<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40056 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "jpcar008___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H2>   February Reports </H2>
<AU>  JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Integration of Party, Government Criticized </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0107A Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese No 12, 11 Dec 93 pp 9-12 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0107A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Fang Wangzhi (2455 2598 0037): "A Critique of </F>
the Integration of the Party With the Government"] 
  [Text] As the party central committee has repeatedly 
emphasized that its reform objective is the self-perfection of 
the socialist system, our reform is principled, objective, and 
directed, not arbitrary, and subjective in neither substance nor 
end-result. Reform must develop China's productive forces to 
increase the overall national might of our country, which is a 
socialist country, not any other kind. Forgetting this point 
would lead our reform astray. 
  For a time now, some have been setting forth the so-called 
"party-government integration" political reform view, wantonly 
publicizing it in the press, beginning to practice it in some 
regions, and regarding it as a successful reform experience for 
dissemination and introduction. Its great impact and rapid 
spread merit much attention. 
  "The integration of the party with the government" means 
integration all the way from the center to provinces, cities, 
and townships in one version, and integration of the party and 
government within enterprises in another. The first version is 
detailed as: "The so-called merging of the party and government 
into one refers to merging party and government organs where 
certain functions are identical or similar, to reduce operating 
links and staffs, and basically achieve a single organization 
flying two flags, with one capable hand taking on the two jobs 
of the party committee and the government." This plan says 
that "as every administrative level from the center to 
provinces, cities, and townships has the two huge governing 
organs of the party committee and the government," they must all 
be merged into one. The second version is detailed as: "This 
mechanism has four features: 1) It makes staffmember duties 
consistent, with overlapping party and government jobs, and dual 
responsibilities for dual posts; 2) It integrates the 
organizational leadership structure, forming two separate 
leading bodies into one integrated group in charge of both 
economic and party work; 3) It consolidates the organizational 
structure, dissolving and merging administrative offices with 
similar functions into a single track; 4) It unifies work goals, 
using systems such as joint party-government meetings and 
responsibility zones to coordinate party and government work." 
  These two positions both violate the party central committee 
spirit on political reform. 
  The party constitution passed by the 14th CPC Congress 
points 
out that "the party's grass-roots organs are its combat fortress 
in primary social organization, as well as the foundation for 
all of its work and combat effectiveness." 
  Can this "foundation" be merged with administrative organs? 
And if it is, will the party still be combat effective? 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping notes that: "The substance of 
political reform needs deliberation. I believe that political 
reform should be aimed at stimulating public initiative to raise 
efficiency and overcome bureaucracy. The substance of reform is 
primarily to separate the party from the government, with the 
key being to resolve the matter of how the party should lead and 
be adept at leadership." 
  So can "party-government merger" replace separating the 
party 
from the government as the particular key to political reform, 
to become our reform direction? 
  Just take a look at Comrade Jiang Zemin's opinion: "To deal 
correctly with party-government relations within enterprises, we 
need to bring the crucial political role of the enterprise party 
organization into full play, while ensuring the effective 
application of the factory director responsibility system. 
Leading party and government personnel can have appropriately 
overlapping jobs, and qualified enterprises can have one person 
concurrently holding the key party and government posts. But we 
need to intensify our political and ideological work to bring 
the role of grass-roots party organs into full play, by teaching 
professional ethics to the vast numbers of party members and 
employees, advocating a spirit of contribution, strengthening 
the sense of responsibility of the working class as the master 
of its own fate, and firmly opposing money worship, hedonism, 
and extreme individualism, in an attempt to build a corps of 
employees that can unite in struggle in the midst of market 
competition." (From a speech on 24 August 1993 at a conference 
of some large and midsize enterprises from the north and 
northeast regions) 
  This speech indicates that while party and government 
leaders 
can be appropriately overlapping, and key party and government 
posts can also be held concurrently by one person, enterprises 
must bring the key political role of party branches into full 
play, with enterprise party branches having the major 
responsibility for ideological and political work among the vast 
numbers of employees. So enterprise grass-roots party organs 
must not be dissolved and merged with administrative organs, 
making "party-government integration" impossible. 
  The argument that party and government organs need to be 
merged all the way from the center to provinces, prefectures, 
counties, and townships--advocating the merger of leading organs 
with those that are led, the CPC Central Committee with the 
State Council, all provincial party committees with people's 
provincial governments, prefectural party committees with 
prefectural commissioner's offices, and county party committees 
with county people's governments--stands essentially for 
dissolving the party into the government, and substituting the 
government for the party, to completely change China's political 
system. While the separation of the party from the government is 
in order to ensure that party committees at all levels focus 
their energies mainly on keeping close ties to the masses, by 
studying new situations and issues to better implement the 
party's line, principles, and policies, and in order to improve 
and strengthen party leadership, "party-government integration" 
dissolves the party into the administration (which is so even 
though the sign party committee still hangs over the doorway), 
thus downplaying and even eliminating the leadership of the 
party. Some time back, the press criticized the fallacy of 
"political pluralism." While this so-called "political 
pluralism" denies the leadership status of the CPC, holding that 
all political parties in China can become ruling parties, by 
assuming power and ruling in turn just like in the various 
European and American countries, the current "party-government 
integration" is even worse than "political pluralism," dimming 
even the very name of the Communist Party itself. If the CPC 
could not speak in the just and honorable name of the CPC, but 
had to speak jointly with administrative organs, what would be 
left of it! 
  The practice of "party-government integration" within 
enterprises, by eliminating grass-roots party organs, would 
leave the party hanging in midair, severely divorcing it from 
the masses and ultimately resulting in its demise. Early in 
Comrade Zhao Ziyang's tenure as general secretary, he used the 
pretext of thoroughly practicing the factory director 
responsibility system to issue documents weakening the key 
political role of enterprise party organizations, severely 
undermining the combat effectiveness of grass-roots party 
organs. The stand for "party-government integration" within 
enterprises would similarly weaken the key political role of 
enterprise party organs. As to the huge role of grass-roots 
party organs, as far back as November 1928, Comrade Mao Zedong 
pointed out in an article entitled "Jinggang Mountains Struggle" 
that "a key factor in the Red Army's brave fight instead of 
defeat and dispersion were the company party branches." These 
"company party branches" ensured the absolute leadership of the 
party over the army, becoming the heart of the company, 
enforcing party orders, sharing weal and woe with the rank and 
file, and having a common destiny, to ensure combat victory. 
This was the origin of the post-Liberation establishment of 
party branches in enterprise shops or teams and groups. This 
is a very effective organizational establishment that has stood 
a longstanding test of practice. It is only when shops or 
teams and groups have party branches that they can have a 
leadership center and guiding organization to keep direct and 
widespread ties to the masses, by transmitting to the masses the 
party's principles and policies, without which they would turn 
into a loose sheet of sand, or even be controlled by unhealthy 
trends and evil practices. It is only the party branches that 
bring the unity to complete production tasks, make the situation 
at the lower levels known to the higher levels in a timely way, 
and inculcate and standardize the words and deeds of every party 
member, so that they can play the role of advanced models, 
understand and teach the surrounding masses, and attract 
advanced elements from the masses into the party ranks, to 
strengthen party might. Liu Shaoqi pointed out in "On the 
Party" that: "As party branches are the party's working units 
among the masses, as well as its bridge linking leadership 
organs with the masses, they must closely connect the masses 
with the party's leading organs." From the perspective of 
leadership work, this "bridge" is absolutely indispensable, as a 
party with only leadership organs but no party branches would be 
inconceivable. A party without a sound grass-roots organization, 
just like water without a source or a tree without roots, would 
eliminate both the regular ties to the masses, as well as work 
among the masses, so could not exist. 
  Saying that enterprise party organizations must play a key 
political role demonstrates precisely their irreplaceable 
impact. While enterprises are production and economic 
organizations, not political ones, they absolutely cannot be 
divorced from politics. In China, while state and collective 
enterprises must strictly submit to socialist political demands, 
private, Sino-foreign joint-venture, and individual enterprises 
also cannot violate basic socialist interests, which is the 
politics of enterprise. It is absolutely wrong to think that a 
socialist market economy can deemphasize politics and does not 
need political indoctrination. While those who promote 
bourgeois liberalization say that it is unnecessary to emphasize 
politics so much, they actually do all they can to promote 
bourgeois politics and eliminate proletarian politics. So who 
ensures the realization of proletarian political objectives? It 
is only enterprise party branches, as this is their major 
responsibility. As enterprise administrative organs are heavily 
burdened with production tasks, they have very little energy to 
devote to this. The party committee secretary at the Beijing 
Internal Combustion Engine Plant says that: "If I was now 
forced to carry all of the weight [of party and government 
duties] on my shoulders alone, I would be exerting 99 percent of 
my energy on business, leaving only 1 percent for party 
building. As I have been a party committee secretary for so many 
years, I am still tied to the line of thinking that I ought to 
be strengthening the party establishment." Such 
straight-from-the-heart talk provides much food for thought. 
  The key grounds of those who advocate "party-government 
integration" is that it will raise work efficiency, an argument 
which is very one-sided. Higher work efficiency depends on 
many factors, mainly increased personnel initiative, not 
"party-government integration." While enterprises must of course 
focus on economic development, this focus needs political 
guarantees. An economy without political guarantees can hardly 
adhere to a socialist orientation, to strictly enforce party 
principles and policies. In particular operations, while 
enterprise party and administrative organs must both emphasize 
business, they each have their particular slant, substance, and 
style, which are not interchangeable. It is only when both 
parties display their strengths that they can fully arouse the 
initiative of talented personnel in all areas to jointly push 
forwrad with enterprise economic development. Merging the party 
with the government would "meld" the method of diversified 
channels and substance into a dependence mainly on 
administrative means, sharply weakening political and 
ideological work, not helping to stimulate initiative, and even 
leading people astray into money worship. 
  As "party-government integration" centralizes power, it 
easily leads to the patriarchal system in which one person alone 
has the say, weakening the party's democratic centralism. While 
some use the pretext that enterprise party and government 
leaders are often subject to "internal waste" (dissenting work 
views) as a stand for "party-government integration," except for 
unprincipled disputes, differing work views is actually a normal 
thing, which is similarly unavoidable under "party-government 
integration." While "one person laying down the law" involves no 
"internal waste," it is also undemocratic. Unprincipled disputes 
need to be settled with the criticism and self-criticism style, 
not being in the category of political reform. 
  "Party-government integration" loses the force of mutual 
restraint between the party and government, making it hard for 
administrative organs to exercise self-control, and engendering 
corruption. 
  As "party-government integration" often leads to factory 
directors having the say, it also abets rule by man, being 
adverse to the establishment of rule by law. 
  Theoretically, "party-government integration" is also wrong. 
A political party is a class organization, representing class 
interests, which is the case in all contemporary social systems. 
So the CPC is a Chinese proletarian organization, representing 
the interests of the Chinese working class and all working 
people. The Chinese regime is a people's democratic dictatorship 
organization, in which all democratic parties that support the 
CPC can take part in organizations of political power. 
Enterprises are economic organizations under the leadership of 
the state. As the Communist Party, state power, and domestic 
economic organizations differ completely in nature, they cannot 
be merged. Merging them would mean eliminating the leadership of 
the proletariat over the state represented by the party, which 
would basically violate our constitutional provisions, as well 
as China's political reform directions and principles. 
  In short, the "party-government integration" view is hardly 
tenable! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40057 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Private Ownership Seen Incompatible With Socialism </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0107B Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese No 12, 11 Dec 93 pp 28-31 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0107B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lin Jian (2651 1017): "Such Having of Assets"] </F>
  [Text] Some have advocated in recent years adding "having 
assets" to the criteria for the new socialist man of "having 
ideals, having morality, having culture, and having discipline," 
to make the "five haves." This so-called "having of assets" is 
explained as referring to private individuals owning "the means 
of production [capital goods] to be used directly for 
production, as well as from which to derive economic benefit," 
such as individual employees holding enterprise shares. This 
differs from the sense of "having assets" under socialism where 
public ownership dominates in which all workers own the means of 
production, as well as not being the meaning of "having assets" 
in possessing individual income through the principle of 
distribution according to work. According to this formulation, a 
new socialist man must have (own) private assets such as shares, 
which excludes from the ranks of the new socialist man not only 
the majority of common employees who do not own such private 
assets, but also even the many heroic models on all fronts. As 
an echo to this, an award-winning article solicited recently by 
a certain southern newspaper applauded the "having of assets," 
and was praised by the awards critic for "being more original 
and forceful than the ordinary criticisms of all eating out of 
one big pot (big-pottism)." 
  It is understood that the grounds for this award-winning 
article being "more original and forceful" were found in "our 
ancestor Marx" on "the ownership of assets." Ground one was that 
the "Communist Manifesto" says that "Communism certainly does 
not divest anyone of the power to own social products," with 
ground two being the wording used in "On Capital" and other 
works that Communism would "reestablish individual ownership." 
While the award winning author came to the "original" deduction 
on these two grounds that "not divesting anyone of the power to 
own social products means not opposing private ownership or 
individual possession of property rights," such an inference is 
just too fantastic. All who have read the "Communist Manifesto" 
know that it contains the famous remark that "Communists can sum 
up their theory in one statement: The elimination of private 
ownership." Does not "the elimination of private ownership" mean 
the elimination of private ownership of the means of production, 
or assets? Did not Communists call their party the "Communist 
Party" because they wanted to "make a complete break with" the 
traditional ownership system, or private ownership, to establish 
a new society based on public ownership? In fact, this makes the 
most rudimentary common sense not only for Communists, but also 
for the ordinary citizens of a country like China that has 
practiced socialism for over four decades. If this were not a 
deliberate misinterpretation, it would be impossible to conclude 
from the sentence that "Communism certainly does not divest 
anyone of the power to own social products," that Marx did not 
oppose private ownership of the means of production. The 
"Communist Manifesto" repeatedly emphasizes the thinking that: 
Private ownership of the means of production, as well as the 
exploitation and pillage of the working masses by the 
bourgeoisie that depends on its private ownership of the means 
of production in fact divests the majority of the members of 
society of their right to own the social products that are the 
results of their own labor. Thus it is necessary to eliminate 
private ownership of the means of production and practice public 
ownership of the means of production in order to restore the 
right of the workers who make up the vast majority of the 
population to possess the products of their own labor; public 
ownership of the means of production is the prerequisite and 
guarantee for the realization of this right of workers. What 
Marx said in On Capital and other works about 
"reestablishing individual ownership," also refers to restoring 
the [right] of workers to the fruits of their own labor premised 
on public ownership of the means of production. Marx explained 
this point very clearly in On Capital as follows: 
"...while capitalist private ownership is the first negation 
of private ownership for individuals based on their own labor, 
capitalist production creates its own negation due to the 
inevitability of the natural process, which is the negation of 
negation. Such negation is a reestablishment not of private 
ownership, but rather of individual ownership based on the 
success of the capitalist age, or on the basis of common 
possession of the means of production produced through 
cooperation, land, and labor per se." (On Capital, 
Volume 1, p 832.) It is thus obvious that turning Marx's 
"Communism certainly does not oppose individual ownership of 
social products" and "reestablishes individual ownership" into 
"does not oppose private ownership of the means of production," 
is a deliberate distortion. So the "grounds" concocted through 
such misrepresentation are a fake and shoddy commodity stuck 
with a Marxist trademark. 
  It is said that this fake and shoddy commodity was created 
as 
a criticism of our traditional economic system's "big-pottism." 
Is this really so? It is not. In fact, the above comment of 
"more original and forceful" backed by such fabricated "grounds" 
is directed certainly not at our traditional economic system's 
"big-pottism," but rather at public ownership that is the basic 
economic system of socialism and the basis for our formation of 
a socialist market economy. Just take a look at the following 
comment: "As having and not having are relative, ownership by 
the whole people means ownership of assets by all the people, or 
that if there are no people without property, there is no not 
having, not to speak of having. Is this not a case of the 
Arabian Nights?" In other words, ownership by the whole people 
is equivalent to no ownership by the whole people. To put it 
bluntly, as the logic of such a comment is impossible for anyone 
with a normal reasoning capacity to follow, how could it not be 
a case of the Arabian Nights! Ownership of the means of 
production by the whole people means that the means of 
production are owned by all members of society as a whole, not 
by any individual or group among all members of society. This is 
the essential feature of ownership by the whole people. Thus, 
insisting that this joint possession of the means of production 
by all of the people means no ownership by the whole people can 
only show that the one who made this comment is looking at 
public ownership through the eyes of the propertied 
"private-slanted mindset" that the "Communist Manifesto" 
ridiculed. Such a private-slanted mindset seems to regard 
"ownership" only as putting things in one's own pocket. In 
addition, "there is no not having, not to speak of having," is 
even more revealing than the private-slanted mindset. What is 
its message? As the one who made this comment found his grounds 
in Marx, then let us cite Marx to reveal this message. Marx said 
to the panic-stricken propertied in the "Communist Manifesto" 
about the elimination of private ownership that: "While you are 
alarmed when we speak about eliminating private ownership, 
private property in your existing society has already been 
eliminated as far as nine-tenths of your members are concerned. 
As such private ownership exists precisely because private 
property does not exist as far as nine-tenths of your members 
are concerned, it is obvious that you are actually blaming us 
for wanting to eliminate the kind of ownership that is premised 
on the vast majority of the members of society not having any 
property." In light of his "there is no not having, not to speak 
of having," is not this commentator trying to turn the existing 
ownership by the whole people into a certain kind of ownership 
in which the minority "own property" premised on "the vast 
majority of the members of society owning no property?" 
  This commentator goes on to say that: "The Chinese people's 
right to the property owned by the whole people is in name but 
not in reality." "It is such a blurring of name with reality 
that has produced a prosperous Canada abroad but a China in 
which all take from the state, a steadily declining production 
zeal and initiative, and ever-lower efficiency." The solution to 
these problems is allowing "citizens to own property." To sum it 
up in a word, as his solution to poor efficiency is to turn 
ownership by the whole people into private ownership, it is 
obvious that the commentator believes that public ownership is 
the root of poor efficiency. In fact, while the poor efficiency 
noted by this commentator did exist in our traditional economic 
system for quite a long time and on quite a broad scale, its 
root was not public ownership, but rather that the inherent 
demands of public ownership were not well realized in our 
traditional system. For instance, while public ownership 
requires rigorous and effective control of public assets, to 
maintain and promote the overall interests of all the people, 
our traditional system certainly did not evolve a system of 
strict rights and obligations to achieve such control, leaving 
production and management operations of public assets without 
effective restraints. Taking another example, while public 
ownership requires the application of the principle of 
distribution according to work for various worker collectives 
and working individuals, our traditional system was one of 
production and operating units all eating out of the state's 
"big pot," with employees all eating out of the production and 
operating units' "big pot," leaving production and operating 
units without motivation, and employees without production 
initiative. Through reforming our traditional economic system to 
practice a socialist market economy, these defects are gradually 
overcome, leaving the inherent demands of public ownership bound 
to be realized. As this sharply raises the efficiency of our 
public economy, blaming the defects of our traditional system on 
public ownership is unreasonable. The view that public ownership 
is inevitably inefficient, and that only private ownership is 
efficient, is even more absurd. Marx long ago refuted this in 
the "Communist Manifesto": "Some have retorted that once private 
ownership is eliminated, all activity will cease with the rise 
of indolence. In which case, bourgeois society should long since 
have withered away through indolence, as its workers do not 
gain, and its gainers do not work." We need to understand that a 
public economy is essentially more efficient than a private one, 
as it has rooted out exploitation to better stimulate worker 
initiative. Seizing on the problems encountered in the course of 
development of the public economy that has a brief history of 
only decades in China, and making an uproar about the view that 
public ownership is inevitably inefficient, shows that the 
private-slanted mindset created through thousands of years of 
private-ownership history dominates the whole thought process of 
these commentators. But strangely enough, the commentator 
still says that "property ownership," or private ownership of 
the means of production, "is unprecedented in China's thousands 
of years of history." So it seems that in addition to 
fabricating Marxist theory, the commentator also needs to 
falsify part of the social development of mankind to support his 
precious view about "more original and forceful." In fact, the 
establishment of public ownership is the thing that is truly 
unprecedented in China's thousands of years of history. No 
matter how those gentlemen governed by the traditional 
private-slanted mindset may curse public ownership--this new 
thing in the history of mankind, Chinese Communists and the 
broad masses will certainly be able to fully shine forth their 
inherent vigor and vitality in the course of reform. 
  Finally, to avoid misunderstanding, we also need to point 
out 
that our opposition to the comments on the so-called "having of 
assets," or on realizing private ownership, certainly does not 
mean that our policy since reform of allowing the non-public 
economy to exist and grow is wrong, or that people cannot hold 
individual assets in forms such as shares, and even less so that 
individuals cannot possess the means of subsistence [consumer 
goods]. As China's level of development of the productive forces 
is still quite low, in a multilevel and unequal state, an 
appropriate development of the nonpublic economy is absolutely 
essential to speed up the development of the productive forces 
and supplement public economy inadequacies. Meanwhile, as 
incomes rise, attracting funds in forms such as issuing shares 
to supplement state construction-investment shortages, is also 
absolutely essential. However, these differ substantively from 
negating and trying to undermine the public economy, and the 
Constitution of the PRC clearly provides for the dominance of 
the public economy. As to those who would exploit the subject to 
their own ends, twist Marxist theory, and thus set off a tide of 
conclusions that private ownership should replace public 
ownership, we will expose and attack them resoundingly. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40058 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0072A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 20 Jun 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0072A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 47, 48, and 49 of the serialized article by </F>
Xu Jiatun: "Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [20 June 93 p 20] </H5>
  [Text] 3. Forming the Consultative Committee (part 2 
of 2): Chen Chih-hui [7115 1807 6540], Tseng En-bo [2582 1869 
3134], and Pu Shao-fu [0592 1421 1133] Did Not Respond; An Zijie 
[1344 1311 0094] Objected To Putting Chen Yao-cai [7115 5069 
2088] on the Committee 
  We should consider soliciting the opinions of Taiwanese 
forces in Hong Kong. Back then, the Taiwanese Government's 
attitude toward the mainland was still very inflexible, and they 
were against the Sino-British negotiations over the Hong Kong 
question. After the Sino-British Joint Declaration was made 
public, the Taiwanese Government also issued its own declaration 
saying that they reserved the right to enter into negotiations 
in the future to take back Hong Kong. But it was unclear whether 
they would stay in Hong Kong or leave after 1997; it was all 
very confusing. To ease Taiwan's concern and win their support 
in drafting and promulgating the Basic Law and influence their 
view on the principle of "one country, two systems," we had to 
find ways to enlist the participation of the influential among 
them. Even if they were not willing to participate out of 
personal concern, or perhaps the Taiwanese Government was 
unwilling to let them participate, we should still be able to 
make public our united stand for the sake of the country. I 
therefore openly named three people, indicating that they were 
welcome to participate: The first was the de facto 
representative of the Taiwanese Government in Hong Kong and 
secretary of the KMT's Hong Kong-Macao headquarters, Chen 
Chih-hui; another was Tseng En-bo, chairman of the board of Hong 
Kong's SHI PAO; the third was Taiwan Legislative Yuan member Po 
Shao-fu. Of the three, Po was more open-minded and had a more 
populist stand and was considered the most likely to attend, and 
therefore his name headed the list. But at the end, none 
responded. Later, Po Shao-fu published an article in the 
newspaper entitled, "Thank You, Xu Jiatun," in which he gave a 
friendly response. We subsequently selected three replacements 
who also had close ties with Taiwan to join the Consultative 
Committee. 
  With regard to the "Fei-Shi incident" ["flying rock 
incident"] -- the incident involving Liu Chien-shi [0491 0578 
4258], I was probably being too extreme. Liu was head of the 
Hong Kong Christian Industrial Council and leader of Hong Kong's 
intermediary unions. Back then, it was thought that he had 
political background and that certain forces were trying to use 
him to start a Polish-style solidarist union in Hong Kong and 
turn him into a Walesa-like personality. Many Hong Kong 
industrialists and entrepreneurs regarded Liu as an adversary. 
In labor wage disputes, his union often asked for unrealistic 
raises, making the terms unacceptable for the owners. Based on 
my unwillingness to give him even more publicity, I disagreed 
with the "leftist" union's -- the Federation of Trade Union 
[FTU]--idea of putting Liu Chien-shi on the Consultative 
Committee. Since the FTU had already made some public 
announcement, my decision caused them to openly break their 
promises, causing them trouble, which made the 
middle-of-the-road and leftist unions unhappy and brought 
unfavorable public response. Facts proved that the FTU was 
right and my rejecting Liu Chien-shi only made him even more 
popular, contrary to what I had wanted. Moreover, even people 
with background have friends; they too must work. 
  After the Consultative Committee list was approved by the 
Hong Kong Basic Law Drafting Committee, An Zijie suggested 
adding several foreign personages in financial and business 
circles to serve as consultants. The several vice chairmen had 
no objection, but to balance things, I suggested adding Chen 
Yao-cai, retired veteran labor leader from the "leftist" "FTU." 
An Zijie objected immediately and was very adamant about it, 
which was very unexpected. The several vice chairmen at the 
scene were stunned and quite embarrassed. Not wanting to make 
things difficult for everybody, I did not pursue the matter. 
  When preparing for the Consultative Committee, there was an 
incident involving the election of the executive committee 
members, chairman, and vice chairman which Hong Kong media 
described as "storm in a teacup." The election was held at the 
downtown Lane Crawford Building. The building was one of Mr. Pao 
Yu-kang's [0545 3768 3068] properties after his purchase of 
"Wheelock." He himself offered to turn over one floor to the 
Consultative Committee to be used as an office. 
  Election of the executive committee members went fairly 
smoothly. Nineteen members were elected from among the entire 
Consultative Committee. The only thing was, Cheng Yao-tang [6774 
5069 2768], labor representative and head of the FTU whom we 
thought had high hopes, lost by one vote. 
  After the executive members were chosen, there was a break, 
and the five initiators talked about electing the chairman and 
vice chairmen. I indicted that based on experience in the 
mainland, we should let the executive members work out a list of 
candidates before proceeding with the election. But the others 
wanted an election right away, and I did not insist. In that 
way, after electing the executive members, the first executive 
committee meeting was convened; it was presided over by Pao 
Yu-kang. He immediately announced the election of a chairman and 
vice chairmen and read from a list of candidates. The executive 
committee members were taken by surprise. Pao Yu-kang asked if 
there were any objection, and one executive committee member 
indicated that he had no objection. Thereupon, Pao said, "if 
there are no objections, please applause, and the motion is 
carried." Everybody applauded, and that was that. After the 
meeting, the executive committee members were not pleased, 
saying that it all moved too fast, that they were not prepared, 
and the process did not comply with committee regulations and so 
on. The reporters asked me about it, and I could only made some 
excuses. Of course, we could not blame it on anybody. It only 
showed that the several vice chairmen, including myself, lacked 
training in democracy. To salvage the situation, I asked Mao 
Jun-nian [3029 6874 1628] to consult the others and follow 
regulations to draw up a new list of candidates and hold another 
election. Although it turned out that the original winners were 
again elected, it still brought some criticisms. 
  On 18 December 1985, the day before the anniversary of the 
formal signing of the Sino-British Joint Declaration, the Hong 
Kong SAR Basic Law Consultative Committee was formally 
established. Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378], in the capacity of 
chairman of the Basic Law Drafting Committee, spoke at the 
meeting. At that time, he was in Hong Kong at the invitation of 
the British Hong Kong government and the Hong Kong branch of 
XINHUA SHE. [Installment No 47] 
<H5>  [21 June 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] 4. Democratic Consultation, Cooperation, and 
Compromise (part 1 of 2): Hong Kong People's Wishes Were Taken 
Into Full Consideration; the Drafting Process Was Completely 
Democratic 
  The air of democracy during the drafting of the Basic Law 
was 
unprecedented. 
  The drafting process in fact was a process of cooperation, 
consultation, and compromise among the parties (primarily 
between China and Hong Kong), and it was also a completely 
democratic process. In a period of four years and eight months, 
the drafting committee held eight conferences, five special 
topic small groups, and met more than 60 times. The mainland's 
drafting committee members came to Hong Kong on several 
occasions to solicit ideas from various parties in Hong Kong, 
and on two of those occasions, formally organized groups were 
sent to solicit opinions in a comprehensive way. They were known 
as the "two ups and two downs." The first of these visits was 
made between May and September of 1988 to gather written 
suggestions for the Draft Basic Laws. The second was made 
between February and 31 October of 1989, whereby opinions on the 
Sixth Session of the Seventh People's Standing Committee's 
examination of the "Draft Basic Law of the Hong Kong SAR" were 
solicited. 
  The Consultative Committee took an objective and 
comprehensive approach when gathering ideas. The committee 
members had a full schedule in Hong Kong and often went to 
Beijing to report on ideas they had collected. On the two 
occasions they made their comprehensive survey of ideas, they 
gathered many suggestions and compiled them into a written 
report. To preserve the originality of the ideas, no 
comprehensive editing was made, but each item was recorded 
individually and reported truthfully, without distortion or 
simplification. The suggestions were "categorized" to make 
reading easier. 
  In addition, through its contact with individuals, groups, 
and others, the Hong Kong branch of XINHUA SHE had also gathered 
many suggestions. XINHUA SHE made special studies of those 
ideas, and some Chinese-funded organizations also heard and 
gathered ideas and brought them to the branch XINHUA SHE. The 
Sino-British Joint Liaison Group and the Hong Kong-Macao Affairs 
Office also obtained some information, and so did party and 
state leaders when they were meeting people from different 
circles in Hong Kong and Macao. 
  It is fair to say that the Hong Kong people's wishes were 
given full consideration in those four years and eight months; 
most ideas were deemed very valuable. They were studied and 
discussed repeatedly, especially by the Drafting Committee. 
  Members of the Drafting Committee in Hong Kong represented 
different interests and different stands; there were few 
consensus. The committee had no problem with the more simple, 
reasonable, and less controversial issues. For example, the 
question of the New Territories' native inhabitants' right to 
inherit land only involved residents of the New Territories; 
there was no controversy, and it was ratified easily and was 
written into Article 40 of the Basic Law. Another example was 
the churches' right to use and inherit properties and accept 
financial aid, which was a concern of the churches but not vital 
to the others, and was quickly decided in the Basic Law. 
  But things were different when it came to issues that 
involved other interests, that were confrontational and 
controversial. For example, on the questions of the Hong Kong 
people's autonomy and the relationship between the central 
government and the government of the SAR, there were many 
disputes. The Drafting Committee had a principle: Do the easy 
things first; that is, tackle the easy, less controversial 
problems first to lay the foundation for the Basic Law and take 
ample time to consider and discuss the difficult problems. 
  As far as the Drafting Committee itself was concerned, in 
order to deal with the relationship between members of the 
mainland drafting committee and the Hong Kong drafting committee 
and between the committee and the outside world, many mainland 
practices were changed to facilitate cooperation and compromises. 
  For example, it is customary to keep everything secret in 
the 
mainland. The secretariat followed mainland practice and brought 
up the secrecy issue at the Drafting Committee' first meeting. 
Hong Kong's Drafting Committee members and the media objected, 
and public opinion demanded that the Drafting Committee's 
activities be made public, and so at the chairman's meeting the 
secretariat asked for a debate and suggested accepting the idea, 
changing past practices. And so it was decided that after each 
special topic small group meeting, a spokesman would talk to 
reporters about the contents of each meeting, but there was one 
provision, that while the contents of all discussions could be 
disclosed, what was said and who said it was strictly 
confidential. If individual committee members chose to disclose 
what he or she had said at a meeting, the Drafting Committee had 
no right to intervene, but the formal briefing (the background 
explanation sessions) would name no names, giving individual 
members the right to choose. Subsequently, the meetings became 
increasingly public. The entire drafting process was basically 
an open process and was completely transparent, drastically 
changing the mainland's usual workstyle and approach. 
[Installment No 48] 
<H5>  [22 June 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] 4. Democratic Consultation, Cooperation, and 
Compromise (part 2 of 2): The Hong Kong People Were Satisfy With 
the Basic Law Prior to "June 4" 
  Between the mainland committee members and the Hong Kong 
committee members, it was the former who tried hard to let the 
latter express their opinions, to accept their ideas, and in the 
actual writing, they tried their best to satisfy the Hong Kong 
drafting committee and honor the Hong Kong people's reasonable 
wishes as much as possible. 
  Meanwhile, the Hong Kong drafting committee members also 
adjusted to the mainland's regulations and discussion 
procedures. For example, when the Consultative Committee drew up 
its regulations, some members objected to the reference to 
"democratic consultation," saying that the term was "imprecise 
and unscientific," and they also felt that it connoted the sense 
that the democratic parties and factions were in agreement with 
the ruling Communist Party. But in the mainland, democracy and 
consultation always go hand in hand. Later a compromise was 
reached, and the term was included in the regulations. I once 
said that consultation was part of democracy, and for that I was 
criticized by some Hong Kong people. 
  Actually it was just a misunderstanding. Consultation can be 
on equal grounds. In the consultative process, there is an 
assertive side, and there is also a side that accepts and 
agrees, or both sides may compromise. Subsequently, in the 
actual drawing up of the Basic Law, many in the Hong Kong 
Drafting Committee and the Consultative Committee accepted this 
approach, and everybody talked things over on equal footing. It 
became a way to give expression to democracy. 
  Prior to the second plenary session of the Drafting 
Committee, the secretariat sent copies of the outline of the 
Draft Basic Law to the chairman and the vice chairmen. The 
reporters came to me, and I said, "I have read it, but I cannot 
disclose the contents." Little did I know that would cause 
trouble. Liu Yiu-chu [1675 3852 3796] asked, "We are all 
members. Why should he get to look at the draft first?" I 
learned my lesson. In the mainland, usually we pay little 
attention to procedure at meetings. To let someone in charge 
look at a draft first was nothing unusal, but in a capitalist 
society, procedure, also known as the rules of the game, is an 
important part of democracy. 
  Later, Li Hou [2621 1775], the Drafting Committee secretary 
general in charge of the secretariat, said, "At first, we 
thought that the outline was not an essential issue; it had no 
substantive content, and we thought that we might as well make a 
rough draft, not knowing that it would lead to such 
misunderstanding. Because of this incident, we have decided to 
set up a special topic small group composed of mainland and Hong 
Kong committee members." Practice later proved that the small 
group approach was very effective. 
  The Basic Law was based on ideas suggested by mainland 
experts and personages concerned about the Hong Kong question as 
well as people from all walks of life in Hong Kong, including 
some foreigners. By way of meetings and the broadcast media, and 
through debates and consultations, the "comment-soliciting 
draft," "rough draft," and "Decision" were written. In my 
opinion, overall, the Hong Kong people were quite satisfied with 
the Basic Law: Prior to "June 4," they were mainly interested in 
whether the Basic Law would really be implemented after 1997. 
After "June 4," they became more dissatisfied with the final 
version of the political system as written in the Basic Law, 
especially regarding Article 23 which amended the 
anti-subversion clause. 
  Overall, the Basic Law was founded on the wisdom of the 
masses and compiled after a complicated consultative process. It 
was the result of compromises and the product of the expression 
of wisdom on both sides. Even today, I still think that it is a 
good choice that will put the people of Hong Kong on the road to 
democratic autonomy. 
<H3>  5. Trouble Over a Booklet (part 1 of 4): British Hong Kong 
Published "Green Paper" and "White Paper" </H3>
  The British Hong Kong government put out the "Green Paper" 
on 
the reform of the system of representative government in July, 
before the Draft Joint Declaration was signed by China and 
Britain in September 1984, and in November, before the formal 
signing of the Sino-British Joint Declaration in December, it 
rushed to publish the "White Paper." In Hong Kong, these actions 
caught our attention, and we began studying them. 
  The British Hong Kong government's goal as stated in the 
"Green Paper" was to "gradually establish a political regime, so 
that its power is firmly rooted in Hong Kong and has the full 
authority to represent the Hong Kong people's views and is held 
responsible to the Hong Kong people even more directly." By the 
time the "White Paper" was published, the goal was even more 
clear: It was to "gradually establish at the central level a 
system of representative government that is even more directly 
responsible to the Hong Kong people and is firmly rooted in Hong 
Kong." 
  The British Government's goal was very clear. It was to set 
up a system of representative government in Hong Kong and 
practise so called "returning the government to the people." 
  From our own intelligence and from public opinion trends, we 
had proof of British intention to radically change the basic 
framework of the Hong Kong government prior to 1997. 
[Installment No 49] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40059 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0113A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 25 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0113A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 52 of Hong Kong Memoirs by Xu </F>
Jiatun (6079 1367 1470), [former director of the Hong Kong 
Office of the New China News Agency, China's unofficial embassy 
in Hong Kong]: "A Storm About My Statement -- With the Support 
of Figures, Such as Wan Li, It Did Not Cause a Great Storm in 
Beijing, with Britain Finally Compromising, and Both Sides 
Taking a Path of Cooperation"] 
  [Text] Various international news agencies also carried 
reports, leading certain Japanese and French banks to ask 
their Hong Kong connections to find and ask me in person: "What 
is the problem between China and Britain?" 
  And a friend from press circles asked someone to pass on the 
word to me that: "Your statement was too intense, being much 
too damaging to your image!" 
  I received phone calls from certain friends, some telling me 
about public and international reactions, some expressing 
support, and yet others indirectly reflecting differing views, 
making the well-meant suggestion that the future statements 
should emphasize deportment. And I also received certain 
"letters from the people," expressing support and encouragement. 
  Bao Yugang [0545 3768 0474] also sought me out to express 
support: "While you have spoken very well, and it was about 
time, certain Chinese as well as British friends also agree with 
you." He also said that: "Good principles also say that you have 
spoken well!" 
  Later, Jardine Matheson's Simon Kaise expressed to me 
directly his dissatisfaction with the British Hong Kong 
government's method of representative government, sympathizing 
with my statement. 
  While I had expected differing stands and reactions, I had 
never anticipated the reaction to my sense of propriety, 
particularly to my deportment. So I learned my lesson, and 
strove to prevent its recurrence on future public occasions. 
  This "storm about my statement" also aroused the attention 
of 
Beijing, with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) and the 
[State Council] Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office (HKMAO) 
sending me telegrams asking what I had said. My colleagues in 
our branch of the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY (NCNA) were quite tense, 
wondering whether the inquiries meant that a mistake had been 
made. So I reported the news record to the MOFA, the HKMAO, 
the CPC Central Committee, and the State Council, as well as 
consoling my colleagues that there was no need for concern, as 
the matter had not been handled wrong. Even if it had and 
Beijing criticized us, I was responsible, as "the statement was 
mine." 
  The MOFA's diplomatic language of "considering both sides 
and 
speaking around the issue" was essentially noncommittal, showing 
China's conflict in dealing with my statement. When the 
British side criticized my statement at a meeting of the 
Sino-British Joint Liaison Group, the Chinese side's chief 
representative, Ke Zaishuo [2688 0961 3617], responded that this 
was "unfair," differing from MOFA's tacit consent, and 
stretching to convey China's position. I considered that he 
might have used such a "neutral" term only because he either was 
not obeying MOFA instructions, or had not received them (which 
possibility was not great). I believe that he felt very awkward. 
  When Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] [chairman of the Basic Law 
Drafting Committee for the Hong Kong Special Administrative 
Region, and director of the HKMAO] later visited Hong Kong, he 
asked me: "What did you say at the time?" After I had told him, 
he had nothing further to say. (In fact, his question was 
unnecessary, as I had already reported by telegram, as well as 
attaching the news account.) I knew that his view differed, so 
did not discuss it further. And when a reporter asked him on a 
public occasion his view on the "storm about my statement," he 
did not take a stand. At a cocktail party given for him by 
industrial and commercial circles, when Mauridge of the Hong 
Kong Chamber of Commerce (generally known as the West's Chamber 
of Commerce, as its members were mostly British merchants) 
"complained" to him, criticizing my statement, Ji Pengfei 
actually said nothing despite the fact that I was standing not 
far from them, making me feel that he had gone a bit too far. 
But at a luncheon after he had spoken with Hong Kong Governor 
Wilson, when someone again mentioned the "storm about my notes," 
he finally made the statement that: "As it seems to have 
motivated Britain to dovetail' with us, it did have an impact." 
  While Ji Pengfei was visiting Hong Kong, the news came from 
Beijing that the "storm about my statement" had also set off a 
"storm" in Beijing, with the MOFA and the HKMAO complaining 
about me to the Central Committee and State Council, arousing 
the attention of the Central Committee. At a meeting of the 
CPC Central Committee Secretariat, Wan Li said that: "I have 
read the whole text of Xu Jiatun's statement, and believe that 
it contains no problems." So it seems that the support of 
figures, such as Wan Li, kept the storm from blowing up in 
Beijing. 
  At a meeting with Deng Xiaoping in the first half of 1986, 
he 
asked me: "Did you not make a statement that aroused 
controversy?" While I did not know if he was referring to its 
internal or external controversy, I said: "Yes. It caused much 
trouble." Whereupon Deng said: "You were not wrong. If you had 
not made that statement, allowing Britain to go on as it had, 
Hong Kong would have certainly been thrown into chaos." State 
Councilor Gu Mu was at that meeting with Deng. When I returned 
to Hong Kong and discussed the matter with my NCNA colleagues 
there, they suggested that: "You ought to write a report to 
the MOFA and HKMAO, to let them know about this." While my 
colleagues' idea was a very good one, I felt that it was 
unnecessary, as I had always felt that I had done nothing wrong. 
  One month after the "storm about my statement," Britain 
expressed acceptance of the principle that representative 
government would be dovetailed with the Basic Law, even though 
much mutual controversy still remained over the political system 
issue. After this, in the course of the drafting of the Basic 
Law, both sides entered a stage of cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40060 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0113B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 26 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0113B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment 53 of Hong Kong Memoirs by Xu </F>
Jiatun: "An Emphasis on Hong Kong's Stability--Zhao Ziyang 
Said That the Collapse of Hong Kong's Economy Would Be 
Unbearable for the Central Government, Being Concerned That 
Instituting Democratic, Representative Government Too Quickly 
Would Cause Unrest"] 
  [Text] Zhao Ziyang had warned me that in order to maintain 
Hong Kong's stability and prosperity, "its economy must not be 
allowed to collapse. On the (one in ten thousand) chance that 
it did, the burden would be too great for us to bear." 
  I agreed with Zhao Ziyang's view, having calculated at the 
time that the Hong Kong government had annual revenues of $36 
billion HK and annual expenditures of over $30 billion HK, 
meaning that at the exchange rates of the time, Hong Kong was 
spending over $10 billion RMB, or more than Jiangsu Province's 
annual revenues of over $7 billion RMB. 
  If Hong Kong's economy collapsed, in order to maintain Hong 
Kong's spending, not to speak of $10 billion RMB, could the 
Central Government come up with even $3-5 billion RMB to support 
the Hong Kong government? This was highly unlikely. And in 
light of Hong Kong's economic development realities, it would be 
necessary first to preserve Hong Kong's social stability, or 
relative social stability, in order to even attempt to maintain 
its economic prosperity. This was a primary consideration in 
both the Sino-British talks, as well as in the process of 
drafting the Basic Law. 
  Hong Kong was situated in the heart of the Asia-Pacific 
region, in relation to which Hong Kong alone was relatively 
stable. China itself had been through decades of unrest, and 
Southeast Asia had also been in a state of constant upheaval. 
  Hong Kong's stability depends mainly on China. China's Hong 
Kong policy under the KMT had been not to regain sovereignty, 
but rather to maintain the status quo, which policy remained in 
effect after the founding of the PRC. In modern history, Hong 
Kong had experienced instability only twice. The first time 
was the Japanese invasion of China, when Hong Kong was occupied 
for three years and eight months, which was the longest period 
of turbulence in Hong Kong's history. The second was two brief 
periods of instability after the founding of the PRC: In 1956, 
when the KMT engineered an insurrection in Kowloon and 
Ch'uan-wan; and in 1967, when the CPC led the so-called 
"Anti-British resistance," neither of which two periods of 
instability lasted very long. 
  After the Sino-British talks began, Hong Kong also 
experienced sharp turbulence, with stocks and real estate 
plummeting abruptly, and capital flight and emigration coming in 
severely growing waves, the fundamental cause of which was 
economic, with supply exceeding demand. This, in addition to 
political factors, meant that China's recovery of Hong Kong was 
touching off some unrest. 
  In short, Hong Kong's long-standing stability, in addition 
to 
its economic and monetary policies of freedom and low taxes that 
had turned Hong Kong into a capital and refugee haven for China 
and many Southeast Asian countries and regions, were also 
factors in the development of Hong Kong's funding and talent. It 
could be said that Hong Kong was prosperous precisely because it 
was more stable than other regions. 
  So how could we continue its stability? The external factors 
were very hard to predict and estimate. If the British Labor 
Party came to power, might it change Britain's Hong Kong policy? 
For instance, might it radically change Hong Kong's democratic 
course, or take a harder line in Sino-British relations? Might 
Taiwan continue its past practice of stirring up unrest in Hong 
Kong? We estimated such a possibility to be very small, as 
Taiwan was busy enough with its own affairs, so that stirring up 
unrest in Hong Kong would have few pluses. And while it was 
possible that China itself might turn "left," this was not seen 
as a major consideration at the time, as we held it to be 
unlikely. 
  We were most concerned about two possibilities: First, that 
Western and Taiwanese forces might exploit Hong Kong to effect a 
change of system in inland China and undermine inland security, 
by turning Hong Kong into an anti-Communist outpost. In fact, as 
they had long since acted in this way, at issue was whether they 
would go so far as to make things unbearable for China. 
  Second, we were concerned that instituting democratic, 
representative government too quickly might be too hard for the 
various social strata to adapt to, causing unrest and affecting 
investor confidence. 
  In light of the past experiences of the Philippines, Taiwan, 
South Korea, India, and certain African countries in instituting 
democratic government, the transition of colonized countries to 
democracy almost always led to social unrest, affecting investor 
confidence. As these countries were all larger than Hong Kong, 
which had a tiny area and sensitive people, chaos such as had 
occurred in Manila, Seoul, and even India would be inconceivable. 
  In addition to these external factors in Hong Kong's 
stability and prosperity, there were also two internal factors: 
1) The British administration; 2) local Chinese endeavors. Of 
these two factors, while the major one was the endeavors of the 
local people, particularly the Chinese, from a policy and 
administrative perspective, the British Hong Kong government's 
administrative expediting of Hong Kong's stability and 
prosperity was also an objective fact that should not be ruled 
out. 
  The Hong Kong Administration had three features. One was its 
colonial nature. The Hong Kong governor appointed by the 
British Crown held centralized power, not only holding political 
power, but also being the supreme local military officer, as 
well as probably the highest official in charge of the region's 
intelligence system. The Hong Kong administration represented 
not only the British Government, but also the interests of U.S. 
capitalists, including participation by local Hong Kong 
spokesmen for British financial groups, such as Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corp and Jardine Matheson spokesmen serving as 
Executive Council (EXCO) members, as well as British 
financial-group delegates, such as T'ai-Ku and Chartered Bank 
delegates in EXCO. (This was prior to 1983, as Jardine Matheson 
and Chartered Bank had no EXCO members in later years). 
  Later, the Hong Kong administration began to recruit 
participation by Chinese delegates having good relations with 
Britain, with new developments occurring in this area after the 
publication of the Sino-British Joint Declaration, in that most 
of those recruited for the future SAR Government were capable of 
maintaining more ties to the British side. And the government 
leadership also saw a noncolonialist change. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40061 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0113C Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 27 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0113C </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment 54 of Hong Kong Memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun: "An Emphasis on Hong Kong's Stability -- One of the 
Hong Kong Government's Three Features Was Its Outstanding 
Consultative Political Framework, in Which the Hong Kong 
Governor, the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation, and 
the Race Track Constituted the Three Governors of Hong Kong"] 
  [Text] The Hong Kong administration's second feature was 
its establishment of an outstanding consultative political 
framework. 
  Hong Kong's Executive and Legislative Councils (EXCO and 
LEGCO) were clearly the advisory bodies for the Hong Kong 
governor, who was president of both councils. While EXCO was 
the Hong Kong governor's most important advisory and 
policymaking body, all key decisions of the Hong Kong 
administration were made by the Hong Kong governor. Almost all 
of the highest officials in the Hong Kong administration were 
members of EXCO. 
  The Hong Kong administration's LEGCO, in addition to having 
appointments of some government officials as 
"administration-defense members," also recruited some 
outstanding public figures from areas, such as industrial and 
commercial circles, the professional world, and mid- and 
upper-level figures from certain community groups. The Hong Kong 
public elected each year 10 outstanding young people, a great 
many of whom, such as Li P'eng-fei [2621 7720 7378] and Li 
Chu-ming [2621 2691 6900], were recruited by the Hong Kong 
government to take part in the administration. 
  These figures took part in the administration in an advisory 
capacity, having no decisionmaking authority. While EXCO 
proposals were submitted for discussion to LEGCO, which could 
propose ammendments, the final decisionmaking authority on their 
acceptance rested with the Hong Kong governor. 
  The Hong Kong administration's practice of this consultative 
system contributed to Hong Kong's economic development. 
  As the Hong Kong administration had organized an advisory 
committee of over 300 members appointed by the Hong Kong 
administration, including outstanding figures from all walks of 
life, it was said that the administration was an outstanding 
regime. Generally speaking, whenever there was an issue, a 
particular profession had any legislative problems, or the 
government proposed a program, the pertinent departments would 
solicit opinions from the advisory committee, whose views were 
submitted to the pertinent departments, EXCO, and the Hong Kong 
governor for either adoption or ammendment. 
  While this consultative system was essentially within the 
Hong Kong governor's monopoly-power political framework, it did 
enable the Hong Kong governor within certain limits to give a 
little "democracy" to mid- and upper social levels, providing 
them with opportunities to both learn about government decisions 
in advance, as well as to express their opinions, so could be 
said to be a certain degree of "participatory" or 
"representative" government. 
  Hong Kong's 19 district assemblies were also part of the 
consultative framework, aimed at providing residents with a 
certain degree of participation in district affairs. These 
district assemblies mostly joined grassroots mid- or lower- 
levels, with each district assembly carrying out a "plan for 
meeting with residents," so that residents from the district 
could make appointments for meetings with district assembly 
members, in order to express their views on any district 
matters, and propose means of making improvements. 
  Hong Kong's 19 districts had 71 advisory service centers 
where questions about government work were answered free of 
charge, with 127 sub-district committees and over 4,000 village 
organizations to provide the government with a widespread and 
quite effective liasion network with grassroots residents. 
  As the Hong Kong administration consulted with residents 
through these channels, this consultative organization became a 
key part of the ruling framework under the control of the Hong 
Kong administration's government affairs office. 
  Hongkongers said that Hong Kong had three governors: 1) the 
governor appointed by the British Crown; 2. the board chairman 
of the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation who, with his 
decisive financial might and prerogatives, had become Hong 
Kong's financial "governor"; 3) the Racing Association, which 
could be said to be the psychological ruler of quite a few 
Hongkongers. 
  The Racing Association held horse races twice a week for 
four 
months out of the year (June through September), with the 
betting reaching tens of millions of dollars [HK] a race, 
hundreds of millions a racing day, 12 billion for all of 1983, 
and over 30 billion by the eve of my departure in 1989. Hong 
Kong had two horserace tracks, the older one dirt and the newer 
sand, where each race not only saw the stands packed with tens 
of thousands of people, but also included offtrack bettors, 
attracting up to a million people, all of whom hoped to win. 
Every week brought two chances for several bettors to get rick 
quick and become mid- and small-size millionaires, while others 
went bankrupt and committed suicide. I held that while most 
people could be said to be "willing taxpayers" for the 
government, the Racing Association acted as a narcotic to make 
residents unconsciously satisfied with the status quo, with many 
trying to get rich by luck instead of looking for other routes 
to wealth. 
  There was also a lottery, which twice a week created several 
millionaires and nouveau riches, playing the same role. 
  As British Hong Kong rule was quite successful, the mid and 
upper levels of society certainly did not essentially contain 
any organized mindset to overthrow colonial rule, developing a 
rather widespread dependent mentality instead. As Hong Kong's 
upper levels, and even quite a few mid-level figures, lacked 
political independence, it must be said that Britain's colonial 
rule in this case was successful. The Hong Kong administration 
also awarded each year several imperial decorations of various 
grades, such as "Gentleman of Peace" and "OBE," which were 
conferred on outstanding public figures from all walks of life 
by the Hong Kong governor himself, or even by the Queen, as well 
as rewarding administration officials for "achievements or 
contributions," thus winning over Hongkongers' hearts, giving 
them a sense of honor and belonging. But other Hongkongers 
poked fun at these decorations, calling them "Dutch water (soda) 
bottlecaps." 
  Generally speaking, the Hong Kong administration formed the 
structure for rule of Hong Kong by the Hong Kong administraion 
through the law, the police, the military, and the 
consultative organization, accompanied by social organizations, 
such as the Racing Association, charitable institutions, and 
churches. British rule in Hong Kong was a sort of "benevolent" 
dictatorship. Or it could be called conciliatory rule with a 
large degree of freedom. While it was not democratic, it did 
give people, without threatening British colonial rule, various 
opportunities to vent their discontent or dissent, which 
discontent and dissent was heard and ameliorated to a certain 
extent. 
  The third feature of the Hong Kong administration was that 
it 
had a civil service. The Hong Kong administration's various 
departments were essentially composed of permanent staffs, who 
needed certain qualifications (such as professional knowledge), 
but had lifetime employment through set procedures of internal 
training and promotions. Moreover, officials had only to swear 
allegiance to the British Crown, not being troubled with the 
problem of having to maintain neutrality in party struggles, 
giving them an even greater sense of dedication. 
  These three major features of the Hong Kong administration 
showed that British rule in Hong Kong for the last century plus, 
particularly the last several decades, had been successful in 
maintaining Hong Kong's stability, particularly its economic 
growth in the last two decades. So when drawing up the Basic 
Law, we needed to notice and utilize this, discarding its 
colonialism, assimilating its freedom, and developing its 
democracy, as one of our key grounds for establishing after 1997 
a highly autonomous democratic system with prosperity and 
stability. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40062 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0114A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 28 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0114A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment 55 of Hong Kong Memoirs by Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Democracy in Hong Kong Must Proceed Step by Step' 
-- When Li Hou Proposed the Separation of Powers, Deng Xiaoping 
Was Opposed to It, With the Hong Kong British Surreptiously' 
Initiating a Wave of Democracy in Hong Kong"] 
  [Text] As the political-system program, or what kind of 
political system the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region 
(SAR) would practice after 1997, was the most controversial, 
complex, and difficult issue in the course of formulating the 
Basic Law, it was also the most time-consuming and volatile 
problem. 
  The Chinese Government's conception of Hong Kong's political 
system after 1997 was to maintain the British Hong Kong 
Administration's status quo essentially unchanged, being 
depicted in Liao Chengzhi's [1675 2110 1807] terms as "a change 
of national flag," with "the Hong Kong governor becoming a 
Hongkonger appointed by China." 
  But the Sino-British Joint Declaration's Appendix 1 on the 
SAR's political-system clause differed substantively from the 
Chinese Government's original conception. 
  In the drafting of the Basic Law, the sharpest controversies 
were mainly in two areas: 1) On "the Hong Kong SAR's enjoyment 
of executive, legislative, independent judicial, and final 
judgment authority." 2) On "the Hong Kong SAR's legislature 
being elected, with the executive having to observe the laws 
and being responsible to the legislature." The crux of the 
controversy was: Would the SAR's political system be one of a 
tripartite balance of powers, with mutual checks and balances? 
Would the "executive" or "legislature" dominate? 
  As I did not take part in the Sino-British talks (as Li 
Jusheng [2621 5468 3932] had blocked me from the early-stage 
talks), the only records that I could see were mostly 
"verdicts," making it very hard for me to see the crux of the 
controversy. But by the time of the drafting of the Basic Law, 
the controversy came to light. I guessed at the time that the 
Chinese consideration for after 1997 was that: As the former 
colonial government was not democratic, it would need to be 
changed somewhat; and these Chinese democratic plans had induced 
the British to promote a representative system. Or possibly it 
was the British who had proposed the representative-system idea 
in the talks. But regardless of which side was responsible for 
it, it was certain that the Chinese had never reckoned during 
the negotiations with Britain's "surreptiousness" before the two 
sides had even reached agreement, in that it would "rush" to 
promote the representative system during the last 12 years of 
its jurisdiction, to change its promise in the Sino-British 
Joint Declaration to "return administration to China" into 
"returning administration to the people." (While the 
Sino-British Joint Declaration had stated that "the two kingdoms 
jointly declare that the governments of the two kingdoms will 
return Hong Kong to the PRC on 1 July 1997," the British had 
still set forth in a "white paper" the "need to gradually 
establish at the Administration's central level a representative 
system that is more directly responsible to the people and 
firmly rooted in Hong Kong.") 
  Li Hou [2621 0683] [deputy director of the State Council's 
Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office (HKMAO)] did not at first 
seem to understand Britain's plot. At a meeting in Macao of the 
Basic Law Political System Group that he chaired, he had 
proposed that the future SAR Administration would practice a 
"separation of powers" program, with executive, legislative, and 
judicial authority being separate and having mutual checks and 
balances. This not only was out of line with the understanding 
of the Central Government's views by the Hong Kong and Macao 
Working Committee of the time, but also before long was 
disagreed with by Deng Xiaoping as expected. 
  As to the executive being "responsible" to the legislature, 
Lu Ping [7627 1627] [deputy secretary general of the Basic Law 
Drafting Committee for the Hong Kong SAR and deputy director of 
the HKMAO] explained this to Hong Kong reporters as being 
legislative consultation, just as the then relationship between 
the British Hong Kong Administration and the Legislative Council 
(LEGCO). And the response to public calls for the British 
Government to explain this was also very vague. I doubted at 
the time whether the "senior advisor" of the Chinese Planning 
Committee would clarify the issue in the Sino-British talks. 
This was because in a discussion of the "decade of great 
changes remaining in effect for 50 years" by the Hong Kong and 
Macao Working Committee, its "chairman," Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 
7378] [chairman of the Basic Law Drafting Committee for the Hong 
Kong SAR and director of the HKMAO] had sighed to me about the 
provision on "the legislature being elected," that "he had not 
added consultation' at the time, as he had not fully reckoned 
with Britain's (intentions)." (The Sino-British Joint 
Declaration provided that the SAR Chief Executive would be 
produced through either election or consultation.) 
  The British Hong Kong Administration's "surreptitous rush" 
to 
promote a representative system touched off a wave of democracy 
unprecedented in Hong Kong's history. This was the British 
Hong Kong Administration's brilliant "public opinion card" 
stroke, which intensified Hong Kong's social division and 
unrest. Outstanding mid-level and grassroots figures, who had 
no confidence in China and were dissatisfied with the public 
status quo and their own plight, came out with calls for rushing 
to democracy, some of whom were dependent on British Hong Kong 
largesse while considering it inadequate. Of course, many were 
also trying to exploit the struggle between China and Britain to 
win democracy from both sides. While this led to a surge toward 
democracy by various types, the "silent types" were probably 
still in the majority. 
  It should be pointed out that while Hong Kong had never 
questioned the social climate of its politics, this [wave of 
democracy] began a fundamental change that has gradually evolved 
to turn Hong Kong into one of the world's regions with a rare 
and maximum political sensitivity. 
  As to this wave of democracy, most of the upper levels of 
society were laden with anxiety. Most Hong Kong Chinese big 
bourgeoisie had been economically dependent on the British at 
first. And while some later had vanquished British capital in 
market competition, even supplanting it in some areas, they had 
not yet completely overcome this dependence, at least not 
financially. As they lacked political independence, their 
major aspiration was to maintain the status quo. Confronted 
with the ever-surging wave of democracy, they started out with 
no ideological preparation, and with even less preparation for 
playing the democracy game, which turned into concern that 
middle and lower class participation in and control over 
political affairs would change the status quo, bringing great 
calls for a "free lunch" and sharply higher taxes that would 
lose them their advantage in Hong Kong's moneymaking paradise. 
But while democracy was a wave that could not be opposed 
"rationally" or stopped with "force," leaving them for some time 
in a state of depression and vacillation, the process of 
drafting the Basic Law made some of them dependent on China, in 
order to cope with the Hong Kong democracy wave's ideas and 
actions. 
  The big capitalists had the same position among both the 
British financial groups and the Chinese. Chia Tao-li [0857 
6670 3810] endorsed and supported my "statement-storm" speech, 
as well as telling me directly after the 4 June incident that he 
supported the middle-of-the-road plan proposed by business world 
figures, such as Luo K'ang-jui [5012 1660 3843]. And Simon 
Kaise told me twice that he was dissatisfied with the position 
of Hong Kong's democratic radicals. 
  They held that as Hong Kong was founded on stability, 
instituting democracy too quickly might cause unrest that would 
produce an investor-confidence problem. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40063 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs Continued </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0114B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 29 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0114B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment 56 of Hong Kong Memoirs by Xu </F>
Jiatun: "Democracy in Hong Kong Must Proceed Step by 
Step'--While Lower and Middle Level Democracy Radicals Had 
Organized in Embryonic Form, the Upper Level Had Still Not 
Awakened to the Lack of Public Checks and Balances"] 
  [Text] As China had gradually begun to recognize Britain's 
tactics of "surreptiously pushing" to promote a representative 
system after the British Hong Kong Administration had issued its 
"green paper," it formulated its own tactics that the 
representative system would have to be "dovetailed" with the 
Basic Law to restrict the pace of Britain's administrative 
reform, i.e., that "they would have to act according to their 
statements." 
  While most people in a society with no democratic traditions 
were not ideologically prepared for democracy, so were unsuited 
to it, particularly the upper levels who were anxious about it, 
the push toward democracy had already become a fact, leaving the 
only possibility being to retreat to a second line of defense 
and consider its rate of advance, which was logical. 
  In the course of drafting the Basic Law, the crux of the 
political-system controversy was over whether democracy would 
occur "fast," "slow," "more," or "less." During my time with the 
Basic Law Drafting Committee in Guangzhou, I had responded to a 
Hong Kong reporter's question on democrats and conservatives 
that: Hong Kong's democracy dividing line is one of radical or 
moderate democracy, not of democracy or conservatism (without 
remembering the specific words, this was my general idea). But 
this controversy certainly evolved into an intricate and complex 
dispute between China and Britain and between China and Hong 
Kong, becoming so complicated and confusing that it was hard for 
the public to see the true facts. 
  China had designed Hong Kong's political reform pace 
according to Deng Xiaoping's thinking on "general elections" 
"proceeding step by step," which Britain had later essentially 
accepted in [then Hong Kong governor] Wilson's public version of 
"advancing gradually in due order," which Deng Xiaoping had 
immediately endorsed publicly. This "advancing gradually in 
due order" was a substitute term for "proceeding step by step." 
  Most democracy radicals were in the middle and lower-middle 
levels of the middle (middle bourgeoisie) stratum, who were 
calling for equality of upward mobility politically, 
economically, and as to human values. Such calls gave no cause 
for much criticism, as they needed to be designed into the 
political system within the democratic framework of the Basic 
Law needing to consider them. And most democracy moderates were 
in the upper and middle-upper levels of society, quite a few of 
whom had originally not endorsed a democratic political system, 
but had later seen that democracy was unavoidable, so were 
forced to meekly submit, while still being concerned about too 
much or too fast democracy. The drafting of the Basic Law set 
off new hopes that democracy would protect vested interests, or 
even bring greater benefits and new enjoyments politically, 
economically, and as to human values. So the "proceeding step 
by step" or "advancing gradually in due order" principle for 
practicing a democratic political system, gave consideration to 
both democracy radicals and moderates, striving for a compromise 
to reduce unrest. 
  But the varying degrees of mobilization of the various 
social 
strata was also a problem. 
  The situation in Hong Kong at the time was that while some 
in 
the upper, middle, and grassroots levels already had democratic 
political and government aspirations, most people had not yet 
been organized. But the lower and middle level's organized 
"pressure groups" had already appeared in embryonic form. 
During the Sino-British talks, all social forces, mainly the 
middle level's lower-middle strata, organized various new social 
groups, which gradually began to collaborate. 
  My own internal analysis at the time was that: The 
situation was much like that of the initial inland anti-Japanese 
struggle, in which various elements had organized guerrilla 
forces, with those possessing a few guns acting as "commanders," 
and "commanders sprouting up like weeds" for a time. These 
guerrilla forces grew, with the large eating the small, and the 
strong gobbling up the weak, to gradually merge into a large 
guerrilla force, and even into a "regular" army. And this group 
development in Hong Kong could also take a similar path to grow 
into a political party. 
  But as most of the upper bourgeoisie had not yet awakened, 
while the middle and lower strata had already gone into action, 
society lacked organized checks and balances. 
  As to Li Hou's proposal that the future Hong Kong SAR 
Government practice "the separation of powers," this was based 
mostly in Western nations on political-party politics, with 
multiparty elections and majority-party rule. As these 
governments had majority-party support in congress, they could 
ensure that their political orders were passed. But Hong Kong 
had no political parties, with the big and middle bourgeoisie 
essentially not yet having organized. Even if they had 
organized, it would have been hard to achieve the right climate 
in a short period of time. Meanwhile, the democracy radicals 
representing the middle and lower social strata were organized 
in embryonic form (after the 4 June incident, the democracy 
radical forces did certainly further expand to appear in a 
political party form). I estimated at the time that the 
continuation of this could very likely lead to a general 
situation before 1997 of one-party legislation, with antagonism 
after 1997 among the Chief Executive, the administrative sector, 
and the Legislative Council, making it impossible or hard to 
pass any bills, leaving nothing of the Hong Kong 
administration's original efficiency, and touching off 
political, social and internal-administration turbulence. 
This meant that the "separation of powers" plan was out of 
line with Hong Kong's realities. Before long, on 16 April 
1987, Deng Xiaoping publicly disagreed in a meeting with the 
Hong Kong [Basic Law] Drafting Committee with the "separation of 
powers," showing that this idea of Li Hou and others did not 
conform to the Central Government spirit. 
  Li Hou and Lu Ping also publicly stated at the time that 
they 
did not approve of the emergence of political parties in Hong 
Kong. This [the emergence of political parties in Hong Kong] 
was also out of line with Deng Xiaoping's thinking and Hong 
Kong's realities. So when reporters asked me about Li Hou and 
Lu Ping's statements, I could only respond that "those are their 
personal views." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40064 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Five Issues for State Bond System Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0253B Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 20 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0253B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Xiaosi (7115 1420 0934) and Wan Laiyou </F>
(8001 0171 0645), affiliated with the Huanggang branch of the 
PBOC in Hubei Province: "Five Issues Regarding State Bond System 
Reform"] 
  [Text] State bonds (national treasury bonds) are a national 
liability based on the credit principle obtained through 
borrowing from domestic citizens and units in the form of bond 
sales. While China's resumption of state bond sales in 1981 has 
raised a lot of funds for the state, playing an important role 
in supplementing fiscal deficits, supporting economic 
development, and balancing revenues with expenditures, our state 
bond system went into effect rather late, so that it still 
contains certain practical and theoretical issues and weak links 
that are in urgent need of study and resolution. 
<H5>  An Appropriate State Bond Sales Volume </H5>
  The sale of state bonds certainly does not directly increase 
the overall amount of social funds, rather only temporarily 
changing the flow of some social funds, shifting financial 
resources not under government control to government control, 
and making it essentially a redistribution of social funds. So 
premised on a set overall amount of social funds, state bonds 
should be sold in a rational volume, which if too low could not 
ease our current fiscal problems, and if too high might create 
repayment problems for state revenue. China's state bond sales 
are now too arbitrary and high in volume. In the decade from 
1981 through 1990 alone, China's state bond sales volume grew at 
an average rate of 25.86 percent a year, exceeding our average 
state revenue growth rate of 15.09 percent a year, and far 
surpassing our average social gross output value growth rate of 
16.22 percent a year, making it out of line with our economic 
growth. Since 1988, we have repeatedly postponed the repayment 
of capital with interest on matured state bonds purchased by 
units, leaving our debt burden growing larger each year. 
Meanwhile, as our national balance of revenue and expenditure 
has seen constant deficits in recent years, these excessive bond 
sales have affected our repayment capability and our national 
prestige. So the setting of a state bond sales volume should 
arouse much attention. 
  Based on the experiences of advanced nations throughout the 
world combined with China's realities, our state bond sales 
volume should be subject to the following three limiting 
factors: 1) Our national economy's growth rates. Our state 
bond sales volume growth should be consistent with that of our 
social gross product, national income, and revenues, with this 
optimum-balance effect being used to determine whether sales 
volume is appropriate. 2) Our debt subject's operating 
capability. As our state bond debt subject is the government, 
this means that we must first learn the overall amount of 
government debt, on which basis to calculate the ratio scale of 
overall debt to the state's tangible funds and capital. 3) 
Social sustainability. Our state bond sales scale must consider 
social sustainability, including funding, material, and social 
sustainability. Based on China's existing debt burden and 
possible state revenue sustainability, China's annual state bond 
sales volume in recent years should have made up about 10 
percent of the year's fiscal spending. 
<H5>  Manipulating Our State Bond Sales Term Structure </H5>
  State bond sales terms come in long, medium, and short, with 
the ratio of long-, medium-, and short-term state bonds to state 
bond sales or accumulated overall volume being called the state 
bond term structure, which directly determines the length of the 
state's period of use of state bond revenue. All social funds, 
when idle, also come in long-, medium-, and short-term. While 
state bonds, as an effective means of attracting funds, should 
also be adapted to this feature, with a diversified 
term-structure policy, since China resumed state bond sales in 
1981, they have been generally limited to only medium-term ones 
in the three grades of five to nine years, three years, and two 
years, meaning that we obviously lack long- and short-term state 
bonds. This irrational state bond term structure is a minus for 
the state on one hand, creating bond-repayment peaks, and even 
higher bond repayments than the year's bond sales, sapping the 
significance for the state of selling state bonds in the first 
place; on the other, it is also unsuited to a diversified social 
fund structure, making it hard to meet the needs of all 
purchasers. So, in order to suit our state bond sales term 
structure to China's national conditions, we should consider the 
following two aspects: 1) State bond term adjustment 
flexibility. In selling state bonds to raise funds, while 
medium- and long-term state bonds are naturally better, 
short-term ones are also indispensable, with the three types 
generally needing to be compatible. If it is said that the 
impact of selling medium- and long-term state bonds is to 
achieve revenue balance for the whole budget year, then selling 
short-term ones can make up for the various seasonal revenue 
differences within the year. More state bond categories with 
better options is undoubtedly attractive to investors, not only 
promoting state bond sales success, but also being a great plus 
in raising the use efficiency of treasury funds. 2. State bond 
category proportion-determination rationality. A) State bond 
sales terms ought to be suited to the needs of economic 
conditions. During economic depressions, we should expand as 
much as possible our sales of short-term state bonds that are 
economically expansionary. But during periods of inflation, we 
must increase as much as possible our sales of medium-and 
long-term state bonds that have a deflationary impact on the 
economy. B) State bond interest costs should be minimized. When 
money market interest rates are higher, we should sell more 
short-term state bonds; and when they are lower, we should 
appropriately sell more medium- and long-term ones. C) During 
state bond redemption peaks, we should sell short-term state 
bonds to repay old debts with new ones. At other times, we 
should sell medium- and long-term ones to postpone such peaks. 
<H5>  Our Choice of State Bond Sales Method </H5>
  Our decade of state bond sales shows that almost all of 
China's state bond sales use the method of administrative 
apportionment, with mostly organized sales promotions through 
the diversified channels of banks, state revenue, and post 
offices, supplemented with free subscription by individuals. 
While this sales method was objectively more effective and 
practical under the market conditions of the time, both ensuring 
state bond sales success, and raising public awareness about 
securities investment, it severely violated the autonomy 
principle of financial asset transactions. For purchasers, 
mandated apportionment meant fiscal weakness and state credit 
crisis, thus shaking investor confidence in state bonds. On the 
other hand, setting subscription amounts based on employee wages 
did not consider differences in employee subsistence burdens and 
investor's inclinations. In light of China's national 
conditions, while continuing to employ administrative means, we 
should gradually try out economic ones, by expanding financing 
channels, and practicing comprehensive sales promotion methods, 
in order to pave the way for a gradual transition to economic 
means. This could be done by instituting a policy of free 
investment choice, to evolve a contract relationship between the 
state and investors based on creditor-liability relations, thus 
changing the state bond apportionment sales method, to change 
direct sales by state revenue to an indirect method of 
competitive group bidding for exclusive selling rights. That is, 
we would first sell state bonds through the method of 
competitive bidding by purchasing groups for exclusive sales 
rights, which would then sell them directly on markets in the 
form of voluntary transactions. The greatest plus of this method 
is that it would bring market forces to state bond sales. The 
state's first purchase of exclusive treasury bill selling rights 
by financial institutions in 1991 was a valuable try at this. 
<H5>  Setting Rational State Bond Sales Interest Rates </H5>
  While interest rates are a key means of leverage for 
regulating bond market capital flow and volume, China's use of 
this method still contains certain problems. 1) It is 
overcentralized, with the authority to set and adjust interest 
rates completely controlled by the revenue sector, leaving 
markets with no leeway for spontaneous adjustment. 2) There is 
only one category, with unit and individual subscriptions, 
without regard for amounts or terms, all at a uniform price. 3) 
It has remained unchanged for too long, with state bond interest 
rates, once set, remaining unchanged for years. Thus, in order 
both to lower sales costs to lighten fiscal burdens and to 
complete bond sales promptly, we must pay attention to setting 
rational state bond interest rates, with the right criteria for 
setting them having a great impact on state bond efficiency and 
competitiveness. Generally, state bond interest rates should be 
set based on the following three considerations: 1) State bond 
interest rates must move in the same direction as money market 
ones. When setting state bond interest rates, we need to 
reference money market interest rates and project interest rate 
changes during state bond sale terms, in order to keep interest 
rate fluctuations moving in the same direction for both state 
bonds and money markets. 2) We need to combine fixed with 
floating interest rates. As short-term bond sales generally 
adapt to money market interest rate changes, they should use the 
fixed interest rate method. But as medium- and long-term bonds 
do not adapt well to money market interest rate changes due to 
their longer terms, they should use the floating interest rate 
method. That is, based on money market interest rates for the 
term of issue, fixed interest rates based on average market 
rates, and floating interest rates in consideration of 
investment stimulus and rational cost burdens, should be 
combined to make up the year's state bond sales interest rates. 
In successive years, as money market interest rates change and 
are affected by domestic policies, the fixed interest rates will 
remain constant, while the floating ones can rise or fall with 
the markets. This will enable state bond investors to both 
ensure their capital and make their anticipated and nominal 
compensation consistent, while reducing cost spending for the 
state. 3. The setting of state bond interest rates must also 
consider national economic policy needs. State bond sale 
interest rate control needs to be coordinated with government 
economic reforms during various periods. When the state is 
tightening money, state bond interest rates need to be 
appropriately higher; and when the state is expanding credit, 
its bond interest rates should be relatively lower. 
<H5>  The Choice of State Bond Repayment Methods </H5>
  The state generally has three debt discharge methods; i.e., 
direct repayment, market transaction, and paying old debts with 
new ones. At various times and under varying economic 
conditions, the debt discharge method also varies. In light of 
China's state bond market status quo, it would be rational for 
us to use in the short-term a mixture of the two methods of 
direct repayment and payment of old debts with new ones. 1. In 
the direct repayment method, the state repays bonds as they 
mature in lump sums or payments. It requires the state to have a 
stronger discharge capability, with more abundant discharge fund 
sources. China's immediate fiscal condition is that revenues are 
growing slowly on one hand, while spending is pressing on. If we 
had maintained our state bond scale of 1989 for the two years of 
1991 and 1992, we would not only have had to use all bond 
revenue to repay capital with interest, but we would also have 
had to take some revenue each year from our routine budget to 
make up the difference. As this would make fiscal balance 
difficult for the year, this method should now be applied only 
to the redemption of mature individual bonds. 2) In the method 
of paying old debts with new ones, we turn old bonds, where the 
government sale of bonds under varying terms and economic 
climates touched off bond type, repayment deadline, and payment 
method chaos, into new bonds in set percentages, as well as 
restudying bond terms and interest rates, in order to postpone 
the average bond repayment deadline. Since 1990, the state has 
used this redemption method. Under China's current bond 
structure status quo, this is a feasible way of solving state 
bond repayment problems during repayment peaks. This not only 
enables the state to acquire some repayment fund sources, but 
also adjusts old debt repayment terms to coordinate them with 
new state bond sale repayment terms, for a rational disposition 
and even distribution, to promote normal state bond sales. Of 
course, this method can be regarded as only a special means for 
one-time use and, in consideration of the political factor, can 
be used only for unit-purchased mature bonds. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40065 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Adjusts Production Material Prices, Taxes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0178A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 1 Nov 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0178A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Xin (0702 0207): "To Meet Market Demands, </F>
Guide Reasonable Orientation of Circulation, State Adjusts Some 
Production Material Prices, Tax Rates"] 
  [Text] Beginning this year, China's production material 
market prices have exhibited rather great fluctuations, but 
people are concerned about which are officially approved 
rational price adjustments. According to data supplied by the 
China Materials Information Center, as of the third quarter, the 
following adjustments had been made with the approval of the 
state departments concerned. 
  State Determines Scope of Fixed Price Commodities 
  In 1993 state fixed prices were retained for approximately 
33 
product categories. 
  1. Coal: Raw coal, mixed coal, bitumenite, and powdered coal 
(including washed coal and washed refined coal) produced by 
mines under central control and local mines brought under 
central control. 
  2. Electric Power: State unified fixed price electric net 
and 
locally produced electricity. Thermoelectricity produced by 
thermoelectric plants under state controlled investment. 
  3. Petroleum: Natural crude oil, natural gas, oilfield 
liquified gas, gasoline (including central first class station 
adjusted allocated price and 73 centrally managed market sale 
priced), kerosene, diesel, heavy oil, and refinery gaseous 
naphtha. 
  4. Chemical Industry: Dimethylbenzene and urea and 
agricultural use nitroammonium produced by designated 
enterprises (including the portion under unified selling price). 
  Special Railroad Use Steel Material Adjusted Price 
  The State Ministry of Metallurgical Industry and the State 
Planning Commission from 1 August determined the adjusted state 
unified producer price of such steel materials for special 
railroad use as heavy rails, wheels, tires, and fish-tail 
[switching] panels. The price after adjustment is implemented 
without distinguishing between products in the plan and those 
outside the plan. 
  The adjusted per ton prices of heavy rails (GB2585-81) are: 
38 kilogram/meter: U71, 3,450 yuan; U74, 3,480 yuan; U71Mn, 
3,570 yuan; U70MnSi, 3,680 yuan; 43 kilogram/meter: U71, 3,420 
yuan; U74, 3,450 yuan; U71Mn, 3,540 yuan; U70MnSi, 3,650 yuan; 
and 50 kilogram/meter: U71, 3,380 yuan; U74, 3,410 yuan; U71Mn, 
3,500 yuan; U70MnSi, 3,600 yuan. 
  The producer prices for each wheel with external diameters 
of 
840mm, 915mm, and 950mm are 1,580 yuan, 1,840 yuan, and 1,920 
yuan, respectively. 
  The per ton producer prices of tires with external diameters 
of 660-1,400mm and above are 1,030 yuan, 1,150 yuan, 1,420 yuan, 
1,750 yuan, and 1,880 yuan, respectively. 
  The per ton price for fish-tail [switching] panels with 
specifications of 22, 38, 43, and 50 kilograms per meter is 
adjusted to 3,500 yuan. 
  All Lead and Zinc Mines Float Up the Prices of Zinc Ore 
Concentrate in the Plan 
  The producer price of zinc ore concentrate in the plan has 
been lowered because of the effect of market supply and demand. 
Also the effects of rising prices for electric power and 
railroad transportation and higher bank loan interest rates have 
caused the mines' economic performance to seriously decline. To 
ensure that the task of turning over zinc ore concentrate is 
completed for 1993, with the agreement of the State Planning 
Commission Pricing Department, in 1993 the price of zinc ore 
concentrate in the plan can be floated up 5 percent on the basis 
of the [1993] number 169 jiagong [price and 
label;0116 1562] fixed price. The price of zinc ore concentrate 
produced by other zinc ore concentrate enterprises within the 
plan also can be implemented based on the stipulations given 
above. This was implemented from 1 August 1993. 
  Jilin Papermill Adjusts Up the Price of Newsprint 
Outside the Plan 
  Beginning this year, the production costs of a series of 
newsprint products outside the plan has greatly increased 
because of such factors as the constantly rising price of lumber 
and upward adjustment in energy and railroad transportation fees 
and it is difficult for the enterprises to absorb them. To 
maintain newsprint enterprises' normal production of newsprint, 
the Jilin papermill, from 10 July, adjusted the producer price 
of a series of newsprint products in accordance with relevant 
regulations. From 10 July 1993, 51 gram common newsprint is 
3,800 yuan per ton; 49 gram offset print newsprint is 4,000 yuan 
per ton; special class-A offset print newsprint is 4,150 yuan 
per ton; and 45 gram offset print newsprint is 4,250 yuan per 
ton. 
  State Tax Rate on Finished Oil and Some Chemical 
Industry Products 
  To adapt to new reforms in crude oil prices, the Ministry of 
Finance has decided to adjust current tax rates and methods of 
levying taxes on finished oil and some chemical industry 
products. 
  Generally product taxes are levied on finished oil produced 
by petrochemical enterprises in accordance with actual sales 
income. Finished oil product tax rates have been adjusted to 10 
percent for gasoline, kerosene, lubricating oil, and solvent 
oil; 8 percent for diesel, tar, and other refined oils; and 3 
percent for heavy oil, naphtha, and chemical industry light oil 
and other unfinished oils. The product tax levy on gasoline, 
kerosene, and diesel produced from crude oil not in the unified 
plan is temporarily lowered to 5 percent in 1993, and the 
product tax on solid paraffin, liquid paraffin, pitch, petroleum 
tar, petroleum benzene, polyethylene, polypropylene, 
polystyrene, butadiene rubber, acrylonitrite rubber, and nylon 
66 has been temporarily reduced to 10 percent. 
  The State Has Decided To Temporarily Reduce the Levy on 
Caustic Soda Products 
  In recent year, costs have increased for caustic soda 
producing enterprises because of the rising prices of raw and 
auxiliary materials, leading to a rather large number of 
enterprises experiencing losses. Out of concern for the actual 
difficulties of caustic soda enterprises and to support the 
development of their production, after study by the State Tax 
Bureau and relevant departments, on 9 June of this year, a 
notice was issued determining a temporary reduction of the tax 
rate on caustic soda products to 12 percent (formerly set at 15 
percent). 
  The notice also stipulated that after the temporary 
reduction 
of the tax rate to 12 percent, no localities could further open 
up tax reductions or exemptions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40066 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Gross Industrial Output Value in Dec </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK1801095894 Beijing CEI Database in English 18 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1801095894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list showing 
China's total industrial output value in December 1993, released 
by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(in 100 million y-| 
|                  |                  |                  |uan)              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |12/93             |1-12/93           |chg over 1-12/92 (| 
|                  |                  |                  |pc)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total             |3664.4            |35073.9           |23.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Light ind.        |1833.8            |16594.8           |22.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heavy ind.        |1830.5            |18479.1           |24.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|State firms       |1749.0            |18307.1           |8.9               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Collectively owne-|1474.3            |12795.6           |39.8              | 
|d ones            |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Others            |441.1             |3971.2            |64.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Note: the industrial output value is measured in 1990s constant yuan.      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40067 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar008___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Revitalizing Jiangsu Machinery Industry </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0175A Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO in Chinese 17 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0175A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xu Hanwen (6079 3352 2429), director of the </F>
Jiangsu Provincial Department of Machine-Building Industry: 
"Revitalize Jiangsu's Machinery Industry by Correctly Handling 
10 Relationships"] 
  [Text] Now, the main theme and target for our province's 
machinery industry are still the acceleration of development. 
The development should be sustainable, quick, and sound so as to 
revitalize the machine-building sector and make it a real pillar 
industry in Jiangsu. To meet this target, we must make ceaseless 
efforts to emancipate our minds, seize every opportunity 
available, and work assiduously and in a down-to-earth way to 
fulfill all related tasks. Above all, we must correctly handle 
the following 10 relationships with respect to our state of mind 
and method of work: 
<H3>  1. Correctly handle the relationship between strengthening 
macroeconomic regulation and control and developing the industry. </H3>
  To meet the needs of developing the economy and deepening 
the 
reform, the party Central Committee and State Council have put 
forth a series of policy-related measures aimed at strengthening 
and improving macroeconomic regulation and control. This is 
absolutely necessary and timely. A review of our province's 
machinery industry shows that after breaking the 20-billion-yuan 
mark last year, the gross output value of this industry 
increased further by 55.31 percent during the first half of 
1993, surpassing the province's industrial growth by 10.71 
percentage points and the average growth of the nation's 
machinery industry by 21.59 percentage points. For the same 
period, increases in sales and in economic returns both outpaced 
the growth of production. Affected by the increasingly tight 
macroeconomic environment, however, this year's monthly 
production growth has kept declining--each month the growth rate 
has declined 2 to 3 percentage points. For the entire first half 
of this year, the farm machinery sector registered a 
17-percentage-point drop in its monthly production growth, while 
for the construction machinery sector the decline was as great 
as 31 percentage points. Meanwhile, there emerged more factors 
that increased production costs and reduced profit yield; for 
the first half of this year alone, a reduction in profit by 1.4 
billion yuan was attributable to these factors. Losses suffered 
by those known as loss-incurring enterprises climbed up to a 
fairly big extent. Due to an acute shortage of circulating funds 
in the hands of enterprises, only 14.4 percent of the funding 
requirements could be met for key technological-upgrading 
projects. As of the end of June, the three kinds of tied-up 
funds [funds tied up by products in stock, by goods in transit, 
and by receivables and prepaid accounts] had amounted to 6.69 
billion yuan, up 20.9 percent from the figure registered a year 
ago. Urgently needed primary and auxiliary materials were in 
short supply, resulting in a surge in prices. Transportation 
facilities and electric power supply were far from adequate to 
meet the demands. If we do not promptly correct the above 
situation by beefing up macroeconomic regulation and control, 
the output and economic returns of the entire machinery industry 
will continue to slide, and some sectors of this industry will 
encounter more serious problems in production and operations and 
may even be bogged down in predicament. 
  Although it has not been long since the macroeconomic 
regulatory and control measures designed by the CPC Central 
Committee were put into effect in Jiangsu, they have 
nevertheless produced remarkable results. This has undoubtedly 
provided a rare opportunity for the machinery industry -- which 
serves as an equipment supplier in the entire economy -- to 
adjust and develop itself. We should seize this opportunity, 
value it highly, and make good use of it. On the one hand, under 
macroeconomic regulation and control, we should be versed in 
enlivening our microeconomic activities to achieve development. 
On the other hand, we should see to it that the various 
microeconomic activities we are carrying out are at all times 
consistent with and subordinate to macroeconomic regulation and 
control. That is, it is necessary to seriously implement the 
party Central Committee's policy decision of strengthening 
macroeconomic regulation and control and, at the same time, 
achieve a sustained, quick, and sound development of the 
machinery industry. This year, our province's machinery industry 
should make every effort to meet the targets of a sales revenue 
of more than 30 billion yuan (a growth rate of 30 percent) and a 
total profit and tax contribution to the state amounting to 2.2 
billion yuan (a growth rate of 20 percent) so as to consolidate 
its pillar-industry position. 
<H3>  2. Correctly handle the relationship between the total 
production increase and the three kinds of tied-up funds. </H3>
  An increase in total output inevitably requires more 
circulating funds. The two have a certain inherent relationship. 
We should take such measures as enlivening the utilization of 
the present assets and making best use of the increased capital 
to avoid or minimize as much as possible the need for increasing 
the circulating funds and to reasonably control the three kinds 
of tied-up money. This way we will bring about a 
self-perpetuating and highly efficient production growth. 
  A current problem of our province's machinery industry is 
that with the growth of total output, the three kinds of tied-up 
funds have kept increasing. In August, the stockpile of products 
reached 4 billion yuan. Planning production in strict accord 
with market demands and making an all-out effort to limit the 
output of certain items, slash their stockpiles, promote sales, 
collect and avert accounts receivables, and maintain a 
reasonable amount of stock are key to controlling the three 
kinds of tied-up funds. We should do this seriously so that we 
may increase the machinery industry's total output while keeping 
the three kinds of tied-up funds at a reasonable level and 
achieving a fast and sound development of this industry. 
<H3>  3. Correctly handle the relationship between production 
speed and product quality. </H3>
  In reality, this involves the question of how to correctly 
handle the relationship between the quantity and quality of 
production. We should reach a consensus of thought on the 
following points and put them into practice in our work. 
  -- Without good quality, quantity will be meaningless, and 
no 
real, effective speed can be spoken of. Quality is the life of 
enterprises. Failing to pay attention to quality, an enterprise 
or a trade will have no future, and its development will be out 
of the question. 
  -- While ensuring quality as a prerequisite, we should go in 
for greater quantity and speed. Authorities in charge of the 
machinery industry should guide the enterprises to operate "as 
independent socialist commodity producers and dealers, 
responsible for their own profits and losses and for their own 
decision about whether to expand" with attention focused on 
product quality. They should be guided to improve their product 
quality as a way to boost their operational efficiency so that 
they will really embark on the road of efficiency through 
quality. 
  -- When contradictions arise between product quality and 
production speed, it is imperative to adhere to the principle of 
"giving priority to quality." This is especially important. 
Sample quality inspections conducted by the state and by the 
ministry concerned in the first quarter of this year revealed 
that the percentages of standard-quality products turned out by 
the province's machinery industry were only 67.03 and 66.67 
percent, respectively. This shows that product quality is a 
problem worthy of concern. Therefore, while production is 
developing quickly, great attention should be devoted to the 
question of quality. By taking the current drives to transform 
enterprise operational mechanism and modify government functions 
as an opportunity, we must seriously carry out the "Product 
Quality Act" and use the market as a mechanism to gear up 
quality control and supervision so as to ensure a sound and fast 
development of production. It is necessary to rely on progress 
in science and technology to raise our product quality in an 
effort to catch up with the advanced world standards as soon as 
possible. 
<H3>  4. Correctly handle the relationship between product 
development and the optimization of product mix. </H3>
  Now, Jiangsu's machinery industry turns out nearly 20,000 
different varieties and specifications of products. Among them, 
close to 3,000 are main products. Recently my department has 
made an analysis of the development levels of 7,821 products 
made by the machinery industry and found that only 8.34 percent 
of them are up to the world's standard of the 1980s. Those 
meeting the standards of the "late 1970s and early 1980s" 
account for 21.63 percent, those up to the standards of the 
1970s, 55 percent; and those below the standards of the 1960s, 
15.03 percent. As can be seen, the proportions of products in 
terms of their levels of development are not so rational. 
Further, products meeting high standards have been developed 
slowly, while most products being turned out are of low 
standards. Such a state of affairs neither meets the needs of 
our economic development nor is in the interest of achieving a 
sustained, quick growth of the machinery industry itself. For 
this reason, in developing new products, we should not only pay 
attention to expanding the variety and categories of products 
and increasing the models and specifications in each category, 
but also attach great importance to improving their quality. We 
should strive to develop products made by high and new 
technologies, products that are a combination of machines and 
electric equipment, and other products belonging to the 
technology-intensive category. 
  Meanwhile, we should constantly adjust and optimize of our 
present product mix. With the market condition as a guidance and 
using brand-name and competitive products as model commodities, 
we should strive to transform, reorganize, and reform our lines 
of production so as to boost the percentage of high-technology, 
good-quality, highly profitable, and readily marketable 
products. In addition, we should successfully adjust our 
production plans to suit the demands by adopting the strategy of 
"wresting the market for urgently needed products, expanding the 
mass production of highly marketable products, upgrading the 
quality of moderately marketable products, and replacing 
nonmarketable products with marketable ones." This way we will 
be able to constantly adjust and optimize our product mix. To 
sum up, we should pay close and earnest attention to every 
aspect of product-mix optimization, from setting targets and 
developing new products to promoting technological 
transformation and boosting the marketability of products. 
<H3>  5. Correctly handle the relationship between the development 
of the industry and the development of advantages and 
characteristic conditions in various localities. </H3>
  As an early developed traditional industry and an equipment 
industry, the machinery industry has a relatively big influence 
on and is rather closely related to other industries. Because 
of this, it has received due attention in all regions (cities 
and counties) and is listed as one of the key undertakings to be 
developed locally. On the other hand, we have noted that the 
products made by our province's machinery industry have a 
serious problem of low standards, that the lines of production 
in various regions show a tendency to be identical, and that the 
development and production of new products are at a slow pace. 
As a result, the industry cannot have a rational layout with 
distinctive characteristics in each location -- a problem which 
has affected the sustained and quick development of 
machine-building enterprises. In view of thi s, all cities and 
counties must give prime consideration to their respective 
priorities, choose the fittest projects to develop, and display 
their own distinctive characteristics in promoting the machinery 
industry. They should change the mindset of seeking paralleled 
and all-inclusive development and rushing to make "products that 
sell well." Instead, they should dare to give up some of their 
current undertakings and products, and go all out to develop 
uncommon products, make good the shortage, and fill up the gaps 
in the machinery industry. In developing themselves, all cities 
and counties should keep to the track of making what others 
don't have, beating competitors by turning out better products, 
and giving full scope to their own characteristics, so that each 
of them will have their strong points. This is the only path to 
take in developing our machinery industry. 
  Now, competitive products with distinctive characteristics 
have appeared in various parts of our province. Examples are 
"vehicles, boxes, machines, and containers" [che xiang ji gui 
6508 4630 2623 2681] made in Yangzhou; construction machinery 
produced by Xuzhou; and farm machinery, mainly diesel tractors, 
turned out by Changzhou. We should speed up the development of 
the strong points of various localities. In doing this, we 
should be oriented toward the domestic and overseas markets, 
take the local economic and technological conditions into 
consideration, bring into full play our strong points, and 
sidestep our shortcomings. We should choose some characteristic 
products as key targets to make breakthroughs, devote our 
efforts to improving the quality of these products and expanding 
their production scale, strive to develop them into competitive 
products with distinctive local characteristics, and make every 
effort to bring them up to the nation's advanced level. 
  To sum up, we should take the development of the strong 
points and characteristics of various localities as a main task 
in connection with the effort to increase the total output. We 
should see to it that while increasing the total production, all 
localities bring into full play their characteristics and strong 
points, and that, in doing so, they also contribute to 
increasing the total production and boosting the economic 
returns. 
<H3>  6. Correctly handle the relationship between developing 
"small but specialized" enterprises and promoting conglomerates. </H3>
  Jiangsu's machinery industry is characterized by large 
numbers of small- and medium-sized enterprises as well as 
township enterprises. Such an organizational structure makes it 
necessary to develop scores of "small but specialized" 
enterprises as basic units to supplement and coordinate with the 
development of big and medium-sized enterprises. Based on their 
characteristics, these small enterprises should constantly raise 
their technological level, improve their product quality, 
acquire advanced equipment, and distinguish themselves by fine 
quality, low production costs, and expertise in their 
specialized fields. More importantly, they should put stress on 
developing conglomerates aimed at making competitive products as 
the leading commodities, such conglomerates to be formed by 
sharing assets on the basis of specialization and cooperation. 
The purpose is to build an economy of scale, bring out the 
advantage of the integrated whole, and boost the enterprises' 
competitiveness so that they can get a foothold in the domestic 
and international markets. 
  The competent government authorities can do something in 
organizing such conglomerates. During the last two years, our 
department did play a leading role in organizing three 
provincial-level conglomerates. At the same time, a number of 
conglomerates also came into being in various localities. The 
year 1992 saw 48 enterprises and conglomerates formed in our 
province in the machine-building field, each scoring an output 
value in excess of 100 million yuan or providing more than 1,000 
yuan to the government in the form of profit contribution or tax 
payment. This brought an initial change to our province's 
machinery industry, which had lacked big and effective 
organizations. In the future, we should further use our polices, 
laws, and regulations along with informational and economic 
measures to guide enterprises to form conglomerates as a way to 
spur the development of the machinery industry. Such 
conglomerates may be formed by association or merger of 
enterprises or through such methods as share-buying, 
shareholding, or leasing. We should try to see that each sector 
of our machinery industry has one or two conglomerates. 
<H3>  7. Correctly handle the relationship between introducing 
technology and capital from outside and making self-improvement. </H3>
  Since the outset of the reform and opening-up drive, our 
province's machinery industry has introduced some 120 new 
technologies from abroad, established 156 partially- or 
wholly-foreign-funded enterprises, and actually utilized foreign 
capital in the amount of $117 million. This has accelerated the 
updating and upgrading of our products and increased our sources 
of capital. Acquisition of advanced designs, manufacturing 
techniques, and management expertise from abroad has helped 
promote our export trade to earn foreign exchange and has 
brought in greater economic returns. Our practical experience 
shows that such acquisition and joint investment with overseas 
business interests are a significant way for our machinery 
industry to achieve quick and effective results in making 
technological progress, seeking quick development, and narrowing 
the gap between itself and its foreign counterpart. 
  In the main, acquisition of foreign technology plays the 
role 
of raising our starting point in making technological progress, 
while our foundation for technological progress is to beef up 
our own strength in the field of science and technology. 
Because of this, we cannot solely rely on the acquisition of 
foreign technology. More important is a positive effort to 
digest and assimilate what we have acquired from abroad and, on 
this basis, create our own technology, expand our own expertise, 
and raise our independent development capability. As an example, 
the Wuxi Compressor Plant has created its own technology after 
actively digesting and assimilating the oiled-screw-rod 
technology acquired from abroad. The plant has developed two new 
products, no- lubrication screw rods and screw-rod 
refrigerators. These new products have provided it with a new 
competitive edge and boosted its capability for sustained 
development. 
  In utilizing foreign capital to solve the shortage of funds 
at home, we should pay particular attention to the following: 
Along with the capital acquired from abroad, we should also 
obtain foreign advanced technology and equipment. We should 
encourage the sectors and enterprises concerned to participate 
in international division of work and to explore overseas 
markets for their products. In addition, we should integrate the 
work of utilization of foreign capital with the transformation 
of old enterprises and go all out to win success in developing 
the three kinds of partially- or wholly-foreign-funded 
enterprises. 
<H3>  8. Correctly handle the relationship between developing the 
domestic market and exploring the international market. </H3>
  In view of China's forthcoming "reentry into the General 
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade," the quickened pace taken in 
linking the domestic market with the international market, and 
the internationalization trend of world economic development, 
every enterprise and region must base itself not only on 
developing the domestic market but also on exploring the 
international market. It must act in both directions. 
  On the one hand, the machinery industry must meet domestic 
market demands. It must make further efforts to capture a large 
part of the domestic market and must compete successfully with 
foreign companies and "imported goods" by means of flexible 
marketing strategies, good after- sales services, and 
fine-quality and low-price products. On the other hand, it must, 
as a strategic measure, expand its international market and 
boost its exports to earn more foreign exchange. While 
consolidating and developing the current export market, it must 
continue to expand the market abroad and establish transnational 
companies to develop internationalized operations. In no way 
should it relax or give up the exploration of international 
market because its products are selling well at home. 
<H3>  9. Correctly handle the relationship between the 
transformation of government functions and the transformation of 
enterprises' operational mechanism. </H3>
  These "two transformations" are both needed in building a 
socialist market economic structure. We should coordinate and 
synchronize the work in these two fields, let them promote each 
other, and really achieve the goal that "enterprises are acting 
in line with the market condition, while the government is 
functioning according to the needs of enterprises." 
  Enterprises should speed up the transformation of their 
operational mechanism. In doing this, however, they should not 
relax their internal management. Some time ago, "using contract 
arrangements instead of strengthening management" and a relapse 
of laxity in management appeared in varying degrees in our 
machinery industry. This matter deserves our particular 
attention. We must make a real effort to gear up management and 
devote ourselves painstakingly to "internal work." Factory 
directors of enterprises should properly exercise their 
decision-making power while giving full play to the role of the 
staff members and workers as the factories' masters. 
  The administrative department in charge of the machinery 
industry should put in more efforts to transform its functions. 
On the one hand, it must further implement the "Regulations" 
[Regulations on Transformation of Operational Mechanisms of 
State-Owned Industrial Enterprises], simplify its 
administration, and delegate more power to enterprises so as to 
create a relaxed external environment for enterprises to better 
their services. On the other hand, it should not loosen its 
control over this industry. Especially, it should not relax or 
give up its supervisory functions (such as supervision in the 
fields of quality, security, fixed assets, as well as party and 
government discipline). It must learn to be adept at regulating, 
controlling, and guiding the industry by using comprehensive 
measures, including economic means, policy-based measures, and 
legal, informational, and planning methods. Plus, it must gear 
up investigations and studies, draw experience from selected 
units to promote overall work, and pay attention to solving 
tendentious problems. 
<H3>  10. Correctly handle the relationship between reform and 
development </H3>
  Reform is a powerful propellant for development. An industry 
without reform is hard to develop quickly. Similarly, an 
enterprise without reform is hard to become lively. We cannot 
use the old mindset and methods to solve the problems and 
contradictions encountered in the development of an industry or 
an enterprise. Still less should we go back to the old road to 
solve them. The only solution is to deepen the reform. 
  Our present task is development, but it is more important to 
be devoted to reform. We should seek development by means of 
reform and, in the course of development, continue to deepen our 
reform. Many of the above-mentioned tasks involve the work of 
reform, such as the tasks related to the three enterprise 
systems, the shareholding system, the property rights system, 
and government organizations. We must make rock-firm efforts to 
deepen the reform in various fields and strive to achieve 
successful results. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40068 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of Material Situation in 1994 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0178B Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO in Chinese 1 Nov 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0178B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUZI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chinese Material Information Center: "Analysis </F>
and Prospects of the Materials Situation"] 
  [Text] (I) 
  As regards the current overall economic situation, 
macroeconomic control has just begun to show its effect, the 
scale of investment still has not been truly reduced, and 
inflationary pressures still are very great. It is forecast that 
the annual gross value of industrial output will increase by 20 
percent or more, the annual scale of fixed asset investment 
could break 1 trillion yuan, increasing by 45 percent or more, 
and the retail price index will increase by about 13 percent. 
In the two months since the estimate, the tightness of funds 
could have been somewhat relieved, but it will be difficult for 
the materials market to exhibit significant change in supply and 
demand. Moreover, led by the anticipated decline in futures and 
long-term forward contract prices on several exchanges, the 
prices of production materials will essentially maintain a 
steady decline and the rise in the annual price index will be 
about 40 percent. The weak market trading situation will not 
show a significant change. It is estimated that annual steel 
production could increase by 15 percent, and with imports, total 
resources could break 100 million tons for the first time. Total 
annual materials sales for the whole society could reach 1.75 
trillion yuan, a 30 percent increase. Within that materials 
system sales are forecast to be 630 billion yuan, an increase of 
about 35 percent. 
  Next year the overall economy will have another rapid growth 
year, although the growth rate could be a little lower than this 
year. According to preliminary estimates, next year the scale 
of investments will increase by at least 20 percent. Next year 
the economic growth rate and the rate of inflation could both 
reach double digits. To maintain economic stability, the 
corresponding economic rebound cannot be delayed to the second 
quarter of next year. It is understood that in setting up the 
plan for next year the guiding thought is to achieve sustained 
rapid economic growth as much as possible. 
  (II) 
  According to the basic estimates given above, the combined 
index of production material prices is expected to continue to 
rise, but the increase could be smaller than this year. 
Preliminary calculations are for the combined index of prices 
influenced by upturning factors to rise by five percentage 
points next year. Adding new price rising factors, the rise in 
the combined index could exceed 10 percent. Certainly, the 
overall characteristic of next year's prices will not simply be 
rising or declining. Next year's production material prices 
fluctuations could very well exhibit a complicated and 
changeable situation, because next year the factors influencing 
price fluctuations will increase. Not only must we consider the 
domestic economy, we also must consider changes in the 
international market, and we must especially consider the 
implementation of several recent major reform measures. For 
example, reform of the Ministry of Finance tax revenue system, 
reform of the financial system, reform of the foreign exchange 
and foreign trade systems, and continuing adjustments (or 
freeing up) of the prices of energy, basic raw materials, and 
transportation could have a huge influence on the economy and 
the production materials market. So, structural change will be a 
pronounced characteristic of next year's materials market 
prices. Both the product mix and the regional structure could 
cause them to rise or fall. The characteristics of the market 
economy will be even more significant. 
  In addition, next year the adjusted price of foreign 
exchange 
could tend to rise. Some experts believe that if China wants to 
accelerate the merging of the dual track foreign exchange system 
and lessen the impact of "reentry into the GATT," it should be 
accompanied with a continued devaluation of the renminbi. If the 
foreign exchange rate is merged next year and the foreign 
exchange quota system is eliminated, the price of foreign 
exchange could reach or exceed 9 yuan to the U.S. dollar. This 
would help the international balance of payments, but it also 
could promote domestic price rises. 
  (III) 
  Based on the above analysis of next year's macroeconomy, we 
have calculated the balance of supply and demand for principal 
materials. It can be simply described as follows: 
  1. There still will be a gap between supply and demand for 
steel and the market can be expected to rebound. Next year's 
steel demand is forecast to increase by 10 percent to 13 
percent. As regards resources, domestic production could 
increase by 12 percent to 15 percent. With the use of some 
reserves, there still would be a rather large gap that will 
depend on imports. So, the steel market can be expected to 
rebound in the first half of next year. As regards product mix, 
the majority of the overstock is in wire rods and threaded 
steel. So, it is difficult to expect that the prices of 
construction use steel could return to this year's high levels. 
Production materials such as some plate and tubing materials, 
especially such heavily imported materials as cold-rolled 
silicon steel sheets, large diameter seamless tubes, and 
galvanized iron could again tend to be tight. 
  Next year China will still need to import a rather large 
amount of steel. At the same time, it also will eliminate the 
licensing system for a group of materials including steel and 
there will be an increase in destabilizing factors on the steel 
market. 
  2. The prices of nonferrous metals could come out of the low 
valley. It is estimated that next year the world economy will 
tend to rebound and it could somewhat increase the demand for 
nonferrous metals, and the international price could come out of 
the valley. The domestic economy will maintain a rather high 
acceleration and the demand could continue to rise. The market 
price will stumble toward stability and then rebound to a 
certain extent. According to overall calculations, next year 
copper and aluminum will have to maintain imports no lower than 
this year to essentially balance domestic resource supply and 
demand. 
  3. The supply of coal can be assured and the market price 
will steadily rise. It is forecast that next year the demand 
will continue to steadily rise, increasing by 5 percent to 6 
percent and reaching about 1.2 billion tons. Next year coal 
production can maintain about a 5 percent rate of increase, and 
with a rather high level of reserves, can essentially satisfy 
demand. But because of the effect of inadequate transportation 
and adjusted prices, the price of coal still will rise steadily. 
  4. The building materials market will rise steadily. Next 
year investment growth will remain a major factor moving the 
economy, and the building materials market continue to look 
favorable. It is estimated that next year national cement 
consumption will continue to increase, exports will remain 
steady with this year, and total demand will increase by 
approximately 14 percent. Generally, domestic production 
capacity can satisfy demand, but there is a pronounced 
contradiction in the product mix, and large cement and high 
grade cement could still be tight. The market for other building 
materials such as glass and ceramics for construction use and 
decorating materials also will gradually improve. 
  5. There is a rather large contradiction in lumber 
production 
and demand and the market tends to be tight. It is estimated 
that next year lumber demand will be largely the same as this 
year, but because domestic production also could decline, the 
balance of supply and demand will depend more and more on 
imported resources. If Western economies recover, the demand for 
lumber could increase, creating a tight international market, 
and the price could go higher. It appears that next year imports 
could continue to be reduced and the price tend to rise. 
  6. The chemical industry market is both sluggish and 
flourishing with product mix the principal contradiction. Next 
year with the national economy growing rather rapidly, the 
chemical industry market demand could rebound somewhat, but 
there is a rather large divergence among various types of 
products. The sales of plastic materials such as polyethylene, 
polypropylene, polyvinyl chloride (PVC), PVC resin, and ABS 
resin, and natural rubber can be expected to improve and prices 
will tend to rise. 
  7. Automobile market resources are adequate, but prices are 
rather greatly effected by policy. Since the third quarter, 
influenced by such policies as tight money and increased credit 
association controls, the flourishing automobile market suddenly 
cooled, dropping everywhere, and the prices of large and small 
vehicles generally declined. It is estimated that next year's 
automobile production could reach 1.5 million vehicles and with 
imports supply can be ensured. As regards the product mix, the 
market for heavy vehicles sold mainly to such key industries as 
the railroad, energy, and the basic raw materials industry will 
still be good. The small vehicle business could be in trouble 
compared to this year. As regards the price of automobiles, as 
it gradually merges with international market demand, for a 
period of time, the domestic price generally should steadily 
decline. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40069 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Gross Industrial Output Value in Jan-Dec </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK1801100094 Beijing CEI Database in English 18 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1801100094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list showing 
China's total industrial output value in January-December 1993, 
released by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(in 100 million y-| 
|                  |                  |                  |uan)              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |1-12/93           |1-12/92           |Change over 1-12/9| 
|                  |                  |                  |2 (pc)            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total             |35073.9           |28281.0           |23.6              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Including:        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Light ind.        |16594.8           |13568.1           |22.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heavy ind.        |18479.1           |14812.8           |24.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|State firms       |18307.1           |16813.5           |8.9               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Collectively owne-|12795.6           |9151.8            |39.8              | 
|d ones            |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Others            |3971.2            |2415.7            |64.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Note: the industrial output value is measured in 1990s constant yuan.      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40070 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar008___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fujian 1994 Grain Area, Output </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257C Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 14 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994 Fujian Province will maintain a grain 
area of 29.5 million mu, and gross output of 9.5 million tons, 
an increase of 80,000 tons over 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40071 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning To Implement Water Permit System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0195B Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 29 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0195B </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gong Junchun (7895 0193 4783): "Liaoning Begins </F>
Implementing Water Permit System Next Year; Xiao Zuofu (5135 
0155 1381) Alerted All People of Liaoning Province To Strengthen 
Sense of Urgency and Responsibility To Preserve Sources of 
Water"] 
  [Text] "Water has become an important factor which 
controls Liaoning's economic development and it is imperative to 
implement across the board a water permit system, to strengthen 
water management and to scientifically develop and utilize 
sources of water," these were remarks made by Liaoning Party 
Committee Standing Committee member and Vice Governor Xiao Zuofu 
at the symposium on the "Practical Implementing Procedures for 
Instituting a Water Permit System" held recently under Liaoning 
Province's sponsorship. 
  Liaoning is among the provinces in north China with the most 
serious water shortage problem, with a per capita water 
availability estimated at one-third of the national level. Not 
only is there a scarcity of water supply sources, there are also 
four unfavorable characteristics: One is the uneven 
distribution in the water table during the year, with 70 to 80 
percent of the water supply concentrated in the months from June 
to September; second, there is considerable imbalance between 
sources of water supply and population distribution and land 
use, with over half of Liaoning's population and farmland 
located in the central part of Liaoning having access to only 38 
percent of the province's water supply; third, there is a lack 
of coordination between regional economic development and the 
sources and quantity of water supply, with the central part of 
Liaoning, the province's economic lifeline, having the most 
serious shortage of water supply; and fourth, there is a lack of 
balance in developing sources of water supply among the various 
rivers and tributaries; in the case of the Liao river (flowing 
through the central part of Liaoning), 67 percent of its water 
sources were developed, but in the Yalu river and the various 
tributaries in Liaodong peninsula, only 5 to 20 percent of water 
sources were developed. In addition, there are widespread 
phenomena of man damaging water sources and wasting water 
supply. Because of excessive drawing of underground water, 
wells are drying up in rather large areas in parts of Shenyang 
and Liaoyang. In such places as Dalian, Yingkou, Jinzhou and 
Jinxi, also because of over-drawing of underground water, an 
increasingly large area is affected by sea water seepage, which 
has created great difficulties in terms of water usage for 
industrial and agricultural production as well as people's 
livelihood. Some specialists are predicting that if any problem 
develops in Liaoning's "second stage of development," it will 
very possibly be over "water." Xiao Zuofu said this is no mere 
alarmist talk but is the fact. The entire body of cadres and 
masses of Liaoning must strengthen their sense of urgency and 
responsibility to preserve and protect the sources of water 
supply. 
  Xiao Zuofu said that the purpose of the government 
implementing a water permit system which will control usage of 
water drawn directly from underground, rivers or lakes is to 
strengthen the macro-controls over water resources in order to 
achieve an optimum balance between water supply and water use 
for national economic development and for meeting the increasing 
need for water in people's daily livelihood, to perfect a 
unified management system of water resources, to promote planned 
and economical usage of water in order to make maximum use of 
the limited water resources. 
  At the symposium, many water conservation specialists and 
major water users submitted constructive views and opinions on 
Liaoning's proposed implementation of a water permit system. At 
present, the Liaoning Water Conservation Bureau and other 
concerned departments are conscientiously working out the 
details for carrying out the "Implementation Procedures for 
Water Permit System" issued by the State Council. Liaoning 
Water Conservation Bureau Vice Director Wang Jiancheng [3769 
1696 2052] told reporters that Liaoning Province will begin to 
implement the water permit system early next year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40072 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Effect of Price Mechanism on Grain Purchasing </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0218B Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO in Chinese 12 Oct 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0218B </F>
<F P=104>  Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lei Xiping (7191 3588 1627), Director of the </F>
Price Bureau, Autonomous Region: "Viewing Use of Price 
Mechanism From Angle of Grain Purchasing"] 
  [Text] The price mechanism is the most important market 
mechanism, or, to put it another way, it is the core mechanism; 
it may be compared to an "invisible hand" possessing magic 
power. Then, in the socialist market economy, how is the price 
mechanism to be correctly used? At Quanzhou County, Lingui 
County, Zhongshan County, Guijiang City, and Binyang County, we 
began to understand all sorts of questions concerning grain 
prices, and this understanding was very rewarding. 
  1. A contract without an agreement on specific prices 
is very difficult to implement. 
  In our survey we found that the Grain Bureau of Quanzhou 
County this year signed a contract with the grain department of 
a certain province for the purchase of 25 million kg of wheat, 
but in the contract no specific price was agreed upon. 
Afterward, the supply side, seeing that the source of goods was 
tight, set a price of 900 yuan per ton. The demand side 
maintained that in this locality wheat was sold at 840 yuan 
perton, but, considering that the quality of this province's 
wheat was fairly good, it made a counteroffer of 860 yuan, which 
the other side firmly rejected. As a result, the deal fell 
through. It is said that the grain economic contracts signed by 
our autonomous region's grain department with peasants, and the 
grain economic contracts signed by producing areas with 
marketing areas, also do not have specific prices agreed upon. 
Contracts are important to a market economy, but prices are of 
interest, and without a contract on the price it is naturally 
difficult to honor the agreement. 
  2. Fulfillment of contract obligations mainly depends 
on price. 
  On what does the purchasing side depend to fulfill its 
obligations under a contract without an agreed specific price? 
Ideological education, organizational measures, and 
administrative methods are necessary and have an effect. As for 
legal measures such as notarization and the contract, will, of 
course, possess an extremely great binding force, but if the 
contract does not have a specific agreed price, the two sides 
will only agree on a time to consult on setting the price, and 
once the consultations fail, there is no breaking of the 
notarized contract! One year ramie was in great demand and its 
price in outside provinces was high. To prevent an outflow and 
ensure their own needs by forcing purchases at a low price, some 
places did not hesitate to sent administrative law enforcers to 
block an outflow, but they could only block the main roads and 
could not block the mountain roads, could only block in the 
daytime and could not block in the nighttime, and could only 
block motor vehicles and could not block portable shoulder-borne 
transport. In the purchasing of ginkgo, the situation was 
similar. Commodities go toward places where prices are high, 
just as water flows toward low-lying places. It is thus obvious 
that the fulfillment of the obligations of an economic contract 
mainly depend on economic measures, first of all, in economic 
measures there is a dependence on price. 
  3. Commodities on which prices have been released 
should be bought and sold in line with the market prices. 
  After commodities on which prices have been released are put 
on the market, they should be dependent on market prices. In the 
five counties (city) I went to, the purchasing prices of the 
grain departments (including the ex-value add-on price) in 
general was two to three yuan lower than the market prices and 
one to two yuan lower than the individual householder prices; 
some were even lower. Normally, the ex-value add-on price on the 
negotiated purchasing price should be in line with the market 
price. The ex-value add-on price is the price stipulated by the 
state when a purchasing contract places an order for grain or 
gives the peasant an award, and chemical fertilizer and diesel 
oil is charged to the difference between parity and the market 
price in the form of currency paid to the peasant at the time of 
the signing of the grain-purchasing economic contract. Our 
autonomous region stipulates that for every 50 kg of an economic 
contract the ex-value add-on price is 3.54 yuan, and it is given 
gratis by the central and local financial administrations and 
passes into the hands of the peasant through the purchase of 
grain. If it is lower than the market purchasing price, 
resistance to it will be difficult to avoid. 
  4. Form regular market prices through fair 
competition. 
  In line with market price exchange, regular market prices 
should be formed under conditions of fair competition, but 
currently there are distortions in the market prices. On the one 
hand, some individual grain operators, when selling purchased 
millet that had been processing into husked rice, give short 
weight, adulterate (i.e., mix late rice with early rice), or 
increase the water content. Therefore, if the state-owned grain 
departments purchases 35 kg of millet, the individual household 
pays out 36.5 yuan; when the grain department sits back and 
receives the grain, the individual household itself pays the 
transport fee to deliver the grain to the door. This unfair 
competition artificially raises the market's purchasing price. 
On the other hand, some localities have taken economic and 
administrative measures to limit the amount of grain coming in 
from other provinces and regions in order to control demand and 
stop prices from rising in conformity with economic law. This is 
also a form of unfair competition, and it artificially holds 
down the market's purchasing price. Therefore, we must 
strengthen the quality control of society's grain trade and curb 
improper competition, and we must also break through regional 
separation and protect proper competition in order to form 
regular market prices for grain. 
  5. What the producer wants is a price that actually can 
be taken in hand. 
  Even if the price is in line with the market, if there are 
various deductions will the price be all right? Certain 
counties and townships have stipulated that when a peasant has 
an economic contract to sell grain to the state, 11 deductions 
must first be made from the money paid for the grain purchase: 
water fee, education add-on fee, health emergency fee, paddy 
field fee, public security fee, disease prevention fee, militia 
training fee, military martyrs and dependents fee, "five 
guarantees" living fee, "five guarantees" sympathy and 
solicitude fee, and aid to disabled fee. After the deductions 
are made on the money paid for the grain sold by households that 
sell fairly much grain, there is not much left; after the 
deductions are made for households that sell little grain, there 
is even nothing left or not enough left to cover the deductions. 
This price is just an "empty price": it can be seen but not 
obtained. To avoid this "chop," some peasants prefer to sell 
their grain to individual households. 
  6. Price rigidity. 
  Except for the natural fall back in price because of market 
changes, there is a rigidity to the profit on the price obtained 
by peasants from the sell of grain to the state. The 
abovementioned ex-value add-on price is based on calculating the 
difference in the first half of this year between the parity and 
the market price of chemical fertilizer and diesel oil, and the 
time for using the fertilizer is between March and April next 
year; if the price rises, it will be impossible to use this 
year's price difference to buy back an equivalent quantity of 
material objects, and the peasants owrrly that they will lose 
their profit. When the Grain Department of Miaoling township 
understood this situation, some peasants when delivering grain 
had strongly reacted to it. They demanded that when one party 
devlivers grain the other party should give it money and a 
chemical fertilizer voucher, writing clearly on the voucher the 
variety, quantity, price, and purchase at the beginning of 
spring, all of which must be accurate. 
  7. A price that protects capital while obtaining profit 
is demanded by the law of value. 
  Protection of capital while obtaining a profit, i.e., a 
reasonable cost plus a suitable profit, is the monetary 
manifestation of value. In 1992 in our autonomous region, the 
average cost of production with tax of every 50 kg of early 
long-grain rice was 21.64 yuan, but this did not include all 
sorts of inappropriate expenditures by the peasants that were 
discovered in the survey, so it was an incomplete cost; even 
less was it the production cost for rice grown on low-grade land 
(unlike the value of industrial products, the value of 
agricultural products is decided by the average necessary time 
in society to produce on low-grade land). In our autonomous 
region this year, the protected price per 50 kg of early 
long-grain rice was 24 yuan, obviously on the low side. 
Actually, it is also difficult to say that the purchasing price 
protected capital while obtaining a profit. The producer demands 
that his capital be protected while obtaining a profit, and the 
operator, when selling his grain, should also protect his 
capital while obtaining a profit. If all sorts of limits are put 
on the operator's selling price, there cannot be a situation in 
which "the boat goes up when the river rises" -- particular 
things improve with the improvement of the general situation -- 
and in this case purchasing will certainly be adversely affected. 
  8. Set up a price-regulating fund. 
  We must both follow the trade that is put on the market and 
protect capital while obtaining profit, but if there is a steep 
fall in the market price, one could get no profit and even lose 
one's capital, because cheap cereal crops hurt agriculture; if 
there is a sharp rise in the market price, the operator gets 
staggering profits, not just appropriate profits, and the people 
cannot bear the high price. This gives rise to the following 
questions: when there is a steep fall in the market price, how 
are the peasants to be compensated so that they protect their 
capital and obtain a profit? When the market price soars, how 
is it to be kept within a range in which the operator gets an 
appropriate profit and the people can bear it. Besides the 
necessary administrative measures, what is important is to set 
up and make use of a price-regulating fund. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40073 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Official on Agricultural Tax </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0195A Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 8 Nov 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0195A </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liaoning Finance Department Vice Director Yu </F>
Jianxun (0060 1696 8113): "Answers Reporter's Questions 
Concerning Agricultural Taxes"] 
  [Excerpt] At present, Liaoning Province has entered the 
peak season for agricultural tax collection, this reporter 
therefore interviewed Liaoning Finance Department Vice Director 
Yu Jianxun on questions of concern to all cadres and masses in 
rural areas. 
  [Question] Director Yu, what kind of taxes are included in 
the so-called agricultural taxes? 
  [Answer] Agricultural taxes generally refer to farming tax, 
special product tax, contract tax and farmland user tax which 
finance departments at every level of government are responsible 
for collecting. [passage omitted] 
  [Question] Since it is a legitimate responsibility of 
peasants to pay agricultural taxes, is the burden of 
agricultural taxes in Liaoning considered to be heavy? 
  [Answer] In taxation, China adheres to the principle of 
"collecting taxes based on set rates, and reducing or waiving 
taxes according to law." On this basis, the government has 
carried out a taxation policy of "collecting only taxes which 
constitute reasonable and stable burdens." For many years, the 
agricultural tax burden in Liaoning has been very light; take 
the farming tax and special product tax as examples, at present 
the Liaoning's agricultural tax is still calculated on the basis 
of production quantity set in 1961, and the average tax for the 
whole province is only 82 kilo per mu which is far below the 
actual production level; in 1992, the Liaoning's average taxes 
per mu are: 3.85 yuan for dry field, 11.3 yuan for paddy field, 
20.64 yuan for vegetables field, and the actual tax burden is 
3.3 percent, far below the nominal tax rate of 12.5 percent. 
This level of taxes is not only the lightest in historic terms, 
but also very much lower than the 12.2 percent actual tax level 
in the 1950-60s. The actual rate of special product tax in 
Liaoning is not even 4 percent, far below the 11 percent 
prescribed by government regulations as being a reasonable tax 
burden. 
  [Question] Since the actual burden of the special product 
tax 
is very low, why has the State Council decided this year to 
lower the tax rates on some of the products subject to the 
special product tax? 
  [Answer] The reason the State Council has decided to lower 
the tax rates on some special products represents a major policy 
decision to strengthen the work in rural areas and to provide 
overall stability to agricultural production. The policy has two 
major objectives: First, to close the gap between the nominal 
tax rate and the actual tax burden. Because the collection of 
special product taxes has run into rather serious problems of 
avoidance, cheating, under-reporting and falsifying or 
concealing the products, there are great discrepancies between 
the nominal tax rates and the actual taxes collected on some of 
the special products. For example, on apples, the government-set 
tax rate is 15 percent, but the actual tax paid nationally is 
only 7 percent; on prawns, the government-set rate is 10 
percent, while the actual tax rate does not amount to 3 percent, 
and so on. Therefore, the government's main objective in 
lowering the tax rates on apples, aquatic products from rivers 
and lakes, logs, fruits and melons, etc., is to lower their 
nominal tax rates so they match more closely with the actual 
taxes collected. Second, to correct the imbalance of tax burdens 
and to mobilize enthusiasm for production not only among the 
large agricultural and special products production enterprises 
but also among the state-owned collective production 
organizations. 
  [Question] In addition to what you have described above, 
what 
are some other policies based on agricultural taxes that benefit 
the peasants? 
  [Answer] Our party and government have always looked after 
the benefits of the broad masses, and in agricultural taxes we 
have prescribed a series of beneficial policies; for example, 
rural households that owe more than 50 percent of taxes as a 
consequence of some disaster can apply for tax relief; 
households in dire poverty, households of military martyrs, and 
five-guarantee households can apply for tax waiver; households 
which use the area in front and back of their houses to grow 
various miscellaneous crops not for commercial sales can be 
exempted from the special product taxes; and peasants who build 
their homes on contract farmland can pay one-half of the 
farmland user tax, and so on. 
  [Question] According to current laws and regulations, what 
punishments are prescribed for evading, owing or delaying 
payment of taxes and actively resisting paying any taxes? 
  [Answer] According to the "Law on Management of Tax 
Collections in the People's Republic of China" and 
"Supplementary Regulations by the PRC National People's Congress 
Standing Committee on Punishments for Evading and Resisting Tax 
Collections," in addition to imposing a penalty of 2 percent per 
day on the amounts of taxes evaded, delayed, owed, or refused, 
the following punishments may be handed down. 
  1. Any taxpayer who evades taxes through fraud, fabrication 
and concealment, and the evaded amount exceeds 10 percent of the 
amount due or more than 10,000 yuan, or who still evaded taxes 
after given two administrative warnings by the revenue 
collecting unit, will be required to pay the evaded amount and 
in addition be punished by a prison sentence of three years or 
less and fined an amount not exceeding five times the amount of 
tax evaded. In the case of a taxpayer who evaded less than 
10,000 yuan or the evaded amount evaded is less than 10 percent 
of the tax due, the revenue collection unit will be responsible 
for collecting the evaded amount and levying a fine not 
exceeding five times the amount of tax evaded. 
  2. The revenue collection unit will be responsible for 
collecting from any taxpayer who owes 10,000 yuan or more; for 
those owing less than 100,000 yuan, also levying a prison 
sentence not exceeding three years and a fine not exceeding five 
times the amount of tax owed; for those owing more than 100,000 
yuan, also levying a prison terms of at least three but not 
exceeding seven years, and a fine equal to or less than five 
times the amount of tax owed; revenue collection unit will be 
responsible for collecting any amount owed under 10,000 yuan, 
and levying a fine not exceeding five times the amount of taxes 
owed. 
  3. Resisting collection of taxes is defined as refusal to 
pay 
tax by force or threat of force. In such cases, the revenue 
collection unit will be responsible for tracking down the 
delinquent taxpayer to collect the amount of tax due, levying a 
prison term of three years or less, and a fine equal to five 
times the amount of tax due; for the more serious cases, levying 
a prison term of more than three and under seven years, and a 
fine equal to five times the amount of tax due; for taxpayers 
who owe rather small amounts and who have not engaged in any 
criminal behaviors, the revenue collection unit will be 
responsible for collecting the amounts owed and imposing a fine 
equal to less than five times the amount of taxes owed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40074 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Changing Family Value System Characterized </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0094A Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 105, Oct 
93 pp 38-41 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0094A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Bao Lei (0545 7191): "Changes in </F>
Current Outlook on Family Values"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] The phenomena of "losing 
sight" of family moral values and changes in family moral 
outlook are primarily expressed as follows: 
  First, it is reflected in the norms of marital relations, 
where the emotional content and spiritual and cultural content 
in marital relationships appear to be increasing, and more and 
more are becoming the leading factors in deciding whether or not 
to establish marital relations. But at present the majority of 
people still take a solid and stable marriage based on a partner 
who "has good moral character, is capable, is easy to get along 
with on a daily basis, and is able to remain devoted until the 
end" as the ideal; at the same time, a utilitarian marriage 
involving grovelling for money is looked at as sacrificing the 
happiness of the parties to the marriage, while feudal marriages 
in which an individual's humanity is destroyed to further family 
interests is looked on as having a tendency to raise eyebrows, 
through such methods as having repeated marriages and accepting 
mistresses, transnational marriages, arranged and mercenary 
marriages and abduction and selling of women; in terms of 
marriage choices, people have even more "individual freedoms," 
and the society has gradually adopted a more understanding 
attitude towards varied marital choices, while "freedom of 
divorce" is becoming a reality. 
  [passage omitted] Second, it is reflected in the norms of 
the 
relations between the two sexes, where the new concept sees a 
sincere, equal, happy, and harmonious sexual life between 
husband and wife as increasing the affection between a man and 
woman and strengthening the biological and physiological basis 
of marital relations, sexual scientific knowledge has gone from 
being shackled to being widely disseminated, and the quality of 
sexual life between men and women has been increased; 
consciousness of female sexual rights has gradually been 
awakened; the sexual rights of the elderly have achieved a 
certain degree of respect, and the need for love of those bereft 
of a spouse in later years is gradually receiving the 
understanding of children and support from public opinion; the 
serious effect of the feudal concept of chastity is weakening, 
and when it comes to female victims of rape and women who have 
made sexually-related mistakes, people are gradually changing to 
be more tolerant and helpful. People are also gradually adopting 
a tolerant attitude towards premarital sexual activity and 
extra-marital sexual activity; at the same time, for business 
and educational circles, the Western trends towards "sexual 
revolution," and sexual liberation," have had an effect that 
cannot be underrated on the younger generation, and have to a 
certain degree rocked the existing marital family system. Such 
phenomena as living together, trial marriages, third 
participants, and pregnancies outside of marriage are occurring; 
and there has been a resurgence of prostitution, which had been 
stamped out after the founding of New China. The phenomenon has 
day by day gotten more serious and more open, venereal disease 
is spreading, while cases of people with AIDS and people 
carrying the HIV virus are appearing on the mainland. 
  [passage omitted] Third, it is reflected in the norms for 
relations between husband and wife, and relations between 
husband and wife with an equality based on a cooperative 
division of labor are gradually coming to the fore; however, in 
large numbers of worker families from rural and township 
enterprises, relations between husband and wife characterized by 
the not fully equal equation "the man rules outside, the woman 
rules inside" still exists to a large degree; among the group of 
newly rich people, there exists a "rich ladies social stratum" 
in which the wife or mistress is totally dependent on the 
husband, while in some poor regions, through various types of 
buying and selling of marriages or abductions, the wife becomes 
the husband's "child bearing tool" and "family slave," and loses 
her personal freedom. 
  Fourth, it is reflected in the norms of intergenerational 
relations. Equal and democratic intergenerational relations are 
gradually replacing the feudal patriarchal relationships between 
principal and subordinate, and for parents and children, senior 
family members and the younger generation, a good deal of the 
familial ties and bonds are democratic and equal relations of 
mutual respect, mutual love and mutual assistance based on 
respect for individual autonomy, and with a general trend 
towards independence of the branches of the household of the 
children's generation and the parents' household, and various 
types of independent relations between the childrens' household 
and the parents' household, creating various "family networks" 
encompassing the childrens' household and the parents' 
household, and a trend towards simplification of household 
structure, and household relations; an increase in the number of 
nuclear households; however, the influence of the feudal 
patriarchal family system still exists, and in recent years 
feudal patriarchal clan strength has reared its head; in a 
relatively large number of independent childrens' households, 
the "disease of thorough spoiling," that is, taking the 
grandchild as the center of all things, has fostered a situation 
where only sons and daughters occupy a paramount and lofty 
special position within the family, so much so that the 
phenomenon of prolonged childhood has emerged; after children 
reach adulthood, they are unwilling to support themselves, and 
still rely on their parents to provide them shelter, find them 
jobs, handle marriage matters, raise grandchildren, and in rural 
areas the phenomenon of childrens' household reliance on, and 
expropriation of parents' households exists to a large extent; 
some senior citizens, particularly rural elderly people, have 
been ill-treated by children, and children are unwilling to take 
care of the old. That a "white haired wave" will soon break on 
China's shores is a social problem that China must focus on. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40075 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Performance Report on F-8 II </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0095A Beijing XIANDAI BINGQI [MODERN WEAPONRY] in 
Chinese No 10, 8 Oct 93 pp 2-4 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0095A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XIANDAI BINGQI [MODERN WEAPONRY] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Yongqian (1728 3057 6197): "Brief Look at </F>
China's Fighter Aircraft Development Level"] 
  [Excerpts] From the founding of the Republic to the present 
time, the development of China's fighter aircraft has gone 
through two stages: From importation and copying to indigenous 
design and manufacture, from low grade to high grade. At the 
present time, there are over 3,000 fighter aircraft in China's 
various military services, placing it third in the world. At the 
end of the 1970's, China was successful in designing and 
manufacturing the Jian-8 fighter. At the present time, China has 
already armed itself with the third generation fighter, the 
Jian-8 II and has the fourth generation in development and it 
should be in service before the year 2000. [passage omitted] 
<H5>  Analysis of Fighter Capabilities </H5>
  Engine China's advanced fighter aircraft, the 
Jian-8 II, employs two WP-13A [Turbojet-13A] engines, each 
developing only 6600 kg of thrust with afterburner: This is the 
Jian-8 II's greatest innate inadequacy. In comparison, the 
Mig-29M's RD-33K engine develops 8820 kg of thrust on 
afterburner, so obviously the RD-33K engine is more advanced. 
Total thrust for the Jian-8 II's two WP-13A engines is 13,200 
kg, with a thrust-weight ration of 0.95, while the Mig-29M's two 
RD-33K engines have a total thrust of 17,640 kg, and a 
thrust-weight ratio of 1.1. We can thus see, in comparing the 
thrust-weight ratios of the two aircraft, the Mig-29M is 
obviously superior. The thrust-weight ratio is a reflection of 
an aircraft's maneuverability and climbing characteristics. This 
is one of the deficiencies of the Chinese fighter. 
  Aerodynamic Configuration Foreign fighters change 
their aerodynamic configurations about once every ten years. For 
example: In the 1940's we had the swept-wing aircraft, in the 
50's the delta wing, in the 60's the variable swept wing, in the 
70's the tapered wing [biantiao yi 6708 2742 5065], in the 80's 
the canard wing, and in the 90's the composite wing. In the 
process of developing the Jian-8 II, the Chinese quite possibly 
studied aerodynamic configurations of the Mig-21, the Su-15, the 
Mig-23 and the F-4. They eventually chose the delta wing. The 
reasons for making this choice were: 
  1. China's manufacturing technology was exceedingly 
backward; 
their stock of relevant technology was obviously inadequate, and 
this had a direct impact on model development. 
  2. China's research and development of a fighter grew out of 
their self-defense requirements, which mainly emphasized 
intercept capabilities, with relatively stringent requirements 
for high altitude and high speed capabilities, and the delta 
wing can fulfill these design requirements. 
  Actually, the delta wing has some unique advantages: Air 
resistance at high speeds is low, there is plenty of open space 
inside the wing structure, it is light weight, it has good 
rigidity, and it is not prone to vibrations in a high angle of 
incidence attitude. However, the delta wing also has some 
obvious drawbacks. For instance, its aspect ratio is small, and 
at subsonic speeds it can induce increased drag; the surface 
area of the wing is great, which also increases friction drag; 
when operating the elevons there is a relatively great loss of 
lift. In addition, in powered flight, the detached vortex which 
is depended on for increased lift can cause a certain amount of 
resistance. Also, because the delta wing is thin as well as 
swept back, lift is slow to alter with changes in the angle of 
attack, and for this reason, in order to produce the greatest 
lift, the required angle of incidence is rather great, and this 
affects the pilot's field of vision, especially on landing 
approach, when one can be constrained by altitude limitations: 
In this instance, the lift required has to be obtained from 
increases in velocity. All of these can degrade its 
maneuverability in subsonic patrols and at low and medium 
altitudes and take-off and landing characteristics. This is why, 
in the 1970s when air combat was emphasized, foreign fighters 
seldom used a pure delta wing. The United States and the former 
Soviet Union both employed tapered wings, and only France and 
China chose to use the delta. On the Mirage 2000, France used 
fly by wire technology which, to a certain extent, compensated 
for the delta wing's deficiencies. But China's Jian-8 II, 
despite not employing the electrical relay controls, improved 
its characteristics by using coupled take-off and landing 
ailerons which can be shifted forward and automatically correct 
the curvature of the wing during air combat or take-off and 
landing. In sum, the supersonic characteristics of the Jian-8 II 
are superior to those of the Mirage 2000 and the F-16A, and, in 
fact, in turning capability it surpasses the Mirage 2000-5. 
However, at subsonic speeds it does not equal either the Mirage 
2000 or the F-16A. 
  Maneuverability If we say that by and large 
China's aircraft can compare with the U.S.'s and the former 
Soviet Union's aircraft in maximum speed level flight and 
service ceiling, then the deficiencies in maneuverability which 
directly affect combat effectiveness are rather obvious. For 
instance, the maximum rate of climb for the Jian-8 II, Mirage 
2000-5, F-16C and the Mig-29M are, respectively, 250 ms [meters 
per second], 305 ms, 360 ms, and 368 ms; the smallest turn radii 
are respectively: 800 m, 950 m, 610 m, and 400 m; acceleration 
from Mach 0.8 to Mach 1.2 respectively: and 25, 22, 18 and 15 
seconds. In regard to maximum service overload, for the Jian-8 
II it is 9 g, for the Mirage 2000-5 it is 9 g, for the F-16C it 
is 9 g and for the Mig-29M it is 12 g. Thus, if the Jian-8 II 
would rely solely upon flight characteristics in combat with 
these aircraft, the probability of success would be rather low. 
One of the main reasons for creating a Chinese fighter aircraft 
with rather weak characteristics was because its thrust to 
weight ratio was so low. The Jian-8 II's thrust to weight ratio 
is only 0.95, while for the Mirage 2000-5 it is 0.97, for the 
F-16C it is 1 to 1.1, and for the Mig-29M it is 1.1 -- all of 
these are superior to the Jian-8 II. 
  On Board Firepower and Control Systems 
Navigational and on-board electronic equipment have always been 
a weak point for China. Although the Jian-8 II's radar employs a 
pulse Doppler system and has look-down shoot-down capabilities; 
it is, after all, only 1970's technology. Today, advanced 
foreign fighter aircraft, such as the Russian Mig-31 and the 
Su-35, employ multi-function phased array radar. Besides this, 
there are other advanced foreign fighters, such as the Mig-29M, 
the Mig-31M, the F-15E, the F-16C and the Mirage 2000-5 which 
have forward-looking infrared detectors, laser-spotting tracking 
equipment and other supplementary search equipment. Some 
aircraft, such as the Mig-29M, use target search instruments 
connected with a helmet mounted aiming device. In summation, in 
the realm of firepower and control systems, the Chinese fighters 
are lagging some 15 years behind advanced foreign levels. 
  Combat weapons Chinese fighter aircraft generally 
carry aircraft cannons and their short-range firepower is 
relatively powerful. However, relatively speaking, their 
armament is somewhat weaker than comparable foreign aircraft. 
The Jian-8 II can carry only 4 to 6 AAM (air to air guided 
missiles), (2 medium range, 4 short range), and has a maximum 
external load rating of 4,500 kg. The Mig-29M, on the other 
hand, can carry 6-8 AAM (4 each medium and short range) and its 
maximum external load is 6,000 kg. Because the accuracy and 
range of China's AAM is somewhat less than that of the foreign 
counterparts, so they greatly emphasize maximum firepower in 
each missile launch. However, as the technical level of China's 
air to air missiles improves, their size and weight will 
gradually be reduced and their destructive force will be 
enhanced. 
<H5>  Summation of Experience, Flying Into the Future </H5>
  Summing up what has been said, the technological level, 
combat capability, on-board equipment and weapon systems are 
some 10 years behind the United States and Russia. There are 
many reasons for this, the main reasons being: 
  Weak technological base, development time too long 
The development time for the Jian-8 fighter was almost 15 years. 
  Technical equipment lacking Key aircraft 
technology is not the product of basic research but is tested 
and proven in the air. The United States carried out a great 
deal of basic research during the 1950s and 1960s, insuring that 
there was an ample store of technology to support the 
development of the F-15 and F-16. In their aircraft development 
work, the former Soviet Union met some of the same problems 
China met, but they quickly compensated for them and were able 
to develop the Mig-29 and the Su-27 fighters. 
  Engine and onboard equipment development has not 
advanced, thus the development of the model and major components 
is uncoordinated. 
  One thing that should be noted is that since the 1980's 
China has intensified the search for and research of new 
technologies so that China's fighters of the 1990s can attain a 
higher level, and an excellent base is established for further 
development in the 21st century. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40076 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems in Public Security Secrecy Work </TI></H3>
<H4>   Vice Minister on Policy </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0043A Beijing RENMIN GONGAN BAO [PEOPLE'S PUBLIC 
SECURITY] in Chinese 18 Sep 93 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0043A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN GONGAN BAO [PEOPLE'S PUBLIC 
SECURITY] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tian Qiyu (3944 2601 3768), vice minister of </F>
public security: "Strengthen Public Security Secrecy Work During 
the New Era"] 
  [Text] On 5 September, the fifth anniversary of the 
promulgation of the PRC Law Governing Safeguarding of State 
Secrets, Comrades Jiang Zemin and Li Peng composed the 
respective dedications "Carry On and Elaborate the Party's Fine 
Tradition and Strengthen Secrecy Work During the New Era" and 
"Serve Economic Development by Strictly Enforcing Laws and 
Regulations on Secrecy," and Comrade Ren Jianxin [0117 1696 
2450] added "Strengthen Awareness of the Need for Secrecy and 
Conduct This Work Properly." These inscriptions demonstrate the 
great emphasis leading comrades of the party Central Committee 
and the State Council place on secrecy work during the new era 
of reform and opening up, chart the tasks and direction of this 
work for our near future, reflect the earnest hopes those 
comrades place in cadres involved in secrecy work and in public 
security personnel, and will provide tremendous impetus to this 
work during the new era. 
<H3>  Secrecy Work Has Always Formed an Important Component of 
Public Security Work </H3>
  Secrecy work has always been important to the entire party. 
As early as the revolutionary war, Mao Zaodong, Zhou Enlai, and 
other leaders of that era repeatedly emphasized the importance 
of strictly safeguarding secrets. Comrade Mao in 1941 dedicated 
the inscription "One Can Never Be Too Careful in Protecting 
Party Secrets" for the Confidential Affairs Office of the 
Military Commission and reiterated at a meeting of the Politburo 
just after Liberation: "We must be extremely attentive to 
secrecy work; 95 or even 99 percent will not do; we must be 100 
percent." On 14 July 1950 Comrade Deng Xiaoping stated in a 
preface to the inaugural issue of JIYAO GONGZUO [CONFIDENTIAL 
WORK]--an armed forces publication: "The situation today is even 
more complicated than before, and protecting our party's secrets 
is even more important now than at any time in the past." The 
victory of the revolution is liable to make us careless and 
lower our guard, giving the enemy opportunity to exploit us. 
This warrants vigilance by all responsible comrades and cadres 
engaged in sensitive work. 
  Public security organs are vital components of party and 
state, so secrecy is especially important for them. From the 
outset, we established a strict system and discipline for and 
viewed secrecy as the key to and lifeblood of national security 
work and vital to the fate of the party and the revolutionary 
regime. Following the founding of the PRC, party and state 
leaders continued to attach great importance to secrecy and 
continually instructed us to stress this in public security 
work. With everyone's political vigilance so high, we developed 
the habit of consciously protecting secrets and good practice in 
this work. In 1958 we incorporated this issue into the Eight 
Great Disciplines for and Ten Points Requiring Attention by 
public security personnel. Public security organs' fine 
tradition of keeping secrets played an important role in 
ensuring smooth implementation of public security work and in 
winning victory for the revolution. 
<H3>  The New Situation Created by Reform, Opening Up Presents New 
Needs Regarding Secrecy in Public Security Work </H3>
  After the 3d Plenum of the 11th Central Committee, a 
strategic shift occurred in the focus of the entire party's 
work, and seizing the moment to accelerate China's socialist 
modernization became the party's overriding task. The new 
situation created by reform, opening up, and the establishment 
of a socialist market economy created new and even greater 
requirements regarding secrecy in public security work. 
  First, there has been readjustment in the guiding ideology 
thereof. In the decades preceding the plenum, "class struggle" 
was the guiding principle for all our effort, and secrecy work 
inclined toward mysticism and conservatism, which developments 
were concretely manifested in the tendencies to broaden the 
scope of secrecy, raising its degree, making it perpetual, and 
so on. This shackled people's thinking, exchange and 
dissemination of advanced science and technology, and 
improvement in productivity. Today secrecy work must pursue 
economic development and make the "three facilitations" its 
criteria. 
  Second, there has been major change in the environment 
surrounding secrecy work. China's external contacts have 
expanded greatly since reform and opening up began. The figure 
for exits and entries alone shows how widely our door has 
opened, as the figure rose nearly ten-fold between 1979 and 
1992. Domestically, while pursuing development rooted in public 
ownership, we allowed all sorts of wholly foreign-owned 
enterprises, joint ventures, and foreign capitalized firms to 
burgeon, change has occurred in the operational mechanisms of 
state enterprises, and economic entities of all stripes have 
mushroomed. After peasants undertook responsibility contracting, 
surplus labor flooded cities and formed the bulk of the floating 
population, which, according to statistics, has reached 50 
million nationally. Literary and artistic output is booming as 
"a hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of thought 
contend": Registered publications alone number over 1,000 
nationally. Thus the environment secrecy work confronts is much 
more complicated than it was before reform and opening up began, 
and this makes the work more difficult. 
  Third, change has occurred in the administrative mechanism 
for secrecy work. Public security organs used to be responsible 
for handling most routine secrecy work throughout the country. 
Once the State Secrecy Bureau was established, that agency 
assumed charge of the work and has discharged the functions 
accorded it by law, subject to unified guidance provided by the 
Central Secrecy Commission. In the areas of preventing, 
investigating, and handling leaks and in combatting theft of 
state secrets, various administrative, legal, and other related 
agencies perform their respective duties in cooperation with the 
bureau and each other. Thus a new administrative mechanism for 
secrecy work has begun to emerge. 
  Fourth, there has been change in the focus of this work. 
With 
the conclusion of the cold war, the prolonged stress on stealing 
military secrets began to change; more and more countries now 
recognize that science and technology form the most important 
productive force; and intelligence agencies in various 
countries, especially Western industrialized ones, have begun to 
emphasize collection and theft of economic, scientific, 
technological, and trade intelligence. To respond to the 
international situation and struggle, departments engaged in 
secrecy work must make appropriate readjustments in their 
thinking, work assignments, organizational structures, and 
staffing, and place greater emphasis on economics, science, and 
technology. 
  Fifth, there has been marked change in the way in which 
secrecy work is conducted. On 5 September 1988 China promulgated 
her first relatively complete law on secrecy, the PRC Law 
Governing Safeguarding of State Secrets, development of which 
signified that her secrecy work had reached a new stage in which 
that effort is conducted according to law. The Enforcement 
Regulations for that law were issued a year later, and another 
10-odd supplementary measures have since followed, thereby 
progressively completing legislation on secrecy and enabling all 
such work to be conducted in accordance with law. 
<H3>  Public Security Organs Must Continue To Serve as Exemplars 
of Strict Safeguarding of State Secrets </H3>
  Our ability to carry on and enhance the party's fine 
tradition and to strengthen secrecy work during this new era 
will affect overall performance in reform, opening up, and the 
four modernizations. Public security organs, the mainstay of the 
people's democratic dictatorship, and the people's police, 
staunch defenders of the party and state, play roles in the 
protection of state secrets that no other agencies or 
individuals can match. Thus, conscientious emulation of the 
dedications presented by Jiang Zemin and Li Peng and further 
strengthening of secrecy work are important tasks for public 
security organs and personnel at all levels and will enable this 
effort better to serve maintenance of social order and economic 
development. 
  We must conscientiously summarize and carry forward public 
security organs' fine tradition of strictly protecting state 
secrets; perfect the legal system for this work; stop all leaks; 
maintain appropriate vigilance in external relations; make 
combatting theft of secrets an important component of crime 
fighting; closely cooperate with state agencies administering 
secrecy work, national security organs, and other related 
departments; and conscientiously protect state secrets. 
  We must constantly study and strictly enforce all laws and 
regulations concerning secrecy. It is especially important that 
we go down and initiate study and enforcement of the Secrecy Law 
and its Enforcement Regulations among public security personnel 
so that they learn the basic provisions of these important 
pieces of legislation and act in strict accordance with law; 
that we overcome arbitrariness and old habit in secrecy work; 
and that we strive to ensure that in this work we have laws to 
follow, abide by those laws, enforce them strictly, and punish 
violations thereof so that this work is conducted in legalized 
fashion and public security organs continue to serve as 
exemplary protectors of state secrets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40077 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems in Public Security Secrecy Work </TI></H3>
<H4>   Theft, Leaks Outlined </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0043B Beijing RENMIN GONGAN BAO in Chinese 18 Sep 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0043B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENMIN GONGAN BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ji Kun (0370 2492): "A Cursory Examination of </F>
Leaks of Secrets by Public Security Organs"] 
  [Text] Over the past several years, public security organs 
across the country have conscientiously studied and implemented 
laws and regulations governing secrecy work; recognition of the 
need for secrecy among the broad masses of public security 
personnel has steadily improved; and these organs and personnel 
have aggressively combated theft of state secrets, cracked many 
cases of theft or leaks, and effectively safeguarded the 
security of state secrets. Nonetheless, we have yet to eradicate 
leaks within public security organs or related to their 
operations, and problems in other areas remain severe. From the 
incomplete information available, we can roughly group these 
problems into five categories. 
  The first involves intentionally giving criminals secret 
information about public security work, including divulging 
plans of action, means of gathering intelligence, clues, 
evidence, and the identities of informants and witnesses. These 
crimes directly undermine the very purpose of public security 
organs and some even endanger informants. In July 1990, Li Rujie 
[2621 3067 4634], secretarial section chief of the Shangli 
Precinct of Pingxiang, Jiangxi gave a letter sent in by Liu Kun 
[2692 0981], a driver for a certain company, detailing crimes 
committed by the head of that company to that same head. The 
informant was murdered early the following December by someone 
hired for big money by that very head. This sort of leak 
typifies the exchange of authority for money and collusion 
between isolated crooks within public security ranks and 
criminals in society and is a manifestation of public security 
corruption. 
  The second category entails leaks resulting from 
disappearance or loss of secret documents or goods due to 
improper handling. This leakage occurs most often in leadership 
organs at various levels, especially in document use and in 
administrative departments. Failure strictly to follow 
registration procedures and handling rules causes documents to 
get lost during transmission, makes it hard to determine the 
principal perpetrators or nature of leakage, and the 
ramifications rarely appear in the short term. The operations 
office of a certain city's public security department discovered 
during inventory early this year that two sets of fairly highly 
classified documents had vanished. Since they had gone out long 
before and the checkout procedures were sloppy, the people 
responsible could not recall where the documents went, so the 
case remains unsolved. This kind of leak demonstrates that 
problems exist in the way public security organs handle their 
documents. 
  The third category is leaks occurring in radio 
communications. Because some public security cadres and police 
lack common sense when it comes to maintaining secrecy or 
familiarity with communications equipment, confusion of open and 
secret communications and exchange of unencrypted secret 
information in wired and wireless communications occur 
frequently, such that transmissions containing state secrets are 
sent openly and thus are easy for crooks or external 
intelligence agencies to intercept, thereby seriously 
threatening the security of state secrets, including codes. In 
February 1992, a border guard operator repeatedly transmitted 
unencrypted the contents of secret documents over shortwave 
radio, resulting in interception thereof. A certain city's 
traffic control department openly radioed deployment orders for 
a vehicle inspection operation that were overheard by a trucking 
firm, thereby affecting the success of the effort. 
  Fourth are publication leaks. This most often occurs in 
public reports or news accounts of successful criminal 
investigations and in instructional, scientific, and 
technological works. The vast majority of these leaks occur 
because the people who commit them do not understand what 
constitutes a state secret in public security work and or stem 
from absence of strict clearance procedures. Then there is that 
extremely rare individual who, for fame and fortune, 
deliberately evades review by appropriate agencies and publishes 
materials involving secrets without authorization. A public 
security academy openly issued instructional materials compiled 
for internal use only that contained data relating to secret 
party work during the revolutionary war and to public security 
work after the founding of the PRC. Although remedy was 
immediately effected, some of the materials had been sold to the 
public, with some ending up abroad and irretrievable. 
Publication leaks are serious due to breadth of dissemination, 
inability to determine where the leaked information destinates, 
and the frequent tendency of ignorant news media to pass the 
information on. Therefore, the serious threat posed by this kind 
of leak cannot be underestimated. 
  The fifth category involves leaks occurring from office 
automation equipment, including copying machines, typewriters, 
and personal computers. Owing to a lack of strict control 
systems or to failure to enforce such, copying machine use is 
unrestricted in many units, so people reproduce things at will. 
Some personal computers holding sensitive information lack 
security measures, diskettes and ribbons are deposited or 
disposed of indiscriminately, and so on. While public security 
organs have yet to discover a single instance in which such 
situations have led to leaks of secrets, potential peril 
remains, trouble could occur at any time, so careful attention 
is warranted. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40078 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   General Chiang Wei-kuo Interviewed on Reunification </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0061A Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAISHING 
NEWSWEEK] in Chinese No 29, 21 Oct 93 pp 52-53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0061A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAISHING 
NEWSWEEK] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Excerpts from article by Lu Keng (7120 6972): "General </F>
Chiang Wei-kuo Discusses Bicoastal Relations"] 
  [Text] General Chiang Wei-kuo was on his way to the United 
States to visit the 92-year-old Madame Chiang Kai-shek when he 
made a short three-day stop in San Francisco on 1-4 October. 
[passage omitted] 
  During those three days, he attended two public meetings 
and was specially interviewed by reporters on two occasions. 
During the interviews, he maintained his characteristic 
style--very open and sincere. What was different this time from 
past encounters was his carefully crafted comments--no speech 
that would hurt others, and few or no argumentative remarks. 
Even so, he still met some difficulties. 
  The "Open Window Discussion" sponsored by the Overseas 
Chinese Hsing-Chung Hui of San Francisco was attended by more 
than 400 persons. When Wei-kuo arrived at the door, someone 
stealthily requested him to "talk a little more about Taiwan." 
As 90 percent of those attending the meeting were from Taiwan, 
most being retired officials and their families, their concern 
for Taiwan was quite understandable. However, in his talk, 
Wei-kuo not only did not say much about Taiwan, he said very 
little. He set aside the political strife on the island, and 
focused instead on bicoastal relations, a topic of much greater 
import--"divided for too long, we must come together; together 
for too long, separation must occur." 
  Someone asked: "There is a certain opinion afoot in Taiwan 
at present which says there is `no hurry for unification, nor 
any hurry for independence.' This seems to be quite a fair 
remark. We understand there is no urgency for unification, but 
does no urgency for independence mean a slow evolvement toward 
independence?" 
  Wei-kuo replied: "Of course unification is not easy, and 
it needs to evolve slowly. But it should not be slower than 
independence." This answer again demonstrated his witty use of 
language which won warm applause from the audience. 
  General Chiang Wei-kuo's widely acclaimed book 
"Reunification of China," published in Chinese and English, has 
received the attention of authorities on both sides of the 
Taiwan Straits. In his book, he proposed three common 
denominators or points of understanding: 
  1) We are all Chinese, so we only need one China. Since we 
need only one China, all who do not admit themselves as being 
Chinese, and want to partition up our territorial sovereignty 
become our common enemy. 
  2) All Chinese must be able to have a good life, or at 
least, the opportunity to have a good life. All thinking, 
theories, systems, and laws that prevent people from enjoying a 
good life must be overthrown (by us). 
  3) We must respond to an ideal new China, one that will be 
respected by the international community. Toward this end, we 
must cooperate to become strong, to be able to carry out our 
international obligations. 
  When HSIN-TAO JIH-PAO reporter Li Ge [6849 2047] 
interviewed Chiang Wei-kuo, I was only a bystander who noted 
Wei-kuo's careful answers. Li Ge used the Palestinian-Israeli 
peace talks as an example and asked: "Isn't Taiwan's refusal to 
discuss matters an unreasonable act?" Wei-kuo's reply was: "I 
had proposed three common points of understanding. If we truly 
have these three common denominators, discussions will not be 
necessary, for all we need will be working units to carry out 
the work. On the other hand, if there are no common 
understandings, what is there to discuss? As for the three 
denominators that I have proposed, the other side has recognized 
all of them, but I have not heard a sound from the Taiwan side." 
  That very clearly illustrates the absence of a common 
understanding between both sides of the Taiwan Straits. The 
Kuomintang authorities have shown no response whatsoever to 
Wei-kuo's three common points of understanding. 
  However, CH'IAO PAO, an overseas Chinese newspaper with a 
Communist Chinese background published in the United States, 
reported on the interview with General Chiang in its 4 October 
issue. It had questioned the points of common understanding 
between both sides of the Taiwan Straits; but at the same time, 
Wei-kuo expressed approval of Deng Xiaoping's "Socialism With 
Chinese Characteristics," because it agreed with one of Sun 
Yat-sen's "Three Principles of the People," the one promoting 
the people's livelihood. This view evoked crticism by certain 
quarters on Taiwan. I surmise that the CH'IAO PAO reporter 
mis-stated what he had heard to create this problem for Wei-kuo. 
For a similar problem can be answered in two ways after a lapse 
of a day. 
  In San Francisco, whether in public or in individual 
interviews, people have asked: "What are your views, General 
Chiang, on the CPC's (Communist Party of China) refusal to 
abandon force with respect to Taiwan?" His answer has been: "The 
CPC considers itself the central government and will not agree 
to any territory being separated from it, for the function and 
responsibility of the central government is to preserve the 
sovereignty of its territorial integrity. Under this premise, 
how can it say it will abandon force? Mainland China has four 
approaches to this unification problem: political, economic, 
psychological, and military. When the first three approaches are 
not effective, can you allow that it will not use the military 
one? These four approaches make a complete whole. To begin with 
the military approach is not appropriate. It does not matter who 
wins or loses, it is not good for the country." 
  In discussing the use of military force, it is only 
natural that Wei-kuo understands the brutality and danger of 
war. This is fully reflected in his interview with Li Ge. Even 
this writer who has no military experience fully appreciates 
this. 
  The young reporter Li Ge is a product of Beijing's 
Institute of Journalism. His father, now retired, had 
participated in many battles against the Nationalists in the 
Shenyang Liaoning region in earlier days. When he heard that his 
son was going to interview General Chiang Wei-kuo, he asked him 
to extend his greetings and bring up a question that many people 
are concerned about--will his generation ever see the day of 
unification? 
  Wei-kuo replied: "Absolutely possible, for everything is 
in an idea. Conflict or war appears suddenly. So does peace. We 
just wish that the politicians are smart enough not to make 
those of us in the military to suffer some more. We are some of 
the best citizens. The selfishness of the politicians creates 
difficulties for the military who have no choice. There are none 
who love peace, await the nation's dignity, and care about the 
well-being of the people more than those in military service. A 
government that can accomplish this is a good government, 
regardless of its color." [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40079 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   DPP Chairman Hsu Interviewed on Self- Perception </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0044A Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 149, 
1 Oct 93 pp 61-66 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0044A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang I-li (2799 5337 0196) and Li Ming-hsuan </F>
(2621 2494 6513): "Hsu Hsin-liang: I Care Only About Myself, and 
About [My] Place In History..."] 
  [Excerpt] Question: You have seen many 
politicians. What is it that politicians are seeking? What kind 
of politician are you? 
  Answer: Politicians may be divided into two types: 
One type enjoys power, the other seeks satisfaction in the 
realization of self. From childhood, I have aspired to be an 
historic figure, and I have always said that if I only knew 
while alive that my name would go down in history, I would be 
very happy indeed! This is the meaning of life that is more 
important than anything else. 
  A man who enjoys power must attend to things personally, but 
I don't attend to everything personally, and I don't get myself 
involved in everything. In fact, I am too impatient to be a very 
good administrator; I am not good at coordinating, compromising, 
and I hate details. I see power as a tool to help realize a 
sense of self. To realize my sense of self, I don't mind hard 
work and sacrifice at all. 
  That is the exact opposite of those who enjoy power, for 
they 
like to attend to things themselves with their power; a very 
good example is that of the first emperor of the Ch'in: He 
studied official documents till all hours of the night, 
personally got involved in all things, and had to make every 
decision. 
  Question: Which type of politician do you think 
fit Mao Tse-tung, and do you admire him? What kind of 
politicians do you most admire? 
  Answer: Mao was between the two types; he enjoyed 
power so much that he could not face the fact of being deprived 
of it; that was Mao in his old age. 
  I greatly admire de Gaulle, he is the politician I most 
respect and admire. He was a war hero in World War II, and 
occupied a position none would dare challenge; yet, when he 
found he could not do anything useful, he resigned and retired 
to the countryside for 12 years. Was there any opportunity for 
him to stage a comeback? The political situation at the time 
appeared to rule that out. However, when the French military 
supported de Gaulle's return to deal with the Algerian revolt, 
the first thing he did upon assumption of power was to announce 
that France would let Algeria go through direct negotiations. 
This truly was something that not anyone could accomplish. 
  When de Gaulle returned to power, he ameliorated the 
historical animosity between France and Germany, promoted the 
European common market, made future plans not only for France 
but also for Europe and established a foundation for the 
continuing future development of Europe; that was true 
leadership. In 1968, with France paralyzed by a series of 
national demonstrations and strikes, he went on television and 
in a short statement announced that general elections would be 
held within a month, and that immediately put an end to all 
demonstrations; this grave crisis was resolved by his one 
television address. The elections resulted in a major victory 
for de Gaulle, but despite the victory he made plans to step 
down for he knew that his era was ending. Issues of 
administrative reform and the student had to be addressed, but 
these trifling matters did not interest de Gaulle and he passed 
them on to others to deal with. 
  At the time I was in England; the democratic politics of 
England was also of the traditional, old-line type, and their 
legislators had first class educational background, oratory 
skills and training, but they were no match for de Gaulle when 
it came to handling major issues from a broad perspective. 
  Question: What kind of historical figure do you 
want to be? 
  Answer: There is no need to talk about that now, 
for it's too early to do so. I consider life like painting a 
picture, one naturally knows what one wants to paint when one 
picks up a brush. De Gaulle certainly knew [his objectives of] 
European unity and a strong France before he proceeded to work 
toward those ends. But what about opportunities? These are the 
external conditions. Whether one has an opportunity depends on 
the kind of environment in which one finds himself. When I was 
young, I was very pessimistic, moody and depressed, thinking 
that I would not have an opportunity in my lifetime. Taiwan is 
too small a place, and even if one had talent and ability, one 
could hardly influence the world [from Taiwan]; I felt I was 
born into the wrong era. But now I no longer think this way; it 
is very clear to me that a politician does have enough room to 
exercise power. 
  Question: How do you see Taiwan today? 
  Answer: So long as I live, it is quite possible 
that Taiwan will develop world-class influence; there is no 
doubt, the question is only what one does to bring that about. 
The space Taiwan occupies is really not that small, therefore a 
Taiwan leader should allow Taiwan to develop its world-class 
influence in the same way as de Gaulle deliberated on how to 
establish a strong and powerful France and launch a new European 
era in the midst of turmoil and instability. 
  Question: How many years will it take to influence 
the whole world? 
  Answer: I have just said, if I were the president 
now, I would immediately proceed to create that kind of era. 
Frankly speaking, if I had the opportunity to be Taiwan's leader 
today, I would not waste one minute or one second. Only a person 
without ability would waste any time, and if at this point in 
life I don't know what should be done, I would be in a total 
mess! 
  Question: How do you see the Party Program on 
Taiwan Independence? Is it a reflection of the anti-Kuomintang 
[KMT] sentiments or is it a national goal? If the DPP came to 
power, would it change the national flag or the country's name? 
  Answer: Objectively speaking, Taiwan is an 
independent country; I hope we ourselves at least recognize that 
fact, but as to how foreigners see it, it becomes a question of 
tactics. Taiwan was originally an independent sovereign country, 
and all we did was to announce that fact. Now you ask whether 
the country's name and flag should be changed, actually these 
are small matters, and questions of tactics are also small 
matters. If China is displeased, are we not supposed to do 
anything? Why do we say we must make changes? Are we supposed to 
wait for the day when China does not care before we make any 
changes? Naturally we hope to make changes, but if changing the 
country's name would create great difficulties, then we can wait 
a while; as the Chinese Communists themselves often say, we too 
can wait 60 years. Waiting a while is not a difficult thing to 
do. 
  Question: In the course of the opposition 
movement, when the Chung-li incident or the Mei-li Island 
incident occurred, you happened to be away. Did you anticipate 
these things and therefore leave [Taiwan]? 
  Answer: In the Chung-li Incident, what could I 
have done if I were here, participate in the demonstrations? 
Direct the demonstrations? That is really laughable. Frankly 
speaking, the historical meaning of the Chung-li incident is the 
use of people's power to block the fabrication of ballots. If 
you expect me to oppose the Chung-li incident, that would be 
impossible. Undoubtedly, I had a share of the responsibility in 
that incident! No, not responsibility, it was my pleasure to see 
these type of things happen, where people use their power to 
oppose the [opposition's] brute force in the elections. If the 
elections could be held with fabricated ballots, the elections 
would be fraudulent. Under such circumstances, you cannot expect 
me to be in control, that cannot be done; but to turn that 
around, if you expect me to carry on further agitation at the 
scene, that also would not be right, would it? 
  I was not present when the Mei-li Island incident occurred, 
because no one knew it was going to happen; and if no one 
expected it, how could I have been present? I left Taiwan two 
months before the incident, and I did not leave with the 
expectation that it would take place. 
  As to the charge that I have paid too small a price, that 
naturally is difficult to refute. I have not spent time in 
prison, and did not seriously consider serving any prison 
sentence. But perhaps I should say I did not avoid prison, nor 
was I afraid of it. Is any further explanation necessary for 
what I have done in my life so far? Are there disasters more 
unpredictable than the Chung-li incident? I would not say 
however that I dare not take a stand for fear of this type of 
disaster. 
  Question: Have you assessed the situation to 
determine how it can be used to your advantage? 
  Answer: For one engaged in politics, one naturally 
makes his moves in the context of major trends. It's true I 
threw myself into one such major trend. When I returned in 1986, 
I brought with me the pressure to organize a party along with 
homecoming. I turned homecoming into a major movement which was 
likely to succeed objectively speaking. However, if other people 
insisted on twisting the facts, no matter how you explain them, 
it would be to no avail; if you have accomplished nothing in 
life, people would certainly not talk about you, but if you aim 
to achieve great things, why should you care what others say 
about you? 
  For example, up to this point of my life, I can say I am 
[speaking in English]: Very proud of myself. In all 
my life, my goal is like de Gaulle's; in painting a picture of 
my life, I am an idealist in search of ideals in life. I am 
perhaps too self-confident, and therefore do not let small 
matters bother me; when other people vilify me over small 
matters, I care not at all. We all know what is beauty; like a 
great painter, one knows what and how to paint, and one would 
not bother about or argue over trifles. I have often said that I 
am not a person concerned with the superficial, but where it 
concerns the ultimate gains and losses in life, I do indeed 
care; my hope is to become a person with a place in history and 
I care about the major achievements in my life but not all the 
minor, superficial things. 
  The biggest difference between me and others is that I am 
not 
concerned about details. Frankly, I don't care at all to be on 
the banquet circuit. I am like that: Other people consider this 
business [of banqueting] to be indispensable, but I don't care 
about it at all! I don't care about society's reaction, I do 
care about myself, [my place] in history and whether I can 
accomplish [my] great historic mission. 
  Question: You said you are not a particularly good 
administrator, but whether as Governor or President in the 
future, isn't administrative ability a prerequisite? 
  Answer: It's true I don't care for details, but as 
my one and a half years as the T'aoyuan County magistrate 
demonstrated, I didn't do badly on that score. A political 
leader cannot simply rely on thinking big, on ideals, for 
ability is also important. You can say that I am bored by 
administrative responsibilities, but that does not mean that I 
don't know how to administer. There are no truly able political 
leaders who don't know about administration; it is because they 
know it too well to involve themselves personally that they 
select the right persons for the jobs with themselves holding 
the key. 
  Question: If you became governor, would you then 
go on the banquet circuit? 
  Answer: Society says this is not a good thing! It 
is not that I care, or that I love banqueting, it's just that I 
don't care for such things. 
  Question: Some people say that you are like Li 
Hsiao-lung [2621 1420 7893], winning is what counts, the means 
utilized are not important? 
  Answer: It's the exact opposite. It is not that 
people like me do not choose their tactics, they do. Because we 
have too much faith [in others] that we do need to choose 
tactics. I am much smarter than you on that score, it's like 
what Mencius said: "Even if one can rule the empire by killing 
one innocent person, one should not do it." It is because I have 
too many choices, that's why we choose our tactics; only people 
in a terrible fix do not choose their tactics, because they 
don't have the option to so choose. 
  Question: What kind of blueprint do you have for 
Taiwan? 
  Answer: I have one important concept; namely, 
Taiwan is the world's newest emerging people. 
  A newly emerging people have two special characteristics: 
They know a great deal and they are full of vitality. There are 
historical reasons for this. In the early days, because 
East-West cultural exchanges took place through the Gansu 
corridor, the Mongols knew a great deal. As a nomadic people, 
they were full of vitality, and from all this they developed 
their special ability and skills. The Manchus were able to 
develop special ability by learning horsemanship from the 
Mongols, Han culture from the Chinese who migrated beyond the 
Great Wall, Western culture through the seafaring Chinese 
pirates and trade and commerce through nomadic herding. In the 
20th century, the Japanese did the same thing: They knew a lot 
more than the Westerners, and they were more vigorous than the 
latter. Today, among the world's newest emerging peoples, it is 
the Taiwanese who know a great deal and who have the greatest 
vitality. 
  Ten years ago, I had already focused on this issue. I was 
the 
first one to do so, and it is the source of my sense of 
self-confidence. I was moody and depressed when I was young, 
thinking that even if the presidency of Taiwan was offered to 
me, what could I do? I dwelled on that proposition during my 
college years, and became very pessimistic. 
  Today, our mission is how to enable this newly emerging 
people and country to develop and fulfill their historic 
mission; people say I am a ultra-nationalist, that's not so, for 
it is our historic duty. That's why with regard to the mainland 
policy, I am not like the majority in the DPP, it's the exact 
opposite: I am not afraid to make concessions. I consider it 
[the mainland policy] a Western expedition: When Taiwan 
businessmen invest on the mainland, that's the beginning of 
Western expedition; it is an unstoppable historic trend and we 
are bound to succeed for we cannot fail. Through China's massive 
market and manpower, Taiwan will achieve a position of 
preeminence in the 21st century in the same way the Mongols and 
Manchus did in their days, and will fulfill its historic destiny. 
  The second stage will not be easy to handle, it will require 
correct policy as well as leadership. We have seen how the 
Mongols and Manchus failed, will we repeat their mistakes? As 
leader, one has the responsibility of absolutely not letting 10 
or 20 years pass [without doing what must be done]. Perhaps one 
should put it this way, will your achievement be that of just 
another economic power? The historic mission of Taiwan, in my 
view, is to establish a more rational relationship between 
production and distribution, for this is the flaw in economies 
of the Western nations including Japan. Nevertheless, in summing 
up, what we hope to build is a societal system. Perhaps our 
historic mission is that history will let Taiwan rise up and 
leave something behind for mankind. The meaning of Taiwan's 
place in history, therefore, is to establish and leave behind a 
more rational and more perfect economic system that will benefit 
all mankind. This is the framework of my thinking and the 
mission of my life. 
  That is why I do not really care to be a county executive, 
the provincial governor or even the president, for my hope is to 
have an opportunity to accomplish the above mission, for 
otherwise being president of the State of Taiwan would have no 
meaning. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40080 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Professor Interviewed on `Criminal Politics' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0062A Taipei TZULI WANPAO in Chinese 17 Oct 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0062A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZULI WANPAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chou Ts'ui (0719 5050): "Interview With Taiwan </F>
University Political Science Professor Chao Yung-mao (6392 3057 
5399): Effect of Lots of Money -- Need To Block Outlets of 
Criminal-Influenced Politics"] 
  [Excerpt] After the shooting incident involving Yun-lin 
County assemblyman Liu Ch'i-hsun [0491 1142 6064] and [his] 
secretary Ta Pin-hung [6671 2430 1347], the question of criminal 
forces manipulating local politics surfaced once again. Taiwan 
University political science professor Chao Yung-mao has spent 
close to 10 years studying the phenomenon of criminal-influenced 
politics and its relationship to local and regional political 
factions. In a special interview granted this newspaper, he 
analyzed the situation by pointing out that the Yun-lin case is 
a symptom of Taiwan's regional politics "festering" at the core 
and that it is entering a criminal democracy period in which 
"local government is dominated by criminal politics" with all 
the trappings of an "Asian Sicily"; we should therefore consider 
this a wake-up call and treat the situation seriously. The 
following is the gist of Professor Chao Yung-mao's interview. 
  Judging from the data available to me, Taiwan today carries 
on a close relationship with criminal politics, most directly 
through members of a legislative assembly who came out of 
criminal politics and make up as much as 50 percent of its 
membership. This type of environment is very frightening because 
the linkage between criminal forces and local politics is 
extremely close which enables them to "divide the spoils on the 
spot" whether over the budget, administration or letting of 
municipal contracts, and this will impact on the quality and 
allocation of public services in local government. 
  As for the Yun-lin County incident, one can analyze it from 
three different perspectives to gain some understanding of the 
background and origin of criminal political influences: First, 
criminal politics thrive on receiving and granting of favors and 
settling disputes among enterprises and over spheres of 
influence controlled by the criminal forces themselves. Second, 
criminal politics have grown and evolved over time from the 
"societal model" in the 1950-60s, when they depended on 
blackmail, extortion, taking a cut on gambling winnings and 
operating prostitution and gambling activities to maintain their 
existence, to gradually changing to the "economic model" in the 
1970s when Taiwan became developed economically and democratized 
politically and the new environment required the protection of 
politicians in power, and in this period the criminal 
enterprises began to restructure and became regional or publicly 
owned enterprises. Under these circumstances, the relationship 
between criminal forces and local political factions grew even 
closer and produced the situation in which the former would 
throw their support to certain factions or choose sides. At the 
same time, favors and grievances which one political faction may 
have vis-a-vis another would affect the interests of the 
criminal forces, so when such conflicts occurred, the criminal 
forces behind the various factions would come out to settle the 
disputes in behalf of their sponsors, and the atmosphere would 
become especially charged when elections are involved, and this 
threatens the fairness and safety of the electoral process 
itself. Third, the actual battleground of criminal forces is the 
elections not of the county magistrates, but the next generation 
of county assemblymen; therefore, the situation we see today is 
only the first shot leading to the next battle, for the criminal 
forces are now only getting the candidates of their factions 
ready for the next election. Analyzed from the above-mentioned 
second and third factors, local politics and criminal politics 
are already intimately intertwined. If local political power 
comes from the county assemblymen, village chiefs and township 
mayors who all owed their political start to criminal forces, it 
would be difficult to say that criminal politics would not 
continue to develop and extend its reach to the provincial 
assemblymen and people's representatives in the national 
legislature, and this will certainly interfere with the goal of 
achieving honest government in national political development. 
If criminal forces and politics were too closely tied together, 
it would lead to even more severe "political struggle," 
particularly after criminal politics has monopolized local 
political power for a long period of time; this would compound 
the difficulties for any party in power to undertake any local 
political reforms. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40081 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   DPP Quotes Li Teng-hui </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0089A Taipei TZULI WANBAO in Chinese 19 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0089A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZULI WANBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Min-tang (0491 2494 1016) in Taipei: "Li </F>
Teng-hui Goes Wild"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] The "Analects of Li Teng-hui's 
Wildness" compiled by the New Democratic Party include: 
  Tainan County - Li says "If Huang Hsiu-meng loses the 
election, I will commit seppuku." Note: It appears that if the 
head of state commits suicide, the "presidential elections" will 
have to be held sooner. 
  Chiayi City - Li says "If Chang Wen-ying does not have 
adequate ability, I will kneel down to get the votes." Note: If 
the head of state can kneel down so easily, does that not 
humiliate the nation and diminish its influence? 
  Taoyuan County - Li says "Liu Pang-you is absolutely clean 
and will not engage in land speculation." Note: When Liu 
Pang-you's three court cases were tried, the head of state 
openly stood as guarantor for him. Ai! The chastity of the Queen 
of Justice... 
  Hualien County - Li says "as a representative, Wang 
Ching-feng never sought favors." Note: There are two types of 
seeking favors. One is for private benefit; the other is for 
public benefit. A representative who never seeks favors is a 
lazy bum! 
  Tainan City - Li says "Based on my reputation, please 
support 
Shih Chih-ming." Note: If the head of state's reputation can be 
sold so cheaply, exactly how much is it per kilo? 
  Hsinchu City - Li says "Tung Sheng-nan was educated to enter 
politics and won't mess up." Note: Does Li Teng-hui think that 
other candidates are not educated? Pingtung County - Li says "Su 
Chen-chang does not get along with others and does not 
understand government but Wu Tse-yuan would not finagle a 10 
billion construction check." Note: Eight months ago Li Teng-hui 
openly confirmed the political career achievements of Su and 
other New Democratic Party county chiefs. Now he wantonly 
criticizes them for the sake of the elections. The head of 
state's "nausea" makes one feel "bitter!" He also publicly 
endorsed Wu Tse-yuan's 10 billion check, thus even more clearly 
demonstrating how the central government favors the Kuomintang 
local leaders and impedes the work of opposition party county 
and city leaders. 
  Kaohsiung County - Li says "Yu Chen Yue-ying only works on 
improving Ch'un Chiao." Note: Yu Chen's accomplishments are 
universally acclaimed in Kaohsiung. It is inconceivable that the 
head of state would be making sarcastic remarks about Ch'un 
Chiao. 
  Taipei County - Li says "You Ching had no achievements 
during 
his term, but you can wear out your shoes searching and not find 
another like Ts'ai Sheng-pang." Note: You Ching based his bid 
for re-election on the assessment of ten major accomplishments 
during his term. His political rallies are always packed, which 
shows that the voters approve. If Li Teng-hui cannot see this, 
then his old eyes must be losing their vision. 
  Penghu County - During an inspection tour of county 
governments, Li expels County head Kao Chih-p'eng. Note: He 
goes on stage to do political magic tricks. First he is 
president; then he is chairman. 
  Taichung City - Li persuades Hsu Hsing-hui to withdraw, 
disregarding the fact that Hsu had sworn before "the gods" to be 
"in the election to the finish." Note: If Hsu Hsin-hui is 
reproached by the heavens, who will take responsibility? 
  Taichung County - Li beats his chest and says "If you 
believe 
in me, Li Teng-hui, then vote for Liao Liao-yi." Note: Liao 
Liao-yi was elected four years ago by buying votes and although 
he was caught, only his subordinates were sentenced. During his 
term, he also participated extensively in land speculation and 
the university town incident inspired 15,000 people to 
participate in protest demonstrations. He has also been indicted 
for the abuse of authority and public equipment for private 
purposes during this election. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40082 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Notes `Criticisms' of Television </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0089A Taipei TZULI WANBAO in Chinese 10 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0089A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZULI WANBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sun Hsiu-hui (1327 4423 5610), Professor of </F>
Advertising at Chengchih University: "Dispelling Our Delusions 
on Television News Reporting"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] On 8 November, the Legislative 
Yuan voted to pass a key clause on funding for public television 
stipulating that each of the three television stations submit 
ten percent of their gross revenue each year as one source of 
funding for public television. The result of the vote by the 
Joint Committee Session not only demonstrated the ardent hopes 
of the people for television reform but also reflected the 
abhorrence felt by many people during the elections when all 
three television stations were reduced to mouthpieces of the 
Kuomintang and not only favored the candidates of the ruling 
party but also went to extremes in every way to discredit the 
abilities of the opposition parties. The subtle aspect of this 
was that although the ruling party was constantly expressing 
views on the mass media (such as the need to scrupulously adhere 
to neutrality, and avoid exaggeration and incitation), the three 
stations did not change their ways. Instead, they pontificated 
instead at length on their demands that critics "not let 
political power interfere with reporting" as if vicious 
manipulators who interfered with television news reporting had 
never before existed. 
  Most who criticize television fall into a morass of news 
reporting principles such as subjectivity and objectivity, 
neutrality and balance, which appear clear but are actually 
vague. I am listing here two commonly seen criticisms with 
analysis of the "delusions" behind them. 
  Criticism one: As soon as elections come around, the 
television news takes on a distorted approach to discredit the 
abilities of the opposition powers. 
  Wrong! Television news is always quite distorted. Whenever a 
sensitive topic arises which is of great controversy or which 
has created conflict between two political parties (such as the 
vote on the No. 4 Nuclear plant case or the Gu-Wang talks), the 
three television stations' willing role as mouthpieces for the 
government becomes especially obvious. The most disastrous 
example of this was during the Gu-Wang talks when the reporting 
style of some television journalists caused some people to worry 
about the lack of distinction between the enemy and ourselves. 
It is not only during election time that the voices of the 
opposition powers are neglected. They have always been merely an 
optional "news source" in television news. 
  Criticism two: Excessive publicity for Kuomintang 
candidates in the television news during the elections can only 
have an opposite effect. 
  Voters who actively participate in political affairs and are 
concerned about the elections will find excessively slanted 
reporting offensive. However, don't forget, in this society 
there are still a large number of "politically indifferent 
groups" who have no interest in politics. They see voting as a 
periodic ritual and lack independent political decision-making 
ability and adequate political knowledge. These people also tend 
to be loyal television viewers, relying on the "reality" 
described on television to construct their external world. The 
images carved by the television news of the opposition parties 
long ago became deeply engraved in their minds. To these people, 
so-called excessive exaggeration merely enhances already 
existing impressions. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40083 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar008___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-008 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial on Nationalist Taiwan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0062B Taipei TZULI WANPAO in Chinese 26 Oct 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0062B </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TZULI WANPAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Excerpt] As was customary, the provincial government held 
a cocktail party yesterday in Taichung to commemorate the Taiwan 
Recovery Day. When non-Taiwanese Provincial Governor Sung 
Ch'u-yu [1345 2806 2404, James Soong] delivered his remarks, he 
spoke quite a bit of Taiwanese. When President Li, who also 
attended the cocktail party made his remarks, he emphasized the 
unconquerable spirit born of the special circumstances and the 
vitality shaped by the "Taiwan experience." He expressed the 
hope that all Taiwanese will further develop this spirit, and 
strive for even more glorious achievements. 
  On the same day, the "Taiwan People's Federation" was 
established in Taipei. Invited to deliver remarks at that 
meeting, professor P'eng Ming-min [1756 2494 2404], noting that 
Taiwan had relations with Mainland China in only four out the 
past 100 years, called upon all Taiwanese to sever any emotional 
ties to China and strive to achieve the dream of a Taiwan that 
is stable, prosperous, and democratic, with freedom and respect 
for human rights. 
  Also on the same day, a "Republic of Taiwan National 
Assembly" jointly sponsored by four organizations -- the 
"Foundation for Establishing Taiwan as a State," the "Taiwan 
Sung-Chu Association," the "Association for Supporting Taiwan in 
the United Nations," and the "Taiwan Cultural Advancement 
Association" -- held its first meeting outside the west gate of 
the Taipei Railway Station. The members demanded that Li 
Teng-hui dissolve the Republic of China and the Kuomintang 
[KMT], transfer the KMT properties into a fund for establishing 
Taiwan as a nation, and truly recover or liberate Taiwan. 
  In the past, commemoration of the Taiwan Recovery Day was 
never quite so enthusiastic. In observing the Taiwan Recovery 
Day this year, one can sense there were different connotations 
in the commemorations held at different quarters. 
  Why is it that for the first time in 21 years a 
non-Taiwanese 
was appointed Governor? Why is it that this non-native Governor 
spoke in Taiwanese? This is because the KMT may possibly be 
trying to promote harmony among the peoples and groups. To use 
President Li Teng-hui's own phrase, the KMT is "re-opening an 
old store." 
  Why is it that P'eng Ming-min once again emphasized the 
"sovereignty of Taiwan?" This is because a large number of 
people have spontaneously reacted adversely to what they 
perceived to be covetous designs of the Chinese Communists. 
  Why is it that in establishing the "Taiwan People's 
Federation," no attempt was made to sort out the non-Taiwanese 
from among the sponsors and supporters? This is because the 
concept of Taiwan as a "living community" for every one is 
gaining widely popular, though still complex responses. 
  The issue of reunification versus independence is still to 
be 
fully debated, but on Taiwanese soil, the cries of "Taiwan, 
Taiwan!" are becoming louder and louder. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40084 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Grain Output </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257E Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO in Chinese 23 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257E </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] The gross output of grain in 1993 for Sichuan 
Province reached 43 billion kilograms. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40085 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Grain Procurement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257D Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO in Chinese 24 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257D </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] As of 10 December, Sichuan Province had put over 
4 billion kilograms of grain in storage; 3.275 billion kilograms 
were contract orders, fulfilling 93.3 percent of the contract 
plan, and was a 15 percent increase over the same period in 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40086 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhejiang Grain Procurement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257L Hangzhou ZHEJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 15 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257L </F>
<F P=104>  Hangzhou ZHEJIANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] As of 10 December, Zhejiang Province had 
procured 1.878 billion kilograms of grain. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40087 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> EAST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Bangguo's Speech at Mao Zedong's Centenary </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0120A Shanghai JIEFANG RIBAO in Chinese 26 Dec 93 pp 1-3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0120A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai JIEFANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Wu Bangguo's Speech at Comrade Mao Zedong's </F>
Centenary (25 December 1994)"] 
  [Text] Comrades: 
  The people of Shanghai and the armed forces stationed in 
Shanghai have gathered here today to commemorate Comrade Mao 
Zedong's centenary. 
  Comrade Mao Zedong was a great Marxist, a great proletarian 
revolutionary, strategist, and theoretician, and the great 
leader of our entire party, entire armed forces and all 
nationalities throughout the land. He performed immortal feats 
in the founding and development of our party and the Chinese 
People's Liberation Army [PLA], in the victory of the 
revolutionary cause of the people of all nationalities in China, 
in the founding of the People's Republic of China, and in the 
development of China's socialist cause. He made major 
contributions to the emancipation of the oppressed peoples of 
the world and to the cause of human progress. Today, when the 
socialist modernization of our great motherland is striding 
proudly ahead, is thriving, and is constantly winning great 
victories, when the Chinese people are filled with pride and 
elation, are becoming more prosperous with each passing day, and 
are proudly and steadfastly taking their place among the 
people's of the world, we more deeply cherish that great son of 
the Chinese people, Comrade Mao Zedong. We will forever remember 
the arduous pioneering work and the great achievements in 
China's revolution and construction performed by the older 
generation of proletarian revolutions represented by Comrade Mao 
Zedong. 
  From the time he was a young man, Comrade Mao Zedong devoted 
himself to the Chinese revolution, and he fought for it his 
whole life long. Comrade Mao Zedong was one of the founders of 
our party, and the principal founder of our glorious People's 
Liberation Army. Following the collapse of the Great Revolution 
[1924-1927], he led the Autumn Harvest Uprising [1927] forces 
into Jinggangshan, where he founded the first rural 
revolutionary base under leadership of the party. During the 
most difficult days of the Chinese revolution, he found the 
correct revolutionary road, formulated a correct overall 
strategy, and gradually fashioned a whole body of correct 
theories and tactics. Thus, he turned defeat in the revolution 
into victory. Beginning with the Tsun-i Conference in 1935, 
Comrade Mao Zedong became the nucleus of our party's first 
generation central leadership collective, thereby ensuring that 
the Chinese revolution went steadily from victory to victory. 
  We shall never forget that but for Comrade Mao Zedong there 
would be no new China. In China's struggle to gain a magnificent 
victory in the new democratic revolution, it was Comrade Mao 
Zedong's correct leadership, the Communist Party of China that 
he headed, and the tremendous theoretical bravery and spirit of 
courageous struggle that opened a road that led from the 
countryside surrounding the cities to ultimate victory 
throughout the country. It was he who led the whole party and 
the people of the whole country through 22 years of arduous and 
brilliant people's revolutionary war that included the great 
land revolution war, the War of Resistance to Japan, the war of 
liberation, and ultimately the overthrow of the three big 
mountains of imperialism, feudalism, and bureaucratism for the 
opening of a new era in China's history. In his connection, 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping paid high tribute when he said: "Without 
Comrade Mao Zedong's outstanding leadership, it is extremely 
likely that the Chinese Revolution would still not be 
victorious. Thus, ...our party would still be struggling 
painfully in darkness. Therefore, to say that without Chairman 
Mao there would be no new China is no exaggeration at all." The 
founding of New China marks the Chinese' people's farewell to 
100 years of humiliation. It marks the time when the Chinese 
people stood up. This immortal contribution of Chairman Mao 
Zedong will forever be the pride of the Chinese people. 
  We can never forget that without Comrade Mao Zedong, 
socialism would not have been founded in China. It was under the 
correct leadership of Chairman Mao Zedong that Chairman Mao 
Zedong and his comrades in arms took advantage of the economic 
and political conditions for making a transition to socialism 
that victory in the new democratic revolution provided for the 
adoption of a policy of simultaneous socialist industrialization 
and socialist transformation, and a concrete policy of a gradual 
change in private ownership of the means of production. They 
were able to solve both theoretically and practically the 
daunting task of building a socialist system in such a populous 
and both economically and culturally backward large oriental 
country. This was the most profound and most magnificent 
socialist transformation in China's history. It greatly 
emancipated social production forces, and it lay a solid 
foundation for China's progress and development, thereby 
enabling new China very rapidly to gain a foothold immediately 
following its founding, and to initiate great socialist 
undertakings. Regarding this magnificent historical achievement 
of Comrade Mao Zedong, Comrade Deng Xiaoping said: "The success 
achieved in our socialist transformation is very wonderful. This 
is a major contribution to Marxism-Leninism of Comrade Mao 
Zedong." 
  These two major acts of leading the Chinese people, who 
account for one-fourth of the world's population, in standing 
up, and leading the Chinese people in taking the socialist path 
influenced and changed China's and the world's historical 
course. This was Comrade Mao Zedong's most outstanding 
historical achievement for the people of China. 
  Comrade Mao Zedong also led the entire party and the people 
of the whole country in exploring a path of socialist 
construction suited to China's circumstances. Following founding 
of the people's republic -- and particularly following the 
decisive victories gained in socialist transformation -- as 
large scale economic construction unfolded and experience was 
gained, and as some shortcomings, mistakes, and the taking of a 
tortuous road came to light in the USSR's economic construction, 
acting on the basis of China's circumstances and our party's 
experience in consistently maintaining independence and keeping 
the initiative in its own hands, Comrade Mao Zedong courageously 
suggested using the Soviet Union's experience as an object 
lesson in the task of exploring a path of socialist construction 
suited to China's circumstances. In early 1956, he proceeded 
from investigation and study, gathering together the wisdom of 
the entire party to propose the correct handling of 10 major 
relationships, which emphasized the rallying of all positive 
elements to build China into a powerful socialist nation. In 
1957, he raised social contradictions of two different 
characters in socialism that must be correctly differentiated 
and handled. He made correct handling of contradictions among 
the people the main theme in the nation's political life. In 
1958, he further called for a change of work emphasis to 
technological revolution and cultural revolution. He said, 
"self-reliance is primary; gaining foreign assistance is 
secondary. The eradication of superstition, maintaining 
independence and keeping initiative in our own hands in carrying 
out a revolution in industry, agriculture, and technology, and a 
cultural revolution, overthrowing a slavish mentality, burying 
dogmatism, and diligently studying good foreign experiences 
while also studying bad foreign experiences -- using them as 
object lessons -- is our line." It must be said that this 
analysis was correct at the outset. Putting forth these ideas 
was valuable and it held long-term guiding significance. 
Unhappily, because of an overestimation of the effect of 
international and domestic class struggle, and because of the 
arrogance and anxiousness to succeed that a succession of 
tremendous victories engendered, guided by mistaken "leftist" 
ideology after the last half of 1957, the application of this 
analysis was not successful, and even veered in a wrong 
direction. Both the party and the people paid a grievous price 
for this. However, emphasis on taking a socialist road of 
construction in keeping with China's circumstances as a basic 
spirit and fundamental direction remains a principle that we 
should forever follow. 
  Comrade Mao Zedong was a great man of the age, but he was 
not 
a perfect man. During the later years of his life, he made 
serious mistakes, but they were, after all, mistakes that a 
great proletarian revolutionary makes. Moreover, even during the 
final several years of Comrade Mao Zedong's life, when his 
mistakes were already very serious, he still kept a watchful eye 
on the motherland's independence and security. He correctly 
grasped new changes in the world situation; he led the party and 
the people in withstanding all hegemonist pressures; and he 
produced a new pattern for China's foreign relations. The Sixth 
Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee made a full 
and penetrating evaluation of Comrade Mao Zedong's historical 
position in "Decisions on Various Historical Problems Since 
Founding of the People's Republic." It said that "Taking his 
life as a whole, his contributions to the Chinese revolution far 
surpassed his errors. His accomplishments are primary; his 
mistakes are secondary." His historic contributions, and his 
scientific writings and correct ideology have struck deep roots 
in the hearts of hundreds of millions of people throughout the 
country. Today, our whole party, whole armed forces, and all 
nationalities throughout the country solemnly commemorate 
Comrade Mao Zedong's centenary. This is a response from the 
heart of the Party, the heart of the armed forces, and the 
hearts of the people. He will forever be revered and remembered 
by the whole party, the whole armed forces, and all 
nationalities throughout the whole country. 
  In commemorating Comrade Mao Zedong's centenary, more 
important than recalling his immortal contributions and 
expressing reverence for him is the maintenance and development 
of Mao Zedong Thought to expand and develop the endeavors he did 
not complete. 
  The Mao Zedong Thought of more than half a century is a 
scientific guiding ideology fashioned by the CPC, of which 
Comrade Mao Zedong was the leading representative, according to 
basic principles of Marxism-Leninism to meet China's 
circumstances. It is a product of the blending of the general 
principles of Marxism-Leninism with concrete practice in the 
Chinese revolution. It is the application and development of 
Marxism-Leninism in China. It is the theoretical principles 
pertaining to the Chinese revolution validated through practice 
and the summarization of experiences. It is the crystallization 
of the collective wisdom of the CPC. Numerous outstanding CPC 
leaders have made major contributions to its formation and 
development. Comrade Mao Zedong's scientific works epitomize it. 
Mao Zedong Thought is an integrated scientific system that is 
extremely rich in substance, including philosophical, political, 
economic, military, cultural, educational, and diplomatic 
theoretical principles, precepts, and scientific methods. In 
particular, its theories on new democratic revolution, its 
theories on policies and tactics, its theories on ideological 
and political work and on cultural work, and its theories on 
party building are all innovative theoretical enrichments and 
development of Marxism-Leninism. They are the living soul of Mao 
Zedong Thought. They are the standpoint, the point of view and 
the methods that run through all of the foregoing integral 
parts. They have three basic aspects, namely, seeking truth in 
facts, the mass line, and maintenance of independence and 
retaining the initiative in one's own hands. They are the 
concrete application of dialectical materialism and historical 
materialism to all proletarian political party work, and they 
are the distinctive standpoints, points of view and methods of 
Communist Party of China members formed through long and arduous 
struggle in China's revolution. As scientific truths, the 
standpoint, points of view, and methods of Mao Zedong Thought 
will always be our guide for action. Numerous of their important 
points of view and expositions combine basic Marxist-Leninist 
principles with China's concrete realities. They are the 
thoughts behind the creation of China's own path of revolution 
and construction. They are the thoughts behind the Communist 
Party being the leadership nucleus for the people of the whole 
country and that only socialism can save China. They are the 
thoughts behind the founding and consolidation of a CPC-led 
people's democratic dictatorship republic. They are the thoughts 
behind the correct handling of contradictions among the people, 
for rallying all positive elements, for uniting all forces that 
can be united, and for building a great socialist power. They 
are the thoughts behind the founding and development of a 
patriotic united front. They are the thoughts behind maintenance 
of independence and retention of the initiative in one's own 
hands, for self-reliance, for arduous struggle, for unceasing 
efforts to become stronger, and for standing on one's own two 
feet among the people's of the world. They are the thoughts 
behind the people being the power that creates history, for 
maintenance of unity and reliance on the masses of people, and 
for wholeheartedly serving the people. They are the thoughts 
behind maintaining and carrying forward the linking of theory 
and practice, for the superb work style of maintaining close 
links with the masses, and for criticism and self-criticism. 
They are the thoughts behind comprehensive improvement of party 
building, particularly improvement of the party's building of 
ideology. They are the thoughts behind the people's armed forces 
and people's war. Today, they still radiate truth. They still 
play an extremely important guiding role in our work today and 
in the future. 
  Mao Zedong Thought is our party's precious spiritual wealth. 
During the course of long struggle, comrades throughout the 
party have drawn wisdom and strength from Comrade Mao Zedong and 
Mao Zedong Thought. Mao Zedong Thought has nurtured generation 
after generation of party leaders and large numbers of cadres. 
It has educated the people of the whole country and, in the 
course of transforming China, it has become a tremendous 
material force. Therefore, we must treasure and cherish the 
precious spiritual wealth that is Mao Zedong Thought. As Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping said: "Generation after generation, we must raise 
high and safeguard this glorious and magnificent banner. 
Generation after generation, we must use correct and complete 
Mao Zedong Thought to guide our whole party, our whole armed 
forces, and our whole people, and to advance victoriously the 
cause of the party and socialism, and the international 
communist movement. Moreover, to do this, we must diligently 
study and apply the standpoint, point of view, and methods of 
Mao Zedong Thought to the study of new circumstances that occur 
during practice, to solve new problems, using new principles and 
new conclusions consistent with realities to enrich and develop 
our party's theory to ensure that our activities continue to 
move forward on the scientific path of Marxism-Leninism and Mao 
Zedong Thought. 
  Comrades. Since the Third Plenary Session of the 11th Party 
Central Committee, our party has maintained and developed Mao 
Zedong Thought in the active exploration of a road for building 
socialism that meets China's circumstances, making tremendous 
achievements thereby. The most important of these achievements 
has been finally finding the way to build a distinctively 
Chinese brand of socialism that Comrade Mao Zedong sought but 
did not find during those years, and to fashion Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory on building a distinctively Chinese brand of 
socialism. This is a process of combining Marxism and Chinese 
realities. It is continuing to find ways for China's new 
democratic revolution to bring about the second historical leap 
after the first historical leap. Taking our own road to build a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism is a road that must be 
taken for the development of China's society. It is a road that 
China must take to move toward prosperity, wealth, strength, and 
to stand on its own two feet among the people's of the world. 
Right now, diligent study of the newly published Volume 3 of 
Deng Xiaoping's Selected Works, to striving to 
understand Deng Xiaoping's theories about the building of a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism, and translating them 
into a tremendous "material force" to win new victories in the 
cause of building a socialism that is distinctively Chinese is 
to use real actions to maintain and develop Mao Zedong Thought. 
  Fifteen years ago, the 3d Plenary Session of the 11th Party 
Central Committee formed the Central Committee leadership 
collective of which Comrade Deng Xiaoping is the nucleus. This 
collective set the guiding policy of emancipating thinking, 
using one's head, seeking truth from facts, and uniting as one 
to look ahead. It firmly rejected the mistaken "leftist" policy 
of "taking class struggle as the key link," which is not 
appropriate to a socialist society, and it changed the party's 
and the state's work emphasis to economic construction, thereby 
bringing about a great historical change that ushered in a new 
era in the development of the socialist cause in China. 
  The most distinctive feature of the new area is reform and 
opening up to the outside world. Comrade Deng Xiaoping is the 
architect of China's socialist reform and opening up to the 
outside world, and its modernization. As the nucleus of the 
party's second generation leadership collective during the new 
era of reform and opening up to the outside world and socialist 
modernization, his most outstanding contributions have been not 
only leading our party and nation out of the profound 
catastrophe of the Great Cultural Revolution, but also using his 
profound understanding of contemporary China and the world to 
put the party and the national again in the forefront of the 
trend of the times, and drawing up a brand new and magnificent 
blueprint for the Chinese people to take their place among the 
peoples of the world with greater strength. His feet firmly 
planted on the good earth of China, he oriented toward the 
world. He looked squarely at China's present realities and cast 
his eyes on the future. In the process of studying new 
situations and solving new problems, he conceived and designed 
with great foresight a whole development strategy that is 
distinctively Chinese in character. In brilliantly leading the 
Chinese people in reform, opening up to the outside world, and 
modernization, he conducted an arduous and unflagging 
theoretical exploration. He respected practice, and he respected 
the masses. He was always concerned about the rights, interests, 
and hopes of the broadest masses of people. He was adept at 
capsulizing the experiences and creativity of the masses. He 
keenly understood the pulse and the moment of the times. He both 
continued what predecessors had done and broke with outmoded 
conventions. He exhibited tremendous political courage in 
opening new roads for the building of socialism, and tremendous 
theoretical boldness in blazing new realms of Marxism to make 
major historical contributions to the founding of distinctively 
Chinese socialist theory that brought Marxist theory to new 
heights in contemporary China. He is the originator of the 
theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism. 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a distinctively 
Chinese brand of socialism occurred under historical conditions 
in which peace and development became the main themes of the 
age. In the course of China's reform and opening up to the 
outside world, and its modernization, he summarized the 
historical experiences of socialist victories and reverses in 
China, and borrowed from the historical experiences of the 
waxing and waning, and the success and failure of socialism in 
other countries to fashion and develop this theory. It is a 
product of Marxist-Leninist basic principles and contemporary 
Chinese realities combined with the character of the age. It is 
a crystallization of the collective wisdom of the whole party 
and the people of the whole country. It has a distinctive 
character of the time. This theory provides, for the first time, 
a preliminary answer fairly systematically to a series of basic 
questions such as how to build socialism in a country that is as 
economically and culturally relatively backward as China, and 
how to consolidate and develop socialism. It employs new ideas 
and points of view to carry on, enrich, and develop Mao Zedong 
Thought. It is the newest product of the linking of Marxism to 
Chinese realities. It is contemporary Chinese Marxism. 
  It was under guidance of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism that China's 
reform and opening up to the outside world, and its socialist 
modernization during the past 15 years scored tremendous 
achievements that attracted the attention of the world, that the 
people's standard of living improved markedly, and that the 
party's endeavors increasingly gained the support of the people. 
It was because practice showed this theory to be correct and a 
scientific guide for our activities, that the 14th Party 
Congress explicitly made it the party's guiding thought. The 
14th Party Congress' call for the use of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism to 
arm the whole party is urgently required for moving ahead with 
the great undertaking of reform and opening up to the outside 
world, and socialist modernization. It is an important measure 
for enhancing and improving the building of the party in the new 
era, and it is also a basic guarantee for maintaining the 
party's basic line without wavering for 100 years. The recently 
published third volume of the Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping, and the second volume, which was published 10 
years ago, assemble the most important and the most original 
works of Comrade Deng Xiaoping in shaping and developing the 
theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism. 
They provide the finest teaching materials and the most powerful 
weapons for our further use of the theory of building a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism to arm the whole party, 
to educate cadres and the people, to unify ideology, to 
strengthen confidence, and to actively, completely, and 
correctly carry out the party's basic line. How diligently we 
study Volume 3 of the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping 
and profoundly understand and master the basic experiences 
accumulated, the basic theories created, and the basic lines 
formed by the second generation of the CPC leadership 
collective, of which Comrade Deng Xiaoping is the nucleus, in 
undertaking entirely new endeavors will have a major effect on 
whether we will be able better to complete the tasks of the 
1990's and advance victoriously into the 21st century. 
  The crucial issue in our study of Volume 3 of the 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping and in studying 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a distinctively 
Chinese brand of socialism lies in firm mastery of the 
quintessence, which is emancipation of thinking and the seeking 
of truth in facts, and linking the ideological realities and the 
work realities of all battlelines for the conscientious 
overcoming of all ideological restraints to enable a confluence 
of ideology and practice, and to enable a confluence of the 
subjective and the objective. 
  From Mao Zedong Thought to Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism are the two 
historical leaps generated in the course of persevering in the 
great cause of combining Marxism with China's realities by 
members of the Chinese Communist Party represented by Comrades 
Mao Zedong and Deng Xiaoping. Although the two leaps occurred in 
different historical periods, and have the characteristics of 
different historical conditions and times, and although they 
faced different historical contradictions and historical tasks 
and gained different historical victories; nevertheless, the two 
leaps were permeated with a common essence and substance. This 
was that they adhered to the ideological line of seeking truth 
from facts, and followed China's own road of revolution and 
construction. Adherence to the ideological line of seeking truth 
from facts and taking China's own road of revolution and 
construction are the most basic historical experiences of all 
the historical experiences summarized in Mao Zedong Thought and 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's building of a distinctively Chinese 
brand of socialism. They successfully transform the scientific 
tenets of Marxism into a complete system of new ideas, new 
theories, lines, plans, policies, and realistic operating 
principles for guiding practice in China's revolution and 
construction. Thus, they enabled China's revolution and the 
building of socialism to become a great scientific practice and 
a successful reality. All the history of our party shows that 
perseverance in combining Marxism with China's realities must 
proceed from national circumstances and the character of the 
times. It requires a thorough knowledge of the spiritual nature 
of Marxism to carry on and develop Marxism. This requires, in 
turn, the emancipation of thinking, the seeking of truth from 
facts, and diligent investigation and study of Chinese realities 
to induce new ideas and points of view, and new methods of 
solving problems. It means one cannot copy word for word the 
books and prescriptions of Marx, or mechanically follow the 
models and experiences of other countries. Failure to understand 
these points would have rendered impossible the creation of 
China's new democratic revolution and socialist revolution 
theories, and it would have rendered impossible the creation of 
the theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand of 
socialism. The most fundamental experience of adherence to the 
ideological line of seeking truth from facts and taking our own 
road of revolution and construction enabled both Mao Zedong 
Thought and Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism of our party to express 
the distinctive features of the times and the character of 
China, and to be imbued with the essence and the substance of 
universal Marxist truths. This is another reason why Mao Zedong 
Thought is a continuation and a development of Marxism. It is 
the reason that the theory of building a distinctively Chinese 
brand of socialism is the most substantive embodiment of the 
continuation and development of Mao Zedong Thought. 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping has always upheld Mao Zedong Thought. 
He deeply understands the ideological essence of Mao Zedong 
Thought's seeking of truth from facts. He also developed the 
ideological essence of the seeking of truth from facts of Mao 
Zedong Thought. He proposed the concept of emancipating 
thinking. He made the emancipation of thinking a part of the 
party's ideological line. He emphasized that the emancipation of 
thinking is of extreme importance in upholding the party's 
ideological line of seeking truth from facts. The emancipation 
of thinking and the seeking of truth from facts are parts of a 
piece. Only by emancipating thinking can the seeking of truth 
from facts be attained. Only the seeking of truth is facts is a 
true emancipation of thinking. Comrade Deng Xiaoping is a 
paragon of upholding the Party's ideological line of seeking 
truth from facts. He is a paragon of adherence to and 
development of Mao Zedong Thought. Comrade Deng Xiaoping has 
repeatedly emphasized that "emancipation of thinking and seeking 
truth from facts" is the essence that permeates the entire point 
of view of the theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand 
of socialism. In studying the new volume of the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping, we must grasp this essence, and 
clutch this substance firmly. We must adhere to practice being 
the sole criterion for testing truth. In the course of practice, 
we must adhere to truth and develop truth. We must reject 
dogmatic interpretations of certain Marxist principles and 
Marxist writings; reject understandings of socialism that are 
not scientific or that distort it; reject incorrect ideas about 
skipping the preliminary state of socialism; resolutely oppose 
erroneous points of view that basically repudiate Marxism; and 
uphold the use of the world outlook and methodology of 
dialectical materialism and historical materialism in analyzing 
and solving problems. We must constantly improve our perceptions 
as history advances, as times develop, and as practice deepens. 
The achievements we have made stem from the emancipation of 
thinking and the seeking of truth from facts. If we are to make 
even greater achievements in the future, we must likely depend 
on the emancipation of thinking and the seeking of truth from 
facts. New situations and new tasks are placing new requirements 
on our emancipation of thinking and seeking of truth from facts. 
We must continue to emancipate thinking and seek truth from 
facts so that our ideas and understandings meet constantly 
changing situations. This is a matter that we must understand 
before studying the third volume of the Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping. 
  In studying the third volume of the Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping, not only must we profoundly understand that 
the emancipation of thinking and the seeking of truth from facts 
are important ideological premises for maintaining and 
developing Mao Zedong Thought, but we must profoundly understand 
and grasp that on a series of important issues -- particularly 
basic issues such as what is socialism and how to build 
socialism -- how Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on the building 
of a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism building is a 
continuation and development of Marxism and Mao Zedong Thought. 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping has said: "In carrying out reform and 
opening up to the outside world and in placing the work emphasis 
on building the economy, we have not abandoned Marxism, 
Leninism, or Mao Zedong Thought. We cannot abandon the 
forefathers!" He also said: "Following the Third Plenary 
Session, we revived the correct things of Comrade Mao Zedong, we 
studied and applied Mao Zedong Thought in a correct and 
integrated way . The basic points are still the same. In many 
ways, today we are still doing things that Comrade Mao Zedong 
proposed but did not do. We are doing things well that he did 
not do well. For a fairly long time to come, we will be doing 
well these things and we will also be developing, but we will 
also have to continue to develop." He also noted that "True 
Marxist-Leninists must, based on current circumstances, 
understand, continue, and develop Marxism-Leninism." This is 
because "the world is constantly changing. In particular, modern 
science and technology are developing very rapidly. What used to 
be done in the old society in several decades or as much as a 
century or even a longer period is done in a single year 
nowadays." Therefore, true Marxists must make their thinking 
catch up with and meet rapidly developing circumstances. They 
cannot fall behind. This is like "the reason Lenin is a truly 
great Marxist is that he found the revolutionary road not in 
books but in reality, logic, philosophical ideas, and communist 
theory. The great Marxist-Leninist, Mao Zedong, did not seek in 
the books of Marx and Lenin the way to win victory in the new 
democratic revolution in backward China. Could Marx have 
predicted that the October Revolution would occur in a backward 
Russia?" Could Lenin have forecast that the use of rural 
villages to surround the cities could be used to attain victory 
in China?" Therefore, true Marxists must boldly pioneer and 
innovate. Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism is both a continuation 
of what those who have gone before have done and an opening up 
of a way to the future. This theory holds both very strong real 
pertinence and the distinctive character of the times. It is 
pertinent to today's rapidly changing world situation, and it is 
pertinent to the basic situation in China. It is also pertinent 
to various mistaken points of view that have existed for a long 
time in the understanding of socialism. It addresses the main 
issues in basic socialist theory, namely what is socialism and 
how to build socialism. Comrade Deng Xiaoping has put forward a 
series of new ideas, new points of view, and new concepts. They 
include new ideas, new points of view, and new concepts about 
the innate character and basic tasks of socialism; about the 
initial stage of socialism; about the standards for judging the 
"three facilitates"; about the economic development strategy of 
proceeding in three steps to accelerate development, the 
national economy moving a new step upward every several years; 
about science and technology being the primary productive force; 
about reform being China's second revolution; about China's 
development being inseparable from the rest of the world, 
opposing self-confinement and isolation; about the existence of 
no fundamental contradiction between socialism and a market 
economy; about how political system reform must correspond to 
economic system reform; about doing many things simultaneously 
and working with might and main; about one nation, two systems; 
about adherence to socialism, halting disturbances, and 
preventing peaceful evolution; about the need for vigilance 
against the right, and mostly guarding against "leftism"; about 
adherence to the party's basic line of "one center and two basic 
points" for a hundred years without wavering; about peace and 
development being the two main themes in the contemporary world; 
about taking the five principles of peaceful co-existence as the 
standard for building a new international order; about the need 
for dispassionate observation of the international situation, 
securing one's position, and dealing with matters calmly; about 
the key to China's problems being doing a good job within the 
Communist Party; and about greater building of clean government 
and opposition to corruption. This series of new ideas, new 
points of view, and new concepts are a creative development of 
Mao Zedong Thought. They are a major contribution to Marxist 
theory. It is the innovation of such theories that has brought 
about today's vigorous development of socialism in China. The 
facts show that we are true Marxists only because we both 
continue our forbearers' breaking of outmoded conventions and 
dare to pioneer and create the future. It is only by consciously 
understanding this point that we may be considered to have truly 
reached the ideological heights of modern Chinese Marxism, and 
to have more profoundly comprehended and truly grasped Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand 
of socialism. Therefore, when we read the third volume of the 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, we should study 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's strategic ideas and theoretical points 
of view, and diligently study his scientific attitude and 
creative spirit in employing the Marxist standpoint, point of 
view, and methods for use in studying new situations and solving 
new problems. 
  Comrades, only by adhering to contemporary Chinese Marxism 
-- 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on the building of a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism to guide our ideology 
and every endeavor -- will our cause have a bright future. Only 
in this way will our country be able to prosper, become rich and 
wealthy, and our people prosper and flourish. As Comrade Jiang 
Zemin said in his speech at a public lecture on the study of the 
third volume of the Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, 
"Doctrine may be likened to a banner." When the CPC was first 
founded, it solemnly wrote the words Marxism-Leninism on its 
banners. Following the Yanan rectification and the 7th Party 
Congress, it solemnly made Marxism-Leninism and practice in the 
Chinese revolution a unified ideology -- writing Mao Zedong 
Thought on its own banners. Beginning with the 3d Plenary 
Session of the 11th Party Central Committee, and on through the 
12th, 13th, and 14th Party Central Committees, our party has 
solemnly written Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on the building 
of a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism on its banners. 
This is an extremely precious spiritual wealth for which our 
party paid a tremendous price. It is a scientific summarization 
of the new historical innovations of our party and people. It is 
a great banner of our development of the socialist cause. It is 
a powerful spiritual mainstay of our nation's advance and 
development. In contemporary China, only by having this banner, 
and having this spiritual mainstay can a large party of 50 
million members and a large country with a population of 1.1 
billion have greater cohesiveness, combat strength, and 
creativity. The 15 years of reform and opening up to the outside 
world and the socialist modernization since the 3d Plenary 
Session of the 11th Party Central Committee fully demonstrates 
that "adherence to Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism is true maintenance and 
development of Marxism-Leninism, and Mao Zedong Thought." So 
long as we continue in the direction and along the road charted 
by this theory, and follow the "movement in three steps" 
development strategy all the way into the middle of the next 
century to attain the level of a moderately developed nation in 
the world, a wealthy and strong, democratic, and cultured modern 
socialist China will certainly be able to stand lofty and firmly 
in the Orient. 
  Comrades, as the largest city in China, Shanghai holds an 
important position in China's revolution and construction 
endeavors. It received a high degree of attention from Comrade 
Mao Zedong. Prior to his death, Comrade Mao Zedong had more than 
50 important activities underway in Shanghai. He gave numerous 
important instructions about work in Shanghai, and he left a 
glorious imprint and a great ideology. Back in March 1919, in 
seeing off the students for part-work part-study in France, he 
began his earliest contact with Shanghai. During the period of 
the party's founding, Comrade Mao Zedong came to Shanghai 
several times to seek truth for rescuing the nation and the 
people. He actively launched revolutionary activities, and did 
much work in founding the party. He attended one of the first 
Chinese Communist conferences convened in Shanghai, thereby 
becoming one of the founders of the CPC. When the CPC 
established a democratic revolutionary program of opposition to 
imperialism and feudalism for the founding of the democratic 
united front, Comrade Mao Zedong was appointed by the party to 
go to Shanghai to take part in the work of the Kuomintang 
Central Executive Committee. He actively promoted the first 
cooperation between the KMT and the CPC, and did much work 
"sowing the seeds" of the subsequent grand and spectacular first 
great revolution. Following defeat of the great revolution, 
Comrade Mao Zedong left the city to found revolutionary bases in 
the villages. Using the single spark of a red regime, he 
encouraged and supported the people of Shanghai in arduous and 
tortuous struggle. Following the party's Wayaopao Meeting [in 
December 1935], the Central Committee and Comrade Mao Zedong 
looked after and guided the work of the Shanghai underground 
party organization, thereby making Shanghai one of the main 
bastions of China's workers's movement, revolutionary cultural 
movement, and the patriotic and democratic movement of various 
democratic strata in the Chinese democratic revolution. When the 
war of liberation was on the verge of success and the CPC 
Central Committee decided to shift the party's work emphasis 
from the rural villages to the cities, showing great foresight, 
Comrade Mao Zedong personally drew up the strategic policy of 
"both the need to annihilate the enemies defending Shanghai, and 
the need to preserve Shanghai intact." He also personally 
drafted nearly 20 telegrams in the name of the CPC Central 
Committee and Central Military Committee as part of the strategy 
for Shanghai's liberation and takeover. He drew up a series of 
plans and policies that permitted Shanghai, the largest city in 
China, to revert intact to the hands of the people. 
  Right after Shanghai's liberation, faced with a grim 
situation of blockade by the Americans and Chiang Kai-shek, 
bombings, sabotage by enemy agents, rampant speculation, and 
countless tribulations, the CPC Central Committee and Comrade 
Mao Zedong adopted a series of important policies for guiding 
the people of Shanghai in rapidly overcoming all difficulties to 
win a tremendous victory in transforming the old Shanghai and 
building a new Shanghai. Later on, thanks to the guiding spirit 
of the CPC Central Committee and Comrade Mao Zedong, Shanghai 
rationally readjusted existing industry and commerce and 
smoothly carried out a full revival of Shanghai's national 
economy. After three years of economic revival and the socialist 
transformation of capitalist industry and commerce, and 
handicraft industries, as well as the planned building of 
socialism, Shanghai's industrial production rapidly revived and 
developed. 
  With the full launching of socialist transformation and 
construction, Comrade Mao Zedong personally visited Shanghai 
several times to explore avenues for building Chinese socialism. 
He went down to the grassroots, inspected industrial plants and 
enterprises, and contacted cadres and the masses to learn about 
events. He met with people in all walks of life and listened to 
statements from all quarters. He personally made a report to 
Shanghai cadres announcing the party's plans and policies to 
promote work in every way in Shanghai. In January 1956, Comrade 
Mao Zedong visited Shenxin Plant No 9 where he told everyone 
that after the USSR took power, capitalist property was taken 
over by the state with a single order, but that China had 
adopted the method of gradual transformation. This was done in 
view of China's circumstances. Soviet methods were not rigidly 
copied. He also warned everyone to rely on the working class to 
look after the factories. Around this same time, Comrade Mao 
Zedong also visited Shanghai port and the Jiangnan Shipyard. On 
5 November 1955, Comrade Mao Zedong boarded "Gangshen Lun," for 
a zestful inspection of the port's new appearance. He also said 
significantly that Shanghai is China's largest port; it is an 
international port; and it is a port that has development 
potential. We must take good care of it. He also said to 
accompanying leading cadres that Shanghai cadres should study 
management skills to meet needs in building socialism. At the 
Jiangnan Shipyard, he was ecstatic upon learning that this 100 
year-old shipyard was able to build submarines. When an 
accompanying municipal CPC committee official said that not only 
was it necessary to learn Soviet techniques but to surpass them, 
Comrade Mao Zedong said in great agreement: "We must have this 
kind of courage." In July 1957, Comrade Mao Zedong visited the 
Shanghai Machine Tool Plant. When Comrade Mao Zedong learned 
that within seven years after liberation, Shanghai-produced 
grinding machines were being supplied to the whole country to 
support construction everywhere, he said: "This kind of plant is 
needed for construction." After hearing that the plant was now 
designing its own grinding machines instead of making the former 
copies, he said delightedly: "We must take the independent 
design road," and he emphasized the study of advanced foreign 
experiences "for our own use." During this period, Comrade Mao 
Zedong used a large amount of investigation and study to shape 
many new approaches to the building of socialism in China. 
Comrade Mao Zedong personally urged along the cadres and people 
of Shanghai saying, "Shanghai has a future. It must be 
developed," to point out a direction for Shanghai's 
construction. He directed Shanghai to set up a "completely 
useful and rationally developed" industrial construction plan. 
During the 10 years of beginning the all-out building of 
socialism, Shanghai brought into play the potential and the 
strengths of its old industrial base, providing powerful support 
for the economic construction of the whole country. 
  During the period of his visits and guidance to Shanghai, 
Comrade Mao Zedong also frequently associated with the people. 
He had extensive contacts, intercourse, and even communications 
with people in all trades and professions, and all strata in 
Shanghai. He was profoundly concerned about the feelings and 
hopes of the masses. 
  The Shanghai working class will never forget Comrade Mao 
Zedong's hopes for the working class. Comrade Mao Zedong often 
went among the working people of Shanghai. He had cordial talks 
with them and learned about their circumstances. He encouraged 
everyone to contribute to the building of socialism. He was 
particularly solicitous about and cherished model workers. He 
instructed cadres in the need to pay attention to making the 
most of the role of model personnel as mainstay cadres, leaders, 
and bridges. In March 1960, he also personally invited to dinner 
Shanghai's innovators and labor model representatives, and he 
encouraged everyone to suggest ways and means for the 
technological revolution, and to contribute their energies to 
it. He also pointed out that "Revolution is no easy matter. 
Remember this truth when you are making technological 
innovations. No testing means no failures, and no successes! 
Everything must be tested and experience gained through failures 
making later success possible." He emphasized the need to train 
college students, train engineers, and train writers from among 
the workers. It was because of Comrade Mao Zedong's advocacy and 
concern that the first group of worker engineers was born in 
Shanghai. A number of labor models entered university, and 
advanced model personnel in every trade and industry spurred 
technological innovation and a technological revolution campaign 
throughout the city. 
  Comrade Mao Zedong was concerned about the production and 
the 
livelihood of Shanghai's peasants. On many occasions, he issued 
instructions on the need for concern and assistance. He warmly 
endorsed and recommended the experiences of Songjiang County in 
convening meetings of delegates from all walks of life during 
the early liberation period. He also personally wrote comments 
on the reports of five agricultural production cooperatives, 
including one from Hongnan Township in suburban Shanghai, and it 
was included in a book titled "High Tide in China's Rural 
Socialism." 
  Comrade Mao Zedong was solicitous about the growth of 
Shanghai's young people. In April 1950, despite being busy with 
a political campaign, Comrade Mao Zedong took the time to write 
a few words of encouragement for the Shanghai Nanyang Model 
Middle School student wall newspaper, QINGFENG, that urged the 
students to learn skills to serve the people. In reply to a 
request from the Shanghai QINGNIAN BAO, he sent the powerful 
inscription, "March On, March On, On!" to encourage the 
embattled Shanghai youth who were overcoming difficulties. When 
visiting the Shanghai Machine Tool plant, he noticed that most 
of the people in the workshops were young workers. He happily 
instructed, "This is the newly rising force that you must 
nurture." "You have so many young people; you will certainly be 
able to run the plant better!" This expressed Comrade Mao 
Zedong's ardent hopes for and confidence in youth. 
  On several occasions, Comrade Mao Zedong met women 
delegates, 
which left unforgettable memories for the women of Shanghai. 
When Comrade Mao Zedong saw quite a few women workers on the 
frontline of production when he visited plants, he shook hands 
warmly with them. He was sincerely proud of the emancipation of 
China's women, and he said approvingly: "Now that women have 
been liberated, they can run machine tools too. Things that male 
comrades can do, female comrades can also do." His encouragement 
and praise encouraged the broad masses of women in Shanghai to 
play a "hold up half the sky" role in the building of socialism. 
  Comrade Mao Zedong always paid close attention to the 
building of the people's armed forces. On numerous occasions, he 
visited and encouraged units stationed in Shanghai. In February 
1953, when Comrade Mao Zedong inspected navy vessel units for 
the first time, he boarded the Chang Jiang, and the Luoyang. He 
also said that "We are determined to build a powerful people's 
navy to oppose imperialist aggression." Comrade Mao Zedong also 
personally wrote the well-known "Eighth Company Eulogy," which 
praised the model deeds of "the good Eighth Company of Nanjing 
Road." All the party, all the armed forces, and all the people 
were called upon to study it. 
  On numerous occasions, he met notables in the fields of 
education, science and technology, health, literature and the 
arts, and news and publication, as well as delegates from 
commerce and industry. He befriended them and showed great 
concern for their ideology and livelihood. Thus, they sincerely 
revered this leader of the people, and they felt the warmth of 
the party in living expression of the party intellectuals policy 
and united front policy. 
  After founding of the people's republic, Shanghai was also 
an 
important site for the CPC Central Committee's and Comrade Mao 
Zedong's state activities. Under his personal sponsorship, the 
CPC Central Committee convened numerous important conferences in 
Shanghai, which produced numerous major policies and decisions. 
In addition, he conducted numerous important foreign affairs 
activities in Shanghai where he received important heads of 
state and international friends from numerous countries. The 
birth of the Shanghai Communique was a major victory for Mao 
Zedong's diplomatic line. It lay the foundation for our opening 
up to the outside world of today. 
  All of this encouraged the entire party and all of the 
people 
of Shanghai to struggle to build socialism. Comrade Mao Zedong's 
brilliant thought and leadership style left a profound 
impression on the hearts of the people of Shanghai. The people 
of Shanghai will forever cherish the memory of Comrade Mao 
Zedong. 
  Since the 3d Plenary Session of the 11th Party Central 
Committee, the older generation of revolutionaries, including 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping, have exhibited extreme concern and 
expectations for Shanghai. Shanghai's every construction 
achievement has been the coacervation of the guidance and 
support of the Central Committee leaders and the older 
generation of revolutionaries. In recent years, in particular, 
Comrade Xiaoping has made a fairly concentrated and profound 
exposition of Shanghai's development problems as part of his 
macroeconomic strategy of accelerating China's economic 
development. In 1990, in talking with Central Committee comrades 
in charge, he said: "Take Shanghai, for example, which is 
considered a major case. Shanghai is our king card. Getting 
Shanghai going is a shortcut." When he visited Shanghai in 1991, 
Comrade Xiaoping said that development of Pudong "is not just a 
Pudong matter. It is a matter affecting the development of 
Shanghai. It is a matter of the use of the Shanghai base to 
develop the Chang Jiang Delta and the Chang Jiang Basin." In 
discussing finance as the nucleus of a modern economy, he also 
noted that "for China to achieve international standing in the 
finance and banking field, Shanghai will have to be relied upon 
first of all." During his visit to south China in 1992, Comrade 
Xiaoping said in his important remarks that Shanghai holds a 
marked advantage in human resources, technology, and management, 
which influences a wide area. "Right now it has all the 
conditions for acting faster." In this connection, he called 
upon us "not to miss opportunities." We should emancipate 
thinking a little bit more, be a little bolder, and act a little 
faster. He said that we can only move ahead but not retreat in 
the development of Pudong today, and that you have no retreat 
route. Pudong's late development is bad, but it is also good. 
You can benefit from Guangdong's experiences to do a better job, 
and to be more modern. The starting point can be somewhat 
higher. Later on, you can rest; I believe this. He said, 
Shanghai people tend to be agreeable. This is a boundless force 
for the building of socialism. Look at Shanghai with so many 
changes in a single year. In three years, it will have greater 
changes. Comrade Xiaoping stressed doing many things at the same 
time and working with might and main. He asked Shanghai to issue 
two questionnaires, one on economic construction and the other 
on spiritual civilization. He said that by the end of the 
present century, Pudong in Shanghai and Shenzhen in Guangdong 
will have to answer the question whether what you have done is 
socialist or capitalist, and both of you will have to be role 
models. You must pay attention to overall national strength, but 
at the same time you have to pay attention to spiritual 
civilization. Comrade Xiaoping's important instructions and 
earnest hopes provided enormous spiritual motivation for 
Shanghai's progress. 
  The third generation of party leaders in which Comrade Jiang 
Zemin is the nucleus also showed deep concern and provided warm 
encouragement to work in Shanghai. Not long after the 14th Party 
Congress, Comrade Zemin conducted an inspection in Shanghai 
during which he said that historically Shanghai's commodity 
economy has been fairly well-developed. It has multiple 
advantages, including the human talent needed for the 
development of a socialist market economy. He called upon 
Shanghai to take the lead in building a socialist market economy 
operating mechanism. He ardently supported the development and 
opening to the outside world of Pudong. During his inspection of 
Shanghai during April 1993, he acted personally, night after 
night drafting speech drafts reiterating that the Central 
Committee's development and opening to the outside world of 
Pudong is firm and unshakable, and the Pudong policy is 
unchangeable. He also directed many times that Shanghai should 
take the national lead in the building of spiritual 
civilization. As a socialist international metropolis, Shanghai 
should have things such as a symphony orchestra and a ballet, 
highly refined arts that express Shanghai's level of 
civilization. The expectations for Shanghai of the CPC Central 
Committee and the older generation of revolutionaries make every 
cadre and party member in Shanghai feel a heavy sense of 
responsibility. Today, when we solemnly commemorate the 
centenary of Comrade Mao Zedong's birth, in addition to 
expressing the respect and reverence of cadres and the public in 
our entire city, more important is the use of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's theory on the building of a distinctively Chinese 
brand of socialism to arm our minds, to guide practice, to seize 
opportunities, to accelerate reform and to hasten development. 
This is also the best commemoration of Comrade Mao Zedong's 
centenary. 
  The key in using Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory for building 
a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism to arm the mind, and 
full and correct implementation of the party's basic line of "a 
single center and two basic points" lies in firmly grasping the 
essence of the emancipation of thinking, seeking truth from 
facts, and proceeding from realities in all affairs. Comrade 
Xiaoping, who occupies a commanding position in the times, and 
who brilliantly analyzed the international and domestic 
situations, stressed on several occasions the need to seize 
opportunities to develop productivity. He said, "Development is 
a firm principle." An essential feature and fundamental task of 
socialism is the development of productivity. Without the 
development of productivity, changing of our impoverished and 
backward state is impossible. Neither can the masses standard of 
living be improved nor the superiority of socialism be 
demonstrated. He stated clearly that "poverty is not socialism." 
At the same time, he brilliantly pointed out that "too slow 
development is also not socialism." If socialism is to gain an 
advantage comparable to capitalism, it must "realize the proper 
speed of development." "Slow speed is tantamount to a halt, or 
even to regression." This is not just an economic problem; in 
reality, it is a political problem." "Therefore, those who can 
develop should not stand in the way. Places having the 
conditions must do all possible to work faster. So long as they 
stress returns, stress quality, and operate an export-oriented 
economy, they have nothing to worry about." The 1990s are 
Shanghai's "last opportunity" for development. The CPC Central 
Committee has made the development and opening to the outside 
world of Pudong a strategic emphasis for China's reform and 
opening to the outside world during the 1990's. We must seize 
this difficult to obtain historical opportunity, clear away all 
interference, work singlemindedly, and devote ourselves 
wholeheartedly to building the economy. We must proceed from 
Shanghai's realities to focus on three strategic points, namely 
building the city's infrastructure, tertiary industries, and 
high and new technology. We must accelerate building of the 
city's infrastructure, give priority to the development of 
tertiary industries, and energetically develop high and new 
technologies to fashion high and new technology industries and a 
new generation of mainstay industries, to raise the overall 
quality of Shanghai's national economy and its international 
competitiveness, and strive to realize the established goal of 
making Shanghai prosper during the 1990s. 
  Hastening development means taking the road of reform. 
Reform 
is the road that must be taken for the emancipation and 
development of productivity. Reform is "fundamentally changing 
the economic system that hampers the development of 
productivity, setting up a socialist economic system that is 
imbued with vim and vigor to advance the development of 
productivity." The 14th Party Congress decided that the goal of 
reform of China's economic system is the founding of a socialist 
market economy system. The decisions of the 3d Plenary Session 
of the 14th Party Central Committee systematized and gave 
substance to this goal that the 14th Party Congress set as the 
basic framework for building a socialist market economy system. 
It is our operating program for hastening reform and 
accelerating development. We must hasten the pace of reform in 
Shanghai on the basis of the requirements for building a 
socialist market economy system. We must make a transition from 
the planned economic system that was practiced for a long time 
to a socialist market economy system. Combining the socialist 
market economy system with the socialist basic system is a 
pioneering undertaking without parallel. In moving ahead, 
inevitably difficulties and problems of one kind or another will 
be encountered. We must adhere to a spirit of seeking truth from 
facts, proceeding from reality in all endeavors, and using 
reform measures to solve them. Only whatever helps develop 
socialist social productivity, helps increase the socialist 
country's overall national strength, and helps improve the 
people's standard of living should be boldly practiced. 
Experiences should also be constantly summarized to move ahead 
steadily. Fifteen years of reform and opening to the outside 
world have infused enormous vitality into Shanghai's economy. 
They have changed Shanghai's appearance daily, and they have 
constantly improved the livelihood of Shanghai's people. 
Consequently, reform and opening to the outside world have 
gained the full support and hearty endorsement of the masses. So 
long as we are adept at linking the spirit of the Central 
Committee with practice in Shanghai under leadership of the CPC 
Central Committee, and go about our work in an innovative way, 
we shall certainly be able constantly to bring about a new 
situation in Shanghai's reform and opening to the outside world, 
and its modernization. 
  Reform and opening to the outside world require a stable 
social environment and strong moral support. The glorious cause 
of vigorously developing Shanghai and developing Pudong, has 
produced an unprecedented centripetal force and cohesion in 
people throughout the city. It also places higher demands on 
people's ideology and morality, and their scientific and 
cultural attributes. This requires that we proceed from the 
heights of full implementation of the party's basic line in 
truly working with might and main, steadily intensifying the 
building of socialist spiritual civilization. The basic task of 
building spiritual civilization lies in the nurturing of a new 
socialist man possessed of ideals, virtue, discipline, and 
culture. In addition, it is necessary to improve socialist 
democracy and the legal system, to make science and culture 
flourish, and to promote all-around social advance. In a 
situation of reform and opening to the outside world and the 
development of a socialist market economy, resisting the 
corrosion of decadent capitalist and feudal ideology and doing a 
good job of building spiritual civilization is both an extremely 
daunting and complex piece of systems engineering, but also a 
strategic task that has a bearing on success or failure in 
socialist modernization. We must pay great attention to doing a 
solid job, steadily move ahead with the building of spiritual 
civilization in Shanghai, making a satisfactory response to the 
material civilization and the spiritual civilization that the 
CPC Central Committee and the older generation of 
revolutionaries such as Comrade Deng Xiaoping have passed along. 
  Today, we can thank Comrade Mao Zedong and countless older 
generation revolutionaries for Shanghai's present political 
stability, economic development, and social tranquility under 
the correct leadership of the CPC Central Committee and the 
State Council. The situation is very good in every way. 
Throughout the city, cadres at every level and the far-flung 
masses are diligently studying Volume 3 of The Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping, and the Decisions of the 14th Party 
Congress. They are taking Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building a distinctively socialist China as a guide in carrying 
out the "Decisions" of the 14th Party Congress in order for 
Shanghai to take the lead in building a socialist market economy 
operating mechanism. They are striving and fighting to attain 
the 14th Party Congress goal of Shanghai becoming "a turnkey" 
and "three centers." 
  Comrades, from now until the end of the present century is 
the magnificent historical period for realization of the second 
step of the strategic goal of building socialist modernization. 
It is an important historical period in Shanghai's vigorous 
development to become a "turnkey," and "three centers." It is a 
great time to be alive. We all feel proud and honored in 
shouldering this important historical task. Let us unite closely 
around the CPC Central Committee in which Comrade Jiang Zemin is 
the nucleus. Guided by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory of 
building a distinctively Chinese branch of socialism, let us 
steadfastly uphold the party's basic line of "one center and two 
basic points," study and carry forward the glorious 
accomplishments and ideological model of Comrade Mao Zedong and 
the older generation of proletarian revolutionaries, work hard 
to blaze new trails, do solid work, and make the contribution we 
should make to realize Shanghai's reform and construction goals, 
and to realize the magnificent cause of building a distinctively 
Chinese brand of socialism. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40088 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> EAST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official on Impact of Beijing Economic Retrenchment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0187A Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 44, 8 Nov 93 pp 18-19 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0187A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Baoying (7115 1405 5391), Deputy Director </F>
Hong Kong-Macao Research Institute, Hong Kong-Macao Office, 
State Council: "Impact on Hong Kong's Economy of Inland China's 
Increased Macroeconomic Regulation and Control"] 
  [Text] Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Shows 
Initial Results 
  Acting in response to tumult in the domestic financial 
order, 
too much investment and credit, too much issuance of currency, 
serious currency inflation, illegal raising of money from the 
public, and indiscriminate land development, in early July 1993, 
the Chinese Government adopted a series of important measures to 
enhance macroeconomic regulation and control. These measures 
took reform of the financial system and restructuring of the 
financial order as their point of departure in the application 
of economic and legal measures, augmented by administrative 
measures, to solve problems in economic development. They 
included controlling the issuance of currency, raising interest 
rates, controlling the total amount of credit, correcting the 
breaking of credit regulations, halting various forms of 
helter-skelter fund raising, enhancing central bank 
macroeconomic regulation and control, improving control over the 
issuance of negotiable securities and the size of the securities 
market, improving foreign exchange control and stabilizing the 
renminbi exchange rate, increasing control over real estate, 
controlling the inauguration of new projects, strictly 
controlling excessive increase in the purchasing power of social 
groups, restricting price increases, and accelerating fiscal, 
financial, investment, and social security reforms. 
  The inauguration of these strengthened macroeconomic 
regulation and control measures aroused wide attention both at 
home and abroad. Hong Kong, which is closely associated with 
inland economic developments, showed particular concern and 
sensitivity. Economic, financial, and public opinion sectors 
concerned commented constantly. The initial reaction and 
perception of some was that this was another round of all-around 
retrenchment of the inland economy that would have a seriously 
adverse affect on Hong Kong's economy. It was even predicted 
that, in consequence, Hong Kong's economic growth rate might 
decrease by various percentage points. 
  Developments during the past two months have changed, or are 
in process of changing, some of the mistaken notions of people 
abroad. The Central Committee's actions to increase 
macroeconomic regulation and control have shown initial results. 
In certain regards, they have generated positive effects. These 
are manifested largely in the following: Banks' mindless 
granting of loans and various kinds of helter-skelter fund 
raising have been preliminarily corrected; the renminbi rate of 
exchange in allocation markets is tending to stabilize, 
development zones have been reined in to a certain extent, and 
the real estate craze has abated; the policy of raising interest 
rates has shown results, a marked upturn in savings accounts 
occurring; prices of the means of production have turned 
downward; and a restructuring of securities markets has begun. 
Of course, inasmuch as only a short time has passed since 
inauguration of applicable macroeconomic regulation and control 
measures, full implementation will require a process. The 
positive results seen so far are just a beginning, and results 
in some areas are difficult to see within a short period, 
particularly in some lagging indicators such as the degree of 
rise in market prices, which remains fairly high. The industrial 
structure is still not sufficiently rational as well. Continued 
close implementation of applicable measures is needed. 
<H5>  Near Term Effect on Hong Kong's Economy </H5>
  A near term and partial view of the possible impact on Hong 
Kong's economy of inland China's increased macroeconomic 
regulation and control is as follows: 
  1. Until such time as the positive results and role of 
inland 
China's increased macroeconomic regulation and control, 
restructuring of the financial order, and adjustments and 
retrenchments of investment and credit in some fields and in 
some areas are fully reflected, these measures will produce some 
psychological pressures on Hong Kong investors. 
  2. Some Hong Kong businessmen who have made primarily short 
term investments and who have speculated in inland China real 
estate will be hurt by the temporary cooling of the inland China 
real estate market. Some medium and small real estate companies 
that lack staying power and whose financial resources are 
limited will close their doors and go bankrupt, and Hong Kong 
parties having a professional association or who are creditors 
for these companies will be incriminated. 
  3. As a result of the rectification of the financial order 
and readjustment of the industrial structure, former investment 
projects not in keeping with national industrial policy will be 
unable to obtain continued support from inland China banks. Hong 
Kong businessmen involved in joint investments may consequently 
sustain losses. 
  4. Following cutbacks on credit in inland China, some new 
projects will be rigorously examined, and this may, to a certain 
extent, correspondingly slow Hong Kong bank credit activities. 
It is expected that financing by Chinese financial institutions 
during the second half of the year will be less than during the 
first half of the year. As a result of the tightening of credit 
by inland banks, trading companies will turn to foreign owned 
banks in China to seek import financing and letters of 
hypothecation. This will be beneficial to foreign owned banks. 
  5. The effect will be different on commercial and trading 
businesses. Those selling mostly in foreign markets will be 
little affected, but those selling mostly in the domestic market 
will be fairly greatly affected. The effect on trade involving 
inland China processing for Hong Kong will be fairly slight; 
trade with Hong Kong not related to processing will be reduced 
because of inland China's financial retrenchment. 
  6. The Hong Kong Stock Market reacted extremely sensitively 
and rapidly to inland China's increased macroeconomic regulation 
and control. Stimulated by good news from talks held in Beijing 
between the foreign ministers of China and the United Kingdom, 
the Heng Seng Index rose to 7,205 points. Later on, affected by 
China's increased macroeconomic regulation and control, the 
market declined to about 6,800 points. Share prices of some 
listed companies that Chinese-owned companies purchased, or that 
market rumors said Chinese owned companies wanted to purchase, 
i.e., "red chip shares," also fell greatly. However, now that 
inland China's measures for increasing macroeconomic regulation 
and control have produced preliminary results, the Hong Kong 
Stock Marked has rallied remarkably. 
  Recently, as a result of the normalization of the inland 
China economy and the financial order, the renminbi exchange 
rate has become more stable and inflation has been brought under 
control. This helps the development of normal economic and trade 
relations between inland China and Hong Kong. Therefore, 
generally speaking, the near-term effect on Hong Kong's overall 
economy is relatively small, and the effect is positive rather 
than negative. 
<H5>  Long-Range Effect on Hong Kong's Economy </H5>
  Over the long term, the Chinese government's strategic 
measures for increasing macroeconomic regulation and control 
will have far reaching effects on the sustained, rapid, and 
healthy development of inland China's economy. 
  First of all, the present increased macroeconomic regulation 
and control differs from the 1988 improvement of the economic 
environment and rectification of the economic order. The current 
measures are a combination of both increased regulation and 
control and reform. They are rooted in reform, reform being used 
to solve problems that have come about in the course of moving 
ahead. The emphasis of this reform is mostly on macroeconomic 
reform including financial, tax, investment and social security 
reform, these reforms serving to stimulate steady 
intensification of enterprise reform. Reform proceeds from top 
to bottom, and is conducted in a coordinated way. Reform methods 
are primarily economic and legal in nature, completely 
coordinated, and carried out with vigor. The focus of reform is 
financing, this reform serving to spur progress in taxation, 
investment, and social security reform, as well as enterprise 
reform. 
  Second, the present increase in macroeconomic regulation and 
control devotes extremely close attention to the legal system. 
It emphasizess the need for vigorous application of legal 
methods in conducting rigorous crackdowns on all forms of 
behavior in violation of the law and discipline. It truly 
achieves the goal of acting according to law and punishing 
violations of the law, thereby placing economic construction and 
reform and opening to the outside world within the purview of 
the legal system with all possible speed, regularizing the 
behavior of all economic interest entities. 
  Third, the present macroeconomic regulation and control is 
not an across-the-board retrenchment but rather a readjustment 
and an optimization of the structure. The emphasis is on 
concentrating funds to ensure procurement of agricultural and 
sideline products, to ensure the normal production of key 
national enterprises, to ensure procurement and activities 
associated with foreign trade, to ease bottlenecks that limit 
the development of the economy today, and to ensure key national 
construction projects, particularly energy and transportation 
projects, and key facilities. It is not intended to make major 
cuts in investment projects with arbitrary uniformity. 
  Fourth, these macroeconomic regulation and control measures 
have been inaugurated at a time when economic construction, and 
reform and opening to the outside world are entering a new era, 
and the overall domestic economic situation is good. This is 
manifested in ample supplies of consumer goods, a substantial 
rise in the real income of city and countryside residents, a 
relatively stable consumption psychology, and maturity and good 
sense in buying plans. These measures are not being implemented 
in a situation of reduced income, shortages of supply, and a 
psychology of fear. 
  Therefore, China's restructuring of the financial order, 
strict enforcement of financial discipline, promotion of 
financial reform, and increased macroeconomic regulation and 
control are important actions and steps to advance the normal 
operation of he socialist market economy and to move the 
national economy into a benign cycle. Its goal is to make the 
development of China's economy more healthy, more stable, and 
better coordinated. This is beneficial for further improvement 
of inland China's investment climate, for improving economic 
relations and trade between Hong Kong and inland China, and for 
the long term prosperity and stability of Hong Kong's economy. 
Therefore, inland China's increased macroeconomic regulation and 
control is generally understood and welcomed by people both at 
home and abroad. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40089 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Experts Forecast Social Trends for Youth in 1994 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0102A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN [CHINESE YOUTH] in 
Chinese No 12, 1 Dec 93 pp 10-11 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0102A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN [CHINESE YOUTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang Jianhua (2799 3386 5478): "Alarming Report </F>
on Social Problems of Chinese Youth in 1994"--First paragraph is 
editor's note] 
  [Text] This alarming report from Yang Jianhua, secretary of 
the China Youth Research Center, is based on his study of 
voluminous reliable documents and data supplied by the State 
Statistical Bureau. Its intent is that all sectors of society 
have an increased awareness of the social problems of our young 
people, and implement efficient social administration and deal 
with the problems at an early stage. 
  As a general observation, the main trend of the Chinese 
youth 
campaign will show both healthy and stable development in 1994; 
the social problems connected with youth are not sufficient to 
cause the eruption of a societal crisis, but neither can they be 
regarded as unimportant. 
  In 1994, the susceptible points of society's youth problems 
will be concentrated in the economic area. Due to the pressures 
of the decrease in the domestic economic growth rate during the 
year, youth benefits seeking space will tend to be relatively 
narrow within a certain period of time. Once the macroscopic 
activity of reforming the economic and political systems is 
begun, it becomes impossible to accomplish immediately the 
principle of fairness in social distribution. So when a part of 
youths' benefits are threatened, they will either get the idea 
of seeking society's protection, or else fall into an unbalanced 
psychological state that puts them in a contradictory mood. The 
possibility that economic problems will produce negative social 
events will increase. 
<H3>  The Blue Collar Tide Will Cause a Million Young Peasants To 
Leave Their Villages and Fields </H3>
  Experts forecast that in 1994, the tide of blue collar 
workers in which young peasants are the dominant factor will 
increase by more than 20 percent over the previous year, which 
would be about 8 million people. 
  Due to the widening gap between industry and agriculture, 
with less profit in farming, the peasants' enthusiasm has been 
damaged, and finding outside employment has become the major way 
of earning a living for rural youth. In Lin County, Henan, which 
has the greatest number of peasants seeking work elsewhere, "a 
construction army of one million has gone out from Taihang 
Mountain," which can bring several hundred million yuan into the 
county every year. Meanwhile, young peasants leaving their 
villages and fields on a large scale could be fatal to an 
agricultural labor resource which were not of a high quality 
before. 
  Analysis shows that in 1994, the region which will be under 
attack by the tide of peasant laborers will still be Beijing, 
Tianjin, Shanghai, and the coastal open cities, these crowded 
cities cannot bear such a heavy burden any longer. Shortages of 
funds have caused sharp cutbacks in construction projects, 
leaving a large group of peasants with no work to do, so they 
will become a blind flow of people. 
  These circulating peasant laborers are carried by rail. If 
in 
1994 rail travel continues to be as rough as it has been, it is 
possible that extremist activities directed at railroad 
departments may occur in individual areas where there are 
tie-ups. 
  Protection of the rights and interests of young peasant 
laborers is steadily becoming a greater problem, as nearly every 
day brings new instances of illegal employment of workers and 
threats to the rights and interests of young peasant workers. In 
Beijing's Chongwenmen illegal labor market, traders in human 
beings abducted and sold to Qingzhou, Shanxi, more than 1,800 
young female peasants who had gone to Beijing to find jobs. 
  It can be said that this large-scale transfer of the surplus 
rural labor force will be a troublesome problem in urban and 
rural construction and administration in 1994. Whether we let it 
go or block it, whether we transfer it to other places or try to 
accept it locally, there should be a scientific and practical 
plan for resolution. 
<H3>  Protection of Young Workers' Rights and Interests Is Leading 
To Disputes Between Labor and Capital </H3>
  As enterprises increase their reform, smashing the old 
system, implementing various contract systems, joint-stock 
systems, and perfected reorganization, it is urgent that the 
rights and interests of both employers and employees undergo 
major adjustment. Because enterprise reform is at present still 
incomplete, the rights and interests of enterprises and young 
workers are still not in conformity, leading to frequent 
conflicts. In state-owned enterprises, disagreements between 
young workers and enterprises are concentrated chiefly in the 
system for using labor; in foreign capital enterprises, the 
disputes lie for the most part in the area of interpreting and 
implementing contracts; in privately owned enterprises, disputes 
mostly center around threats to rights and interests. 
  During the first half of the year, the Shanghai Labor 
Arbitration Department handled a total of 319 cases, an increase 
of 43.7 percent over the same period last year. In foreign 
capital enterprises throughout the country, there were 2,000 
worker strikes during the first quarter of 1993 alone. Many 
young employees of privately run enterprises went to court 
seeking legal protection for their rights. Of these, the abuse 
suffered by the Chinese crew of the foreign ship "Acadia" was a 
shock to society. 
  It is forecast that in 1994 cases to labor arbitration 
departments seeking legal resolution will tend to increase. It 
is a matter of urgency to accelerate the formulation of labor 
laws and regulations, providing a legal foundation to protect 
the rights and interests of both enterprises and young people 
from encroachment and threat. This will avoid and reduce this 
destabilizing factor in society. 
<H3>  Guard Against Secular, Aristocratic, and Mercenary 
Tendencies on Campus </H3>
  According to a survey, more than 60 percent of college 
students and young teachers lack confidence about going into 
society, establishing themselves and building the country 
through what they have learned. Two-thirds of those surveyed 
considered teaching, scientific research, and public affairs as 
dangerous roads to take. This kind of phenomenon may include the 
dissatisfied mood of intelligent young people who have lost a 
balanced state of mind. What deserves more vigilance is the 
depreciation of knowledge that has led to secular, aristocratic, 
and mercenary tendencies on campus. 
  Secularization is expressed in a lack of concern for 
politics, pandering to popular culture, and viewing popular 
taste as fashion. Aristocratic tendencies are expressed as a 
lack of concern for the masses, and regarding the main stream of 
Chinese culture of China with contempt. Mercenary tendencies 
appear when the value judgements of intelligent people tend 
toward material desires and money in a great degree, their 
awareness of civilization's development shaken. 
  The campus definitely provides an excellent base for 
supplying the talent China needs to succeed in its strategy of 
catching up with world trends by the end of this century. 
However, the current situation is that people engaged in 
business, teaching, and studying lack vigor, with future 
problems difficult to foresee. Reliance on morality alone to 
solve this problem is far from sufficient; it is urgent that the 
State invest more in education and provide favorable policies 
for education. 
<H5>  Rising Prices Affect Young People's Financial Benefits </H5>
  Economists forecast that the inflation rate for the cost of 
living in 1994 will still be around 10 percent, and the 
government will put its limited financial resources into 
projects which are related to the nation's strength, such as in 
agriculture, transport, and energy. At the consumer level, it is 
the young people who will feel the greatest effects from rising 
prices. 
  Statistical documents show that among young people, it is 
farming peasants and the working class who will feel a money 
pinch most acutely; government workers and young intellectuals 
will see a continual increase in the gap between their income 
and the average income in society, directly affecting their 
standard of living and their recognition of reform. An 
investigation by the Beijing Zero Point Survey Company showed 
that worries about rising prices was undermining the morale of 
residents of Beijing, Tianjin, and Shanghai. Although experts do 
not foresee the reappearance of panic buying, as in 1988, there 
could be an abnormal reaction from young people, the group which 
will suffer the greater loss in benefits. In addition, the 
occurrence of negative events in some inland areas is not beyond 
the realm of possibility. 
  As we are consciously breathing life into the education of 
our youth and into reform, we should also set our hand to social 
security work on young people's special benefits. This will help 
young people who are having problems in their lives get past the 
difficult stage, as well as assisting the government in 
formulating relevant youth social security laws and regulations, 
setting a minimum wage, a minimum cost of living, subsidies for 
financial emergencies, and related welfare. 
<H3>  Big Income Gap Leads Youth to an Unbalanced State of Mind 
Regarding Society's Fairness </H3>
  In recent years, the gap between people's incomes in China 
has been growing steadily, taking shape on three obvious levels: 
individual and private operators of businesses, company managers 
and foreign trade agents, entertainment and sports stars have 
become the wealthy class; salaried workers who are satisfied 
with their lives; peasants, unemployed people, and retirees have 
become the poor class. The average between the lowest and 
highest incomes in the three classes is 1:15 to 1:20. At 
present, in the world's developed nations, the income gap 
usually stays at the rate of 1:10. 
  The statistics show that less than one-third of those at 
society's highest income level are young people, but in their 
activities, especially their consumption activities, these act 
as a strong role model for others of their generation. A 
significant number of low income youth sometimes have inner 
doubts about "whether social distribution is fair." They cannot 
concentrate on their studies or work, and some even take the 
"shortcut" of breaking the law. Although the problem of large 
gaps in personal income will be adjusted by personal income 
taxes in 1994, it takes time to establish a distribution system 
which is acceptable to the public. Unfair distribution is still 
a factor which could potentially affect young workers' 
enthusiasm for work. 
<H3>  It Is Urgent We Strengthen Youth's Overall National 
Knowledge and Unified Ethnic Knowledge </H3>
  Political education in recent years has largely ignored 
overall knowledge of the nation and unified ethnic knowledge; 
rather, the reality has been that a tendency to local 
protectionism has certainly developed. In 1994, opposing foreign 
forces on our borders will continue to make trouble in Tibet and 
Turkestan. Our northwest will still be a sensitive area of 
ethnic conflicts and religious disputes. There will continue to 
be antagonisms concerning rights in the South China Sea, Taiwan 
Independence, and the 1997 transfer of Hong Kong. 
  We should strengthen the overall national knowledge of 
youth, 
telling them repeatedly that China is the family of every 
Chinese, the joy of the Chinese nation, and it is not correct to 
go the way of developing only a certain area or a certain 
nationality in isolation. The present generation of youth should 
keep a clear mind, definitely preserving the unity of state and 
nation, and struggling against all types of divisional actions 
by opposing forces both within and outside of China. 
<H3>  Criminal Actions of Youth Are Obviously Directed at the 
Economic Area </H3>
  This year and next, criminal actions of youth have obviously 
been directed at economic activities. Among these, economic 
disputes which lead to hooligans fighting with weapons, and 
cases of retaliation for injury have shown a sharply increasing 
trend. All crimes, such as robberies on the road or on buses, 
the abduction and sale of human beings in inland areas, 
prostitution, drug dealing, and smuggling along the coast, have 
the obvious intent of obtaining money. 
  We can predict that there will be new youth crime problems 
in 
1994. The youth black society group will spread to the economic 
area; crimes of theft will rise among high school students; 
there will be an increase in the flow of people blindly fleeing 
crime; and fraud cases in economic activities will tend to be 
serious. We should pay special attention to the problem of crime 
among youth who are "the group outside the system," and the 
trend of youth and teenage crimes to occur at a lower age. 
  Every segment of society should jointly look for scientific 
countermeasures for dealing with this, to create an excellent 
social environment for further reform and opening up. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40090 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Phases' of 1993 Economy Outlined </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0237A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 19 Dec 93 pp 
1,2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0237A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondent Bao Yueyang (0545 2588 7122): </F>
"Soft Landing of China's Economy in 1993"] 
  [Text] The end of the year is fast approaching. Although 
economic statistics for the entire year are not yet available, 
the major outlines of the economic growth rate and economic 
operation are already very apparent. China's economy during 1993 
will be characterized by two main components: Overheating and 
control of overheating. We can gain numerous insights from a 
review of the operation of the economy in 1993. 
<H3>  Beginning Phase: High Speed Operation in the Midst of a 
"Heat Wave" </H3>
  In forecasting China's economy during 1993, at the end of 
1992 most economists believed that economic growth momentum 
would weaken in early 1993 and that economic growth for the year 
would be about 10 percent, an amount somewhat less than the 
12.98 percent of 1992. However, not long after the beginning of 
1993, some surprises occurred in the economic growth rate. 
During the first quarter, GDP increased 14.1 percent over the 
same period in 1992; gross industrial output value increased 
22.4 percent; state-owned unit investment in fixed assets 
increased 70 percent; and total retail sales of social 
commodities increased 16.2 percent. During the second quarter, 
the economy continued ultra high-speed growth, gross industrial 
output value increasing 25.1 percent for the first half of the 
year, including a record-breaking 30.2 percent increase for 
June. Investment in social fixed assets increased 61 percent, 
including a 70.7 percent increase for state-owned units. Total 
social commodity retail sales increased 21.6 percent, and GDP 
increased 13.9 percent. Clearly, economic growth for the year 
certainly could not be pegged at 10 percent. 
<H3>  Inflation and "Bottlenecks": Two Manifestations of 
Overheating </H3>
  With the quickening of economic growth, quite a few people 
in 
China and abroad noted evidence of another overheating of 
China's economy. However, one cannot determine whether an 
economy is overheating simply by looking at the size of the 
economy's absolute speed of growth. One has to look at whether 
the supply of resources meets economic growth needs, and whether 
marked inflation occurs. Throughout 1993, China's economic 
growth was accompanied by marked inflation. In addition, the 
energy and raw and processed materials "bottlenecks" -- 
particularly transportation -- also became worse and worse. 
  Let us look at prices first. During the first half of the 
year, retail prices nationwide increased 10.5 percent over the 
same period in 1992. The cost of living price index for city and 
countryside residents increased 13 percent, the cost of living 
index for staff members and workers in 35 large- and medium- 
sized cities rose 17.4 percent. 
  Let us look next at the "bottlenecks." The worst 
"bottleneck" 
was railroad transportation. During 1992, the railroads were 
able to satisfy only about 50 percent of freight transportation 
demand, and during 1993 the railroad transportation shortage 
increased without letup. The various actions of the Ministry of 
Railways proved utterly inadequate. 
  Raw and processed materials also became more and more 
difficult to obtain. In 1992, prices of the means of production 
increased approximately 25 percent, and during the first quarter 
of 1993, the overall means of production price level nationwide 
increased 38 percent over the same period in 1992. In 
mid-January, the price of wire rods in Kunming reached 3,800 
yuan per ton, and prices of cement (#425 common sulfate cement) 
and gasoline (90 octane) in Chengdu reached 650 and 4,900 yuan 
per ton respectively. As of the end of February, the price per 
ton of various kinds of steel used in urban construction stood 
at between 3,300 and 3,700 yuan per ton. 
  The energy "bottleneck" eased somewhat, relatively speaking. 
Nevertheless, the energy production and investment situation was 
very gloomy. During the first half of the year, electricity 
shortages occurred in varying degrees in many places. 
<H5>  Blow Away the Bubbles To See the Growth </H5>
  Despite the ensuing marked inflation and "bottlenecks," and 
despite the appearance of a bubble economy in many places, such 
as too many and too indiscriminate development zones, and 
overheating of real estate, the high economic growth for 1992 
and the first half of 1993 made an enormous contribution to 
China's economic development, and effective growth was still 
paramount. 
  Clear evidence of this was that the economy's high speed 
growth kept within bounds the trend toward a continued slide in 
enterprises' economic returns of the previous several years. 
This enabled a month-by-month turn for the better. 
  During the first half of the year, the composite index of 
industrial economy performance for the whole country (statistics 
not yet available for Shanghai and Tibet) was 99.31, up 15.67 
points from the same period in 1992. Of the six leading 
indicators, except for net output value, those for product sales 
rate, profit and tax rate on capital, profit rate on costs, 
capital turnover times, and net output value labor productivity 
rate were tremendously higher than for the same period in 1992. 
Production and sales paced each other fairly well, and funds 
turned over rapidly. The industrial product sales rate figured 
at prevailing prices increased with each passing month. Thanks 
to the good dovetailing of production with sales and the speed 
up in the number of times that industrial working capital turned 
over, the amount of finished goods in inventory decreased. The 
fairly rapid increase in profits and tax payments meant a 
reduction in the number of money-losing firms. As of the end of 
June, 17.6 percent of all industrial enterprises showed a loss. 
This was a 1.7 percentage point decline from the same period in 
1992. 
  Overall, with the high speed operation of the economy, total 
industrial economic returns approached the average level of the 
Seventh Five-Year Plan. If the returns of Shanghai's industrial 
economy are figured in, the total exceeded that of the Seventh 
Five-Year Plan. By comparison, with the sustained decline in 
economic returns during the period of improving the economic 
environment and rectifying the economic order, it is easy to see 
that the economy's high growth undeniably increased national 
economic strength. 
<H3>  Middle Phase: Soft Landing, Major Readjustment of 
Macroeconomic Policy </H3>
  Just when the whole country, and even the whole world, was 
regarding China's economy with alarm and wondering where this 
"express train" was headed, China's macroeconomic policy 
underwent a major change: 
  On 15 May, the Chinese People's Bank announced a raise in 
the 
interest rate on bank savings deposits, the interest rate on 
savings rising an average 1.19 percentage points, and the 
interest rate on loans rising an average 0.82 percentage points. 
This was the first change in bank interest rates in two years. 
Next, the State Council inaugurated a series of emergency 
measures such as raising the interest rate on savings and loans, 
tightening the money supply, rectifying the financial order, 
putting development zones on a tight leash, taking drastic 
action to control real estate overheating, and reducing fiscal 
expenditures. 
  The inauguration of this series of macroeconomic regulation 
and control measures was an inevitable reaction of the central 
policy makers to the marked overheating of the economy. However, 
this macroeconomic regulation and control differed from the 
improvement of the economic environment and rectification of the 
economic order in 1989. Central Committee leaders reiterated 
under numerous important circumstances that the increase in 
macroeconomic regulation and control was not an across-the-board 
tightening. Its purpose was to control economic overheating and 
to protect both economic growth and the impetus of reform. In 
economic parlance, this regulation and control approach was a 
"soft landing." 
  General Slowing of the Economy During July 
  Inauguration of the Central Committee's macroeconomic 
regulation and control policies in May had a marked effect very 
rapidly on real estate, stocks, and development zones. Liaoning, 
Hebei, Shandong, Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Fujian, Guangdong, and 
Guangxi conducted a one-time check of development zones at the 
county level and above. As a result, the number of development 
zones in these six provinces and one autonomous region decreased 
from more than 1,200 to more than 200, the plan area contracting 
from more than 7,500 to 1,600 square kilometers. Real estate in 
all the jurisdictions slumped and land prices plummeted. 
  However, the macroeconomic regulation and control had no 
immediate effect on industrial production. In June, industrial 
growth nationwide reached a record breaking 30 percent. A 
questionnaire survey of the prosperity of 5,000 industrial 
concerns in 12 provinces that the departments concerned 
conducted showed that these 5,000 concerns maintained the rising 
momentum of the second quarter after entering the third quarter. 
However, 75 percent of the concerns did feel a shortage of 
working capital, the working capital situation reaching the 
lowest point in recent years. 
  The effect of macroeconomic regulation and control on 
industrial production began in mid-July. The 19 August State 
Statistical Bureau report on the economy during July said that 
industrial concerns at the township level and above throughout 
the country showed an output value of 286.3 billion yuan for 
July, up 25.1 percent over the same period in 1992. This was a 
5.1 percentage point downturn from June, and marked the first 
time in more than 30 months that the State Statistical Bureau 
reported a substantial downturn in industrial growth. In 
addition, investment in fixed assets for newly opened projects 
declined; buying and selling of means of production slowed; and 
trading volume dropped. 
  It was inland and state-owned enterprises that were most 
quickly and hardest hit by this macroeconomic readjustment and 
control. 
  In terms of ownership, the July output value of state-owned, 
collective, and township-operated and other kinds of industries 
was 8.7, 43.4, and 70.3 percent of the total, the 
township-operated and other kinds of industries still 
maintaining high speed growth. By comparison with June, 
state-owned, collective, township-operated, and other kinds of 
industries showed a downturn in industrial growth of 4, 7.2, 7, 
and 1.2 percentage points respectively. The downturn in 
industries under other forms of ownership was least, showing the 
aptness of the macroeconomic regulation and control policy to be 
very great. 
  In terms of region, southeast coastal area maintain growth 
leadership. Except for Shanghai, Hainan, and Xinjiang, growth 
decline in varying degrees in every region. Places having a 
growth higher than the national average in July were Jiangsu, 
Zhejiang, Anhui, Fujian, Shandong, Guangdong, and Hainan 
provinces. In the eastern, central and western parts of the 
country, gross industrial output value increased in July by 
30.1, 17.3, and 13.7 percent. During July, growth of industrial 
production took a downturn in 26 provinces, municipalities, and 
autonomous regions, the area of greatest downturn being 
concentrated mostly in the central and western regions. The 
downturn was fairly slight in coastal areas such as Guangdong, 
Hainan, and Shanghai 
  Regulation and Control Measures Largely in Place by 
September 
  If one says that people saw only a little evidence of 
macroeconomic regulation and control in September, by October, 
following the central government's inauguration of macroeconomic 
regulation and control measures, the general effect of the soft 
landing of China's economy had become apparent. 
  From the beginning of the third quarter, growth of 
industrial 
production took a downturn, but still maintained a pattern of 
fairly rapid growth. After reaching a peak of 30.2 percent in 
June, growth of industrial production at the township level and 
above began a month-by-month downturn. During the third quarter, 
growth was 22.6 percent, including 19.1 percent for September. 
During October, growth of industrial production continue a 
descent. In November, it was 18.9 percent. The total figure for 
January through November was 22.7 percent. 
  The overly rapid increase in investment in fixed assets was 
brought under control. State-owned units investment growth 
declined from 70.7 percent for the first half of the year to 
61.7 percent during the third quarter. This included a 56.5 
percent rate for September. During October, investment continued 
to cool, investment by state-owned units in fixed assets for 
that month increasing 58.4 percent. Total growth for the period 
January through October was 65.2 percent. 
  Markets stable while prospering. With the entry into the 
third quarter, the buying up of consumer goods as a hedge 
against currency value loss abated, and group consumption 
inflation was brought under control. Social commodity retail 
sales totaled 968.7 billion yuan for the first through the third 
quarters, up 22.4 percent from the same period in 1992. After 
deducting for price rises, the actual increase was 9.3 percent. 
In November, social commodity retail sales increased 19.8 
percent. 
  Means of production markets cooled greatly, the increase in 
sales declining from the 49.5 percent of the first half of the 
year to 27.3 percent in the third quarter. Speculative buying 
and selling weakened markedly, and the shortage of means of 
production eased. Prices fell. Prices of finished steel used in 
construction fell from 4,100 yuan per ton in June to 3,050 yuan 
per ton in September. 
  The finance and banking, and the fiscal and tax sectors 
turned for the better. Uncontrolled lending, uncontrolled fund 
raising, uncontrolled establishment of financial institutions 
were brought under control. Individual savings mounted month by 
month. As of the end of September, savings accounts contained a 
balance of 1.3867 trilling yuan, 232.2 billion yuan more than at 
the end of 1992. 
  Stock markets, futures markets, foreign exchange markets, 
the 
real estate market, and development zones all turned for the 
better. Investment in commercial housing turned downward. Real 
estate prices in coastal areas declined about 20 percent. 
Development of futures markets and stock markets gradually 
stabilized. The foreign exchange swap market rate for the 
renminbi stabilized at 8 yuan to $1.00. About 8 yuan is a 
rather reasonable price. 
  All in all, thanks to the strong macroeconomic regulation 
and 
control from May through August, positive changes appeared in 
the operation of the economy. The macroeconomic environment was 
relatively stable, and "bottlenecks," which are one of two signs 
of economic overheating, eased markedly. The rise in prices also 
receded slightly. September macroeconomic monitoring and early 
warning indicators showed that the economic situation had 
receded from the middle of the "red light zone" (i.e., 
overheating) of the first half of the year to the lower end of 
the "red light zone." 
  Intensity: From Strengthening to Fine Tuning 
  Because of the difficulty in getting the intensity of 
retrenchment just right, some negative results accompanied the 
macroeconomic regulation and control process, principal of which 
was a general shortage of funds in enterprises because of the 
tightening of the money supply. Although the shortage of funds 
in enterprises only began to appear in April 1993, by the middle 
of July, it suddenly intensified. Triangular debt reappeared, 
and with much greater force than previously. In some 
enterprises, sales slackened, inventories rose, and enterprises 
delayed paying each other. As of the end of July, net accounts 
receivable of industries within budget nationwide totaled 173.4 
billion yuan, up 24.8 billion from the same period in 1992. Some 
concerns that showed good returns amd that were developing at 
moderate speed during the first half of the year saw a sudden 
slide in production and returns during the second half of the 
year because of the funds shortage. Some experts said that 
without some moderation of the intensity of regulation and 
control, the landing would be hard rather than soft. 
  The negative effects that grew out of this macroeconomic 
regulation and control were attributable, to a very large 
extent, to China's finance and banking system. China's banks are 
neither like banks that operate for policy reasons nor like 
commercial banks. They have the authority of banks that operate 
for policy reasons, and they are strongly mindful of their own 
economic interests. Under these circumstances, it is very 
difficult to regulate and control the economy effectively in an 
appropriate way. During the financial consolidation, the central 
government asked the banks to straighten out their loans, and 
they asked the banks to recall the 90 billion yuan they had 
invested in real estate. In fact, however, this 90 billion yuan 
had been buried in the ground and could not be easily taken 
back. What was to be done? Restricting normal credit was all 
that could be done. Enterprises everywhere had a strong reaction 
to this action by the banks. 
  After discovering this problem, the central government 
immediately reduced the intensity of regulation and control, and 
infused some money with the result that enterprises' money 
supply began to improve during October. In October, banks and 
credit cooperatives issued 71.2 billion yuan in new credit, 27.4 
billion yuan more than during the same month in 1992. Seventy 
percent of it was credit to be used as working capital. With the 
moderate easing of the money supply, enterprises' savings 
reversed the several month sustained decline. Enterprises made 
new deposits of 24.7 billion yuan during the month, 2.4 billion 
more than during the same month in 1992, thereby showing an 
increase in enterprises ability to pay. Currency issuance 
continued to be effectively controlled, 8.8 billion yuan less 
put into circulation during October than during the same month 
in 1992. The specialized banks' payment reserves rate climbed to 
around 10 percent thereby changing the payment difficulty 
situation. 
<H3>  Final Phase: High Growth a Foregone Conclusion, Three 
Problems Require Solution </H3>
  Despite the easing of the speed of economic growth during 
the 
last half of the year, because of the ultrahigh speed growth of 
the first half of the year, speed of economic growth for the 
year as a whole will still be high in 1993. 
  According to State Statistical Bureau statistics, GNP for 
the 
year will break the 3 trillion yuan mark. Figured at comparable 
prices, this is an approximately 13 percent increase over 1992. 
Other major economic indicators are as follows: 
  Industry Gross output value of industry at the 
township level and above will be about 21 percent greater than 
in 1992. If village level and above industry is included, the 
increase will be about 23 percent. 
  Agriculture Forecasts call for the gross output of 
grain to maintain the 885 billion jin level of 1992., the gross 
output value of agriculture for the year increasing 4 percent 
over 1992. 
  Investment Investment in social fixed assets for 
the year will total 1.15 trillion yuan in an approximately 46 
percent increase over 1992, making this the highest investment 
growth year since the 1980s. 
  Markets Social commodity retail sales for the year 
will total 1.35 trillion yuan in an approximately 23 percent 
increase over 1992. After deducting for price rises, the actual 
increase will be about 9 percent. 
  Foreign Trade Exports for the year will total 
between $90 billion and $93 billion, up 6 to 8 percent over 
1992. Total imports will break the $100 billion mark, up more 
than 24 percent. 
  However, simultaneous with the sustained high growth of the 
economy as a whole and the achievements made in macroeconomic 
regulation and control, several glaring problems appeared in the 
operation of the economy during 1993 that will require solution 
during practice in the future. 
  Speed and Health: How To Combine the Two 
  The high economic growth of the first half of 1993, and the 
macroeconomic regulation and control process during the last 
half of the year confronted us with an extremely acute problem: 
how to make economic development both speedy and healthy. 
  During the past several years, the economic development 
policy of the CPC Central Committee and the State Council has 
been "sustained, steady, and coordinated." The Third Plenary 
Session of the 13th Party Central Committee changed this, 
proposing a "sustained, speedy, and healthy" policy. This policy 
adjustment was necessary because China's economy needs high 
speed. China's economy is facing enormous international 
challenges. If China is to become a world economic power in the 
twenty-first century, slow speed economic development will not 
do, and medium speed development will not do either. Only 
sustained high speed development can make up for China's being a 
late comer, and establish an invincible position for China in 
international competition. 
  However, attaining sustained, rapid, and healthy development 
is by no means easy. Since 1978, China's economy has gone 
through three major fluctuations, namely between 1978 and 1982, 
between 1983 and 1986, and between 1987 and 1991. The process in 
each fluctuation was rapid economic development leading to 
economic overheating, and culminating in urgent retrenchment. 
This means that for the past more than a decade, China's economy 
has been unable to escape from a cycle of overheating once 
restraints are removed and ruin when restraints are reimposed. 
This includes the economic heating of 1988 and the economic 
slide of 1989, which are still fresh in people's memories. The 
high economic growth of 1992 and 1993 are likewise confronting 
an overheating threat. The macroeconomic regulation and control 
of the last half of the year was also undertaken because no 
alternative existed. Mindful of the lessons of past economic 
retrenchments, the approach that the Central Committee took this 
time in increasing macroeconomic regulation and control was a 
soft landing. Nevertheless, in the regulation and control 
process, a severe shortage of enterprise funds appeared, and 
production faced a difficult period of slippage; thus, large 
amounts of money had to be provided. Seemingly, the attainment 
of both rapid and healthy development is a major problem that 
China will have to solve in the future. 
<H5>  Prices: A Wild Horse That Has Not Yet Been Broken </H5>
  While the overheated economy was beginning to cool during 
the 
last half of the year, skyrocketing prices had yet to be brought 
under effective control. The price index remained high with no 
sign of coming down. State Statistical Bureau statistics showed 
an average 12 percent rise in retail prices for the first three 
quarters, and a 14 percent rise in the cost of living. This 
included an 18.9 percent rise in 35 large- and medium-sized 
cities. In October, the rise in prices still showed some 
resilience, the cost of living index in 35 large- and 
medium-sized cities increasing to 21.1 percent. 
  The continuation of prices at a fairly high level was 
attributable to the following several factors: First, the cost 
of living index is a lagging indicator. Even though the economy 
is cooling now, the lag effect of the previous phase of economic 
overheating still plays a role on consumer prices. This is to 
say that during the ultrahigh speed economic development period 
of 1992 and the first half of 1993, prices of the means of 
production rose rapidly because of the effect of too vigorous 
demand. This caused a rise in consumer goods production costs. 
There is a lag period between the rise in prices of means of 
production and the rise in prices of consumer goods. Second, 
during 1993, the state substantially readjusted or decontrolled 
prices of numerous daily necessities and services, such as the 
prices paid for grain, nonstaple foods, fuel, house rent and 
electricity, transportation, and school expenses. Prices of 
these essentials rose considerably. Since no substitutes could 
be found following the rise in prices of these essentials, the 
cost of living rose without let up. Third, as income levels 
rose, consumer goods of different qualities gradually appeared. 
The high consumption of people having high incomes propelled a 
rise in prices of consumer goods. Fourth, changes in the 
renminbi-U.S. dollar exchange rate caused prices of imported 
consumer goods to shoot up. This also abetted the rise in prices 
of consumer goods. 
  Given China's present economic system, complete elimination 
of inflation during the near term is impossible. Nor is it 
necessary. The key lies in getting the citizenry and other 
quarters to accept it. The emphasis of macroeconomic regulation 
and control has to be on holding the rise in prices below 10 
percent. The current extent of price rises is clearly too high. 
By increasing the intensity of macroeconomic regulation and 
control, and halting the inauguration of new price reform 
measures, skyrocketing prices may be brought under control. 
However, speed of economic growth may be too low, and plans for 
further deregulation of the prices of products of some basic 
industries in 1994 will come to naught. If prices continue to 
rise beyond controllable limits, the direction of macroeconomic 
regulation and control can be changed, financial controls 
relaxed, but this would mean that the as yet not fully cooled 
economy would face more overheating. Clearly, unless there is a 
marked price recession in early 1994, a timely change in 
policies to influence subsequent macroeconomic regulation and 
control will be necessary. 
<H5>  Quick Returns: When Will a Change Occur? </H5>
  Yet another problem is the conflict between speed and 
returns. Returns from China's industrial economy are 
characterized by quick returns. This was particularly so during 
1993. As the speed of economic growth changed, economic returns 
from industry nationwide were strikingly different during the 
first half and the second half of the year. The composite index 
for returns from the industrial economy nationwide (no 
statistics available from Shanghai) for the first six months of 
the year was 99.31. This was 15.67 points higher than for the 
same period in 1992. If the statistics for Shanghai are 
included, the national economic returns composite index is more 
than 100. As the speed of economic growth began a downturn in 
June, the economic returns of industrial firms also began a 
gradual descent. Statistics from 360,000 independently 
accounting industrial concerns at the township level and above 
throughout the country showed a composite index for industrial 
economy returns of 98.67 for the period January through July, 
96.63 for the period January through August, 96.34 for the 
period January through September, and 95.21 for the period 
January through October. This represented a respective 0.64, 
2.68, 2.97, and 4.10 percentage point decline from the January 
through June 99.31 economic return composite index. It included 
a marked decline for light and heavy industry. Twenty-five of 
the country's 29 regions (not including Tibet) were affected. 
  The direct reasons for the decline in returns of the 
industrial economy over such a wide area were, first, the 
accumulation of goods in inventory and payment defaults, which 
caused a decline in the money utilization rate. Second was a 
rise in enterprise losses. A more deep-seated reason was that 
once quick return industries encountered a cooling of the 
economy, their production cycles did not work well, leading to a 
decline in economic returns. 
  So-called quick returns means nonintensive economic returns. 
Specifically, quick return industries may be generally 
characterized as follows: First, their product make-up is 
ill-conceived; second, product quality is rather poor; and 
third, their management and technology is antiquated, their 
labor productivity rate is low, their energy and materials 
utilization rate is low, and waste is great. Since they are 
innately inferior, the ratio between input and effective output 
of such industries is low, and consumption per unit of product 
produced is high. When the economy is developing rapidly, large 
social demand makes the sale of their products easy. Even though 
consumption per unit of product produced is high, such concerns 
can manage because of their quick economic returns. However, 
once social demand shrinks absolutely, or growth declines, sales 
become difficult because of the high cost of producing products, 
and the level of economic returns decline as well. 
  During the period of a country's economic takeoff, quick 
return industries are an inevitable phase. They also make a 
contribution to high speed development of the economy. However, 
if no change is made in quick returns, macroeconomic policy is 
likely to end up in two predicaments: Too high a speed means 
proneness to overheating; too low a speed means a great decline 
in economic returns may occur. Such a situation occurred once 
during 1989, and it has appeared again in 1993. Therefore, both 
macroeconomic policymakers and the operators of concerns should 
see quick returns for what they are. They should not be overly 
optimistic about the temporary great increase in quick returns. 
They must take actions to reduce, insofar as possible, the 
period of quick returns. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40091 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Research Group Probes `New' Managing System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0246A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 15 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0246A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by the Group Studying a New System of Managing </F>
Socialist State Assets of Our Country: "The Selecting of Goals 
and Policy Study With Regard to Our Country's State-Asset 
Management System of a New Type"] 
  [Text] The goal of our country's reform of the economic 
system is to establish a system of socialist market economy. In 
view of the demands raised by this goal and the actual 
situation, we believe that in the 1990s the core of the effort 
to establish our country's state-asset management system of a 
new type is to rectify property right relationships governing 
state assets and impose norms on the government's property-right 
management conduct in accordance with the objective laws of 
development of a socialist market economy, so as to turn 
state-owned enterprises into true market actors with full vigor, 
to make the state sector of the economy truly become our 
country's main force in the arena of international market 
competition and capable of also effectively safeguarding and 
developing the national interest, and to make the optimum 
deployment of state assets truly satisfy the objective demands 
of the rapid development of the social productive forces and the 
continuous improvement of the living standards of the people in 
our country. 
<H3>  Basic Point of Departure of the Effort To Establish a 
State-Asset Management System of a New Type </H3>
  The establishment of a state-asset management system of a 
new 
type must be in line with the objective needs of our country's 
economic development. We believe that in the 1990s, on the one 
hand, the reform and opening up have resulted in countries 
infiltrating one another economically, politically, culturally, 
and in other spheres, leading to the direct faceoff between the 
capitalist system and the socialist system in a "war of 
commerce." Under such a condition of "peaceful competition," how 
high the level of the productive forces is will be of more 
decisive significance to the consolidation and development of 
the socialist system than at any time in the past. On the other 
hand, the current growth of our country's national economy has 
an obvious dual-structure character, and at the same time our 
country faces the double task of continuing the effort to 
accomplish industrialization and of endeavoring to achieve the 
modernization of industry as well as the serious challenge posed 
by the prospect that new technology revolution will inevitably 
lead to important changes in industrial structure and industrial 
organizations. Faced with such a situation, we must 
fundamentally change our view on the management of property 
rights over state assets, and the core is to establish the idea 
of the state sector's leading role based on the sector's 
capability for competition. 
  The state sector's capability for competition comes, on the 
one hand, from the optimum allocation of resources within the 
state-owned enterprises, and, on the other, from the optimum 
allocation of resources in the state sector. To increase the 
state sector's capability for competition and to give full play 
to the state sector's leading role, it is necessary to start 
with proceeding with reforms in the two areas simultaneously. We 
believe that in the 1990s it is necessary to accelerate the 
transformation of the operating mechanisms of the state sector 
by organically integrating the contents of reforms at the 
following three levels because of the demands of international 
market competition. 
  The first is the reform of state-owned enterprises' mode of 
business operation. On this level, the main content of the 
reform is the reforming of the leadership system, financial 
accounting system, labor and personnel system, wage system, and 
other business management systems in state-owned enterprises, 
thereby using the management systems to ensure that state-owned 
enterprises' mode of business operation meets the demands of 
international market competition. This reform is especially 
important in those industries or enterprises which cannot adopt 
the joint-stock system. 
  The second is the reform of state-owned enterprises' asset 
organization. On this level, the content of the reform is to 
transform the majority of state-owned enterprises into 
corporations and establish a modern enterprise system. Through 
transforming those enterprises into corporations, provide those 
enterprises with a property-right system environment in which 
they can compete with nonstate-owned enterprises on an equal 
footing. Surely, with the reform of the forms of asset 
organization used by enterprises, enterprises' mode of business 
operation will also inevitably undergo many important changes as 
compared with the past. 
  The third is the reform on the level of state-owned 
enterprises' operational scale and structure. On this level, the 
main content of the reform is to optimize the sectoral structure 
and geographical structure of state assets, so as to concentrate 
the state's limited capital in the industries or enterprises 
where the leading role of the state sector can be given play in 
the most effective way. We should fully exploit the current 
advantageous condition under which the nonstate sector is quite 
strong while in society individuals' investment desire is 
getting ever stronger, and transfer to the nonstate sector 
partial and complete property rights over state-owned 
enterprises in ordinary industries in a planned manner or 
transform those state-owned enterprises into joint-stock 
companies which accept individual investment in a big way. 
Absorb funds in society through transferring property rights, 
and use the funds for accelerating the technological progress 
and development of state-owned enterprises in the emerging 
industries, thereby promoting the modernization and upgrading of 
our country's industrial structure. 
  While proceeding with reforms on the above-discussed three 
levels, we should also effectively enhance the construction of 
state-owned enterprise groups, transforming and helping such 
enterprise groups on the basis of consideration of the demands 
of international market competition so that they can gradually 
become transnational corporations with the capability for 
international market competition. 
<H3>  Basic Line of Thought on Establishing a State-Asset 
Management System of a New Type </H3>
  We believe that in view of the demands of the development of 
a socialist market economy, the establishing of a state-asset 
management system of a new type should start with work in the 
following five areas: 
  1. In terms of intragovernment arrangement, appropriately 
separate the functions of macroeconomic regulation and control 
and sectoral management from the function of managing property 
rights over state assets; and establish an organizational system 
characterized by a proper division of labor between those 
exclusively engaged in the management of the properties and 
those partially engaged in the management of the properties 
under the unified leadership of the State Council. 
  2. Separate the government's administrative management of 
property rights over state assets from business operations based 
on the use of property rights over state assets, and make 
property rights enter the market as a financial commodity; 
establish many enterprise-like actors which carry out business 
operations based on the use of property rights, give them the 
status as independent legal persons, and sever their 
administrative subordinate relations to the government, so that 
they can play the role of the intermediary between the state and 
ordinary production and circulation enterprises. 
  3. On the basis of establishing a modern enterprise system, 
make the state sector be characterized by a development 
situation where the state sector is composed of two main 
categories of enterprises and engaged in double-level 
(multilevel) business operations. Enterprises of one category 
are mainly engaged in business operations based on using 
property rights over state assets as a commodity; enterprises of 
the other category use the state assets under their control for 
producing products and services, and use the products and 
services as commodities in business operations. Enterprises of 
the two categories and the double-level business operations are 
in an common effort to ensure the preserving and increasing of 
the value of state assets. 
  4. Break down the confines imposed by the current framework 
of "separation of two powers," establish a property right system 
appropriate to a market economy, remove the closure-inducing 
restrictions imposed by the classical idea on property rights, 
and impose norms on the various derivative property rights 
resulting from property rights in accordance with the law and 
under the precondition of protecting the original property 
rights of owners, so as to form a property right system with a 
multilevel structure. 
  5. Have three basic organizational levels of management, and 
appropriately demarcate their functions, so as to form 
constraining mechanisms of a new type extending from the 
government to enterprises with regard to property rights over 
state assets, that is, the level of government management of the 
state's property rights based on having the State Council serve 
as the main actor, the level of management of the state's 
property rights, carried out by agencies which are engaged 
exclusively in such management, which is based on having the 
State Bureau of State-Asset Management serve as the main actor, 
and the level of enterprises' management of the state's property 
rights based on having the board of supervisors (or the board of 
directors or the management council) serve as the main actor. 
The specific ideas are as follows: 
<H5>  Level of Government Management of the State's Property Rights </H5>
  The State Council is the main actor which exercises 
ownership 
right over the assets of state-owned enterprises on behalf of 
the state. At this organizational level, the government's dual 
economic function is fused. Its main task in managing the 
state's property rights is to give the most effective play to 
the state sector's role in promoting the optimum allocation of 
resources in society. Consequently, the main contents of the 
management of the state's property rights at this level include: 
determining where additional state assets are to be placed, 
adjusting the scale and structure of business operations based 
on state assets, forming and issuing mandatory plans on 
state-owned enterprises, coordinating the social objectives of 
state-owned enterprises' business operations with the profit 
objectives of such operations, etc. In order to ensure the State 
Council's effective exercise of ownership right over the assets 
of state-owned enterprises and to enhance the overall planning 
and guidance regarding the reform of the system of state-owned 
enterprises and the rearrangement of state assets, it is proper 
to consider establishing an interagency commission for 
state-asset management, with the premier or a vice premier 
serving as chairman of the commission and with officials in 
charge of the government's structural reform agencies, the 
various comprehensive economic functional agencies, state-asset 
management agencies, and the agencies in charge of the relevant 
industries serving as members of the commission. To make 
decision making more scientific, it is also proper to establish 
an advisory committee or evaluation committee of experts under 
the commission. 
<H3>  Level of Management of the State's Property Rights Carried 
Out by Government Agencies Engaged Exclusively in Such Management </H3>
  The State Bureau of State-Asset Management is a State 
Council 
agency engaged exclusively in the management of property rights 
over the assets of state-owned enterprises. Its main task in 
managing property rights is to promote, in the most effective 
way, the optimum deployment of state assets on the macroeconomic 
level. Its main functions include: formulating uniform rules, 
laws, regulations, and policies on the management of property 
rights over the assets of state-owned enterprises; analyzing the 
macro situation regarding business operations based on the 
assets of state-owned enterprises as well as the strategies used 
in such operations, providing the State Council with timely 
suggestions of an advisory nature with regard to the adjustment 
of the structure of business operations based on state assets 
and the rearrangement of the assets, and coordinating the 
relationships between the objectives of government management of 
property rights and the objectives of the government's social 
and economic management, so as to ensure that the business 
operations of state-owned enterprises have a unified goal; 
providing unified and category-based guidance regarding the 
reform of the property right system governing state-owned 
enterprises, training, selecting, and evaluating representatives 
of the state's property rights in enterprises and top management 
personnel of the enterprises, etc. The State Bureau of 
State-Asset Management can set up several layers of bureaucracy 
and make division-of-labor arrangements. In general, vertically 
governmental state-asset management bureaus can be established 
at the levels of the center, provinces (autonomous regions, 
municipalities under direct central jurisdiction, and cities 
with separate plans), and cities. Horizontally branch offices of 
state-asset management bureaus can be established in economic 
management agencies in charge of some industries. Such 
exclusively mandated agencies, established at the various levels 
and under division-of-labor arrangements, will carry out work 
under the unified guidance exercised by the State Bureau of 
State-Asset Management. 
  With regard to the establishment of branch offices in charge 
of state-asset management in the management agencies in charge 
of a few industries, it is necessary to pay attention to doing a 
good job of resolving the conflict between "supervisory 
management" (i.e., the property right management, carried out by 
agencies in charge of the relevant industries, of the 
state-owned enterprises supervised by those agencies) and 
"general management" (i.e., the management of all the 
enterprises in the relevant industries carried out by the 
agencies in charge of those industries). To that end, it is not 
only necessary that workers of the agencies in charge of the 
industries transform their views, improve their quality, and 
change their modes of operation, but also necessary to clearly 
stipulate in terms of the rules governing the system that those 
branch offices should accept the dual operational direction of 
both the agencies in charge of the relevant industries and the 
State Bureau of State-Asset Management and that their main tasks 
be to coordinate the relationships between the objectives of the 
government's management of the industries and the objectives of 
enterprises' business operations in an appropriate manner and to 
ensure state-owned enterprises's effective playing their leaning 
role on the basis of those enterprises' improving the efficiency 
of their business operations. Those branch offices not only 
perform the function of managing, on a full-time basis, property 
rights over the state-owned enterprises supervised by agencies 
in charge of the respective industries, but also perform the 
functions of analyzing and studying the situation regarding 
business operations based on the assets of the state-owned 
enterprises in their respective industries (including the 
state-owned enterprises which are in those industries but which 
are not subordinates of the agencies in charge of those 
industries) and of timely submitting to superior agencies 
advisory suggestions on adjusting the scale and structure of 
business operations based on state assets in their respective 
industries and on the formulating of policies on the relevant 
business operations. At the same time, it is necessary to 
establish a corresponding management system to prevent the 
phenomenon of excessive direct intervention carried out by the 
agencies in charge of the relevant industries in the business 
activities of state-owned enterprises. 
  To ensure effective management of the state-owned shares of 
joint-stock enterprises and Chinese-foreign joint ventures, the 
central and local governments can also establish state 
assets-based business companies, investment companies, and 
holding companies to be engaged exclusively in performing the 
function of managing the state-owned shares in view of the 
actual needs. Those companies' serving as intermediaries between 
the government and state-owned joint-stock enterprises is 
conducive to both weakening government agencies' direct 
administrative intervention in enterprises' business activities 
and the effective functioning of state-owned shares in the 
market economy, thereby contributing to the effort to have 
state-owned shares managed by enterprises engaged exclusively in 
such management. 
<H5>  Level of Enterprises' Management of State's Property Rights </H5>
  In terms of enterprises, being transformed into corporations 
represents the inevitable trend in the reform of the property 
right system governing most state-owned enterprises. With the 
establishment of the corporate system and the development of the 
socialist market economy, the forms of enterprise organizations 
based on state assets in our country will become increasingly 
diversified and complex. Vertically, with the extension of the 
chain of property investment of enterprises, there have now 
emerged business operations based on property rights at several 
levels such as those of state-owned parent companies, 
subsidiaries, and subsidiaries' subsidiaries. Horizontally, with 
the diversification of actors investing in companies, there have 
emerged several types of property right organization such as 
sole state ownership, joint ventures between the state and 
enterprise legal persons, joint ventures between the central and 
local governments, joint ventures among the state, enterprise 
legal persons, and individuals, joint ventures between 
enterprise legal persons, and Chinese-foreign joint ventures. In 
correspondence with those forms are a number of forms of 
enterprise organization such as solely state-owned companies, 
state-owned limited liability companies, and state-owned 
joint-stock limited liability companies. Obviously, the ways and 
contents of the government's state-asset management of those 
state-owned companies of different types will be very different. 
For instance, the government maintains direct property-right 
constraining relationships with state-owned parent companies, 
but does not have direct property right relationships with 
state-owned enterprises' subsidiaries and the subsidiaries of 
state-owned enterprises' subsidiaries, of which property right 
management is mainly carried out by the parent companies. Take 
another example. With regard to state-owned joint-stock 
companies of various types, the state performs its equity 
management function mainly through participating in the general 
meetings of shareholders, boards of directors, and boards of 
supervisors in ways determined by the proportions of its 
directly held shares under the corporation law. As for solely 
state-owned companies, the government carries out property right 
management of those companies mainly through selecting members 
of the boards of directors or boards of supervisors as well as 
top management personnel and having the boards of directors or 
boards of supervisors serve as intermediaries in accordance with 
the special laws formulated by the state to govern those 
companies. Authorized by the government's state-asset management 
agencies, the boards of directors or boards of supervisors 
perform the function of actually managing the property rights on 
behalf of the state. To provide support in this regard, the 
government's state-asset management agencies should establish a 
set of effective systems of management of state-owned shares, 
including the system of hiring and evaluating representatives of 
state-owned shares, system of business operations based on 
state-owned shares, and system of making statistical reports on 
business operations based on state-owned shares. 
  With regard to the state-owned enterprises which will not 
be, 
or which will for the time being not be, transformed into 
corporations, it is necessary to further perfect the contracting 
system and leasing system and have contracting agreements or 
leasing agreements formulated in a more standardized and 
scientific way because contracting agreements and leasing 
agreements are the main means through which the government 
manages the state's property rights. One line of thought which 
can be selected would suggest the adoption, on the basis of 
implementing the new accounting system, of a system of 
contracted responsibility for business operations which is 
mainly based on evaluating performance in regard to the 
preserving and increasing of the value of net assets of 
state-owned enterprises. At the same time, it is proper to 
consider establishing offices in charge of supervising and 
managing property rights in enterprises, offices which will 
resemble boards of supervisors in corporations; the boards of 
supervisors are to be composed of representatives of the 
government's state-asset management agencies, party 
organizations at the enterprises, and trade union organizations, 
and will be responsible mainly for monitoring and regulating the 
situation regarding the preserving and increasing of the values 
of the relevant enterprises' state assets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40092 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Symposium Discusses Enterprise Merger, Bankruptcy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0247A Beijing JINGJI GUANLI [ECONOMIC MANAGEMENT] in 
Chinese No 12, 5 Dec 93 pp 46-48 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0247A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI GUANLI [ECONOMIC MANAGEMENT] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by this journal's special correspondent: "China Will </F>
See the Emergence of a New Industry--The Property Rights Trading 
Industry"] 
  [Excerpt] On 18-20 September 1993 the Symposium 
on Enterprise Merger and Bankruptcy was held in Beijing. This 
symposium was jointly sponsored by the Enterprise Department of 
the State Bureau of State-Asset Management, the Research 
Department of the Chinese Industrial Economics Association, the 
Wage Institute under the Labor Ministry, the journal JINGJI 
GUANLI, and the Siyuan Merger and Bankruptcy Consulting Agency 
of Beijing, and was organized by the Siyuan Agency. One hundred 
and thirty-six people, including representatives of the relevant 
agencies of the central and local governments, the Supreme 
People's Court and some superior and intermediate people's 
courts, enterprises, institutions of high learning, institutions 
of scientific and technological research, news organizations, 
and the International Bankruptcy Association and renowned 
bankruptcy judges and accountants from Poland and Hong Kong, 
participated in the symposium. The symposium carried out 
extensive and in-depth discussions of policy issues which had 
emerged in the process of handling enterprise mergers and 
bankruptcies after the going into effect of the Enterprise 
Bankruptcy Law of our country, and which needed to be resolved. 
Combining discussion and study, combining theory with practice, 
combining the government and private individuals, and having 
entrepreneurs, scholars, and government officials "perform on 
the same stage" were prominent features of this symposium. 
  Cao Siyuan, president of the Siyuan Agency, thoroughly 
expounded the proposed draft of the Enterprise Bankruptcy Law 
(Tentative) of the People's Republic of China that he had put 
forward. According to him, in revising the bankruptcy law, it is 
necessary to follow three principles: First, move further toward 
international practices; second, be conducive to improving 
case-handling efficiency during the process of implementation; 
and, third, pay attention to maintaining continuity. Therefore, 
he favored moderate revision rather than radical revision. The 
nine revision proposals put forward by him were as follows: 1) 
Extend the scope of application from all people-owned 
enterprises to all enterprise legal persons. 2) The statement of 
the legislative purpose should be simplified, and should not 
have ideological colors. 3) Bankruptcy should be defined in a 
uniform way and it should be clearly stipulated that bankruptcy 
mean "being unable to pay debts as they are due." 4) As for the 
issue of placement of employees of bankrupt enterprises, since 
the State Council has already issued rules, there are no 
additional rules in the text. 5) It is necessary to abolish some 
rules such as the rule that a petition in bankruptcy or for 
amicable settlement and consolidation has to be approved by the 
enterprise's supervisory agency and endorsed by the workers' 
congress after discussion. 6. Introduce the concept of the 
bankrupt's creditor. 7) Shorten bankruptcy cases' handling time, 
and one measure in this regard will be to change the time limit 
on filing creditor claims from three months to two months. 8) Do 
not directly cite criminal law provisions in the bankruptcy law; 
it would be adequate to just have the explicit wording in 
accordance with the relevant criminal law provisions. 9. The 
work of establishing liquidation teams should be regulated by 
the market. The main current obstacle, he also said, to the 
implementation of the bankruptcy law is that in the course of 
implementing the bankruptcy system, creditors, especially the 
banks, lack the enthusiasm for using the bankruptcy law to 
protect their own economic interests; the second is the issue of 
placement of employees of bankrupt enterprises. China will see 
the emergence of a new industry--the property rights trading 
industry and the emergence of the new occupation of the "merger 
producers," he predicted very confidently. Their business is to 
"trade" in enterprises, and "trading" in enterprises is not a 
bad thing. They buy enterprises, have the enterprises 
consolidated, transformed, and packaged, and then sell the 
enterprises. After going through this process, enterprises would 
emerge with entirely new looks, and would have levels of 
efficiency totally different from those in the past. Turning 
from "money eating" enterprises into "money spitting" 
enterprises. Producers of enterprise mergers would make a great 
deal of money through first devouring and then throwing up 
enterprises. But such money is not made through exploiting 
national calamities but made through benefiting from competition 
and prosperity. 
  Professor Xiao Zhuoji of Beijing University made five points 
with regard to the issue of merger and bankruptcy. First, merger 
and bankruptcy represent the objective demands of a market 
economy. Under a market economy, the law of survival of the 
fittest is effective, and it is inevitable that some enterprises 
will face bankruptcy; at the same time some enterprises need to 
develop and grow and the main way to develop is to have mergers. 
Second, merger and bankruptcy constitute an important way to 
have resources allocated in an optimum manner and can result in 
limited resources being transferred to sectors and industries 
equipped with advantageous conditions, thereby producing 
economies of scale which are conducive to the development of the 
social productive forces. Third, merger and development 
themselves would improve the overall quality of enterprises. To 
enterprises, merger represents a driving force, and bankruptcy 
represents a pressure. Because of such a driving force and 
pressure, every enterprise must strive to improve the standards 
of its business operation and management; otherwise, it would 
face the danger of elimination. Fourth, merger and bankruptcy 
constitute an effective way to safeguard state properties. A 
loss making enterprise is subsidized by the state, and the 
state's losses are unlimited; however, if the bankruptcy method 
is used, there will be some losses of state property, but the 
losses will be limited. Furthermore, it is possible to utilize 
the original assets for making up the losses through 
transferring properties. Fifth, merger and bankruptcy also 
constitute an important way to maintain social stability. If 
some enterprises which should be liquidated are kept alive with 
difficulty, it would seem on the surface that workers are not 
unemployed and society would seem stable; but society's 
resources would be wasted or remain idle, and such a situation 
would mean the greatest instability. Only by adopting the merger 
and bankruptcy method so as to achieve the optimum allocation of 
resources, develop the economy, and improve efficiency, would it 
be possible to fundamentally ensure social stability. 
  Guan Weili, director of the Enterprise Department of the 
Bureau of State-Asset Management, put forward ten ideas on the 
issue of enterprise merger and bankruptcy. 1) Enterprise 
bankruptcy and merger are an indispensable link in the market 
economy, and merger and bankruptcy constitute the main way of 
adjusting the allocation of factors of production. 2) Bankruptcy 
and merger can both be positive means, and constitute 
metabolism. Letting bankrupt enterprises control resources means 
wasting resources, and it would be better to have bankrupt 
enterprises absorbed by enterprises equipped with advantageous 
conditions. At the present stage, it is proper to take larger 
steps with respect to merger and bankruptcy. 3) The current 
situation of state-owned enterprises has two major 
characteristics: First, the level of efficiency is low while the 
problem of asset washout is serious. Some enterprises cannot be 
saved, while some others are not suited to remaining in their 
respective industries; to them, merger and bankruptcy are good 
things. Second, the speed is high but the figures are inflated; 
the situation is governed by plans but also unbalanced. 
Enterprises face a heavy task of carrying out structural 
readjustment. 4) To have mergers and bankruptcies, it is first 
of all necessary to clearly define property right relationships 
and to make clear who have ownership; we must have agencies 
which exercise ownership rights over enterprises. In the 
transition period, enterprises' supervisory agencies must 
continue to exercise supervisory and management rights. 5) It is 
proper not to take away an enterprise's legal person status 
after it has been absorbed, and this practice can serve as a 
nonstandardized method, and be reflected in some way in the 
future enterprise merger law. 6) To have enterprise mergers as 
well as bankruptcies, it is necessary to transform the function 
of financial institutions. 7) Amidst enterprise bankruptcies and 
mergers, it is necessary to resolve the issue of placement of 
employees. 8) To have enterprise bankruptcies as well as 
mergers, we must establish a system of asset evaluation. 9) 
Change views, clarify understanding, and have a new 
understanding of the property right structure of state assets. 
10) Enterprise bankruptcy and merger are dependent on the 
establishment, development, and perfecting of a property rights 
trading market. Enterprise bankruptcy itself needs a market; the 
existing state-asset management agencies and structural reform 
agencies are doing the relevant work in this respect. The 
Enterprise Merger Society established by the symposium should 
play its due role in this respect. 
  Dr. Li Shuguang, vice president of the Siyuan Agency, 
submitted to the symposium the proposed text of the Enterprise 
Merger Law (Draft) prepared by the research group led by him, 
and delivered a speech entitled "The Development of the Market 
Economy Needs an Enterprise Merger Law," expounding the proposed 
text. 
  The main breakthroughs and additions contained in "The 
Proposed Text" with regard to the existing economic laws and 
regulations were: Clarifying the legislative purpose and 
application scope of the Enterprise Merger Law as well as the 
concept of enterprise merger; containing specific rules on the 
modes and categories of enterprise merger and on merger 
agreements; containing clear rules on dividing enterprise assets 
in merger asset evaluation under the new accounting system and 
on sources of funds for mergers; containing more detailed rules 
on the placement of employees of absorbed enterprises than "The 
Tentative Provisions"; containing a chapter dealing exclusively 
with "legal responsibilities." The purpose was to raise the 
merger law's statutes and authority in an effort to impose norms 
on the conduct of all parties. 
  "The Proposed Text" aroused strong reactions from the 
participants of the symposium. According to the participating 
foreign scholars and experts, China should, as other countries, 
have a merger law which, while in line with international 
practices, is also appropriate to China's realities. People from 
government agencies and the business community argued that both 
carrying out practical work and invigorating the merger market 
would keenly need the Enterprise Merger Law, and expressed the 
hope that this law would come into being as soon as possible. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40093 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reportage on Price Changes in Various Sectors </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0247B Beijing JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN [PRICE: THEORY AND 
PRACTICE] in Chinese No 11, 20 Nov 93 pp 11-15 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0247B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN [PRICE: THEORY AND 
PRACTICE] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Reportage by Chen Jun: "The Recent Price Situation and </F>
Price Prospects"] 
  [Excerpt] Since the beginning of this 
year, the Chinese economy has continued to grow rapidly, and 
inflation-inducing and constraining factors have been growing 
simultaneously. The introduction of price reform measures has 
been proceeding in a basically smooth manner, but the increase 
in the general price level is still much higher than the target. 
State set prices have risen in a planned way; state-guided 
prices have risen slightly amid general stability; and 
market-regulated prices have risen rather substantially. In 
terms of the general trend, changes in the price level have a 
sector-based character. Final consumption has risen amid general 
stability; increases in prices for production materials have an 
obvious character of being caused by the adjustment of 
industrial structure and product structure, and are in line with 
the trend of market demands; and the continued large increases 
in prices for services and labor service have objective causes. 
The rate of increase in the general retail price level was high 
at the beginning of the year, and has risen recently, thereby 
demonstrating a trend to increase on a monthly basis. 
<H5>  The Current Price Situation </H5>
  1. Extensive price decontrol was carried out in 1992, and 
since the beginning of this year, plan-governed prices for 
things such as grain, coal, petroleum, and steel have been 
further decontrolled, while rates for railway freight transport 
have been raised. 
  Under the State Council's unified plan, prices for most 
centrally distributed coal were decontrolled at the beginning of 
the year; prices for most steel and iron products have been 
decontrolled; on 1 April 30 million metric tons of plan-governed 
parity-priced crude oil was transferred to use for extraplan 
sales; the grain, chemical fertilizer, cotton, wood pulp, raw 
materials for detergent imported with centrally held foreign 
exchange under plans have changed into agent-set prices, with 
prices regulated by the market; prices for things such as 
natural gas, metal alloy products, cement, and communication 
exchange equipments have been decontrolled; and the fee 
standards for some centrally managed services have been 
decontrolled. Since 1 July, the per metric ton/km rate for 
railway freight transport has been 1.5 fen higher, representing 
an increase of approximately 40 percent. 
  In the first half of the year, prices for a small number of 
commodities involving scarce resources and a small number of 
monopoly prices were adjusted. Prices for centrally distributed 
timber produced by state-owned forest zones were raised; burning 
and transport additions to the electricity price were increased; 
ceilings were imposed on prices for chemical fertilizer, 
farm-use pesticides, and farm-use films; protective minimum 
prices were used for grain ordered by the state and for grain to 
be stored for special purposes, and so on. 
  After prices for grain were decontrolled in some regions 
last 
year, this year such provinces and autonomous regions as 
Zhejiang, Shaanxi, Shanxi, Jilin, and Xinjiang and such cities 
as Shanghai, Tianjin, Wuhan, Zhengzhou, and Kunming have also 
decontrolled grain prices. As marked by Beijing Municipality's 
decontrolling sales prices for grain on 10 May, the work of 
gradually decontrolling sales prices for grain nationwide, which 
had started in the second half of 1992, was completed. 
  Under the influence of the state's price reform measures, 
governments of some regions have also further decontrolled 
tertiary industry prices, raised housing rents and fares for 
urban public transport, and raised or decontrolled prices for 
fuels for civilian use. 
  After the adoption of those measures, the consumer goods 
market has experienced some partial fluctuations and there have 
been sporadic occurrences of panic buying, but there has been no 
large overall impact on market prices. 
  2. The increase in the general price level is rather 
substantial, and prices for production materials and rates for 
services have risen too rapidly; increases in market-regulated 
prices are an important factor shaping changes in the general 
price level. 
  In the months of January-August of this year, the nationwide 
general index of retail prices rose by 8.5 percent, 8.7 percent, 
9.1 percent, 10.9 percent, 12.5 percent, 13.9 percent, 14.9 
percent, and 15.1 percent respectively over the same periods 
last year, constituting an average increase of 11.8 percent for 
the months of January-August; the rates of increase in retail 
prices in 35 large and medium cities were 12.5 percent, 12.6 
percent, 14.2 percent, 13.9 percent, 16.5 percent, 19 percent, 
20.8 percent, and 19.9 percent respectively. The nationwide rate 
of increase in employee cost-of-living prices was 13.4 percent 
for the same period. 
  As compared with the same period last year, in 
January-August 
changes in prices for consumer goods, in terms of the average 
monthly situation, were basically normal, except for the 26.2 
percent increase in grain prices, 11.3 percent increase in 
nonstaple food prices, 40 percent increase in fuel prices, and 
29 percent increase in prices for building materials. Prices for 
industrial consumer goods were basically stable, with some 
increases and decreases. In this respect, apparel prices 
increased by 5 percent; prices for daily-use goods increased by 
5.8 percent; and prices for entertainment goods and mechanical 
and electrical products declined by 1.8 percent. After May, 
because of the rise in the retail sales tax, prices for most 
industrial consumer goods increased. For a time the swap-market 
exchange rate was one dollar to 10.8 yuan, representing an 
increase of approximately 70 percent over the beginning of the 
year. Because of this development, prices for imported 
industrial consumer goods increased substantially, and the gold 
jewelry price increased by approximately 40 percent, reaching 
140 yuan per gram. 
  Prices for agricultural products have begun to rise again. 
Prices for some oils have increased while prices for some others 
are stable; the price of rice began rising in early April, but 
the price of wheat has remained weak. Prices for coarse cereals 
have risen rather substantially; in mid-July the price of corn 
was for a time higher than that of wheat on the grain wholesale 
market in Zhengzhou. 
  Rates for paid services have continued to rise rapidly. As 
compared with the same period last year, the increase in 
January-August was 28.2 percent. Increases in 35 large and 
medium cities were even larger. Nanjing saw an increase of 92 
percent in June. 
  Prices for production materials have increased on a 
widespread basis. According to the results of the relevant 
agencies' monitoring of market prices for 37 major production 
materials in 35 large and medium cities, if January this year is 
considered the base period, the average rates of increase for 
the months of February-September were respectively 6.8 percent, 
15 percent, 22.4 percent, 27.6 percent, 33.6 percent, 36.2 
percent, 36 percent, and 35.6 percent and the monthly 
chain-increase rates were respectively 6.8 percent, 6.0 percent, 
5.3 percent, 4.2 percent, 4.1 percent, 2.2 percent, -0.5 
percent, and -1.1 percent. As compared with January, 11-20 July, 
when the highest rate of increase occurred, saw a 420 percent 
increase in the price of heavy oil, a 11 percent increase in the 
price of coal, a 120 percent increase in the price of pig iron, 
a 21 percent increase in the price of 10 mm steel plates, a 35 
percent increase in the price of 1 mm cold-rolled steel sheets, 
a 34 percent increase in the price of cement, a 79 percent 
increase in the price of raw pine timber, increases of 3.6-5.8 
percent in the prices of nonferrous metals, a 45 percent 
increase in the price of soda ash, a 8.5 percent increase in 
prices for raw materials for plastics, and a 13 percent increase 
in the price of gasoline. Since August, prices for most 
production materials have been getting stable. By the end of 
September the per metric ton producer price for some 
construction-use steel products had fallen by approximately 
1,000 yuan, resulting in a price of around 3,000 yuan per ton 
and the February 1994 futures price of steels had fallen to 
2,800 yuan per ton. 
  Stocks of agricultural production materials have increased. 
Chemical fertilizer and farm-use films are selling slowly, but 
prices have not declined because of increases in prices for raw 
materials; some chemical fertilizer plants have begun to suspend 
production. The price of farm-use diesel fuel is high because it 
has been difficult to deliver plan-governed supplies. In 
January-August, nationwide prices for agricultural production 
materials were up by 13.5 percent over the same period last year. 
  The rates of increase in the regional general price levels 
have been gradually getting closer to one another, and the 
differences in the rate of increase between the urban and rural 
areas and between the coastal and hinterland regions caused by 
the differences in the time of price reform are being reduced. 
For January-August the general retail price levels for the urban 
and rural areas nationwide rose by 14.5 percent and 12.7 percent 
respectively, with the increase for the urban areas being 
slightly larger than for the rural areas. 
  This year the general retail price level has risen 
substantially, and the main reason is that there have been 
substantial cost-push increases in market-regulated prices. 
According to estimates, the general retail price level has risen 
by 11.8 percent. In this respect, state-set prices rose by 
approximately 19 percent; state-guided prices rose by 
approximately 1.5 percent; and market-regulated prices rose by 
approximately 11 percent. The impact of increases in 
market-regulated prices on prices is approximately 3 percentage 
points greater than envisioned in the plans made at the 
beginning of the year. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40094 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhao Haikuan on Monetary Policy as Regulator </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0241A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 14 Dec 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0241A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhao Haikuan (6392 3189 1401) edited by Gao Lu </F>
(7559 6424): "Monetary Policy Is a Key Means of Macroeconomic 
Regulation and Control"] 
  [Text] Our establishment of a socialist market economy will 
further invigorate microeconomic operations, with market 
variations becoming the key regulator of enterprise production 
and business activities. Yet, while market activities can 
forcefully propel enterprises to improve their operation and 
management and raise their product quality and economic 
efficiency, they are quite unchecked. So, to bring the driving 
force of markets into full play, while ensuring the steady, 
rapid, and sound growth of our national economy, tighter 
macroeconomic regulation and control brook no delay. 
  China's macroeconomic regulation and control is exercised by 
the State Council through sectors such as planning, finance, and 
banking. The central bank is the department that enforces 
monetary policy under State Council leadership by regulating the 
money supply. The "CPC Central Committee Resolution on Certain 
Issues Involved in Establishing a Socialist Market Economy" 
(abbreviated hereafter as the "Resolution") points out that the 
Central Government must "use monetary and fiscal policy for 
regulation to achieve a basic overall balance between supply and 
demand, as well as coordinating them with industrial policy to 
promote the balanced development of our national economy and 
society." 
<H3>  Monetary Policy Is Most Crucial Means of Exercising 
Macroeconomic Regulation and Control </H3>
  While planning, fiscal policy, and monetary policy all are 
China's means of macroeconomic regulation and control, monetary 
policy stands in a particularly crucial position. This is 
because the most essential substance of macroeconomic regulation 
and control is the maintenance of basic overall economic 
balance, or the preservation of a basic overall balance between 
supply and demand. Overall supply is all of the commodities 
capable of being provided to markets, while overall demand means 
effective demand, or purchasing power expressed in the money 
supply and its turnover frequency. The key function of 
macroeconomic regulation and control, in addition to actively 
supporting the development of industrial and agricultural 
production and tertiary industries, by doing all possible to 
increase commodity supplies, is to regulate the whole society's 
money supply (as the currency turnover rate does not vary much 
under normal conditions, it can be regarded as a constant), so 
that it reflects the scale on which overall demand is suited to 
overall supply. 
  The so-called money supply is the cash and account-transfer 
currency in the market. It is formed by banks through fund 
applications. As about 95 percent of bank fund applications are 
loans, it can be said that the money supply is formed through 
bank lending. Enterprises generally borrow from banks to pay for 
stock purchases, and the loans granted by banks for enterprise 
stock purchases very quickly turn into sales units' product-sale 
funds. The product-sale funds acquired by sales units are then 
used to pay employee wages, all sorts of expenses, profits and 
taxes to state revenue, and for stock purchases with, except for 
some that form potential currency, the rest being converted 
through transactions into cash and account transfer currency. So 
as long as the state emphasizes the key link of banks, 
controlling overall lending and the money supply, it can achieve 
its macroeconomic regulation and control ends. 
  The fund activities of other sectors of the national economy 
can affect only the distribution and turnover rate of social 
currency, by either shifting it from one sector to another or 
accelerating or slowing the currency turnover rate, but cannot 
directly increase or reduce the money supply. This is also the 
case with fiscal revenue and expenditure. When revenue and 
expenditure is balanced (including balance achieved through the 
sale of bonds), fiscal revenue and expenditure comes from and is 
used for the society, affecting only the social currency 
turnover frequency, as well as redistributing the social money 
supply. However, when fiscal revenue and expenditure produces 
surpluses or deficits that increase or decrease the social money 
supply, that is achieved either through increasing or decreasing 
fiscal deposits in banks or through borrowing and overdrawing 
from banks. In the final analysis, the impact of fiscal revenue 
and expenditure on the money supply is still realized through 
bank credit fund variation. 
  Of course, this refers only to the overall source of the 
social money supply, certainly not to say that the impact of the 
economic activities of the non-banking sector (mostly the fiscal 
sector) on the money supply, and thus on overall social demand, 
is insignificant. On the contrary, sectors, such as state 
revenue, in addition to being able to affect the currency 
turnover rate, can also use methods, such as spending beyond 
income, creating deficits, and arranging more basic construction 
projects, to force banks to make additional loans, increasing 
the money supply and expanding overall social demand. So the 
impact on overall demand of activities by sectors, such as state 
revenue, must absolutely not be overlooked. While emphasizing 
the use of monetary policy to exercise macroeconomic regulation 
and control, the state must also establish coordination and 
restraint mechanisms among planning, banking, and finance, to 
enhance its comprehensive coordination of economic operations. 
<H3>  Achieving Macroeconomic Regulation and Control Through 
Mostly Monetary Policy Means Will Require Certain Terms To Be Met </H3>
  Setting up a macroeconomic regulation and control system in 
which planning, finance, and banking are coordinated and 
monetary policy by banks is the major means, or shifting 
regulation and control from mostly administrative to mostly 
economic means, will require that the following terms be met: 
  1. We need to set up a modern enterprise system, to enable 
state enterprises to become corporate entities that have 
operating autonomy, are responsible for their own profits and 
losses, and organize their production or operation according to 
market needs. This will allow both enterprise leaders and 
employees to pay particular attention to their operating results 
so that they can respond sensitively to economic macroeconomic 
regulation and control measures by conscientiously organizing 
and adjusting their production and operation according to state 
macroeconomic policy. 
  2. We need to pave the way for the central bank to exercise 
an independent monetary policy. China's money market is a 
centralized one, in which the yuan can circulate freely and 
without obstacle throughout the country, and in which a larger 
monetary investment by any region can affect the national 
money-flow status quo. Thus, to prevent unchecked starting of 
projects by localities, which would force the central bank to 
provide more money, sharpening inflation, our macroeconomic 
regulation and control authority, including monetary policy 
control authority, must be concentrated in the center. 
  Some hold that we ought to devolve some macroeconomic 
regulation and control authority to local governments, setting a 
clear division of labor between the center and localities, and 
practicing two-level macroeconomic regulation and control. This 
merits discussion. Those who hold this view probably understand 
macroeconomic regulation and control as controlling the major 
matter of economic construction, believing that it should be not 
overcentralized, but rather appropriately decentralized to 
stimulate the initiative of all areas. In fact, macroeconomic 
regulation and control is an economic concept with a specific 
meaning, being an overall regulation and control. Its regulation 
and control target is overall social supply and demand, with its 
regulation and control aim being an attempt to achieve an 
overall balance of demand with supply. So macroeconomic 
regulation and control policies and measures can only be 
formulated, organized, and enforced directly by the central 
government. If we allowed all places and sectors to become their 
own units for exercising regulation and control, making their 
own money supply decisions, it would be impossible to balance 
our whole society's overall supply and demand, and difficult to 
prevent inflation. 
  Might the uniform exercise of macroeconomic regulation and 
control concentrated in the center affect local economic 
development? This would be absolutely impossible, and we must 
not confuse macroeconomic regulation and control with the former 
planned management. We must not worry that the mere mention of 
tighter macroeconomic regulation and control concentrated in the 
center might mean restricted microeconomic activity. In fact, 
macroeconomic regulation and control differs sharply from the 
past planned management, which directly restrained microeconomic 
activity, with the more planning, the more restraint on and the 
harder to stimulate the economy. On the other hand, 
macroeconomic regulation and control mainly regulates and 
controls overall social supply and demand, completely 
deregulating the economic activities of individual enterprises 
to market regulation. Tighter macroeconomic regulation and 
control ensures currency stability to give enterprises full play 
to grow faster, by clearing the way and setting the stage. One 
of the reasons that the "Resolution" provides for macroeconomic 
regulation and control authority to be concentrated in the 
center is to promote microeconomic activity. If we allowed all 
regions and sectors to share in macroeconomic regulation and 
control authority, to practice two- or multi-level regulation 
and control that would micromanage macroeconomic regulation and 
control, certain defects of our past planned management might 
reappear in such micromanaged macroeconomic regulation and 
control. 
  3. We need to establish an appropriate banking system. While 
banks shoulder the key macroeconomic regulation and control 
responsibility, our banking system still contains certain 
problems that keep it from adapting to needs. 1. Our central 
bank is liable for too many specific matters, making it hard for 
it to focus more efforts on controlling monetary policy. 2. All 
specialized banks handle both ordinary banking business and 
policy-related matters, making it impossible for them to be 
genuine enterprises. This keeps the banking industry from 
further invigoration, while making it impossible for the central 
bank to exercise macroeconomic regulation and control through 
economic means. Economic means of regulation and control is 
using a method that can influence the economic interests of all 
financial institutions and enterprises, to guide financial 
institutions and thus enterprises to operate their business 
activities according to state macroeconomic policy demands. As 
all large banks have not yet become genuine enterprises, not 
emphasizing evaluation of profits, it would be bound to be 
impossible for the central bank to achieve the desired results 
from exercising macroeconomic regulation and control through 
economic means. 3. As economic leverage, such as interest and 
exchange rates, is still not invigorated, bringing the impact of 
monetary policy into full play to tighten macroeconomic 
regulation and control will necessitate intensified reform of 
our banking system: 
  --We need to set up a policy bank as quickly as possible to 
specially handle the ordinary banking business handled by the 
central bank and the policy-related matters handled by 
specialized banks that require direct government regulation and 
control. Once specialized banks separate out policy-related 
matters; they will gradually convert to commercial banks. In 
addition, we could also reestablish in an organized way a few 
national or regional commercial banks, including 
shareholding-system banks. But all commercial banks must 
practice assets, liability, and ratio management and risk 
control. 
  --We need to better develop our money markets. We need not 
only to increase our securities trade turnover, but also to 
commercialize the credit funds of commercial banks and other 
financial institutions. All monetary funds, except for policy 
bank loans, must be turned into commodities to operate according 
to the fund for commodity exchange principle. 
  --We need to deregulate banking interest rates in a 
controlled way. Based on the spirit of the decision by the Third 
Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee, the central 
bank in the future will set only benchmark interest rates based 
on fund supply and demand, while commercial bank interest rates 
can float freely within a range around the benchmark rates. 
Within these limits, commercial banks and other financial 
institutions will have the authority to freely decide their own 
deposit and loan interest rates. We also need to reform our 
foreign exchange control system by establishing a market-based 
and controlled floating exchange rate system and a foreign 
exchange market with uniform standards, in order to gradually 
turn the yuan into a convertible currency. 
  Once these terms are met, the central bank will be able to 
basically use economic means to effect monetary policy, the 
state will be able to establish macroeconomic regulation and 
control forces that control effectively while contributing to 
microeconomic invigoration, and our socialist market economy 
will be able to grow steadily, quickly, and soundly. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40095 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Asset Losses 100 Million Yuan Daily </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0253A Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 16 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0253A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article based on a report in NANFANG ZHOUMO (SOUTHERN </F>
WEEKEND): "State Asset Losses Amount to 100 Million Yuan a Day"] 
  [Text] Our switch from the old to the new system, in which 
our state assets management organs are incomplete and divided, 
has left our state assets in an awkward plight of "all managing 
them, but no one being liable for them." Our current management 
sector's lack of responsibility and authority has created a 
situation in which state assets suffer from ineffective 
oversight and severe losses. Authoritative figures 
conservatively estimate that our state asset losses are 
averaging 100 million yuan a day. 
<H5>  Property Rights Adjustments Have Devalued State Assets </H5>
  While international practice requires assets appraisals 
before enterprises set up joint or contractual joint ventures, 
project appraisals were conducted for only a little over 2,100 
of the up to 10,000 Sino-foreign joint and contractual joint 
ventures by state enterprises approved by the pertinent sector 
in 1992, leaving nearly 8,000 to be set up without assets 
appraisals. 
  Investigation shows that in the over 2,000 enterprises for 
which project appraisals were conducted, the assets appreciation 
rate averaged a high of 75 percent. Projecting from this, state 
asset losses for the 8,000 enterprises that were not appraised 
topped 30 billion yuan. 
  Many enterprises either do not conduct assets appraisals or 
deliberately undervalue assets in the course of setting up 
joint or contractual joint ventures, which is due largely to 
local administrative interference. 
  In the conversion to the shareholding system, arbitrarily 
undervaluing or essentially not appraising state assets creates 
a quite severe situation of differing profits for similar shares 
among state shares and other share types. Some regions provide 
individual and corporate shares with matching and gift shares, 
while certainly not granting such rights to state shares. The 
data for 1992, excluding state shares that were not listed, show 
state-share returns losses reaching 300 million yuan. 
  In the contracting and leasing process, nonstandard actions 
of contractors and leaseholders also create a loss of state 
assets. 
<H3>  Unclear Property Rights Have Left Small Fish Eating From the 
Big One </H3>
  When state enterprises first set up so many collective 
enterprises to resolve the matter of jobs for dependents, this 
was actually a case of state enterprises giving state assets to 
collective enterprises as free gifts, with the returns going to 
collective enterprise ownership. But while setting up these 
collective enterprises undoubtedly resolved the jobs 
difficulties, the loser was certainly the state as to who 
invested and who benefited. 
  Administrative institutions taking over state assets free of 
charge to set up tertiary industries and create earnings has 
also gobbled up state assets to varying degrees. 
  Arbitrary fundraising and apportionment have also created a 
great loss of state assets. The list of arbitrary 
apportionments against enterprises can reach up to 100 items, 
including a host of charges by the center, localities, and 
even neighborhoods, causing enterprises unspeakable problems. In 
recent years, up to 10 billion yuan a year of state assets have 
been lost through such apportionment. 
  State enterprise oversight is ineffective, with unclear 
property rights, all units indulging in their own wishful 
thinking, and profits being seized where seen, resulting in all 
eating off of the state's "big fish." 
<H5>  Enterprise Losses: The Black Hole of State Assets </H5>
  State enterprise losses represent a severe problem in 
China's 
economic activities that has never been solved. The data from 
investigations by pertinent sectors shows that by the end of 
1991, budgeted state enterprise losses throughout China had 
topped 100 billion yuan, which when added to the 104.5 billion 
yuan in accumulated enterprise bad debts and the 50 billion yuan 
in hidden losses, probably topped 250 billion yuan. 
  In addition to state industrial enterprises, state 
commercial 
enterprise losses are also severe. In 1991, state commercial and 
supply and marketing cooperative enterprises sustained losses of 
31.972 billion yuan. And while foreign trade enterprises cut 
their losses somewhat through foreign trade system reform, they 
still sustained a record 11.97 billion yuan in losses in 1992. 
  This sharp increase in enterprise losses has severely eroded 
state assets, with such erosion being most severe due to hidden 
losses. In 1992, our budgeted state industrial enterprise fixed 
assets net value was less than 800 billion yuan, which 
considering hidden losses of 50 billion yuan, gave us an asset 
loss of 6.25 percent. If we let such an abnormal situation 
continue, some state assets will be faced with the danger of 
being eaten up entirely. 
  What is incomprehensible is that enterprises are sustaining 
severe losses on one hand, while great waste exists on the 
other. As much as 70-80 percent of the banqueting at restaurants 
and hotels is entertainment at public expense. Concerned 
parties estimate that at least one-third of the 80 billion yuan 
so banqueted away in 1992 was illegal. 
  Resource-type state assets have also been sharply damaged 
through illegal operation and leased management, with severe 
losses. Illegal land transactions alone cause the state losses 
of over 10 billion yuan in income a year; whole mineral veins 
are regularly destroyed by illegal mining of particular 
sections; and the arbitrary stripping of forests seems even more 
unstoppable. 
  Thus, tightening state asset oversight is of great urgency. 
It has been disclosed that the pertinent State Council 
departments are now drawing up regulations on tightening state 
asset oversight. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40096 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Review of Liaoning's Development Zones </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0182A Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 25 Nov 93 pp 1, 
2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0182A </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondent Tao Jie (7118 2638): "Review of </F>
the Development of Five Major High and New Technology Industrial 
Development Zones"] 
  [Text] An Uncommonly Good Start in Trying Hard To 
Catch Up 
  In 1984, the CPC Central Committee drew up a plan to meet 
the 
challenges and the opportunities that the new technological 
revolution poses. In 1985, the Central Committee proposed the 
nationwide selection of various knowledge-intensive areas and 
adopted special policies for the step-by-step formation of new 
technology industrial development zones, each having different 
characteristics. Thereafter, new and high technology industrial 
development zones such as Jiechunfeng developed quickly. Today 
the country has 52 national-level new and high technology 
industrial development zones and 37 province level high and new 
technology industry development zones. 
  Liaoning Province, which possesses a strong industrial base, 
scientific and technical forces, and a multitude of institutions 
of higher education, has not shirked its responsibilities. One 
after another, three high and new technology industry 
development zones in Shenyang, Dalian, and Anshan have joined 
the "national team," and two province-level teams have been 
founded, one at Jinzhou, and the other at Liaoyang. The Nanhu 
Science and Technology Development Zone in Shenyang also became 
one of the five new and high technology development zones that 
the State Science and Technology Commission and State Commission 
for Restructuring of the Economic System designated test areas 
for comprehensive reform. 
  "First, sound a clarion call from the heights for an advance 
in a blaze of color." A large number of the province's 
scientific and technical personnel left research institutes, 
institutions of higher education, or large and mediumsized 
enterprises to found mew and high technology enterprises in 
scientific and technical development zones. These zones turned 
into commodities what had formerly been called "samples" or 
"exhibits." Incomplete statistics show the founding of more 
than 1,200 high and new technology enterprises in the province's 
five technology development zones, and more than 630 high and 
new technology projects represented by Jinzhou's far infra-red 
technology, Liaoyang's qihuamei [1477 0553 5326] technology, 
Anshan's static electricity technology, Dalian's hollow fiber 
super membrane technology, and Shenyang's bar code technology 
have entered domestic and foreign markets one after another for 
the preliminary creation of an output value of more than 15 
billion yuan. Within the short period of five years, Shenyang's 
Nanhu Science and Technology Zone, which got off to the earliest 
start, has seen the founding of 25 enterprises making earnings 
of more than 10 million yuan, and 126 enterprises making more 
than 1 million yuan from scientific industrial commodities. They 
have also developed a number of products having an annual output 
value of more than 100 million yuan including bar codes, heavy 
fire retarding steel wire cable conveyor belts, and dansheng 
hubao ye [6130 3932 6233 1405 3210]. 
<H3>  Like the Eight Immortals Crossing the Sea, Each Showing 
Special Prowess </H3>
  Making the most of each region's advantages to shape a 
distinctive economy is the outstanding feature of the province's 
five major science and technology development zones. This 
embodies the party's ideological line of seeking truth in facts, 
and it is also in keeping with the development of a socialist 
market economy. 
  Liaoyang is neither along the coast nor along the frontier, 
much less does it have the political, economic, and scientific 
and technical forces available in large cities; nevertheless, 
the municipal CPC committee and municipal government recognized 
the cities' special character and seized opportunities 
tenaciously. First, Liaoyang began work on three major projects 
for which the State Council had approved a total investment of 
13 billion yuan, namely the second phase of the Liaoning 
chemical project, the Qingyang MDI project, and the Liaoning 
linen and polyester project. It coordinated construction of the 
three projects, which will bring a large amount of high and new 
technology and products into Liaoyang. It's digestion and 
absorption of advanced technology, and its in-depth development 
of new products have become a major advantage for Liaoyang. In 
this connection, the Liaoyang high and new technology industry 
development zone established the principle of taking the 
chemical industry, chemical fibers, and plastics as the three 
main industries to be developed. 
  Jinzhou City did not attempt across-the-board development. 
It 
concentrated its energies on the building of high and new 
technology industrial parks in an effort to make them into new 
growth points for the whole city's economic development. It 
developed leading edge forward positions for new and high 
technology industries. Currently, a large number of high level 
technical products, including membrane separation technology, 
quma [2575 7456] multiple analgesia, and titanium dioxide powder 
technology have been brought to fruition in the science and 
technology parks. 
  The steel capital, Anshan, has abundant natural resources. 
It 
has one-fourth of the country's recoverable iron ore reserves, 
and one-fourth the world's magnesite reserves. Its talc and soap 
stone are renowned in China and abroad. The Anshan Iron and 
Steel Corporation has an annual 8 million tons aggregate 
production capacity. Therefore, the Anshan high and new 
technology industry development zone will make new materials, 
new energy, and high performance energy saving technology, 
automation technology, electronic information technology, 
biotechnology, environmental protection, and static electricity 
technology its six major technological areas for priority 
development. 
  The Qixianling Industrialized Base in Dalian's high and new 
technology industrial zone is the city's key development 
project. Since the famed Dalian Economic and Technology 
Development Zone is located in the city, projects coming into 
the base start from a higher threshold. Using an overall 
development strategy of building a "northern Hong Kong," the 
park administration decided during 1993 to attract both domestic 
and foreign high and new technology by expanding its opening to 
the outside world in order to make major breakthroughs in the 
technical fields of electronic information, electromechanical 
integration, new materials, high performance energy 
conservation, and on environmental, maritime, and biological 
projects. It is making an effort to achieve within five to 10 
years the formation of an industrial system that is distinctive 
to that city and at a substantial scale. 
  The Nanhu Science and Technology Development Zone in 
Shenyang 
has become outstanding among development zones nationwide. The 
development zone emphasizes major high and new technology fields 
including electronics and information, electromechanical 
integration, biology projects, new materials, energy and 
environmental protection. It has already developed more than 
2,000 high and new technology achievements that have spawned 
1,113 high and new technology enterprises. Gross earnings 
realized from technology, industry, and trade total more than 3 
billion yuan; high and new technology projects have an output 
value of 2 billion yuan; and profits and taxes amount to 470 
million yuan. It has created more than $20 million in foreign 
exchange. The software center headed by 38 year old Professor 
Liu Jiren [0491 4480 0088] of Northeast University's science 
park enjoys a reputation in the American and Japanese market. 
The bar code series products developed under the aegis of the 38 
year old Zhu Junying [2612 0193 5391], a high level engineer at 
the Shenyang Engineering Institute, now hold 70 percent of the 
domestic market. By comparison with the other four zones, the 
Nanhu Science and Technology Development Zone plays more the 
part of a locomotive for the transformation of traditional 
industries. The development zone has successfully created a 
"diffusion butt joint project," a "galloping-dragon 
changing-into-a-bird project" and a"single plant single role" 
project. In this way, the development zone has transformed more 
than 3,000 different traditional technologies producing 1 
billion yuan in economic returns. 
<H5>  Seizes Opportunities To Create Splendor </H5>
  The high and new technology development zones not only 
possess policy advantages, but skilled manpower and technology 
advantages as well. In addition, the investment environment is 
being constantly improved, procedures simplified, and publicity 
increased. Consequently, foreign traders flock to the province's 
five large science and technology industry development zones, 
and invest enthusiastically. Today, 157 foreign trader-owned 
enterprises are operating in Shenyang's Nanhu Science and 
Technology Development Zone, 85 percent of them high technology, 
high return, high foreign exchange earning projects. 
Foreign-owned enterprises account for 14.2 percent of all 
enterprises in the Nanhu Science and Technology Development 
Zone. They also account for 35 percent of the development zone's 
output value, as well as for more than 75 percent of its export 
foreign exchange earnings. 
  While the science and technology industry development zone 
is 
expanding, during the first half of 1993 the central authorities 
increased macroeconomic regulation and control, and the State 
Council also issued a notice on taking a hard look at all 
development zones. How to regard the situation being faced is of 
crucial importance. Not long ago, leaders from the departments 
concerned in the State Science and Technology Commission and 
principal leaders from the provincial science and technology 
commission headed a group made up of science and technology 
directors in Shenyang, Dalian, Anshan, Jinzhou, and Liaoyang, as 
well as directors from the science and technology industry 
development zone, which visited the science and technology 
industrial development zones in Jinzhou, Shenyang, Liaoyang, and 
Anshan to hear reports and hold panel discussions. 
  Comrades attending the meetings unanimously agreed that the 
State Council notice made clear requirements for operating the 
zones, underscored the solemnity of national policy regulations, 
and abolished all development zones below the provincial level. 
This is another fist tightening move in the country's economic 
development, concentrating material, financial, and, manpower 
resources. It is extremely beneficial to the development of both 
national and provincial level development zones. Opportunities 
are hard to come by. There can be no hesitation. We must move 
ahead vigorously. 
  Comrades attending the meetings recognized that the 
technological foundation for all the province's industry was 
laid on the achievements of the last industrial revolution, and 
that Liaoning Province must carry out "the second creation" to 
restore its prowess. This means using new and high technology as 
the technological basis for the transformation of industry. 
Shenyang's Nanhu Science and Technology Development Zone has 
been successful in doing this. All of the province's five large 
science and technology industrial development zones must become 
primary incubators of high and new technologies for the 
transformation of traditional industries. 
  It is heartening that the fine investment climate and the 
abundant intellect available in the province's high and new 
technology industry development zones have not only attracted 
numerous traders from the United States, Japan, Germany, and 
South Korea, but, more recently. The favor of many domestic 
financial institutions and large enterprise blocs as well. This 
is because they have gradually become aware that the new and 
high technology industry development zones are gestating 
"tomorrow's sun." 
  Reportedly, it takes about 10 years for a science and 
technology industry development zone to become a success. 
Stanford University Science Park, which was founded during the 
1950s, became "Silicon Valley" during the 1960s, and during the 
1970s, it became the world-renowned "first international park." 
The five major high and new technology industry development 
zones in Liaoning play a turnkey role in moving the urban area 
ahead in the plans of each city in which they are located. 
Another five to 10 years arduous struggle, and it will be the 
turn of the century. By that time, five new modern urban areas 
will have risen on the Liaodong Peninsula. What a magnificent 
sight that will be! 
  Leading comrades in Shenyang, Anshan, and Jinzhou have the 
following ardent expectations of comrades in the science and 
technology industry development zones: Not all of the millions 
of workers, peasants, and others in these cities can go abroad, 
but they can go to the development zones. In going to the 
development zones, they can feel as though they are in Japan, 
Hong Kong, Singapore, or in developed countries of Europe and 
the United States. They will be able to see with their own eyes 
what economic development and modernization mean. 
  We look forward enthusiastically to the early arrival of 
this 
day. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40097 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Border Trade Problems, Poor Performance Reported </TI></H3>
<H4>   New Border Trade Problems Surface </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0228A Beijing JINGJI YANJIU [ECONOMIC RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 10, 20 Oct 93 pp 67-70 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0228A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI YANJIU [ECONOMIC RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Lixin (0060 4539 2450): "Current Problems in </F>
China's Border Trade and Remedies To Regulate and Control Them"] 
  [Excerpts] With the implementation of a strategy of opening 
the country's borders and improving relations with nations along 
the country's periphery since the advent of reform and opening 
up to the outside world, border trade and local trade have 
developed rapidly. Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation statistics show border trade amounting to only $13 
million during the beginning of reform and opening up to the 
outside world in 1980, $4 million of which was imports, and $9 
million of which was exports. By 1992, however, China's border 
trade figure reached $1.865 billion, including $787 million 
worth of imports and $1.078 billion worth of exports. Within the 
short space of 12 years, border trade has shot up 142 fold. 
Today, China has 216 border trade points open to the outside 
world, and 292 markets for trading among border peoples. With 
the steady rise in the amount of border trade, China's economic 
and technical cooperation, project contracting, labor 
cooperation, and investment with nations on its borders, 
including the Commonwealth of Independent States countries, 
Vietnam, North Korea, Mongolia, Burma, Laos, and Pakistan have 
developed across the board. This increasingly lively border 
trade, and external economic exchanges, have given extremely 
great impetus to the economic development of China's border 
regions. It has expanded border region commodity production and 
commodity exchange, thereby raising the standard of living of 
all border region nationalities. In addition, China's trade with 
border countries has produced mutual benefit for certain areas, 
the flow of key production elements affecting a rational 
allocation of resources. This has not only widened the realm of 
China's external economic relations and trade cooperation, and 
opened diversified markets, but it has also actively promoted 
the development of the countries concerned and the regional 
economies of South Asia, Northeast Asia, and Central Asia. 
  Despite the rapid development of border trade, we must not 
overlook problems still remaining in China's border trade that 
are in urgent need of solution through macroeconomic regulation 
and control measures. 
<H3>  I. Major Problems Today in China's Development of Border 
Trade </H3>
  A. "Appendage" businesses make for disarray in the operating 
order, which is detrimental to normal development of border 
trade. In recent years, China's border trade has developed very 
rapidly, border trade administration and management system 
developing from scratch, and exhibiting different 
characteristics at each stage of development. Survey data show a 
lack of uniformity in both the way that each of the border 
provinces and regions conduct border trade and in the border 
trade administration and management system. Several of the 
provinces and regions that began border trade ahead of the 
others adopted what is essentially a deregulated operating 
system. They used "appendage" business methods to encourage 
diverse economic components, various economic entities, and 
provincial and autonomous region trade channels to join in the 
border trade. For example, nine corporations in Suifenhe, Heihe 
and Harbin in Heilongjiang Province enjoy the right to conduct 
border trade, and more than 5,000 companies that are appendages 
to these nine corporations also engage in the border trade. They 
include not only state-owned import-export companies, but also 
collectively owned, privately owned, and individually owned 
industrial and commercial companies. This produces a situation 
in which anybody and everybody is involved in border trade. This 
was all right during the early period of implementation of the 
strategy of opening up the border to the outside world to 
encourage border area economies to make a major effort in border 
trade. Today, however, when China is in process of 
transformation of a commodity economy system, and when the legal 
system is not yet completely developed, this kind of "appendage" 
form of border trade administration and management is not in 
keeping with the objective climate for full-speed development of 
border trade. It also runs counter to the building of a 
socialist market economic enterprise system in which enterprises 
are responsible for their own operating decisions and for their 
own profits and losses. The consequences it occasions are: 1) 
Some "appendage" companies use border trade corporations' right 
to engage in border trade to conclude deals with little regard 
for good faith. This causes problems. Eventually the border 
trade corporation receives the blame. This seriously disturbs 
the border trade operating order. 2) As a result of the lack of 
effective macroeconomic control, the involvement of numerous 
entities in importing and exporting merchandise, cut-throat 
competition, and each entity trying to undersell the other, an 
extremely serious situation exists in export trade. Some 
appendage enterprises or individuals gain benefits at the 
expense of enterprises having the right to conduct border trade 
and the country. The sale price of Chinese products steadily 
declines. For example, one could formerly readily obtain 2 tons 
of processed steel for 1 ton of granulated sugar, but only 1 ton 
is obtainable today. 
  B. No macroeconomic regulation and control mechanism has 
been 
established to guide healthy development of border trade. 
Various economic, legal, and administrative regulation and 
control measures have not been applied promptly. This impairs 
improvement of overall economic returns from border trade. 
Border trade is developing very rapidly now, but an overall 
macroeconomic regulation and control mechanism for prices, 
information services, law, Customs, commercial inspections, 
technical supervision, and transportation is still lacking. Some 
local governments and departments do as they please, adopt a 
laissez-faire attitude, and practice blatant local 
protectionism. All these actions hurt the long-term development 
of China's border trade and the opening of markets in 
neighboring countries. For example, in recent years a 
substantial amount of farm machinery, including tractors and 
harvesters as well as motor vehicles and engineering machinery, 
have been imported from Russia through barter trade. Improper 
macroeconomic regulation and control measures, and laxity in 
licensing controls and Customs duties collections resulted in 
this equipment being dumped in China's domestic markets at lower 
than the international market prices. This delivered a serious 
blow to Chinese industries producing similar products, some of 
which went bankrupt or shifted to other lines of production in 
consequence. As another example, in June 1992 Russia revived its 
monopoly system for exports of strategic materials, designating 
specific foreign trading corporations sole agents for the export 
of petroleum, fuels, charcoal, rare metals, steel pipes, and 
timber. Russia also expanded quota export commodities, 
increasing the quotas for non-ferrous metals and the raw 
materials from which they derive. It also hiked the barter trade 
export tariff rate 30 percent. On 1 January 1993, it raised it 
another 20 percent (i.e., to 50 percent). At the same time, it 
revived import duties. However, China did not immediately adopt 
corresponding macroeconomic regulation and control measures to 
guide development of border trade in a healthy direction of 
mutual concessions for mutual benefit. 
  C. Requisite agencies for the newly opened border entry and 
exit points, Customs, and commercial inspection have not been 
fully developed; staffing with supervisory and control personnel 
is not complete; and control is not strict. Consequently, some 
fake, fraudulent, counterfeit, and shoddy merchandise have been 
sent outside the country, thereby creating needless losses for 
border trade. Survey shows that no commercial inspection 
agencies have been set up for more than two-thirds of the 
commodities passing through the newly opened border points, and 
that 60 percent of the staffing of commercial inspection 
agencies has not been completed. A survey of more than 20 border 
trade points in Guangxi Province shows, for example, that aside 
from Pingxiang, Fangcheng, and Beihai, virtually no commercial 
inspection agencies have been set up elsewhere. Consequently, 
only 55 percent of the merchandise exported through the border 
trading points nationwide are subjected to commercial inspection 
agency inspections. In some places, it is only 10 percent. This 
amounts to practically no inspection at all, which is an 
important reason that fake, fraudulent, counterfeit, and shoddy 
merchandise is able to sneak into the country. 
  D. The incompleteness of laws and regulations governing 
local 
border trade, and the lack of judicial coordination with 
neighboring countries are detrimental to prompt resolution of 
border trade disputes. The "Commercial Inspection Code," the 
"Regulations for Implementation of the Commercial Inspection 
Code," and the "Customs Code," that China has promulgated lack 
specific regulations for border trade, Customs, and commercial 
inspection agencies supervision, control, and inspection 
activities. They do not meet the needs of the new situation of 
opening of the borders during the 1990s. Second, no regulations 
exist for commercial inspection and customs supervision and 
control of things carried by individuals such as travelers and 
"profiteers." Loopholes exist in the application of laws. 
Furthermore, no bilateral judicial coordination exists between 
China and Russia, China and Vietnam, or China and Burma. This is 
also an important reason for the inability to resolve promptly 
cases involving the flow across the border of false, fraudulent, 
counterfeit, and shoddy merchandise, and trade disputes that 
occur. 
  E. The other parties do not honor agreements very well, and 
foot dragging is a serious problem. Most contracts cannot be 
enforced; thus, China maintains a large trade surplus, which is 
detrimental to development of the border trade and to economic 
and technical cooperation. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40098 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Border Trade Problems, Poor Performance Reported </TI></H3>
<H4>   Guangxi-Vietnam Border Trade Slump </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0228B Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 7 Nov 93 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0228B </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondent Hong Mei (4767 2734) and Reporter </F>
Yang Ming (2799 2494): "Prospect of a Rewarming of 
Sino-Vietnamese Border Trade, Closing the Back Door and Opening 
the Front Door"] 
  [Text] Prospects at the moment are for a rewarming of 
chilly Sino-Vietnamese border trade. This is what Zhou Jiafa 
[0719 1367 4099], director of the Guangxi Autonomous Region 
Border Trade Bureau said during an interview with the reporters 
several days ago. 
  Border trade between China and Vietnam has cooled for some 
time, largely because Guangxi closed all its maritime border 
trade cargo piers in July, thereby causing a great decrease in 
the volume of cargo crossing the border. In addition, Vietnam 
recently adopted a containment policy toward border trade. 
  First, since August, Vietnam has tremendously increased the 
tariff rate on imports from China. For example, the duty on 
diesel engines was increased nearly 10 fold, and the tariff on 
bicycles was raised from 60 percent to 150 percent. 
  Second, the Vietnamese authorities have strictly controlled 
the movement of goods and personnel. In the contested area of 
western Guangxi, border disputes escalated; consequently, border 
trade in places like Pakse fell 50 percent. In the Tonkin Gulf, 
pirate attacks on Chinese fishing ships also hurt border trade. 
  During an inspection trip to the Tonkin Gulf in October 
1993, 
Deputy Premier Li Lanqing [2621 1526 3237] noted the need to 
develop barter trade with Vietnam under Customs supervision and 
control. While increasing crackdowns on smuggling, China should 
further develop border trade. It should close the back door and 
open the front door, selecting wharfs and opening maritime 
points of entry and exit at places where conditions are ripe to 
engage in border trade. Guangxi Province presently has four 
national level, and eight provincial and local level land points 
of entry and exit. It has 28 border defense reciprocal marketing 
points. Departments concerned plan to normalize Customs 
supervision and control at major provincial level cargo entry 
and exit points, including Shuikou, Aidian, Nongyao, and Puzhai. 
They will increase the number of cargo shipping wharves for 
border trade, opening them in turn as conditions warrant, 
thereby promoting development of Sino-Vietnamese border trade. 
  Guangxi authorities concerned are currently working to 
create 
a fine climate for border trade, and they plan to use the 
advantage Guangxi has in neighboring Vietnam to focus on 
long-term increase in economic cooperation with Vietnam in the 
technical and financial fields. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40099 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Border Trade Problems, Poor Performance Reported </TI></H3>
<H4>   Heilongjiang Border Trade Drops Off </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0228C Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 21 Oct 93 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0228C </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by correspondent Xun Hong (5424 1347): "Need For </F>
Pervasive Development of Border Trade"] 
  [Text] Heilongjiang Province's border trade declined during 
the last half of 1993 after three consecutive years of 
tremendous increase, a grim situation occurring as the result of 
a sharp decline in trade volume and returns. 
  Agencies and businesses throughout the province that are 
engaged in the border trade are facing the same question today, 
which is whether to languish in the present trough or to go in 
for pervasive development. 
  The answer to this question lies, first of all, in how one 
regards border trade prospects. 
  The drop off in border trade stems from many reasons. The 
province's main border trade partner, Russia, is accelerating 
privatization and undergoing political turmoil. Its laws are 
changing greatly, and the legal representatives of its business 
concerns are changing frequently. Consequently, trade contracts 
signed in the morning may change by nightfall, making the 
honoring of agreements difficult. Only 400 million of an 8 
billion Swiss francs trade agreement signed at talks in Harbin 
during 1993 had been honored as of the end of September. 
  Channels for settling payments do not work well, thereby 
increasing trade risks. During recent years, Sino-Russian border 
trade has gradually changed from mostly barter trade to cash 
settlements, but since there are no banks in Russia that are 
able directly to accept spot cash settlements, Chinese concerns 
have to turn to a third country bank. Procedures are cumbersome, 
so frequently opportunities to honor contracts are lost. 
  Prices and Customs duties vary, making it difficult to 
predict trade profits and losses. During April and August 1993, 
Russia twice increased tariffs by more than 10 percentage points 
each time. Prices of some commodities such as chemical 
fertilizers and trucks increased several fold. When they signed 
contracts for the importation of sources of supply, the Chinese 
anticipated a substantial profit, but after the goods were 
delivered, they showed virtually no profit. 
  Foreign trade problems are also directly related to the 
imperfect Russian infrastructure and lack of coordinated 
control. Poor transportation means low ability to move goods 
through entry and exit points, which results in serious cargo 
pile-ups. Every year approximately 300 million Swiss francs 
worth of materials cannot be transferred into or out of Russia. 
The damage done to the operating order is serious, and 
macroeconomic regulation and control lacks teeth. Currently the 
province has 8,000 border trading companies, but fewer than 
1,000 of them can move cargoes across the border. Furthermore, 
statistics show a more than 1.3 billion yuan shortage of border 
trade funds provincewide. Some companies are operating at a 
loss, are unable to repay loans, and are unlikely to carry on. 
  However, one cannot be pessimistic because of the above 
difficulties. Those who are well informed point out that the 
current predicament in border trade is an inevitable reflection 
of accumulated problems in going from a preliminary stage that 
was not normalized to pervasive normalized development. The 
problems are a temporary phenomenon that can be overcome through 
active efforts. Some units are already making genuine efforts in 
this regard, and some conditions are gradually changing. 
Reportedly, the provincial border trade bureau is taking a hard 
look at companies commissioned to act as border trade agents to 
reduce their number from 8,000 to around 4,000. It has also 
decided on a one-year and a three-month training program for the 
rotational training within three years of all the trading 
company cadres in the province. By way of eliminating 
bottlenecks in Sino-Russian trade deliveries, the provincial 
border trade bureau may work with the railroad system in 
exercising uniform control over import and export shipments, and 
in coordinating planning to reduce pile-ups. Some companies are 
also preparing to set up joint transportation companies with the 
Russians. For example, the province's external investment group 
is discussing arrangements for a marine transportation company 
with the Russian Ministry of Foreign Trade's Cooperation Bureau. 
The investment group has submitted a ministerial level 
conference agenda for a Sino-Russian mixed commission, which has 
gained the serious attention and support of both the Chinese and 
Russian governments. It is being actively pursued. The banking 
and finance system is also considering the opening of settlement 
avenues, the Bank of China permitting use of the renminbi in 
making Sino-Russian border trade settlements. This would help 
narrow the Sino-Russian trade balance to the benefit of both 
parties. Some business are considering opening cooperative 
venture banks in Russia that use the currencies of both 
countries in settlements. Russia is also putting border 
procedures in order, normalizing the administration of licenses 
and procedures for examining and approving travel from Russia in 
an effort to expand areas of cooperation. Russian officials in 
China have proposed starting with Chinese and Russian products 
that complement each other, opening up unique areas of trade, 
and making an effort to win confidence in technical cooperation 
and improvement of merchandise quality. 
  Some experts warn that Sino-Russian trade is a long range 
matter in which it is necessary to proceed from realities, 
understand both parties' national circumstances and individual 
people's circumstances, economic development, and market needs. 
We must engage in trade in a steadfast and focused way, going 
from pure trade to economic and technical cooperation, 
resolutely overcoming deceptive and short-term behavior. Now is 
the time for all border trade enterprises to adjust to 
circumstances, readjust their orientation, and concentrate their 
entries on pervasive development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40100 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentator Hails China's New Civil Service </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0233A Hong Kong TZU-CHING [BAUHINIA MAGAZINE] in Chinese 
No 11, 5 Nov 93 pp 6-8 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0233A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TZU-CHING [BAUHINIA MAGAZINE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guest Commentator: "Another Important Step in </F>
Strengthening Reform -- Comments on the Implementation of a 
Civil Service System in China"] 
  [Text] Since 14 August 
1993, when the Chinese Government issued the "Temporary 
Regulations on a National Civil Service System," and decided to 
formally implement the system on 1 October 1993, the 
implementation of a civil service system in China has become a 
hot topic of public opinion overseas. Could the mainland civil 
service system really be implemented on schedule? Does the 
mainland have the fiscal ability to support the system? What are 
the special characteristics of the mainland civil service 
system? There are countless questions and discussions. This 
writer called on the relevant agencies responsible for 
implementing the civil service system in China to answer these 
questions. I will first lay out the views of the relevant 
authorities, in hopes of allowing our friends overseas to 
understand the strengths and weaknesses of the mainland's civil 
service system. 
  Deng Xiaopeng's speechmaking on his inspection tour of the 
South in 1992 opened a new page in the history of reform in the 
mainland. At the end of that year, the leadership of the Chinese 
Government discussed and passed in principle a draft proposal 
submitted by the Ministry of Personnel on the implementation of 
a civil service system. In 1993, the relevant agencies launched 
even more enthusiastic publicity to hasten the legislative 
process on a civil service system and finally pushed through the 
"Temporary Regulations on a National Civil Service System." When 
this regulation appeared in the headlines of the mass media, it 
indicated that the time was ripe for the implementation of a new 
personnel management system in national administrative organs 
and demonstrated that the mainland had increased the strength of 
the political system reform. 
  What is the significance of China implementing a civil 
service system? Perhaps its like the often heard saying "an 
outsider can see more clearly." The comments of some foreign 
analysts are quite insightful. One Western scholar says China is 
in the middle of a reform of basic systems. They understand that 
if the government does not reform the personnel system, it will 
not be possible to solidify the achievements of economic reform. 
How true this is. Chinese communist policy makers soberly 
recognize that to intensify the reform of the economic system, 
they must also proceed with corresponding reforms of the 
political system and must establish a scientific personnel 
management system. The implementation of a civil service system 
is an important "move." 
  Some friends worry that with fiscal difficulties in the 
mainland, the government will not be able to muster enough 
capital to raise salaries for civil servants. It is reassuring 
that the highest policy making regime in the mainland has made 
appropriate arrangements. According to disclosures, this 
salary increase for functionaries will be on a greater scale 
than any previous increase, to gradually correct the problem of 
relatively low wages for government workers. It was also decided 
that every agency and every area would begin calculating wages 
based on the new salary rates on 1 October 1993, regardless of 
when they complete the reform. 
<H5>  Eight Years of Exceptionally Difficult Work </H5>
  The cadre personnel system currently in use in the mainland 
began during the war years and developed gradually after 1949. 
Workers in party and government organs, enterprise management 
personnel, scientific and technical personnel, teachers, 
doctors, performers, and athletes were all called "national 
cadres" and were managed in the same way. This type of 
management method is well-suited to a highly centralized and 
unified planned economy and served a positive function in the 
past. With reform, however, in the economic system and in the 
fields of science and technology, education, and culture, the 
traditional personnel system is less and less suited to the new 
circumstances and its drawbacks are more and more serious. 
Mainly, the concept of "national cadre" is too broad and lacks 
scientific categorization. The delineation of management 
authority is too centralized, the management methods are 
antiquated and unvaried, and the personnel assignment system is 
not sound. As a result, talented individuals are not able to 
shine, and corrupt practices are difficult to avoid. As early as 
1980, Deng Xiaopeng, the chief architect of opening and reform, 
raised the issue of reforming the personnel system. He called 
for the "courageous breakdown of old conventions and of 
organization and personnel systems not suited to reform"; and 
the establishment of new systems for the election, admission by 
examination, appointment and removal, assessment, impeachment, 
rotation, tenure of office, administrative retirement, and 
retirement of cadres. In keeping with the arrangements made by 
the State Council, in 1984 the relevant agencies began drafting 
regulations on a national civil service system. In 1987, the 
13th National Party Congress of the Chinese Communist Party 
formally decided to implement a civil service system. In 1989, 
the "Temporary Regulations on a National Civil Service System" 
were circulated nationwide for comment. In early 1990, all 29 
provinces, autonomous regions, and directly ruled municipalities 
(with the exception of Taiwan) of the entire nation, 14 cities 
with individual plans, and 66 central government agencies 
submitted feedback to the Ministry of Personnel. At the 14th 
National Party Congress of the Chinese Communist Party in 
October 1992, Jiang Zemin called for the "earliest 
implementation of a national civil service system." After eight 
years, the "Temporary Regulations on a National Civil Service 
System" have finally emerged, fusing together the painstaking 
efforts of numerous people. 
  To test the feasibility of the "Temporary Regulations on a 
National Civil Service System" and to seek experience with the 
implementation of the civil service system, in early 1989, six 
organizations including the State Auditing Administration, the 
General Administration of Customs, the State Statistical Bureau, 
the National Environmental Protection Agency, the State Tax 
Bureau, and the State Administration of Building Materials were 
designated as pilot agencies for the new system. In 1990, 
Harbin, a city in the North and Shenzhen, one in the South, were 
also selected as pilot locations. During the past five years, 
the pilot locations have produced laudable results. The main 
indicators are: 
  Government organs have once again become a priority choice 
for people seeking employment. The civil service system hires 
personnel via public examinations for those seeking to enter 
government organs. Just this provision alone touches the hearts 
of young people in their prime. They are clearly aware that life 
in a government organ is spartan but they still list employment 
in a government organ as a priority choice. From 1989 to 1991, 
six government agencies under the State Council held three 
examinations to recruit staff to fill gaps in non-leadership 
positions. A total of 4,585 registered for the examinations to 
fill 401 positions. After a written examination, oral 
examination, physical examination, and assessment, 327 people 
were hired. The ratio of examination registrants to hirees was 
as high as 14.7 to 1. The layers of government are the nerve 
system of the nation. A nerve system must be of top quality in 
order for the nation it leads to have top quality administrative 
efficiency, top quality economic benefits and top quality labor 
productivity. 
  The system also promotes the development of honest 
government 
in government organs. Certain policy errors committed in the 
past by government organs were, no doubt, related to the 
thinking and work style of officials, but the organization 
system and work system were also important factors. The hiring 
system for civil servants can overcome unhealthy practices in 
personnel assignments. The systems of assessment, discipline, 
and rewards and penalties can inspire cadres to actively seek 
self-improvement. The anti-nepotism system can avoid the 
detrimental effects of family relationships and interpersonal 
relationships. The top leadership at the State Statistical 
Bureau led the way on eliminating nepotism in work assignments 
and transferred relatives of two of the Bureau's Assistant 
Directors out of the Bureau. The customs system implemented 
anti-nepotism in official duties. When workers are carrying out 
official duties which involve a relative, they must voluntarily 
explain and practice avoidance. The National Environmental 
Protection Agency had planned to add 30 personnel before 
entering the pilot program. As soon as the word was out, the 
officials in charge received over 200 letters seeking favors on 
behalf of others, thus creating much difficulty for this effort. 
In 1989 and 1990 this agency held two public examinations to 
recruit personnel and not a single person asked for favors. 
  The system enhanced the vigor of the cadre ranks. In 
carrying 
out the civil service system, the pilot units and pilot cities 
broke through the long-standing practice of cadres winning 
promotion but never demotion and entering but never exiting the 
system. Within their authorized hiring limitations, the six 
pilot agencies chose a total of over 300 superior individuals. 
Among these, most were from enterprise and commercial units. Due 
to the intense competition, the newly hired personnel usually 
have superior political and substantive qualifications and the 
distribution of ages and fields of expertise are also more 
reasonable. After being hired, they quickly fill positions and 
quite a few have become key workers. In keeping with the 
regulations in the civil service system on promotion and 
demotion, the pilot units promoted superior civil servants and 
demoted, relieved of duties, dismissed or transferred out the 
small minority of civil servants who did not perform well. 
Because there is a law, references, and procedures, promotion 
and demotion is all done smoothly. Everyone feels that there is 
a future and value in working in a government organization but 
they also feel the pressure where "public meals are not that 
easy to eat." The mainland's civil service system, is not only 
developed out of China's national characteristics as a bold new 
creation, but also borrows from advantageous methods used by 
foreign nation's personnel management systems, which reflect 
modern personnel management patterns. It really is a system 
which is suited for the socialist market economy system and will 
gradually develop into a scientific, legalized system of 
government organization personnel management. Its main 
characteristics are: 
  One is that it reflects the principle of differentiated 
management. The national civil service system is primarily used 
in government organizations and is different from the personnel 
management system used in enterprise and commercial units. This 
is a change from the previous method of using a single model for 
management. 
  Two is that it includes scientific mechanisms for 
encouraging 
competition. The hiring method for functionaries uses public 
examinations, with strict testing and hiring of only the best 
candidates. The system uses procedures prescribed by the law to 
assess civil servants and to use the assessment results as the 
primary basis for awards and penalties, promotions and demotions. 
  Three is that it includes mechanisms for normal turnover of 
employees. These include normal retirement, exchanges, 
appointments, maximum age limits on tenure of office, 
resignations, and relief of duties. Civil servants can enter and 
leave the system and the civil service ranks will remain full of 
vitality. 
  Four is that it has mechanisms for guaranteeing diligent and 
honest government. Diligent and honest government is a 
fundamental requirement for civil servants and is a constant 
thread in a civil service's obligations and rights, discipline, 
hiring, promotions, assessments awards and penalties and other 
systems and stages. At the same time there are nepotism and 
other specific regulations which also promote honesty and 
self-discipline in civil servants. 
  Five is that it is a complete system of laws and 
regulations. 
The "Temporary Regulations on a National Civil Service System" 
is the general law on the civil service system. The Ministry of 
Personnel and other agencies under the State Council have 
already, or are in the process of, formulating individual laws 
and regulations and implementation rules to form a more complete 
system of laws and regulations and provide a legal basis for 
civil service management. Some overseas friends mistakenly 
believe that the civil service system which China is now 
implementing is similar to the civil service system in western 
countries. Actually this is a great misunderstanding. The 
mainland's civil service system adheres firmly to that which 
suits China's national characteristics and China's special 
style. It continues and carries forward well the Chinese 
government's experience and tradition of effective cadre 
management, and it has basic differences with the West's civil 
service system. A contrast of the similarities between the 
Chinese and foreign civil service systems can best explain the 
issue. The laws and regulations in England and the United States 
on the promotion of civil servants are closely linked to work 
quality, quantity and ability. The regulations in the mainland's 
"Temporary Regulations on a National Civil Service System" not 
only include the above elements but also adhere to specific 
requirements for individuals to have both ability and integrity 
and that people be appointed on their merits. 
  Now, China has the "Temporary Regulations on a National 
Civil 
Service System" which suits China's national situation, five 
years of pilot project experience, and many individual systems 
which are practical, clearly focused, and very operable (such as 
hiring by examination, anti-nepotism, and others which are 
already in use throughout the nation). There is a group of 
backbone elements from the top to the bottom. It is especially 
true that with the support of the highest leadership of the 
Chinese Government and of the masses of the mainland, the 
implementation of the civil service system in the mainland had 
several advantageous conditions. Thus, one can believe that from 
1 October 1993, with organization reform as a foundation, in 
three years or a little more time, the civil service system will 
be basically established in the entire country, and later it 
will gradually be perfected. This clearly can be accomplished. 
  In his speech during his inspection tour of the South in the 
Spring of 1992, Deng Xiaopeng said "Whether China's affairs will 
be handled well, whether socialist reform and opening up can be 
maintained, whether the economy can be developed quickly, and 
whether the nation can live for a long time in peace, in a 
certain sense the key is people." The implementation of a civil 
service system in China has grasped this key concept at a 
fundamental level. The strengthening of this reform action has 
important practical and historical significance in the 
establishment of socialism with Chinese characteristics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40101 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Adjusts Tobacco Policy, Prices </TI></H3>
<H4>   Commission Proposes Policy </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0204A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] in 
Chinese No 10, Oct 93 pp 42-43 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0204A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report: "Plan Put Forth by the State Economics and Trade </F>
Commission for Implementing the Adjusted Economic Policy on 
Tobacco"] 
  [Text] In line with the demands of the "State Council 
Circular on Further Tightening the Monopoly Control Over 
Tobacco" (State Document No 7 [1993]), the State Economics and 
Trade Commission conducted a factfinding study in conjunction 
with departments, such as the State Planning Commission 
(including the former State Pricing Bureau), the Ministry of 
Finance, the State Administration of Taxation, the State 
Technology Supervision Administration, and the State Tobacco 
Monopoly Bureau, in the six provinces of Yunnan, Guizhou, Hunan, 
Shandong, Fujian, and Henan on the matters of how to effectively 
control the unchecked tobacco-production momentum and adjust 
economic policy on tobacco, putting forth a plan for 
implementing the adjusted economic policy on tobacco, the 
specific substance of which is as follows: 
<H5>  I. The Principles of the Adjusted Economic Policy on Tobacco </H5>
  The adjusted economic policy on tobacco will be suited to 
our 
socialist market economy development, by giving consideration to 
the interests of the three parties of tobacco farmers, local 
governments, and tobacco enterprises, in order to ensure that 
the real income of peasants for a normal harvest year does not 
drop, and to essentially maintain the existing tobacco-product 
tax level, while basically not raising cigarette-enterprise 
production costs. 
<H5>  II. Strict Control of Tobacco Production </H5>
  To control unchecked tobacco production, all provinces and 
autonomous regions, when purchasing tobacco, will 
conscientiously implement the provisions in the State Council 
National Document No 7 (1993) on "all taxes on tobacco exceeding 
state planned procurement being paid into Central revenues, and 
the purchasing prices of tobacco sold to the state that exceeds 
plans or is unplanned floating downward 20 percent," with taxes 
on all tobacco that exceeds state-assigned annual procurement 
plans being calculated according to the average tax per dan (50 
kg) of flue-cured tobacco for the year in the province 
(autonomous region), and paid into Central revenues. When 
arranging particular procurement plans, we will implement the 
principle of supporting excellence, in order to gradually cut 
back on the area planted to tobacco that is not suited to 
tobacco cultivation. 
<H5>  III. Adjusted Tobacco Procurement Prices </H5>
  As flue-cured tobacco standards are now in a stage of 
transition from 15 to 40 grades and, in line with the principles 
of market demand and price based on quality, tobacco procurement 
prices are correspondingly adjusted to the two separate 
flue-cured tobacco standards of 15 and 40 grades (See 
attachments 1 and 2). The former state-set tobacco production 
support charge will be incorporated into the tobacco procurement 
price. 
<H5>  IV. The Adjusted Tobacco Product Tax Rate </H5>
  The tobacco-product tax rate is based on the adjusted 
tobacco-procurement price, being lowered from 38 percent to 31 
percent in line with the principle of essentially maintaining 
the current tobacco-tax level. The Ministry of Finance and the 
State Administration of Taxation will draw up the particular 
regulations on the adjustment of taxpayment links. 
<H5>  V. Deregulated Tobacco Allocation Prices </H5>
  In line with the needs of establishing a socialist market 
economy and based on our current realities, we are deregulating 
tobacco-allocation prices. The specific means of application 
will be drawn up by the pertinent commercial department of the 
State Tobacco Monopoly Bureau. 
  These regulations will take effect for 1993's new tobacco 
listings, with white-rib tobacco, perfume tobacco, and sun-cured 
tobacco implementing the adjusted plan for flue-cured tobacco. 
As Guangdong, Guangxi, Fujian, and Jiangxi province (autonomous 
region) tobacco is in the latter stage of procurement, the 
respective provincial (autonomous regional) People's Governments 
will decide whether these provinces (autonomous region) will 
implement in 1993 the new flue-cured tobacco procurement prices 
and tobacco product tax rate. 
<H5>  Appendix 1 </H5>


1993 Procurement Prices for 40-Grade Flue-Cured Tobacco 

Grade        Code       Price        Grade            Code       Price 
             Name       (Yuan Per                     Name       (Yuan Per 
                        Dan)                                     Dan) 

Medium       CIF        340.00       Top Red 2        B2R        130.00 
Orange 1 

Medium       C2F        285.00       Top Red 3        B3R        90.00 
Orange 2 

Medium       C3F        225.00       Full Cured 2     H2F        170.00 
Orange 3 

Medium       C1L        300.00       Low Light        X2V        110.00 
Lemon 1                              Green 2 

Medium       C2L        240.00       Medium Light     C3V        170.00 
Lemon 2                              Green 3 

Top Orange   B1F        280.00       Top Light        B2V        130.00 
1                                    Green 2 

Top Orange   B2F        220.00       Top Light        B3V        100.00 
2                                    Green 3 

Top Lemon    B1L        200.00       Smooth 1         S1         100.00 
1 

Top Red 1    B1R        180.00       Top Lemon 4      B4L        60.00 

Full Cured   H1F        230.00       Low Lemon 3      X3L        95.00 
1 

Low Orange   X1F        200.00       Low Lemon 4      X4L        60.00 
1 

Medium       C3L        180.00       Low Orange 4     X4F        70.00 
Lemon 3 

Low Orange   X2F        160.00       Smooth 2         S2         60.00 
2 

Low Orange   X3F        120.00       Medium-Low       CX1K       80.00 
3                                    Mixed 1 

Low Lemon    X1L        165.00       Medium-Low       CX2K       50.00 
1                                    Mixed 2 

Low Lemon    X2L        130.00       Top Mixed 1      B1K        85.00 
2 

Top Orange   B3F        150.00       Top Mixed 2      B2K        60.00 
3 

Top Orange   B4F        100.00       Green Yellow 1   GY1        50.00 
4 

Top Lemon    B2L        130.00       Top Mixed 3      B3K        40.00 
2 

Top Lemon    B3L        90.00        Green Yellow 2   GY2        20.00 
3 


<H5>  Appendix 2 </H5>

----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1993 Procurement Prices for 15-Grade Flue-Cured Tobacco                    | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grade             |Price (Yuan Per D-|Grade             |Price (Yuan Per D-| 
|                  |an)               |                  |an)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 1          |310.00            |Top 3             |110.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 2          |260.00            |Top 4             |60.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 3          |190.00            |Top 5             |20.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 4          |130.00            |Green 1           |60.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 5          |65.00             |Green 2           |20.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 6          |35.00             |Green 3           |8.00              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Top 1             |230.00            |End Grade         |5.00              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Top 2             |165.00            |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40102 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Adjusts Tobacco Policy, Prices </TI></H3>
<H4>   Notice on Procurement Prices </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0204B Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] in 
Chinese No 10, Oct 93 p 44 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0204B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report: "Circular Issued by State Tobacco Monopoly Bureau, </F>
State Planning Commission on Perfume Tobacco and White-Rib 
Tobacco Procurement Prices"] 
  [Text] To adapt to socialist market economy development, 
deal well with the relations among the interests of tobacco 
farmers, local governments, and tobacco enterprises, and tighten 
macroeconomic regulation and control over tobacco production, 
and based on the plan for implementing the economic policy on 
tobacco, the State Tobacco Monopoly Bureau and the State 
Planning Commission issued a joint document on 12 August 1993 to 
the Zhejiang, Hubei, and Sichuan province Pricing Bureaus and 
Tobacco Monopoly Bureaus, giving the following notifications on 
perfume tobacco and white-rib tobacco procurement prices and 
related matters: 
  1. This procurement-price adjustment merely incorporates the 
state-set tobacco-production support charge into the procurement 
price and, premised on overall price levels remaining 
essentially unchanged and based on the principle of price based 
on quality, appropriately adjusts the price differences among 
grades (See attachments 1 and 2). Perfume tobacco is adjusted 
in price from the average per 50 kg of 222.11 yuan (not 
including the production-support charge) to 245.18 yuan 
(incorporating the production-support charge into the 
procurement price), for an increase of 10.39 percent; and 
white-rib tobacco is adjusted in price from the average per 50 
kg of 114.38 yuan (not including the production-support charge) 
to 132.43 yuan (with the production-support charge being 
incorporated into the procurement price), for an increase of 
15.78 percent. 
  2. The State Tobacco Monopoly Bureau will issue a separate 
circular on the benchmark prices for perfume and white-rib 
tobacco allocation. 
  3. These perfume and white-rib tobacco procurement prices 
will take effect the day on which this document is issued, with 
Farm Price Document No 166 (1990) issued by the former State 
Pricing Bureau and the State Tobacco Monopoly Bureau being 
annuled at the same time. 
<H5>  Appendix 1 </H5>

----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1993 White-Rib Tobacco Procurement Price List                              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grade             |Price (Yuan Per D-|Grade             |Price (Yuan Per D-| 
|                  |an)               |                  |an)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 1          |255.00            |Top 1             |190.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 2          |210.00            |Top 2             |140.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 3          |160.00            |Top 3             |100.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 4          |120.00            |Top 4             |55.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 5          |65.00             |Top 5             |30.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Medium 6          |40.00             |End Grade         |15.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  Appendix 2 </H5>

----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1993 Perfume Tobacco Procurement Price List                                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grade             |Price (Yuan Per D-|Grade             |Price (Yuan Per D-| 
|                  |an)               |                  |an)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grade 1           |434.00            |Grade 4           |132.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grade 2           |364.00            |End Grade         |25.00             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Grade 3           |270.00            |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40103 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Henan Team Surveys Peasants on Markets </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0218A Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 9 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0218A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Comprehensive news report by Zhang Yunqing (1728 0061 </F>
7230), Yang Guanjin (2799 0385 6511), and Liu Linglan (0491 7227 
5695): "What Do Peasants Think About When They First Enter the 
Market?"] 
  [Text] Centering on the special topic "Characteristics of 
Peasants' Attitude and Behavior on First Entering the Market," 
the Henan Provincial Rural Socioeconomic Survey Team, a few days 
ago, in the form of a written questionnaire, conducted a special 
survey of 1,200 peasants in 41 counties. The targets of the 
survey were either heads of households or the persons who decide 
family economic behavior, and among them 67.6 percent had a 
junior middle school education or higher. The results of the 
final collection and summing up reflected the typical attitudes 
and real opinions of these peasant households after they first 
entered the market. 
  When asked for their attitude to the putting into practice 
of 
the market economy in the rural areas, 67.8 percent of the 
peasants approved, but 35 percent took an indifferent attitude, 
the main reason being because they didn't know what the market 
economy was and also did not know, in the final analysis, what 
economic system would be most advantageous for them; 34 percent 
of the peasants thought that it was a matter of indifference 
whether or not contract orders were placed for grain, cotton, 
and edible oil, because contracts only had a binding force on 
the peasants; 26.1 percent of the peasants thought that it was a 
matter of indifference whether or not the purchasing prices of 
grain, cotton, and edible oil were released or not, because the 
existing market prices are very little different from the 
state's fixed purchasing prices, and in any case both are fairly 
low. 
  With regard to the main ways that peasants now get 
information on production and management, the survey (multiple 
choice) showed: In first place was television (74.3 percent), 
next came radio (60.7 percent), and in third place was 
information passed on by relatives and friends (38.4 percent); 
the rest in descending order were newspapers (27.7 percent), 
rumors (21.9 percent), wired broadcasting (20.7 percent), 
meetings (11.5 percent), and local information service 
organizations accounted for only 3.6 percent. 
  This year was the first one in which Henan Province 
completely abolished the command-type planting plan, so on what 
arrangements for production did the peasants depend? In the 
course of the survey, 29 percent of the peasants estimated what 
agricultural products after being harvested would sell well and 
then, reckoning up the prices, planted them; 28 percent of the 
peasants arranged their planting according to the market 
quotations before sowing and the market quotations in the 
previous year; 20.5 percent of the peasants planted by habit; 
19.1 percent of the peasants followed the mainstream by planting 
what they saw other peasants planting; and only 2.3 percent of 
the peasants planted in accordance with the contracts they had 
signed with the relevant departments. 
  Among the "vexations" reported by the surveyed peasants in 
chief place was that there were many witholdings and 
apportionments, which made their burdens heavy and hard to bear 
(81.8 percent); next was that the agricultural funds market was 
disorderly, with false goods being sold and prices being raised 
arbitrarily (80 percent); in third place was that public order 
was bad (68.1 percent); in fourth place was a lack of 
information, with the peasants not knowing what to plant and 
what to do to make money (65.9 percent); and in fifth place was 
that it was thought that rural cadres took wages and subsidies, 
but provided the peasansts with few services (50.5 percent). 
  With regard to the peasants' expectations for government, 
the 
survey results showed that 90.1 percent of the peasants strongly 
demanded that the government crack down severely on enterprises 
and individuals that manufacture and sell fake, false, bogus, or 
inferior pesticides and chemical fertilizers; 80.2 percent of 
the peasants hoped for stable policy that would let the peasants 
"take a pill that sets the mind at ease"; 66.7 percent of the 
peasants hoped that technicians would be enlisted to go into the 
countryside and popularize advanced techniques in agricultural 
production; 56 percent of the peasants hoped that there would be 
a severe crackdown on crime and that public order would be 
maintained in the rural areas; and 49.9 percent of the peasants 
hoped that a feasible measure would be formulated to prevent 
bedrock low prices from harming the peasants and soaring 
agricultural funds from harming agiculture. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40104 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Reports Soybean Area, Prices </TI></H3>
<H4>   Soybean Area </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0257I Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 25 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257I </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 the soybean area in Heilongjiang 
Province exceeded 40 million mu. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40105 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Reports Soybean Area, Prices </TI></H3>
<H4>   Soybean Prices </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0257J Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO in Chinese 9 Dec 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0257J </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] The market price of high quality soybeans in 
Heilongjiang has increased from 1,500 yuan per ton in October to 
1,600 yuan per ton at present. The price of red beans has 
increased from 4,600 yuan per ton to 4,800 yuan per ton. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40106 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangsu Rice Procurement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0181U Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO in Chinese 25 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0181U </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] As of 21 November, Jiangsu Province had procured 
665 million kilograms of rice, fulfilling 24.3 percent of the 
task, and was a decline of 800 million kilograms procured during 
the same period in 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40107 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangxi Farmer Income in 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257K Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 17 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257K </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] According to a survey of 29 counties and cities 
in Jiangxi Province, the per capita net income of farmers in 
1993 was 870 yuan, an increase of 102 yuan, or 13.3 percent over 
1992. Deducting price increases, the actual increase was 4.6 
percent. The major reason for the increase was a reduction in 
peasant burdens. In March, Jiangxi redeemed over 300 million 
yuan in IOUs from farmers. 
  In addition, cotton, oil crop, silkworm, tobacco, and fruit 
output increased 5.1 percent, 4.2 percent, 10.4 percent, 29 
percent, and 20 pecent respectively over 1992. 
  Town and township enterprises also quickly developed. In 
1993 the gross output value of rural enterprises was 57.9 
billion yuan, a 92.2 percent increase over 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40108 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Exports Rice to Japan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257F Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO in Chinese 20 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257F </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] On 15 January, Liaoning Province shipped 3,700 
tons of rice to Japan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40109 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar009___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-009 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Reports Late Autumn Crop Area </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257H Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 3 Jan 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0257H </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] The late autumn grain area in Sichuan Province 
will be 46,360,000 mu, a decline of 420,000 mu from 1993; the 
wheat area will be 34,280,000 mu, a decline of 640,000 mu, and 
the area sown to improved varieties of wheat will be 31,500,000 
mu, accounting for 91.8 percent of the total area. The cash 
crop area will be 13,140,000 mu; and the rape area will be 
12,060,000 mu, an increase of 1,452,000 mu, or 13.7 percent over 
1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40110 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<F P=101> GENERAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   UN Security Council Reform, Membership Discussed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0096A Shanghai GUOJI ZHANWANG [WORLD OUTLOOK] in Chinese 
No 235, 8 Oct 93 pp 9-11 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0096A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai GUOJI ZHANWANG [WORLD OUTLOOK] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Commentary by Yu Wen: "On Questions of Security Council </F>
Reform"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] Some people have 
stressed that the Security Council must increase transparency in 
making policy decisions and become highly democratic in 
determining the procedure for the discussion of official 
businesses. They believe that the Security Council should regard 
the common interests of the UN members as its goal instead of 
regarding the concept on value of some large nations and their 
political interests as the basis to make policy decisions. In 
addition, such policy decisions are often made quietly in the 
form of making deals. It is difficult for the ordinary member 
countries to understand the whole procedure in making policy 
decisions, let alone joining with others in making such 
decisions. They urge the international community to earnestly 
formulate a set of strict standards and the proper procedure for 
the Security Council to change this kind of irrational 
phenomenon at present. 
<H5>  On Organizationally Expanding Security Council </H5>
  The voices for organizationally expanding the Security 
Council are becoming louder and louder in each passing day. 
These voices are mainly coming from the following sources: 
  1) Japan and Germany long to become permanent members of the 
UN Security Council. They believe that the provisions on enemy 
countries in the UN Charter with the World War II defeated 
nations as the targets have already become "obsolete" and 
something of the past, and should be abolished. In addition, 
Japan and Germany have already become members of the United 
Nations in 1956 and 1973 respectively. They have said that their 
economic strengths are incompatible with their international 
political status. They belong to the group of UN members who pay 
the highest membership fees (Japan accounts for 12.45 percent of 
the UN funds, next only to the U.S. share of 25 percent; Germany 
makes up 8.93 percent). On the one hand, they have been asked to 
shoulder more international responsibilities; while on the other 
hand, they are excluded from the ranks of permanent security 
council members. It is necessary to resolve the contradiction 
between their bound duties and their rights. They believe that 
they are capable of participating in the management of world 
affairs and have the responsibility to do so. 
  2) The developing nations seek to have more say in UN 
matters. However, there are no African or Latin American nations 
that are permanent Security Council members. For example, 
Indonesian President Suharto, Chairman of the Non-Aligned 
Movement, proposed to add six more permanent council members. In 
addition to Japan and Germany, the other four seats should be 
given to developing nations. He suggested that the two large 
populated Asian nations India and Indonesia be given one seat 
each, while the largest nations in Africa and Latin America one 
seat each. 
  3) Some regional large nations complain that they have not 
enjoyed the due rights to speak in the Security Council in 
solving regional disputes. They seek to become permanent members 
of the Security Council. 
  4) Many countries believe that the current distribution of 
the seats of the Security Council was determined by the balance 
of the international power when the United Nations was first 
founded. However, right now tremendous changes have taken place 
in international relations, and the regional distribution of the 
Security Council member states seems to be unfair. They demand 
that the existing structure of the Security Council be changed. 
  Due to the fact that the Security Council has the power to 
pass any resolution of a compulsory nature, which all UN member 
states are obliged to accept and implement, a nation which is a 
Security Council member of the United Nations, particularly a 
permanent council member, enjoys great power in handling 
international affairs. Therefore, the competition to become a 
member, particularly a permanent member, of the Security Council 
is naturally fierce. Here, we have several issues that we must 
first take into consideration and discuss. 
  1) In dealing with an organization such as the Security 
Council, which assumes the primary responsibility in maintaining 
international peace and security, what kind of scale is most 
appropriate. If the scale is too small, it will lack 
comprehensive representation. If the scale is too large, it 
would be difficult for the Security Council to take actions 
effectively. Here there is an issue of scale. It looks like the 
expansion should not be too large. 
  2) If it is necessary to increase the number of the 
permanent 
members of the Security Council, the economic strengths of the 
candidates should be regarded as a major factor in selecting 
successful candidates. Some people have proposed that those 
nations which make the largest economic contribution to the 
United Nations and support UN actions most vigorously in 
maintaining peace should be selected. Others stressed the need 
to impartially choose the successful candidates from different 
regions. It is essential to fully discuss and deliberate on this 
issue beforehand. 
  3) Due to the fact that a permanent member of the Security 
Council has the veto power, the discussion of the issue on the 
increase of the number of permanent Security Council members 
will inevitably involve the veto power. Therefore, this issue 
must be considered with the veto power in mind. Some people even 
propose to add "semi-permanent council members" in order to work 
around the issue of veto power. 
<H3>  Issue of Veto Power on Principle of Unanimity Among Major 
Powers </H3>
  In accordance with the provisions of the UN Charter on the 
voting procedure, votes of approval from nine council members 
are needed to pass any resolution concerning procedural matters, 
while votes of approval from nine council members including all 
permanent council members are needed to pass any resolution 
concerning non-procedural matters. That means to say that the 
vote of disapproval from any permanent council member would veto 
any resolution concerning non-procedural matter in the Security 
Council. That is referred to as veto power on the principle of 
unanimity among major powers. 
  Amid the calls for reforming the Security Council, many 
people raise objections on the issue of veto power. Some people 
have said that veto power has become the "privilege of large 
nations." This runs counter to a passage in the UN Preface that 
"various nations, large and small, enjoy equal rights" and the 
principle of "all member states being equal" in its Article Two. 
Other people have said that all nations, large or small, rich or 
poor, should be able to discuss and make decisions on major 
world affairs on an equal basis. Large nations should not enjoy 
any special privilege. Still others have said that the current 
situation is different from the situation at the time when the 
United Nations was first founded and five major powers were 
given special status. These people believe that the five major 
powers should not enjoy veto power. Other people have also said 
that in view of the fact that veto power has often been abused 
by some major powers, the use of veto power should be abolished 
or at least restricted. 
  We believe that we must carefully study the principle of 
unanimity among major powers from an historical point of view. 
When the United Nations was first founded, various nations had 
studied, and drew lessons from the experience of the League of 
Nations. Due to a provision of the League of Nations, votes of 
approval from all member states attending any session were 
needed to adopt any League or administrative resolution. It 
meant that all member states of the League of Nations enjoyed 
the veto power in general. As a result, the League of Nations 
could hardly achieve anything effectively. Therefore, the United 
Nations only gave five major powers the right to cast veto so 
that the United Nations could assume its due responsibilities, 
play its role effectively, and avoid taking the same disastrous 
road followed by the League of Nations. On the other hand, it 
cannot be denied that the major powers enjoy the right to cast 
veto in order to protect their own interests. Therefore, the 
principle of unanimity among major powers is built on the basis 
of helping the United Nations operate effectively and of 
safeguarding the interests of the large nations. This principle 
has dual characteristics. It has a positive side as well as a 
negative side. 
  From the point of view of the positive side, the granting of 
the veto power to major powers not only represents a privilege, 
but also enjoins them to fulfill a task to maintain 
international peace and security. The veto power may spur major 
powers to strengthen negotiations and cooperation, and help the 
Security Council play its role even more effectively. Meanwhile 
the veto acts as a restraining force on some major powers which 
act wildly to trample upon the UN Charter. Nations vary in 
economic and military strengths, population and strategic 
positions. Therefore, their influences on the world affairs are 
also different. The United Nations cannot play its role very 
well, if major powers are not asked to assume some special 
responsibilities, consult with one another and reach unanimity 
in handling world affairs on the basis of the purpose and 
principle of the UN Charter, and if they are not given the veto 
power to restrain each other. Let us review the history. In July 
1987, the five Security Council member states adopted, after 
consulting with one another, the No. 598 Resolution, calling for 
a cease-fire between Iraq and Iran. That was the first time for 
scores of years that the five mayor powers had reached unanimity 
on a major issue of war and peace. After this, the Security 
Council had played an unique role in helping Namibia become 
independent, tackling the Cambodian issue and settling regional 
conflicts. During the Gulf crisis, the Security Council had 
adopted 12 resolutions, effectively stopping Iraqi activities of 
aggression. 
  From the point of view of the negative side, some major 
powers abuse the veto power for their own interests. The veto 
power was used 279 times from 1946 to May 1990 at the Security 
Council. On many occasions, it was abused. During the period of 
the cold war between the United States and the Soviet Union, 
both sides worked hard to oppose each other in many incidents, 
seriously weakening the role of the Security Council. Right now, 
the world has entered a new stage with the new structure 
replacing the old one. Although the confrontation between the 
two sides has ended, hegemonism and power politics still exist, 
and factors for the abuse of veto power have not disappeared. 
  It seems that the abolition of veto power is not the best 
choice. To deny the special role and responsibilities of the 
major powers is unrealistic. Veto power can be abused, but it 
can also be used to maintain world peace and security. The 
question is how to give full play to its positive aspect, while 
suppressing its negative aspect. 
  Opinions vary on the use of veto power right now. Some 
people 
propose to keep veto power, while others advocate its abolition. 
Still others believe that the use of veto power should be 
restricted. For example, veto power cannot be used on some 
issues (such as the admission of new member states). Some people 
believe that the power of the UN General Assembly should be 
expanded. For example, when a major power vetoes a resolution, 
such a veto can be overruled if the majority of member states 
vote against this veto at the UN General Assembly. This issue 
should be handled prudently. 
<H5>  Principle To Be Followed in Carrying Out Reform </H5>
  The success or failure of the reform program hinges on 
correct orientation. In carrying out reform, we must take the 
purpose and principle of the UN Charter as guidance. The reform 
program should be conducive to the peaceful settlement of 
international conflicts and to achieving economic balance and 
development of the various countries throughout the world. 
  In carrying out reform, it is essential to have a clear-cut 
objective. The reform is aimed at further improving the 
efficiency of the Security Council, increasing its abilities to 
act, and helping it fulfill the task entrusted it by the UN 
Charter without affecting the council's role and efficacy and 
damaging the existing effective mechanism. 
  In carrying out reform, we must implement the principle of 
promoting democracy, justice, objective rationality and 
effectiveness in a balanced way. The reform of the Security 
Council involves the interests of various nations, regions and 
groups. Efforts must be made to coordinate the stand of the 
large nations with that of the medium and small countries, and 
the stand of the developed nations with that of the developing 
countries. We must carry out reform after extensively 
soliciting views from all quarters, and carrying out overall 
negotiations. The reform program must be generally approved by a 
large number of member states. A few nations should not have the 
final say on world affairs. As for the number of additional 
members of the Security Council, it is necessary to take into 
consideration the principle of regional distribution and 
impartiality. 
  Reforming the Security Council involves amending the UN 
Charter. However, there is a legal procedure for amending the UN 
Charter. To amend the UN Charter, we must pass a resolution at 
the UN General Assembly and go through a General Conference 
specially held for this purpose. Article 108 of the UN Charter 
stipulates: "Amendments to the present Charter shall come into 
force for all Members of the United Nations when they have been 
adopted by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the General 
Assembly and ratified in accordance with their respective 
constitutional processes by two-thirds of the Members of the 
United Nations, including all the permanent members of the 
Security Council." Article 109 stipulates: "A General Conference 
of the Members of the United Nations may be held for the purpose 
of reviewing the present charter." It also points out that "Any 
alteration of the present Charter recommended by a two-thirds 
vote of the conference with their respective constitutional 
processes by two-thirds of the Members of the United Nations 
including all the permanent members of the Security Council." 
From this it can be seen that no matter whether the alteration 
is examined by the General Assembly or the General Conference, 
it must win votes from two-thirds of the members of the United 
Nations, including all the permanent members of the Security 
Council. Therefore, it is extremely important to strengthen 
negotiations among all member states and help all members of the 
Security Council reach unanimity. 
  To sum up, the reform of the Security Council involves the 
interests of various nations and the amendment of the UN 
Character. It is essential to extensively solicit the views of 
all the countries, discuss all issues fully and carry out 
negotiations. It will be a long process. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40111 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further Installments of Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs </TI></H3>
<H4>   (Xu Jiatun's Memoirs (Part 47, 48, 49) </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0072A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 20 Jun 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0072A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 47, 48, and 49 of the serialized article by </F>
Xu Jiatun: "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] 3. Forming the Consultative Committee (part 2 
of 2): Chen Chih-hui [7115 1807 6540], Tseng En-bo [2582 1869 
3134], and Pu Shao-fu [0592 1421 1133] Did Not Respond; An Zijie 
[1344 1311 0094] Objected To Putting Chen Yao-cai [7115 5069 
2088] on the Committee 
  We should consider soliciting the opinions of Taiwanese 
forces in Hong Kong. Back then, the Taiwanese Government's 
attitude toward the mainland was still very inflexible, and they 
were against the Sino-British negotiations over the Hong Kong 
question. After the Sino-British Joint Declaration was made 
public, the Taiwanese Government also issued its own declaration 
saying that they reserved the right to enter into negotiations 
in the future to take back Hong Kong. But it was unclear whether 
they would stay in Hong Kong or leave after 1997; it was all 
very confusing. To ease Taiwan's concern and win their support 
in drafting and promulgating the Basic Law and influence their 
view on the principle of "one country, two systems," we had to 
find ways to enlist the participation of the influential among 
them. Even if they were not willing to participate out of 
personal concern, or perhaps the Taiwanese Government was 
unwilling to let them participate, we should still be able to 
make public our united stand for the sake of the country. I 
therefore openly named three people, indicating that they were 
welcome to participate: The first was the de facto 
representative of the Taiwanese Government in Hong Kong and 
secretary of the KMT's Hong Kong-Macao headquarters, Chen 
Chih-hui; another was Tseng En-bo, chairman of the board of Hong 
Kong's SHI PAO; the third was Taiwan Legislative Yuan member Po 
Shao-fu. Of the three, Po was more open-minded and had a more 
populist stand and was considered the most likely to attend, and 
therefore his name headed the list. But at the end, none 
responded. Later, Po Shao-fu published an article in the 
newspaper entitled, "Thank You, Xu Jiatun," in which he gave a 
friendly response. We subsequently selected three replacements 
who also had close ties with Taiwan to join the Consultative 
Committee. 
  With regard to the "Fei-Shi incident" ["flying rock 
incident"] -- the incident involving Liu Chien-shi [0491 0578 
4258], I was probably being too extreme. Liu was head of the 
Hong Kong Christian Industrial Council and leader of Hong Kong's 
intermediary unions. Back then, it was thought that he had 
political background and that certain forces were trying to use 
him to start a Polish-style solidarist union in Hong Kong and 
turn him into a Walesa-like personality. Many Hong Kong 
industrialists and entrepreneurs regarded Liu as an adversary. 
In labor wage disputes, his union often asked for unrealistic 
raises, making the terms unacceptable for the owners. Based on 
my unwillingness to give him even more publicity, I disagreed 
with the "leftist" union's -- the Federation of Trade Union 
[FTU]--idea of putting Liu Chien-shi on the Consultative 
Committee. Since the FTU had already made some public 
announcement, my decision caused them to openly break their 
promises, causing them trouble, which made the 
middle-of-the-road and leftist unions unhappy and brought 
unfavorable public response. Facts proved that the FTU was 
right and my rejecting Liu Chien-shi only made him even more 
popular, contrary to what I had wanted. Moreover, even people 
with background have friends; they too must work. 
  After the Consultative Committee list was approved by the 
Hong Kong Basic Law Drafting Committee, An Zijie suggested 
adding several foreign personages in financial and business 
circles to serve as consultants. The several vice chairmen had 
no objection, but to balance things, I suggested adding Chen 
Yao-cai, retired veteran labor leader from the "leftist" "FTU." 
An Zijie objected immediately and was very adamant about it, 
which was very unexpected. The several vice chairmen at the 
scene were stunned and quite embarrassed. Not wanting to make 
things difficult for everybody, I did not pursue the matter. 
  When preparing for the Consultative Committee, there was an 
incident involving the election of the executive committee 
members, chairman, and vice chairman which Hong Kong media 
described as "storm in a teacup." The election was held at the 
downtown Lane Crawford Building. The building was one of Mr. Pao 
Yu-kang's [0545 3768 3068] properties after his purchase of 
"Wheelock." He himself offered to turn over one floor to the 
Consultative Committee to be used as an office. 
  Election of the executive committee members went fairly 
smoothly. Nineteen members were elected from among the entire 
Consultative Committee. The only thing was, Cheng Yao-tang [6774 
5069 2768], labor representative and head of the FTU whom we 
thought had high hopes, lost by one vote. 
  After the executive members were chosen, there was a break, 
and the five initiators talked about electing the chairman and 
vice chairmen. I indicted that based on experience in the 
mainland, we should let the executive members work out a list of 
candidates before proceeding with the election. But the others 
wanted an election right away, and I did not insist. In that 
way, after electing the executive members, the first executive 
committee meeting was convened; it was presided over by Pao 
Yu-kang. He immediately announced the election of a chairman and 
vice chairmen and read from a list of candidates. The executive 
committee members were taken by surprise. Pao Yu-kang asked if 
there were any objection, and one executive committee member 
indicated that he had no objection. Thereupon, Pao said, "if 
there are no objections, please applause, and the motion is 
carried." Everybody applauded, and that was that. After the 
meeting, the executive committee members were not pleased, 
saying that it all moved too fast, that they were not prepared, 
and the process did not comply with committee regulations and so 
on. The reporters asked me about it, and I could only made some 
excuses. Of course, we could not blame it on anybody. It only 
showed that the several vice chairmen, including myself, lacked 
training in democracy. To salvage the situation, I asked Mao 
Jun-nian [3029 6874 1628] to consult the others and follow 
regulations to draw up a new list of candidates and hold another 
election. Although it turned out that the original winners were 
again elected, it still brought some criticisms. 
  On 18 December 1985, the day before the anniversary of the 
formal signing of the Sino-British Joint Declaration, the Hong 
Kong SAR Basic Law Consultative Committee was formally 
established. Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378], in the capacity of 
chairman of the Basic Law Drafting Committee, spoke at the 
meeting. At that time, he was in Hong Kong at the invitation of 
the British Hong Kong government and the Hong Kong branch of 
XINHUA SHE. [Installment No 47] 
<H5>  [21 June 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] 4. Democratic Consultation, Cooperation, and 
Compromise (part 1 of 2): Hong Kong People's Wishes Were Taken 
Into Full Consideration; the Drafting Process Was Completely 
Democratic 
  The air of democracy during the drafting of the Basic Law 
was 
unprecedented. 
  The drafting process in fact was a process of cooperation, 
consultation, and compromise among the parties (primarily 
between China and Hong Kong), and it was also a completely 
democratic process. In a period of four years and eight months, 
the drafting committee held eight conferences, five special 
topic small groups, and met more than 60 times. The mainland's 
drafting committee members came to Hong Kong on several 
occasions to solicit ideas from various parties in Hong Kong, 
and on two of those occasions, formally organized groups were 
sent to solicit opinions in a comprehensive way. They were known 
as the "two ups and two downs." The first of these visits was 
made between May and September of 1988 to gather written 
suggestions for the Draft Basic Laws. The second was made 
between February and 31 October of 1989, whereby opinions on the 
Sixth Session of the Seventh People's Standing Committee's 
examination of the "Draft Basic Law of the Hong Kong SAR" were 
solicited. 
  The Consultative Committee took an objective and 
comprehensive approach when gathering ideas. The committee 
members had a full schedule in Hong Kong and often went to 
Beijing to report on ideas they had collected. On the two 
occasions they made their comprehensive survey of ideas, they 
gathered many suggestions and compiled them into a written 
report. To preserve the originality of the ideas, no 
comprehensive editing was made, but each item was recorded 
individually and reported truthfully, without distortion or 
simplification. The suggestions were "categorized" to make 
reading easier. 
  In addition, through its contact with individuals, groups, 
and others, the Hong Kong branch of XINHUA SHE had also gathered 
many suggestions. XINHUA SHE made special studies of those 
ideas, and some Chinese-funded organizations also heard and 
gathered ideas and brought them to the branch XINHUA SHE. The 
Sino-British Joint Liaison Group and the Hong Kong-Macao Affairs 
Office also obtained some information, and so did party and 
state leaders when they were meeting people from different 
circles in Hong Kong and Macao. 
  It is fair to say that the Hong Kong people's wishes were 
given full consideration in those four years and eight months; 
most ideas were deemed very valuable. They were studied and 
discussed repeatedly, especially by the Drafting Committee. 
  Members of the Drafting Committee in Hong Kong represented 
different interests and different stands; there were few 
consensus. The committee had no problem with the more simple, 
reasonable, and less controversial issues. For example, the 
question of the New Territories' native inhabitants' right to 
inherit land only involved residents of the New Territories; 
there was no controversy, and it was ratified easily and was 
written into Article 40 of the Basic Law. Another example was 
the churches' right to use and inherit properties and accept 
financial aid, which was a concern of the churches but not vital 
to the others, and was quickly decided in the Basic Law. 
  But things were different when it came to issues that 
involved other interests, that were confrontational and 
controversial. For example, on the questions of the Hong Kong 
people's autonomy and the relationship between the central 
government and the government of the SAR, there were many 
disputes. The Drafting Committee had a principle: Do the easy 
things first; that is, tackle the easy, less controversial 
problems first to lay the foundation for the Basic Law and take 
ample time to consider and discuss the difficult problems. 
  As far as the Drafting Committee itself was concerned, in 
order to deal with the relationship between members of the 
mainland drafting committee and the Hong Kong drafting committee 
and between the committee and the outside world, many mainland 
practices were changed to facilitate cooperation and compromises. 
  For example, it is customary to keep everything secret in 
the 
mainland. The secretariat followed mainland practice and brought 
up the secrecy issue at the Drafting Committee' first meeting. 
Hong Kong's Drafting Committee members and the media objected, 
and public opinion demanded that the Drafting Committee's 
activities be made public, and so at the chairman's meeting the 
secretariat asked for a debate and suggested accepting the idea, 
changing past practices. And so it was decided that after each 
special topic small group meeting, a spokesman would talk to 
reporters about the contents of each meeting, but there was one 
provision, that while the contents of all discussions could be 
disclosed, what was said and who said it was strictly 
confidential. If individual committee members chose to disclose 
what he or she had said at a meeting, the Drafting Committee had 
no right to intervene, but the formal briefing (the background 
explanation sessions) would name no names, giving individual 
members the right to choose. Subsequently, the meetings became 
increasingly public. The entire drafting process was basically 
an open process and was completely transparent, drastically 
changing the mainland's usual workstyle and approach. 
[Installment No 48] 
<H5>  [22 June 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] 4. Democratic Consultation, Cooperation, and 
Compromise (part 2 of 2): The Hong Kong People Were Satisfy With 
the Basic Law Prior to "June 4" 
  Between the mainland committee members and the Hong Kong 
committee members, it was the former who tried hard to let the 
latter express their opinions, to accept their ideas, and in the 
actual writing, they tried their best to satisfy the Hong Kong 
drafting committee and honor the Hong Kong people's reasonable 
wishes as much as possible. 
  Meanwhile, the Hong Kong drafting committee members also 
adjusted to the mainland's regulations and discussion 
procedures. For example, when the Consultative Committee drew up 
its regulations, some members objected to the reference to 
"democratic consultation," saying that the term was "imprecise 
and unscientific," and they also felt that it connoted the sense 
that the democratic parties and factions were in agreement with 
the ruling Communist Party. But in the mainland, democracy and 
consultation always go hand in hand. Later a compromise was 
reached, and the term was included in the regulations. I once 
said that consultation was part of democracy, and for that I was 
criticized by some Hong Kong people. 
  Actually it was just a misunderstanding. Consultation can be 
on equal grounds. In the consultative process, there is an 
assertive side, and there is also a side that accepts and 
agrees, or both sides may compromise. Subsequently, in the 
actual drawing up of the Basic Law, many in the Hong Kong 
Drafting Committee and the Consultative Committee accepted this 
approach, and everybody talked things over on equal footing. It 
became a way to give expression to democracy. 
  Prior to the second plenary session of the Drafting 
Committee, the secretariat sent copies of the outline of the 
Draft Basic Law to the chairman and the vice chairmen. The 
reporters came to me, and I said, "I have read it, but I cannot 
disclose the contents." Little did I know that would cause 
trouble. Liu Yiu-chu [1675 3852 3796] asked, "We are all 
members. Why should he get to look at the draft first?" I 
learned my lesson. In the mainland, usually we pay little 
attention to procedure at meetings. To let someone in charge 
look at a draft first was nothing unusal, but in a capitalist 
society, procedure, also known as the rules of the game, is an 
important part of democracy. 
  Later, Li Hou [2621 1775], the Drafting Committee secretary 
general in charge of the secretariat, said, "At first, we 
thought that the outline was not an essential issue; it had no 
substantive content, and we thought that we might as well make a 
rough draft, not knowing that it would lead to such 
misunderstanding. Because of this incident, we have decided to 
set up a special topic small group composed of mainland and Hong 
Kong committee members." Practice later proved that the small 
group approach was very effective. 
  The Basic Law was based on ideas suggested by mainland 
experts and personages concerned about the Hong Kong question as 
well as people from all walks of life in Hong Kong, including 
some foreigners. By way of meetings and the broadcast media, and 
through debates and consultations, the "comment-soliciting 
draft," "rough draft," and "Decision" were written. In my 
opinion, overall, the Hong Kong people were quite satisfied with 
the Basic Law: Prior to "June 4," they were mainly interested in 
whether the Basic Law would really be implemented after 1997. 
After "June 4," they became more dissatisfied with the final 
version of the political system as written in the Basic Law, 
especially regarding Article 23 which amended the 
anti-subversion clause. 
  Overall, the Basic Law was founded on the wisdom of the 
masses and compiled after a complicated consultative process. It 
was the result of compromises and the product of the expression 
of wisdom on both sides. Even today, I still think that it is a 
good choice that will put the people of Hong Kong on the road to 
democratic autonomy. 
<H3>  5. Trouble Over a Booklet (part 1 of 4): British Hong Kong 
Published "Green Paper" and "White Paper" </H3>
  The British Hong Kong government put out the "Green Paper" 
on 
the reform of the system of representative government in July, 
before the Draft Joint Declaration was signed by China and 
Britain in September 1984, and in November, before the formal 
signing of the Sino-British Joint Declaration in December, it 
rushed to publish the "White Paper." In Hong Kong, these actions 
caught our attention, and we began studying them. 
  The British Hong Kong government's goal as stated in the 
"Green Paper" was to "gradually establish a political regime, so 
that its power is firmly rooted in Hong Kong and has the full 
authority to represent the Hong Kong people's views and is held 
responsible to the Hong Kong people even more directly." By the 
time the "White Paper" was published, the goal was even more 
clear: It was to "gradually establish at the central level a 
system of representative government that is even more directly 
responsible to the Hong Kong people and is firmly rooted in Hong 
Kong." 
  The British Government's goal was very clear. It was to set 
up a system of representative government in Hong Kong and 
practise so called "returning the government to the people." 
  From our own intelligence and from public opinion trends, we 
had proof of British intention to radically change the basic 
framework of the Hong Kong government prior to 1997. 
[Installment No 49] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40112 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further Installments of Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs </TI></H3>
<H4>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs (Part 52) </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0113A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 25 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0113A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 52 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] Various international news agencies also carried 
reports,international news agencies also carried reports, 
leading certain Japanese and French banks to ask their Hong Kong 
connections to find and ask me in person: "What is the problem 
between China and Britain?" 
  And a friend from press circles asked someone to pass on the 
word to me that: "Your statement was too intense, being much 
too damaging to your image!" 
  I received phone calls from certain friends, some telling me 
about public and international reactions, some expressing 
support, and yet others indirectly reflecting differing views, 
making the well-meant suggestion that the future statements 
should emphasize deportment. And I also received certain 
"letters from the people," expressing support and encouragement. 
  Bao Yugang [0545 3768 0474] also sought me out to express 
support: "While you have spoken very well, and it was about 
time, certain Chinese as well as British friends also agree with 
you." He also said that: "Good principles also say that you have 
spoken well!" 
  Later, Jardine Matheson's Simon Kaise expressed to me 
directly his dissatisfaction with the British Hong Kong 
government's method of representative government, sympathizing 
with my statement. 
  While I had expected differing stands and reactions, I had 
never anticipated the reaction to my sense of propriety, 
particularly to my deportment. So I learned my lesson, and 
strove to prevent its recurrence on future public occasions. 
  This "storm about my statement" also aroused the attention 
of 
Beijing, with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) and the 
[State Council] Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office (HKMAO) 
sending me telegrams asking what I had said. My colleagues in 
our branch of the NEW CHINA NEWS AGENCY (NCNA) were quite tense, 
wondering whether the inquiries meant that a mistake had been 
made. So I reported the news record to the MOFA, the HKMAO, 
the CPC Central Committee, and the State Council, as well as 
consoling my colleagues that there was no need for concern, as 
the matter had not been handled wrong. Even if it had and 
Beijing criticized us, I was responsible, as "the statement was 
mine." 
  The MOFA's diplomatic language of "considering both sides 
and 
speaking around the issue" was essentially noncommittal, showing 
China's conflict in dealing with my statement. When the 
British side criticized my statement at a meeting of the 
Sino-British Joint Liaison Group, the Chinese side's chief 
representative, Ke Zaishuo [2688 0961 3617], responded that this 
was "unfair," differing from MOFA's tacit consent, and 
stretching to convey China's position. I considered that he 
might have used such a "neutral" term only because he either was 
not obeying MOFA instructions, or had not received them (which 
possibility was not great). I believe that he felt very awkward. 
  When Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] [chairman of the Basic Law 
Drafting Committee for the Hong Kong Special Administrative 
Region, and director of the HKMAO] later visited Hong Kong, he 
asked me: "What did you say at the time?" After I had told him, 
he had nothing further to say. (In fact, his question was 
unnecessary, as I had already reported by telegram, as well as 
attaching the news account.) I knew that his view differed, so 
did not discuss it further. And when a reporter asked him on a 
public occasion his view on the "storm about my statement," he 
did not take a stand. At a cocktail party given for him by 
industrial and commercial circles, when Mauridge of the Hong 
Kong Chamber of Commerce (generally known as the West's Chamber 
of Commerce, as its members were mostly British merchants) 
"complained" to him, criticizing my statement, Ji Pengfei 
actually said nothing despite the fact that I was standing not 
far from them, making me feel that he had gone a bit too far. 
But at a luncheon after he had spoken with Hong Kong Governor 
Wilson, when someone again mentioned the "storm about my notes," 
he finally made the statement that: "As it seems to have 
motivated Britain to dovetail' with us, it did have an impact." 
  While Ji Pengfei was visiting Hong Kong, the news came from 
Beijing that the "storm about my statement" had also set off a 
"storm" in Beijing, with the MOFA and the HKMAO complaining 
about me to the Central Committee and State Council, arousing 
the attention of the Central Committee. At a meeting of the 
CPC Central Committee Secretariat, Wan Li said that: "I have 
read the whole text of Xu Jiatun's statement, and believe that 
it contains no problems." So it seems that the support of 
figures, such as Wan Li, kept the storm from blowing up in 
Beijing. 
  At a meeting with Deng Xiaoping in the first half of 1986, 
he 
asked me: "Did you not make a statement that aroused 
controversy?" While I did not know if he was referring to its 
internal or external controversy, I said: "Yes. It caused much 
trouble." Whereupon Deng said: "You were not wrong. If you had 
not made that statement, allowing Britain to go on as it had, 
Hong Kong would have certainly been thrown into chaos." State 
Councilor Gu Mu was at that meeting with Deng. When I returned 
to Hong Kong and discussed the matter with my NCNA colleagues 
there, they suggested that: "You ought to write a report to 
the MOFA and HKMAO, to let them know about this." While my 
colleagues' idea was a very good one, I felt that it was 
unnecessary, as I had always felt that I had done nothing wrong. 
  One month after the "storm about my statement," Britain 
expressed acceptance of the principle that representative 
government would be dovetailed with the Basic Law, even though 
much mutual controversy still remained over the political system 
issue. After this, in the course of the drafting of the Basic 
Law, both sides entered a stage of cooperation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40113 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further Installments of Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs </TI></H3>
<H4>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs (Part 53) </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0113B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 26 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0113B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 53 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] Zhao Ziyang had warned me that in order to maintain 
Hong Kong's stability and prosperity, "its economy must not be 
allowed to collapse. On the (one in ten thousand) chance that 
it did, the burden would be too great for us to bear." 
  I agreed with Zhao Ziyang's view, having calculated at the 
time that the Hong Kong government had annual revenues of $36 
billion HK and annual expenditures of over $30 billion HK, 
meaning that at the exchange rates of the time, Hong Kong was 
spending over $10 billion RMB, or more than Jiangsu Province's 
annual revenues of over $7 billion RMB. 
  If Hong Kong's economy collapsed, in order to maintain Hong 
Kong's spending, not to speak of $10 billion RMB, could the 
Central Government come up with even $3-5 billion RMB to support 
the Hong Kong government? This was highly unlikely. And in 
light of Hong Kong's economic development realities, it would be 
necessary first to preserve Hong Kong's social stability, or 
relative social stability, in order to even attempt to maintain 
its economic prosperity. This was a primary consideration in 
both the Sino-British talks, as well as in the process of 
drafting the Basic Law. 
  Hong Kong was situated in the heart of the Asia-Pacific 
region, in relation to which Hong Kong alone was relatively 
stable. China itself had been through decades of unrest, and 
Southeast Asia had also been in a state of constant upheaval. 
  Hong Kong's stability depends mainly on China. China's Hong 
Kong policy under the KMT had been not to regain sovereignty, 
but rather to maintain the status quo, which policy remained in 
effect after the founding of the PRC. In modern history, Hong 
Kong had experienced instability only twice. The first time 
was the Japanese invasion of China, when Hong Kong was occupied 
for three years and eight months, which was the longest period 
of turbulence in Hong Kong's history. The second was two brief 
periods of instability after the founding of the PRC: In 1956, 
when the KMT engineered an insurrection in Kowloon and 
Ch'uan-wan; and in 1967, when the CPC led the so-called 
"Anti-British resistance," neither of which two periods of 
instability lasted very long. 
  After the Sino-British talks began, Hong Kong also 
experienced sharp turbulence, with stocks and real estate 
plummeting abruptly, and capital flight and emigration coming in 
severely growing waves, the fundamental cause of which was 
economic, with supply exceeding demand. This, in addition to 
political factors, meant that China's recovery of Hong Kong was 
touching off some unrest. 
  In short, Hong Kong's long-standing stability, in addition 
to 
its economic and monetary policies of freedom and low taxes that 
had turned Hong Kong into a capital and refugee haven for China 
and many Southeast Asian countries and regions, were also 
factors in the development of Hong Kong's funding and talent. It 
could be said that Hong Kong was prosperous precisely because it 
was more stable than other regions. 
  So how could we continue its stability? The external factors 
were very hard to predict and estimate. If the British Labor 
Party came to power, might it change Britain's Hong Kong policy? 
For instance, might it radically change Hong Kong's democratic 
course, or take a harder line in Sino-British relations? Might 
Taiwan continue its past practice of stirring up unrest in Hong 
Kong? We estimated such a possibility to be very small, as 
Taiwan was busy enough with its own affairs, so that stirring up 
unrest in Hong Kong would have few pluses. And while it was 
possible that China itself might turn "left," this was not seen 
as a major consideration at the time, as we held it to be 
unlikely. 
  We were most concerned about two possibilities: First, that 
Western and Taiwanese forces might exploit Hong Kong to effect a 
change of system in inland China and undermine inland security, 
by turning Hong Kong into an anti-Communist outpost. In fact, as 
they had long since acted in this way, at issue was whether they 
would go so far as to make things unbearable for China. 
  Second, we were concerned that instituting democratic, 
representative government too quickly might be too hard for the 
various social strata to adapt to, causing unrest and affecting 
investor confidence. 
  In light of the past experiences of the Philippines, Taiwan, 
South Korea, India, and certain African countries in instituting 
democratic government, the transition of colonized countries to 
democracy almost always led to social unrest, affecting investor 
confidence. As these countries were all larger than Hong Kong, 
which had a tiny area and sensitive people, chaos such as had 
occurred in Manila, Seoul, and even India would be inconceivable. 
  In addition to these external factors in Hong Kong's 
stability and prosperity, there were also two internal factors: 
1) The British administration; 2) local Chinese endeavors. Of 
these two factors, while the major one was the endeavors of the 
local people, particularly the Chinese, from a policy and 
administrative perspective, the British Hong Kong government's 
administrative expediting of Hong Kong's stability and 
prosperity was also an objective fact that should not be ruled 
out. 
  The Hong Kong Administration had three features. One was its 
colonial nature. The Hong Kong governor appointed by the 
British Crown held centralized power, not only holding political 
power, but also being the supreme local military officer, as 
well as probably the highest official in charge of the region's 
intelligence system. The Hong Kong administration represented 
not only the British Government, but also the interests of U.S. 
capitalists, including participation by local Hong Kong 
spokesmen for British financial groups, such as Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corp and Jardine Matheson spokesmen serving as 
Executive Council (EXCO) members, as well as British 
financial-group delegates, such as T'ai-Ku and Chartered Bank 
delegates in EXCO. (This was prior to 1983, as Jardine Matheson 
and Chartered Bank had no EXCO members in later years). 
  Later, the Hong Kong administration began to recruit 
participation by Chinese delegates having good relations with 
Britain, with new developments occurring in this area after the 
publication of the Sino-British Joint Declaration, in that most 
of those recruited for the future SAR Government were capable of 
maintaining more ties to the British side. And the government 
leadership also saw a noncolonialist change. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40114 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further Installments of Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs </TI></H3>
<H4>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs (Part 54) </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0113C Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 27 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0113C </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 54 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] The Hong Kong administration's second feature was 
its establishment of an outstanding consultative political 
framework. 
  Hong Kong's Executive and Legislative Councils (EXCO and 
LEGCO) were clearly the advisory bodies for the Hong Kong 
governor, who was president of both councils. While EXCO was 
the Hong Kong governor's most important advisory and 
policymaking body, all key decisions of the Hong Kong 
administration were made by the Hong Kong governor. Almost all 
of the highest officials in the Hong Kong administration were 
members of EXCO. 
  The Hong Kong administration's LEGCO, in addition to having 
appointments of some government officials as 
"administration-defense members," also recruited some 
outstanding public figures from areas, such as industrial and 
commercial circles, the professional world, and mid- and 
upper-level figures from certain community groups. The Hong Kong 
public elected each year 10 outstanding young people, a great 
many of whom, such as Li P'eng-fei [2621 7720 7378] and Li 
Chu-ming [2621 2691 6900], were recruited by the Hong Kong 
government to take part in the administration. 
  These figures took part in the administration in an advisory 
capacity, having no decisionmaking authority. While EXCO 
proposals were submitted for discussion to LEGCO, which could 
propose ammendments, the final decisionmaking authority on their 
acceptance rested with the Hong Kong governor. 
  The Hong Kong administration's practice of this consultative 
system contributed to Hong Kong's economic development. 
  As the Hong Kong administration had organized an advisory 
committee of over 300 members appointed by the Hong Kong 
administration, including outstanding figures from all walks of 
life, it was said that the administration was an outstanding 
regime. Generally speaking, whenever there was an issue, a 
particular profession had any legislative problems, or the 
government proposed a program, the pertinent departments would 
solicit opinions from the advisory committee, whose views were 
submitted to the pertinent departments, EXCO, and the Hong Kong 
governor for either adoption or ammendment. 
  While this consultative system was essentially within the 
Hong Kong governor's monopoly-power political framework, it did 
enable the Hong Kong governor within certain limits to give a 
little "democracy" to mid- and upper social levels, providing 
them with opportunities to both learn about government decisions 
in advance, as well as to express their opinions, so could be 
said to be a certain degree of "participatory" or 
"representative" government. 
  Hong Kong's 19 district assemblies were also part of the 
consultative framework, aimed at providing residents with a 
certain degree of participation in district affairs. These 
district assemblies mostly joined grassroots mid- or lower- 
levels, with each district assembly carrying out a "plan for 
meeting with residents," so that residents from the district 
could make appointments for meetings with district assembly 
members, in order to express their views on any district 
matters, and propose means of making improvements. 
  Hong Kong's 19 districts had 71 advisory service centers 
where questions about government work were answered free of 
charge, with 127 sub-district committees and over 4,000 village 
organizations to provide the government with a widespread and 
quite effective liasion network with grassroots residents. 
  As the Hong Kong administration consulted with residents 
through these channels, this consultative organization became a 
key part of the ruling framework under the control of the Hong 
Kong administration's government affairs office. 
  Hongkongers said that Hong Kong had three governors: 1) the 
governor appointed by the British Crown; 2. the board chairman 
of the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation who, with his 
decisive financial might and prerogatives, had become Hong 
Kong's financial "governor"; 3) the Racing Association, which 
could be said to be the psychological ruler of quite a few 
Hongkongers. 
  The Racing Association held horse races twice a week for 
four 
months out of the year (June through September), with the 
betting reaching tens of millions of dollars [HK] a race, 
hundreds of millions a racing day, 12 billion for all of 1983, 
and over 30 billion by the eve of my departure in 1989. Hong 
Kong had two horserace tracks, the older one dirt and the newer 
sand, where each race not only saw the stands packed with tens 
of thousands of people, but also included offtrack bettors, 
attracting up to a million people, all of whom hoped to win. 
Every week brought two chances for several bettors to get rick 
quick and become mid- and small-size millionaires, while others 
went bankrupt and committed suicide. I held that while most 
people could be said to be "willing taxpayers" for the 
government, the Racing Association acted as a narcotic to make 
residents unconsciously satisfied with the status quo, with many 
trying to get rich by luck instead of looking for other routes 
to wealth. 
  There was also a lottery, which twice a week created several 
millionaires and nouveau riches, playing the same role. 
  As British Hong Kong rule was quite successful, the mid and 
upper levels of society certainly did not essentially contain 
any organized mindset to overthrow colonial rule, developing a 
rather widespread dependent mentality instead. As Hong Kong's 
upper levels, and even quite a few mid-level figures, lacked 
political independence, it must be said that Britain's colonial 
rule in this case was successful. The Hong Kong administration 
also awarded each year several imperial decorations of various 
grades, such as "Gentleman of Peace" and "OBE," which were 
conferred on outstanding public figures from all walks of life 
by the Hong Kong governor himself, or even by the Queen, as well 
as rewarding administration officials for "achievements or 
contributions," thus winning over Hongkongers' hearts, giving 
them a sense of honor and belonging. But other Hongkongers 
poked fun at these decorations, calling them "Dutch water (soda) 
bottlecaps." 
  Generally speaking, the Hong Kong administration formed the 
structure for rule of Hong Kong by the Hong Kong administraion 
through the law, the police, the military, and the 
consultative organization, accompanied by social organizations, 
such as the Racing Association, charitable institutions, and 
churches. British rule in Hong Kong was a sort of "benevolent" 
dictatorship. Or it could be called conciliatory rule with a 
large degree of freedom. While it was not democratic, it did 
give people, without threatening British colonial rule, various 
opportunities to vent their discontent or dissent, which 
discontent and dissent was heard and ameliorated to a certain 
extent. 
  The third feature of the Hong Kong administration was that 
it 
had a civil service. The Hong Kong administration's various 
departments were essentially composed of permanent staffs, who 
needed certain qualifications (such as professional knowledge), 
but had lifetime employment through set procedures of internal 
training and promotions. Moreover, officials had only to swear 
allegiance to the British Crown, not being troubled with the 
problem of having to maintain neutrality in party struggles, 
giving them an even greater sense of dedication. 
  These three major features of the Hong Kong administration 
showed that British rule in Hong Kong for the last century plus, 
particularly the last several decades, had been successful in 
maintaining Hong Kong's stability, particularly its economic 
growth in the last two decades. So when drawing up the Basic 
Law, we needed to notice and utilize this, discarding its 
colonialism, assimilating its freedom, and developing its 
democracy, as one of our key grounds for establishing after 1997 
a highly autonomous democratic system with prosperity and 
stability. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40115 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further Installments of Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs </TI></H3>
<H4>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs (Part 55) </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0114A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 28 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0114A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 55 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] As the political-system program, or what kind of 
political system the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region 
(SAR) would practice after 1997, was the most controversial, 
complex, and difficult issue in the course of formulating the 
Basic Law, it was also the most time-consuming and volatile 
problem. 
  The Chinese Government's conception of Hong Kong's political 
system after 1997 was to maintain the British Hong Kong 
Administration's status quo essentially unchanged, being 
depicted in Liao Chengzhi's [1675 2110 1807] terms as "a change 
of national flag," with "the Hong Kong governor becoming a 
Hongkonger appointed by China." 
  But the Sino-British Joint Declaration's Appendix 1 on the 
SAR's political-system clause differed substantively from the 
Chinese Government's original conception. 
  In the drafting of the Basic Law, the sharpest controversies 
were mainly in two areas: 1) On "the Hong Kong SAR's enjoyment 
of executive, legislative, independent judicial, and final 
judgment authority." 2) On "the Hong Kong SAR's legislature 
being elected, with the executive having to observe the laws 
and being responsible to the legislature." The crux of the 
controversy was: Would the SAR's political system be one of a 
tripartite balance of powers, with mutual checks and balances? 
Would the "executive" or "legislature" dominate? 
  As I did not take part in the Sino-British talks (as Li 
Jusheng [2621 5468 3932] had blocked me from the early-stage 
talks), the only records that I could see were mostly 
"verdicts," making it very hard for me to see the crux of the 
controversy. But by the time of the drafting of the Basic Law, 
the controversy came to light. I guessed at the time that the 
Chinese consideration for after 1997 was that: As the former 
colonial government was not democratic, it would need to be 
changed somewhat; and these Chinese democratic plans had induced 
the British to promote a representative system. Or possibly it 
was the British who had proposed the representative-system idea 
in the talks. But regardless of which side was responsible for 
it, it was certain that the Chinese had never reckoned during 
the negotiations with Britain's "surreptiousness" before the two 
sides had even reached agreement, in that it would "rush" to 
promote the representative system during the last 12 years of 
its jurisdiction, to change its promise in the Sino-British 
Joint Declaration to "return administration to China" into 
"returning administration to the people." (While the 
Sino-British Joint Declaration had stated that "the two kingdoms 
jointly declare that the governments of the two kingdoms will 
return Hong Kong to the PRC on 1 July 1997," the British had 
still set forth in a "white paper" the "need to gradually 
establish at the Administration's central level a representative 
system that is more directly responsible to the people and 
firmly rooted in Hong Kong.") 
  Li Hou [2621 0683] [deputy director of the State Council's 
Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office (HKMAO)] did not at first 
seem to understand Britain's plot. At a meeting in Macao of the 
Basic Law Political System Group that he chaired, he had 
proposed that the future SAR Administration would practice a 
"separation of powers" program, with executive, legislative, and 
judicial authority being separate and having mutual checks and 
balances. This not only was out of line with the understanding 
of the Central Government's views by the Hong Kong and Macao 
Working Committee of the time, but also before long was 
disagreed with by Deng Xiaoping as expected. 
  As to the executive being "responsible" to the legislature, 
Lu Ping [7627 1627] [deputy secretary general of the Basic Law 
Drafting Committee for the Hong Kong SAR and deputy director of 
the HKMAO] explained this to Hong Kong reporters as being 
legislative consultation, just as the then relationship between 
the British Hong Kong Administration and the Legislative Council 
(LEGCO). And the response to public calls for the British 
Government to explain this was also very vague. I doubted at 
the time whether the "senior advisor" of the Chinese Planning 
Committee would clarify the issue in the Sino-British talks. 
This was because in a discussion of the "decade of great 
changes remaining in effect for 50 years" by the Hong Kong and 
Macao Working Committee, its "chairman," Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 
7378] [chairman of the Basic Law Drafting Committee for the Hong 
Kong SAR and director of the HKMAO] had sighed to me about the 
provision on "the legislature being elected," that "he had not 
added consultation' at the time, as he had not fully reckoned 
with Britain's (intentions)." (The Sino-British Joint 
Declaration provided that the SAR Chief Executive would be 
produced through either election or consultation.) 
  The British Hong Kong Administration's "surreptitous rush" 
to 
promote a representative system touched off a wave of democracy 
unprecedented in Hong Kong's history. This was the British 
Hong Kong Administration's brilliant "public opinion card" 
stroke, which intensified Hong Kong's social division and 
unrest. Outstanding mid-level and grassroots figures, who had 
no confidence in China and were dissatisfied with the public 
status quo and their own plight, came out with calls for rushing 
to democracy, some of whom were dependent on British Hong Kong 
largesse while considering it inadequate. Of course, many were 
also trying to exploit the struggle between China and Britain to 
win democracy from both sides. While this led to a surge toward 
democracy by various types, the "silent types" were probably 
still in the majority. 
  It should be pointed out that while Hong Kong had never 
questioned the social climate of its politics, this [wave of 
democracy] began a fundamental change that has gradually evolved 
to turn Hong Kong into one of the world's regions with a rare 
and maximum political sensitivity. 
  As to this wave of democracy, most of the upper levels of 
society were laden with anxiety. Most Hong Kong Chinese big 
bourgeoisie had been economically dependent on the British at 
first. And while some later had vanquished British capital in 
market competition, even supplanting it in some areas, they had 
not yet completely overcome this dependence, at least not 
financially. As they lacked political independence, their 
major aspiration was to maintain the status quo. Confronted 
with the ever-surging wave of democracy, they started out with 
no ideological preparation, and with even less preparation for 
playing the democracy game, which turned into concern that 
middle and lower class participation in and control over 
political affairs would change the status quo, bringing great 
calls for a "free lunch" and sharply higher taxes that would 
lose them their advantage in Hong Kong's moneymaking paradise. 
But while democracy was a wave that could not be opposed 
"rationally" or stopped with "force," leaving them for some time 
in a state of depression and vacillation, the process of 
drafting the Basic Law made some of them dependent on China, in 
order to cope with the Hong Kong democracy wave's ideas and 
actions. 
  The big capitalists had the same position among both the 
British financial groups and the Chinese. Chia Tao-li [0857 
6670 3810] endorsed and supported my "statement-storm" speech, 
as well as telling me directly after the 4 June incident that he 
supported the middle-of-the-road plan proposed by business world 
figures, such as Luo K'ang-jui [5012 1660 3843]. And Simon 
Kaise told me twice that he was dissatisfied with the position 
of Hong Kong's democratic radicals. 
  They held that as Hong Kong was founded on stability, 
instituting democracy too quickly might cause unrest that would 
produce an investor-confidence problem. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40116 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further Installments of Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs </TI></H3>
<H4>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs (Part 56) </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0114B Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 29 Jun 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0114B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installment No 56 of the serialized memoirs of Xu Jiatun: </F>
"Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
  [Text] As China had gradually begun to recognize Britain's 
tactics of "surreptiously pushing" to promote a representative 
system after the British Hong Kong Administration had issued its 
"green paper," it formulated its own tactics that the 
representative system would have to be "dovetailed" with the 
Basic Law to restrict the pace of Britain's administrative 
reform, i.e., that "they would have to act according to their 
statements." 
  While most people in a society with no democratic traditions 
were not ideologically prepared for democracy, so were unsuited 
to it, particularly the upper levels who were anxious about it, 
the push toward democracy had already become a fact, leaving the 
only possibility being to retreat to a second line of defense 
and consider its rate of advance, which was logical. 
  In the course of drafting the Basic Law, the crux of the 
political-system controversy was over whether democracy would 
occur "fast," "slow," "more," or "less." During my time with the 
Basic Law Drafting Committee in Guangzhou, I had responded to a 
Hong Kong reporter's question on democrats and conservatives 
that: Hong Kong's democracy dividing line is one of radical or 
moderate democracy, not of democracy or conservatism (without 
remembering the specific words, this was my general idea). But 
this controversy certainly evolved into an intricate and complex 
dispute between China and Britain and between China and Hong 
Kong, becoming so complicated and confusing that it was hard for 
the public to see the true facts. 
  China had designed Hong Kong's political reform pace 
according to Deng Xiaoping's thinking on "general elections" 
"proceeding step by step," which Britain had later essentially 
accepted in [then Hong Kong governor] Wilson's public version of 
"advancing gradually in due order," which Deng Xiaoping had 
immediately endorsed publicly. This "advancing gradually in 
due order" was a substitute term for "proceeding step by step." 
  Most democracy radicals were in the middle and lower-middle 
levels of the middle (middle bourgeoisie) stratum, who were 
calling for equality of upward mobility politically, 
economically, and as to human values. Such calls gave no cause 
for much criticism, as they needed to be designed into the 
political system within the democratic framework of the Basic 
Law needing to consider them. And most democracy moderates were 
in the upper and middle-upper levels of society, quite a few of 
whom had originally not endorsed a democratic political system, 
but had later seen that democracy was unavoidable, so were 
forced to meekly submit, while still being concerned about too 
much or too fast democracy. The drafting of the Basic Law set 
off new hopes that democracy would protect vested interests, or 
even bring greater benefits and new enjoyments politically, 
economically, and as to human values. So the "proceeding step 
by step" or "advancing gradually in due order" principle for 
practicing a democratic political system, gave consideration to 
both democracy radicals and moderates, striving for a compromise 
to reduce unrest. 
  But the varying degrees of mobilization of the various 
social 
strata was also a problem. 
  The situation in Hong Kong at the time was that while some 
in 
the upper, middle, and grassroots levels already had democratic 
political and government aspirations, most people had not yet 
been organized. But the lower and middle level's organized 
"pressure groups" had already appeared in embryonic form. 
During the Sino-British talks, all social forces, mainly the 
middle level's lower-middle strata, organized various new social 
groups, which gradually began to collaborate. 
  My own internal analysis at the time was that: The 
situation was much like that of the initial inland anti-Japanese 
struggle, in which various elements had organized guerrilla 
forces, with those possessing a few guns acting as "commanders," 
and "commanders sprouting up like weeds" for a time. These 
guerrilla forces grew, with the large eating the small, and the 
strong gobbling up the weak, to gradually merge into a large 
guerrilla force, and even into a "regular" army. And this group 
development in Hong Kong could also take a similar path to grow 
into a political party. 
  But as most of the upper bourgeoisie had not yet awakened, 
while the middle and lower strata had already gone into action, 
society lacked organized checks and balances. 
  As to Li Hou's proposal that the future Hong Kong SAR 
Government practice "the separation of powers," this was based 
mostly in Western nations on political-party politics, with 
multiparty elections and majority-party rule. As these 
governments had majority-party support in congress, they could 
ensure that their political orders were passed. But Hong Kong 
had no political parties, with the big and middle bourgeoisie 
essentially not yet having organized. Even if they had 
organized, it would have been hard to achieve the right climate 
in a short period of time. Meanwhile, the democracy radicals 
representing the middle and lower social strata were organized 
in embryonic form (after the 4 June incident, the democracy 
radical forces did certainly further expand to appear in a 
political party form). I estimated at the time that the 
continuation of this could very likely lead to a general 
situation before 1997 of one-party legislation, with antagonism 
after 1997 among the Chief Executive, the administrative sector, 
and the Legislative Council, making it impossible or hard to 
pass any bills, leaving nothing of the Hong Kong 
administration's original efficiency, and touching off 
political, social and internal-administration turbulence. 
This meant that the "separation of powers" plan was out of 
line with Hong Kong's realities. Before long, on 16 April 
1987, Deng Xiaoping publicly disagreed in a meeting with the 
Hong Kong [Basic Law] Drafting Committee with the "separation of 
powers," showing that this idea of Li Hou and others did not 
conform to the Central Government spirit. 
  Li Hou and Lu Ping also publicly stated at the time that 
they 
did not approve of the emergence of political parties in Hong 
Kong. This [the emergence of political parties in Hong Kong] 
was also out of line with Deng Xiaoping's thinking and Hong 
Kong's realities. So when reporters asked me about Li Hou and 
Lu Ping's statements, I could only respond that "those are their 
personal views." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40117 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Roundup Report on Economic Reforms </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0198A Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] in Chinese No 10, 23 Oct 93 pp 16-18 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0198A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JINGJI TIZHI GAIGE [CHINA'S 
ECONOMIC STRUCTURE REFORM] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Moving Ahead While Tackling </F>
Difficulties--Correspondent Summarizes New Situation of All-Out 
Pursuit of Economic System Reform"] 
  [Text] During the year, every jurisdiction and every sector 
in the country has focused on the difficulties and the key areas 
in reform, studying hard and exploring courageously to attain 
the goal of building a socialist market economy system. 
Consequently, substantive advances have been scored in some 
major fields of reform and opening to the outside world. 
<H5>  Early Results Seen From Implementation of "The Regulations" </H5>
  As of the end of June, the "Implementation Methods" were 
fully inaugurated in every province, municipality, and 
autonomous region. Of the 28 associated regulations drawn up by 
State Council agencies, six have been promulgated, four have 
been countersigned, seven have been forwarded for examination, 
and 11 are awaiting forwarding for examination. Eight of the 14 
rights to manage their own affairs that "The Regulations" confer 
on enterprises have been largely implemented, and four have been 
partially implemented, including the right to form partnerships 
and merge, the right to assign manpower to jobs, the right to 
make investment decisions, and the right to dispose of assets. 
Rights that have not been implemented are two: the right to 
import and export, and the right to refuse the levying of 
assessments. In this process, which has as its goal the 
transformation of state-owned enterprises operating mechanisms, 
many different methods have been newly tried out. One is the 
active and steadfast running of share system trials, the 
emphasis of share system transformation being on changing 
enterprises' operating mechanisms. Second is enterprises' 
further introduction of the competition mechanism, enhancement 
of internal management, and intensification of internal reform. 
Third is the attraction of foreign investment, practicing 
"grafting," bringing a number of enterprises -- particularly a 
number of old enterprises -- into the marketplace, and getting a 
number of enterprises to emulate the operating mechanism used in 
three kinds of partially or wholly foreign-owned enterprises, 
managing in accordance with customary international practice. 
<H3>  New Actions Taken and New Advances Made in Equity Rights 
System Reform </H3>
  Following the 14th Party Congress, all jurisdictions paid 
close attention to the systematization of equity rights 
relationships and reform of the equity rights system, their 
understanding of the importance of equity rights system reform 
becoming increasingly clear, and new actions being taken in the 
following regards. 1) Expansion of the scope of share system 
pilot projects, selecting nine enterprises for the listing of 
shares in Hong Kong, and permitting two enterprises (the 
Shanghai Petrochemicals Main Plant and the Qingdao Brewery) to 
list shares formally on the Hong Kong Stock Market. 2) Equity 
rights trading markets have become livelier with each passing 
day. Today, 25 cities in more than 10 provinces throughout the 
country have set up or are in process of preparing to set up 
equity rights trading markets. 3) Pilot projects have begun to 
be run on "state-owned, civilian-operated," and "publicly owned, 
privately operated" management systems in small enterprises. 
Results have been pretty good, and the outlook appears good. 4) 
Equity rights transfers, enterprise mergers, enterprise 
bankruptcies, and the individually and privately operated 
economy developed further. Enterprises' organizational 
structure was further readjusted. 
<H3>  Important Advances in Government Agency Reform and Changes 
of Functions </H3>
  In order to meet requirements for development of a market 
economy, the State Council made some neeeded adjustments of the 
functions of some government agencies this year. State Council 
government agency reforms are moving ahead across-the board, and 
will likely be completed before the end of the year. Encouraged 
by the spirit of the 14th Party Congress, great strides were 
made, and good results obtained in pilot projects for the reform 
of local government agencies, which focused primarily on 
government agencies at the county and township level. Now the 
scope of these pilot projects has gradually been expanded to 
include about one-fifth of the counties in the country. Pilot 
projects for reform of government, prefecture, and municipal 
agencies have also begun. Inner Mongolia, which is a pilot 
project province or region for the reform of local government 
agencies throughout the nation, is running agency reform 
projects in 86 banners and counties. This is 86 percent of all 
banners and counties in the autonomous region. So far, it has 
disbanded or merged 1,559 party, government, and mass 
organizations in the streamlining of more than 41 percent of 
agencies. It has also sent more than 100,000 personnel from 
various official agencies and institutions elsewhere, and it has 
set up more than 16,200 economic entities of various kinds. 
<H3>  Further Increase in Intensity of Price Reform; Greater Speed 
in Building Markets </H3>
  1) A new situation has occurred in price reform. More than 
90 
percent of the nation's provinces, directly administered 
municipalities, and autonomous regions, more than 280 of its 
prefectures and cities, and more than 1,900 of its counties have 
deregulated grain and edible oil sale prices. They have also 
deregulated, in turn, steel and iron products, and some 
government-allocated coal. Means of production on which the 
state sets prices number only 25, or approximately 20 percent of 
total means of production sales. Only six agricultural products, 
or 15 percent of agricultural product sales, remain on which the 
state sets prices. The state sets prices on only two industrial 
consumer goods, or less than 10 percent of them, and the state 
sets prices on fewer than 10 percent of total retail commodity 
sales. 2) With the change from the old to the new system, fine 
prospects for the building of markets have appeared. A look at 
commodity markets shows the development of nearly 80,000 country 
fair markets nationwide doing 353 billion yuan worth of business 
annually. This is one-fourth of all social commodity sales. 
There are more than 3,000 wholesale markets of various kinds. 
They include the preliminary formation of crisscrossing 
commodity market networks for agricultural and sideline 
products, industrial wares used in daily life, and the means of 
production. Markets for key elements have also developed to a 
certain extent. Some long-term investment markets, short-term 
financing markets, and foreign exchange regulation markets have 
been established in some large- and medium-sized cities. 
Throughout the country, manpower markets, technology markets, 
real estate markets, securities markets, and information markets 
have been set up that are developing and operating very well. 
<H3>  Further Advances in Moving Ahead With the Establishment of 
New System Fully Integrated Municipal Reform Pilot Projects </H3>
  Following approval by the State Commission for System 
Reform, 
eight cities including Chongqing, Anshan, Changzhou, Wenzhou, 
Yantai, Yanji, Tangshan, and Tongling have become pilot project 
cities for completely integrated reforms. These cities are in 
process of drawing up fully integrated reform plans as a first 
step in taking the lead in the establishment of a socialist 
market economy system. 
<H3>  Further Appearance of City, Town, and Rural Village Joint 
Stock System Enterprises </H3>
  1) City and town joint share system enterprises have 
developed rapidly. According to incomplete statistics from six 
provinces including Zhejiang, Jiangsu, and Liaoning, and the 
city of Shanghai, as of the end of June 1993, there were more 
than 5,000 city and town joint stock system enterprises. 2) The 
large scale appearance of rural joint stock share enterprises 
has become a major ingredient in rural economic reform that is 
indicative of the direction of township and town enterprise 
reform, and that marks another important milestone of major 
significance in rural reform. 
<H3>  Steady Intensification of Foreign Trade System Reform, 
Further Widening of the Opening to the Outside World, and 
Improvement of the Investment Climate </H3>
  First is positive advances in import-export system reform 
and 
the continued development of foreign trade. Customs statistics 
show a 4.4 percent increase over the same period in 1992 in 
total exports and a 23.3 percent increase in total imports for 
the first half of the year. Second is further development of the 
externally oriented economy, notably border trade and foreign 
economic and technical cooperation. The Huang He Economic 
Cooperation Zone comprised of nine provinces and autonomous 
regions along the Huang He, namely Shandong, Henan, Shanxi, 
Ningxia, Gansu, Shaanxi, Qinghai Xinjiang, and Inner Mongolia 
uses to the full the advantages of the seacoast, the river, and 
the frontier. This zone has jointly opened 34 land, sea, and air 
ports of entry and exit, and it has developed broader 
international trade with more than 80 countries and territories 
including the Commonwealth of Independent States, the United 
States, Japan, Hong Kong, and Taiwan. Third is fine prospects 
for the development everywhere of three kinds of partially or 
wholly foreign-owned enterprises. Statistics from Jiangsu, 
Zhejiang, and Shanghai show more than 7,600 new enterprises 
built with foreign investment in the Chang Jiang Delta between 
January and May 1993, and a contractual foreign investment of $8 
billion, which is between three and four times the amount for 
the same period in 1992. Fourth is continued expansion of the 
area opened to the outside world. The State Council has recently 
approved the operation of foreign owned commercial retail 
businesses in Beijing, Shanghai, Tianjin, Guangzhou, Dalian, 
Qingdao and the five special economic zones, and it has issued 
companion policy regulations. In addition, it has approved 23 
cities and counties in Inner Mongolia and Henan as areas open to 
foreigners, thereby bringing to 919 the number of cities and 
counties in China that are opening to the outside world. State 
Council approved economic and technical development zones now 
number 30. Fifth is the active movement into internal and 
domestic markets of cities along the Chang Jiang. 
<H5>  In-depth Advances in Social Security System Reform </H5>
  1) New advances have been made in reform of the old age 
insurance system. Currently, more than 500,000 enterprises of 
all kinds nationwide, more than 85 million staff members and 
workers, and more than 17 million retired or separated personnel 
are enrolled in retirement plans. More than 60 million staff 
members in twenty-two provinces and cities make individual 
contributions to basic old age insurance. More than 500,000 
staff members and workers in more than 600 enterprises are 
enrolled in enterprise supplementary old age insurance pilot 
projects. Sixty-five cities and counties are reforming their 
basic old age fund calculation methods. 2) Industrial accident 
insurance system reform pilot projects are expanding steadily. 
In addition to provincewide reforms in Guangdong and Hainan 
provinces, more than 390 cities and counties, and more than 6.5 
million people in Liaoning, Jilin, Jiangxi, Fujian, Sichuan, 
Hubei, Henan, and Shandong provinces are participating in 
industrial accident insurance reform pilot projects. 3) Medical 
insurance system reforms are being carried out everywhere. More 
than 80 percent of all enterprises in the country have 
instituted reforms of various kinds. 
<H5>  Further Improvement of Economic Laws and Regulations </H5>
  China has accelerated the economic legislation pace during 
the year, a number of laws, regulations and documents of a 
regulatory nature appearing one after another. As of the end of 
June, the NPC Standing Committee had passed several important 
regulations such as "Amendment of the People's Republic of China 
Constitution," the "People's Republic of China Product Quality 
Law," and "Supplementary Provisions Pertaining to the Punishment 
of Falsification of Registered Trademark." A number of laws and 
regulations such as the "Corporation Law," the "Securities Law," 
and the "Law Against Unfair Competition" will shortly be sent to 
the NPC Standing Committee for deliberation. During the first 
half of the year nearly 20 State Council administrative 
regulations and documents of a regulatory nature were published, 
including "Interim Regulations on the Issuance of Stocks and 
Exchange Control," "Unemployment Insurance Regulations for Staff 
Members and Workers in State-Owned Enterprises," "Regulations on 
the Placement of Redundant Staff Members and Workers of 
State-Owned Enterprises," "Peoples Republic of China National 
Currency Export and Import Control Methods," "State Council 
Circular Notice on Resolutely Halting Indiscriminate Fund 
Raising and Greater Control Over Bond Issues," and "State 
Council Circular Notice on Hastening Grain Circulation System 
Reform." Some of the circular notices that the State Commission 
on System Reform drafted titled, "Regulations Controlling 
Shareholdings by Staff Members and Workers in Directional 
Capital Raising Shareholding Companies Ltd.," "Checking 
Irregular Methods Whereby Staff Members of Fixed Collection 
Ltd., Liability Corporations Hold Shares," "Futures Markets 
Trial Measures," and "Interim Regulations for City and Town 
Joint Stock Enterprises," will be issued in the near future. The 
views of agencies concerned are being urgently solicited on some 
of these. The pace and rhythm of Eighth NPC Standing Committee 
legislation will quicken greatly. Plans call for the shaping of 
an overall framework for a socialist market economy legal system 
during the five-year plan period. 
<H3>  Work on Designing an "Overall Program for the Building of a 
Socialist Market Economy System" Moving Along Smoothly </H3>
  The State Commission on System Reform is currently working 
on 
further revisions and improvement of the "Program." 
  In addition to the aforementioned progress, particularly 
arresting is the CPC Central Committee and State Council 
decisions of the past several months on the intensification of 
reform, and the strengthening and improvement of macroeconomic 
regulation and control of the national economy, using mostly 
economic means to solve difficulties and problems that have 
risen in economic development, which have achieved initial 
results. They have systematically and completely studied 
problems in accelerating the building of a socialist market 
economy system, focusing on the study of coordinated reform 
measures in the fields of finance and banking, government 
finance, taxation, state-owned assets control, the investment 
system, and the foreign trade system. Major reforms have been 
made in these regards recently. 
  In summary, during 1993, the reform situation throughout the 
country has been good. It has developed in a healthy way. Some 
problems do exist, however, principal of which are the 
following: 1) Unevenness in implementation of "the Regulations." 
2) Continuation of the problem of a hiatus between reform and 
development, some places still failing to concentrate their main 
attention on the intensification of reform. 3) Mindlessness in 
the building of markets. Some places care only about the number 
of markets they build without caring about their quality. 
Second, market regulation and policy measures lag. The building 
of markets is not very regularized. It is disorderly and 
authority is monopolized. Regions and departments act in 
isolation, and failure to act according to market laws, 
competition laws, and the laws of value is widespread. 4) 
Macroeconomic system reform lacks intensity, and the 
macroeconomic operating environment is becoming increasingly 
tight. More serious attention must be given to these 
difficulties and problems. Reform must be further intensified, a 
socialist market economy system and an economic legal system 
consistent with a market economy must be built to produce a 
solution. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40118 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems, Reform of Foreign Exchange System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0131A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 22 Oct 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0131A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Fu Jun (0265 4596) and Zhuo Ya (0587 1246): </F>
"Speed Up the Reform of Foreign Exchange System"] 
  [Text] Major Problems in the Current Foreign Exchange 
System of China 
  1. Foreign Exchange Market Is Not Unified, Local Divisions 
Are Serious 
  Since reform and opening up, the traditional system of 
highly 
centralized foreign exchange control has been broken up and a 
crisscross foreign exchange distribution system has been 
established. Vertical distribution is restricted mainly by the 
ratio of foreign exchange withholding and the state foreign 
exchange utilization plan. Horizontal flow is restricted mainly 
by the economic returns of foreign exchange utilization of local 
departments. The former is less flexible as compared to the 
latter. Enterprises and local departments receive foreign 
exchange supply through vertical distribution and rely on the 
regulatory foreign exchange market for regulating their foreign 
exchange surplus and shortage. The vertical foreign exchange 
distribution plan is linked to the national plan, stressing the 
consideration of national interests, whereas local and 
departmental foreign exchange utilization considers mainly local 
and departmental interests. As a result, there are conflicts 
between vertical foreign exchange supply and horizontal flow. 
For instance, the special economic zones (SEZ) of China have a 
greater demand for foreign exchange due to their rapid 
development. This has caused a large amount of foreign exchange 
to flow into the SEZs. In the meantime, areas losing foreign 
exchange do not get timely compensation for such spontaneous 
outflow of foreign exchange. As a result, out of the 
consideration of regional and local interests, local governments 
often adopt means of administrative intervention to control the 
outflow of foreign exchange, creating man-made obstacles to 
horizontal flow of foreign exchange. 
  2. The Existence of Three Foreign Exchange Rates Affects 
Investment Environment 
  Currently there are mainly three foreign exchange rates: 1) 
Official exchange rate; 2) market exchange rate, referring 
mainly to exchange rate on the regulatory market which is 
determined by the supply and demand situation of foreign 
exchange market and the goal of government intervention; 3) 
black market exchange rate, referring to non-public transactions 
outside the foreign exchange market. The existence of three 
exchange rates has distorted the price of foreign exchange 
market, adversely affected the optimum distribution of foreign 
exchange resources, influenced the environment of foreign 
investment, and hindered to a certain extent the development of 
foreign contacts. 
  3. Foreign Exchange Shortage Makes Reluctance To Sell a 
Common Phenomenon 
  Foreign exchange shortage can be divided into two types: 
actual and psychological. Actual shortage is caused by either 
insufficient supply or excessive demand of foreign exchange or a 
combination of the two. In recent years, China's import and 
export trade has developed rapidly, causing demand for use of 
foreign exchange to skyrocket. Especially since 1991, along with 
the high speed growth of the economy, the growth of import has 
far exceeded the growth of export, creating a shortage of supply 
on the foreign exchange market. A direct consequence of the 
shortage is increasingly tightened control of foreign exchange 
and the prevailing mentality of reluctance to sell. The 
appearance of psychological shortage is caused by strict foreign 
exchange control, complicated screening and approval procedures, 
and anticipation for the depreciation of renminbi. Since 1992, 
the mentality of reluctance to sell has been very common on the 
foreign exchange market. This has caused a very unfavorable 
effect on the regulatory functions of the foreign exchange 
market. 
  4. Foreign Exchange Withholding Quota Creates More Harm Than 
Good and Is Unfavorable to the Formation of Foreign Exchange 
Market 
  Beginning 1979, the traditional unified foreign exchange 
collection and distribution system was replaced with the foreign 
exchange withholding quota system. We should say that this 
special system has played a positive role in increasing the 
efficiency of production and management of export enterprises 
and raising the enthusiasm of enterprises. However, as the 
reform and opening up further deepened and objective economic 
conditions changed, some problems have been exposed in the 
foreign exchange withholding quota system. Their main 
expressions are as follows: 1) Foreign exchange quota is 
separated from the actual amount of foreign exchange, causing 
over-distribution of foreign exchange resources, which tend to 
result in the phenomenon of "marrying one girl to two men." 2) 
The existence of both quota price and current exchange price has 
distorted market exchange rate. 3) Withholding quota cannot 
accurately reflect the actual income and expenditure of foreign 
exchange, causing confusion in management. 4) Quota withholding 
is not an international practice. Abolishing the quota 
withholding system and permitting cash foreign exchange 
withholding is an inevitable demand for deepening the reform of 
foreign exchange management system. 
  5. Many Problems Still Exist in the Current Structure and 
Management Method of National Foreign Exchange Reserves 
  First of all, national foreign exchange reserve that the 
state can actually draw on is fairly limited. This is because 
the state cannot transfer or use for free the portion of the 
balance of foreign exchange operational funds of the National 
Bank of China, which constitutes the difference between the 
bank's own foreign exchange funds and routine foreign exchange 
lending. And, localities and enterprises have the actual right 
to use and control their share of the withholdings from national 
foreign exchange balance. Local and enterprise withholdings 
account for a fairly large portion of national foreign exchange 
balance. Secondly, the Central Bank of China cannot function 
effectively to manage foreign exchange reserves, adversely 
affecting the enforcement of the monetary policy. Under the 
current foreign exchange settlement system, the Central Bank of 
China is responsible for supplying renminbi needed for all 
foreign exchange settlements. As a passive supplier of renminbi, 
it is difficult for the Central Bank to take the initiative in 
regulating and controlling the supply according to different 
monetary policies in different periods. More often than not, the 
supply of renminbi by the Central Bank conflicts with the bank's 
monetary policy, reducing the effect of the monetary policy. 
Third, the readjustment of the scale of foreign exchange reserve 
is inflexible and is carried out at a fairly great price. When 
foreign exchange reserve declines and in serious shortage, the 
state often puts various restrictions on the use of foreign 
exchange. When foreign exchange reserve becomes excessive, the 
state often relaxes control in various manners regarding the use 
of foreign exchange and indiscriminately expands the use of 
foreign exchange, eventually resulting in the abrupt and 
excessive reduction of foreign exchange scale. 
  Proposals for Reform of Foreign Exchange System in the Near 
Future 
  The basic solution for the abovementioned problems in the 
current foreign exchange control system is to deepen and speed 
up the reform of the foreign exchange control system. Through 
the reform, we should establish an overall regulation and 
control mechanism for the Central Bank, speed up the formation 
of a unified national foreign exchange market, strengthen the 
control of foreign exchange reserve by the Central Bank, and 
gradually promote free conversion of renminbi. In the near 
future, we should adopt the following measures: 
  1. Strengthen the control of foreign exchange reserve and 
increase the ability of the Central Bank to regulate and control 
foreign exchange market. The key is to establish a foreign 
exchange reserve control system centered around the Central 
Bank, maintain a rational scale of foreign exchange reserve, and 
change the past situation where the foreign exchange funds of 
the bank were not separated from the foreign exchange balance of 
the state and where central foreign exchange was confused with 
foreign exchange withholdings. At the same time, we should 
establish the foreign exchange leverage fund for the Central 
Bank to ensure its ability to adjust to market changes. 
  As China opens its door wider and wider to the outside and 
as 
the domestic economy of China develops, the overall balance of 
the national economy depends on internal and foreign exchange 
balance to maintain, and doing a good job in coordinating the 
relations between domestic monetary and foreign exchange 
policies is extremely important. Judging from the experience of 
various nations, foreign exchange policy is an important 
component of the monetary policy of the Central Bank. When the 
economy of a nation is affected by external factors, causing 
serious fluctuation of foreign exchange market, the central bank 
will openly buy and sell foreign exchange on foreign exchange 
market to suppress exchange prices. This important task cannot 
be accomplished if the central bank does not have enough foreign 
exchange on hand. Because of this, China should speed up the 
reform of foreign exchange transfer and deposit system, change 
the current situation of decentralized foreign exchange control, 
and establish as soon as possible a powerful reserve control 
system. 
  2. Establish a foreign exchange market of effective 
operation. First, we should create a "market starter" to 
facilitate the circulation of foreign exchange funds between 
financial organizations, especially between banks and other 
financial organizations. At the same time, we should expand the 
right and ability of all financial organizations to manage 
foreign exchange and enable them to actively participate in the 
market and create a market amidst fair competition. Second, we 
should further expand the scale of foreign exchange regulation 
to increase the coverage of market. Third, we should accelerate 
the reform of the current foreign exchange withholding system, 
abolish as soon as possible withholding quotas, and smooth out 
foriegn exchang price. Fourth, we should improve the 
administrative divisions of current foreign exchange market, 
establish unified tangible foreign exchange markets based in 
large open cities, and gradually transfer to an invisible 
unified national market. Fifth, we should abolish the 
multi-track foreign exchange rate systems and merge them into 
one. Sixth, we should experiment with free conversion of 
renminbi in nontrade and border-trade areas and gradually make 
it possible to convert renminbi without any restrictions. 
Through the above reforms, we should establish an open, unified, 
and highly effective foreign exchange market. 
  3. Establish an effective foreign exchange statistics 
monitoring system to provide a basis for strengthening the 
overall regulation and control of the Central Bank. 
  Judged from the current situation, international payments 
have a growing impact on the credit income and expenditure of 
the state. Inaccurate statistics of international payments will 
affect the accuracy of policies. Because of this, we should 
seize the golden opportunity created by the International 
Currency Foundation helping us strengthen our foreign exchange 
statistics and build a complete foreign exchange statistics 
system to create conditions for timely understanding, mastering, 
and study of foreign economic activities and for making correct 
policy decisions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40119 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Makes Progress in Rationalizing Industry </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW1901125994 Beijing XINHUA in English 1200 GMT 19 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> OW1901125994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Shenyang, January 19 (XINHUA) -- The reform and 
opening drive has helped rationalize the industrial set-up of 
northeast China's Liaoning Province in addition to promoting its 
all-around economic development. 
  Liaoning Province is one of the country's major industrial 
bases. Its state-owned large and medium-sized enterprises 
account for almost one tenth of the country's total. 
  As the pillar of its economy, industrial enterprises have 
been pushed to the forefront of Liaoning's reform and opening. 
  The Liaoning provincial government has actively absorbed 
foreign investment, introduced advanced technology and adopted 
new operating mechanisms in local industry. 
  So far, 3.5 billion U.S. dollars in funds have been 
earmarked 
for technological transformations in industrial enterprises all 
over the province. 
  Instead of simply buying up advanced technologies from 
foreign enterprises, a number of Liaoning's major industrial 
enterprises also stress developing new technologies of their own. 
  As a newly developed economic sector, high-tech industries 
in 
Liaoning have scored great achievements. 
  Nanhu science and technology development zone in the 
provincial capital city of Shenyang, one of the first zones of 
its kind approved by the State Council, has seen the 
establishment of 1,100 high-tech enterprises. 
  Technology exports from Liaoning last year topped 100 
million 
U.S. dollars, as compared to previous years when the province 
was a technology importer only. 
  Economic structuring within enterprises has also been 
readjusted to meet the needs of the market. Although heavy 
industry still holds sway in Liaoning, light industry has gained 
substantial growth and some heavy industrial enterprises have 
even begun to produce light industrial products as a complement 
to their traditional production lines. 
  Export-oriented sections of state-owned large and 
medium-sized enterprises have also burgeoned. 
  Technology-intensive and investment-intensive productions 
have flourished while labor-intensive ones have shrunk. 
  Readjustment of the industrial structure has correspondingly 
promoted the rationalization of product mix. The output ratio 
of primary products to finished products now stands at six to 
four, as compared with the original eight to two. 
  At present, half of Liaoning's products for export are 
finished products, whereas in the past 85 percent were raw 
materials. 
  Reform of labor and personnel systems and the introduction 
of 
shareholding systems have further invigorated state-owned 
enterprises. 
  The reform and opening drive has laid a solid foundation for 
Liaoning's industrial enterprises to implement a modern 
enterprise system and to better adapt to international markets. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40120 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> SMALL-SCALE ENTERPRISES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Private Businesses Increase in Shanxi, Sichuan </TI></H3>
<H4>   Shanxi Private Enterprises </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0257N Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 23 Jan 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257N </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] By the end of December, there were 507,000 
individual and private enterprises in Shanxi Province, employing 
1,033,000 people. The number of individual businesses totaled 
498,968, employed 882,358 people, and had a registered capital 
of 3.8 billion yuan. The number of private enterprises totaled 
8,132, employed 151,367 people, and had a registered capital of 
1.622 billion yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40121 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> SMALL-SCALE ENTERPRISES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Private Businesses Increase in Shanxi, Sichuan </TI></H3>
<H4>   Sichuan Private Enterprises </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0257O Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI BAO in Chinese 21 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257O </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] By the end of 1993, there were 1,550,000 
individual businesses in Sichuan Province, employing 1,840,000 
people, and with a registered capital of 3.5 billion yuan. 
There were 8,748 private enterprises, employing 120,000 people. 
  In the past private enterprises mainly engaged in the food 
and entertainment industries, now they engage in education, 
scientific research, real estate, and aviation. Fifty 
enterprises had assets exceeding 1 million yuan, and 20 some 
enterprises had assets exceeding 10 million yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40122 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Regulations on Family Planning </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0208A Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 29 Oct 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0208A </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Several Regulations of Jilin Province for the </F>
Administration and Management of Family Planning"] 
  [Text] Article 1. The following regulations are 
formulated according to the 52nd Provisions of the "Rules and 
Regulations of Jilin Province on Family Planning." 
  Article 2. These regulations apply to all 
organizations and citizens within the border of Jilin Province 
(including those who are domiciled in but have physically left 
Jilin Province). 
  Article 3. Family planning shall be enforced to 
advocate that each couple have only one child. Men and women who 
are legally married cannot voluntarily have children unless they 
obtain a child-bearing license. 
  Article 4. Men and women who are at child-bearing 
age and without a child-bearing license must use safe and 
reliable birth control devices. Those who fail to do so to 
comply with the regulations shall be criticized, educated, and 
given a time period to adopt birth control measures. Those who 
have exceeded the time limit shall be charged 1 yuan a day for 
family planning administrative fees until they adopt a birth 
control device. 
  Article 5. Those who have unplanned pregnancies 
which have not been terminated on a voluntary basis shall be 
criticized, educated, and given a time period to terminate their 
pregnancies. If they exceed the time limit, they will be charged 
10 yuan a day for family planning administrative fees until they 
terminate such pregnancies. 
  Article 6. Floating population at child-bearing 
age who have not obtained a "marriage and child-bearing license 
for floating population" according to regulations shall be 
criticized, educated, and given a time period to comply with the 
regulations. If they exceed the time limit, they will be charged 
2 yuan a day for family planning administrative fees until they 
obtain the "marriage and child-bearing license for floating 
population." 
  Article 7. If related departments fail to handle 
relevant procedures for floating population at child-bearing 
age, those who are directly responsible for such failure shall 
be charged 100 to 200 yuan of family planning administrative 
fees for each case and may be given administrative punishments 
depending on the seriousness of the case. 
  Article 8. Those who cover up and shield pregnant 
women, resulting in unplanned birth shall be charged 3,000 to 
5,000 yuan of family planning administrative fees depending on 
the seriousness of the case. 
  Article 9. Units where employees have unplanned 
births shall be criticized by notices of local people's 
government organs at and above the county level. Responsible 
persons in the units shall be investigated for administrative 
liability. The units shall be disqualified as contenders for 
annual advanced collective and civilized unit in addition to 
being charged 2,000 to 10,000 yuan of family planning 
administrative fees for each occurrence. 
  If employees and temporary workers, who are fired for 
unplanned pregnancies, have unplanned births, their previous 
units will be treated according to the preceding article. 
  Article 10. Those who have unplanned births will 
be charged unplanned birth fees according to the following 
standards: 
  1. 1,000 to 5,000 yuan for first unplanned birth. 
  2. 5,000 to 30,000 yuan for second unplanned birth. 
  3. 10,000 to 60,000 yuan for third and more unplanned 
births. 
  Adoption of children in violation of the Adoption Law of the 
People's Republic of China shall be considered as unplanned 
births and charged for unplanned birth fees according to the 
preceding article. 
  Article 11. In addition to the treatments 
specified in Article 10, those who have unplanned birth will 
receive the following treatments from their own units and 
departments concerned: 
  1. Employees shall not be paid during maternity leave and be 
held responsible for their own birth expenses. Both husband and 
wife shall be demoted one level on the wage scale, disqualified 
for three years as contenders for awards or model workers, and 
not allowed to be promoted within five years. Those whose cases 
are serious shall be subject to administrative sanctions such as 
dismissal, suspension, or firing. 
  2. Farming couples shall not be considered for employment of 
worker or cadres or allowed to be transferred to register as 
residents of cities or towns. 
  Article 12. Charges under 10,000 yuan shall be 
decided by township and town people's governments or by 
neighborhood offices. Charges of 10,000 yuan or over shall be 
decided by functional departments of people's governments at and 
above the county level. 
  Article 13. Parties who disagree with the decision 
of charges by administrative organs may request reconsideration 
or appeal pursuant to the 55th Provision of the Rules and 
Regulations of Jilin Province on Family Planning. 
  Article 14. Concrete issues in the implementation 
of these regulations shall be interpreted by the family planning 
administrative department of Jilin Province. 
  Article 15. These regulations shall become 
effective on 1 October 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40123 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Anhui Cotton Output, Procurement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257Q Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 15 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257Q </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 gross output of cotton in Anhui Province 
reached 5.2 million dan, basically the same level as the 5.25 
milllion dan produced in 1992. By the end of December, Anhui 
had procured 2.75 million dan of cotton, fulfilling 61 percent 
of the task. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40124 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liaoning Hog Stocks Decline </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257M Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI BAO in Chinese 7 Dec 93 p 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0257M </F>
<F P=104>  Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] At present Liaoning Province has 9,250,000 hogs 
in stock, a 9.8 percent decline from the same period in 1992. 
There are 730,000 farrow sows, a 24.9 percent decrease from the 
same period in 1992; there are about 700,000 reserve sows, a 3 
percent decrease; and there are 1,910,000 piglets, a 5 percent 
decrease. In the fourth quarter it is estimated that 1,800,000 
hogs will be removed from stock, a 10 percent decrease from the 
same period in 1992. Farmers will consume 500,000, the 
government will procure 200,000, markets will sell 1,050,000, 
and other sectors will consume 50,000 hogs. The procurement 
price has increased from 3.4-3.6 yuan per kilogram to 3.8-4.4 
yuan per kilogram. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40125 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar010___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Excessive' Financial Burden Burdens Peasants </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0248A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] in 
Chinese No 11, Nov 93 pp 30-34 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0248A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Deng Xinsheng (6772 2450 3932) of the Price </F>
Research Institute in Hainan Province: "Hainan Peasants Bear 
Excessive Financial Burden"] 
  [Text] The excessive social burden on peasants has always 
been a popular conversation topic in Hainan Province. 
Governments at all levels have taken this matter seriously in 
recent years and done a good deal of work with a considerable 
measure of success. Nevertheless, peasants in some places 
continue to be saddled with an excessive social burden, which 
not only constrains agricultural output growth, but also 
constitutes the leading social problem in rural areas today. 
<H5>  Present Situation </H5>
  1. The heavy burden of rural education. 
  To begin with, rural elementary and secondary schools 
collect 
too many assorted fees and charges. Departments in charge of 
education at all levels pay teachers' wages only but otherwise 
give no financial aid to schools. To keep operating normally, 
the schools always target students in their fund-raising 
efforts. Every freshman in the junior high section of Longjiang 
Secondary School in Qionghai Shi must pay 20 fees and charges 
each year, which cost him as much as 141 yuan in all. Zheyuanbo 
Elementary School at Dalu Zhen in Qionghai Shi issues formal 
receipts for fee collection. According to a survey report issued 
by the agricultural commission of Dingan County, students 
attending township and administrative district elementary and 
secondary schools must pay for a host of things in addition to 
tuition and textbooks, including maintenance, water and 
electricity, equipment, recreation, instructional apparatus, 
books, private teachers, class society, school administration, 
sanitation, scholarships, teaching and research, law and order, 
personal insurance, cafeteria, school construction, physical 
examination, tree planting, locks, and broomsticks. Each 
semester a senior high student must shell out more than 180 
yuan; a junior high student, 150 yuan; and an elementary school 
student, 90 yuan. In Wanning County, the price bureau authorizes 
rural elementary and secondary schools to collect 13 fees each 
semester with a combined value of 73 yuan, 59.5 yuan, or 36.2 
yuan, depending on whether the student attends senior high, 
junior high, or elementary school. In reality, elementary and 
secondary school students must each dish out over 100 yuan per 
semester in fees and charges. Of the 140 school-age children in 
Longjie district (village) in Longtang Zhen in Dingan County in 
1992, 50 were forced to quit school because they could not 
afford the tuition. 
  Second, there is a growing trend to raise funds from among 
the rural population to build schools, a trend that has really 
picked up steam in recent years in the countryside. Apart from a 
modicum of funds from the state, peasants are left almost 
entirely on their own to come up with the necessary funds. Thus 
school construction expenses have become one of the onerous 
burdens on peasants. In Dingan County, the per capita school 
construction burden on peasants is 55 yuan. In Longjie 
administrative district (village) in Longtang Zhen, 73 yuan were 
raised on a per capita basis to fund school construction. Nanyin 
Village has yet to achieve grain self-sufficiency; 60 percent of 
the peasant households find it necessary to sell off some of 
their grain to eke out a living. To help pay for a two-story 
teaching building for the village elementary school, every 
peasant was required to come up with 75 yuan (stones and rocks 
extra). This and other burdens make life a struggle for many 
peasants. Their children are forced to quit school because they 
don't have the money to pay their tuition. 
  2. Growing sugar cane an unprofitable proposition for 
peasants. 
  Sugar cane is a leading cash crop in rural Hainan. Since the 
beginning of last year, however, the demand for sugar cane has 
stagnated and prices have dropped to 1,800 yuan per ton. Sugar 
cane procurement prices too have been adjusted downward three 
times, from 130 to 100 yuan per ton. Furthermore, peasants were 
issued IOUs as government fell behind in payment for months. 
Between the pressing season of 1992 and that of 1993, sugar cane 
growers in the province were owed almost 100 million yuan, or 
30.4 yuan per ton. As sugar refineries fell into arrears, the 
peasants experienced difficulty paying off their loans on time 
even as their interest payments mounted month after month, which 
translated into yet another heavy burden on them. Between the 
pressing seasons of 1992 and 1993, the prices of refined white 
sugar skyrocketed to more than 2,300 yuan a ton. Yet the sugar 
cane procurement price remained 100 yuan or so. Furthermore, the 
prices of agricultural capital goods have risen sharply since 
last year, pushing up production costs steadily. Then there are 
the "12 worms in every sugar cane," meaning that 12 fees have to 
be paid during the entire process from the moment the cane is 
cut through shipment to its sale. Everybody, including the 
despatcher, the truck driver, the quality inspector, and the 
person in charge of weighing the cane, tries to extort some 
money from the cane grower. Paying off all these people can set 
him back between 80 and 100 yuan per mu of land cultivated with 
sugar cane. According to calculations, once the yield of his 
sugar cane fields drops below 3 tons per mu, a grower cannot 
expect to make a profit. The underpricing of sugar cane at the 
procurement level has dampened the enthusiasm of peasants for 
growing this particular crop. Sugar cane mismanagement has now 
become commonplace in many localities, with numerous peasants 
giving up on management or planning to switch to other crops. 
According to statistics compiled by the appropriate departments, 
a decline in sugar cane output in Hainan this year is a foregone 
conclusion. 
  3. Taxes on pigs, cattle, and sheep excessive. 
  For every pig slaughtered, a peasant in Qiongzhong County is 
required to pay a total of 39.4 yuan to five agencies, 
specifically, 11 yuan to the food department, 16.5 yuan to the 
industry and commerce administrative bureau, 6.6 yuan to the tax 
agency, 3.3 yuan to the animal husbandry department, and 2 yuan 
to the environmental protection agency. In Qionghai Shi, it 
costs a peasant anywhere from 27 yuan to 32 yuan to slaughter a 
pig, including 6.6 yuan in slaughtering tax, 11 yuan in 
industrial and commercial administrative fees, 2 yuan in 
environmental protection fee, 1 yuan in epidemic prevention fee, 
0.4 yuan in slaughtering charge, and 5 yuan in slaughtering fee. 
Some departments are given to raising the standards for 
calculating fees arbitrarily. With no authorization, a certain 
provincial-level department went ahead anyway and issued a 
directive raising the environmental protection fees for 
slaughtering pigs, cattle, and sheep from a uniform 0.5 yuan to 
1, 2, or 3 yuan, depending on whether the animal is a pig, 
cattle, or sheep, and passed on this extra burden to the 
producers (peasants). It takes a lot of hard work by the peasant 
to raise a pig, but he makes hardly a penny in profit after 
selling the animal. 
  4. Too many fees and charges imposed on the fishery 
industry. 
  According to the survey report by the agricultural 
commission 
of Qionghai Shi, the following fees and charges are imposed on 
fishermen in Tangyu Zhen by the various departments involved: 1) 
Each year the township government collects from every fisherman 
50 yuan in harbor construction fee and 5 yuan in military 
pension fund; 2) the administrative district (village) collects 
15 yuan in accumulation fund annually, along with another 15 
yuan in management fund; 3) the fishery supervisory board 
collects 10.8 yuan for every unit of horsepower. With one worker 
being equivalent to seven units of horsepower, that amounts to a 
levy of 75.6 yuan; 4) the environmental protection agency 
collects an environmental resource protection fee each year on 
the basis of 5 yuan per unit of horsepower, which translates 
into an average of 35 yuan; 5) the police sub-station collects a 
law and order fee at the rate of 3 yuan per person per year; 6) 
the provincial shipping inspection department collects an annual 
inspection fee which ranges from 220 yuan to 250 yuan per 
vessel, or 22 to 25 yuan per person on the average; 7) a new 
vessel registration and certification fee is also levied, which 
could be anywhere from 300 to 400 yuan. The burden on fishermen 
averages 708 yuan per person per year, about 8.5 percent of the 
total per capita income (including taxes). The extra-tax burden 
is 308 yuan, or 3.7 percent of the total income. 
  5. Too many charges on agricultural vehicles. 
  An array of fees is collected on the walking tractor used in 
the countryside, including 11 fees authorized by the provincial 
price bureau and three provided for by the provincial 
transportation department, not to mention other payments 
required by the provincial finance department and industry and 
commerce bureau. When a peasant purchases a walking tractor 
before entering the rural transportation business, he is 
required under the law to pay 975.8 yuan in taxes each year. In 
fact, he must dish out much more. According to a survey by the 
agricultural commission of Lingshui County, he who owns a 
pedicab must pay 11 fees in addition to shelling out 1,645 yuan 
in taxes. 
  6. Overly high rural electric rates. 
  The cost of electricity exceeds 1 yuan per kilowatt-hour in 
the countryside in most municipalities and counties in Hainan. 
It costs an average of 1.3 yuan per kwh in the two counties of 
Qiongshan and Chengmai, 1.35 yuan in Qionghai Shi, as much as 2 
yuan per kwh in some townships and towns, and a whopping 4 yuan 
in a handful of townships. Hence this strange spectacle in some 
villages --people lighting kerosene lamps to watch TV. The high 
costs of electricity are mainly caused by: 1) the mismanagement 
of the power industry. The industry is over-staffed, circuits 
are poorly designed, equipment is obsolete, and waste is 
considerable; 2) rural power supply stations continue to charge 
fees as they please. In Qionghai Shi, for instance, peasants are 
already paying for the acquisition and installation of rural 
electric meters. On top of that, however, some township and town 
power bureaus collect a meter fee at the rate of 1 yuan per 
meter. As there are more than 60,000 meters in the city, this 
levy alone generates an additional 720,000 yuan. 
  7. The high costs of health care in the countryside. 
  The prices of drugs and medical care have shot up rapidly in 
recent years. In addition, a handful of rural hospitals have 
been imposing or raising fees indiscriminately. The result is 
hefty health care bills for peasants. As the masses in Ledong 
county tell it, ever since rural hospitals introduced a new 
system under which the hospital pays the basic wages and the 
technical office takes care of subsidies, bonuses, and other 
wages, the technical office has been charging all manner of fees 
arbitrarily. To enhance their incomes, doctors have all their 
patients undergo a full check-up and every laboratory test 
available regardless of the severity of their illness. They also 
over-prescribe. If you have a cold, a visit to the doctor can 
cost you anywhere from a dozen yuan to a hundred yuan. 
  8. The proliferation of fees, charges, fund-raising schemes, 
and apportionments proliferate. 
  There has been an explosion of fees, charges, fund-raising 
schemes, and apportionments in the countryside, with numerous 
agencies getting in the act. Taxes collected by the state have 
not gone up by much, but local levies, fees, charges, 
fund-raising, and apportionments are legion. According to 
peasants in Qionghai Shi, marriage registration entails the 
payment of five fees: marriage certificate fee, 9 yuan; sponsor 
fee, 20 yuan; physical check-up fee, 25.5 yuan; fetus protection 
fee, 20 yuan; and frequency modulation trumpet fee, 58 yuan. The 
combined price tag is 132.5 yuan. Studies show that some 
counties have written regulations requiring every peasant 
household to pay a 1-yuan law and order fee, with another yuan 
payable to the administrative district (village). Besides 
apportioning construction investment funds among the peasant 
households, some villages also collect funds to pay for bridges, 
roads, wells, cultural centers, communal temples, and ancestral 
halls. 
  9. Hidden burden getting heavier. 
  Following steep increases in the prices of agricultural 
capital goods since the beginning of the year, agricultural 
production costs have gone up significantly. Between January and 
June this year the prices of agricultural capital goods soared 
37.1 percent compared to the corresponding period a year ago. 
Specifically, the prices of chemical fertilizers shot up 56.1 
percent; oil for use in farm machinery, 78.7 percent; and small 
farm tools, 25.4 percent. In contrast, the market price of grain 
(rice) rose just 23 percent in the January-June period over the 
same period last year. The production costs of early season rice 
this year are projected to exceed those of last year by 40 
percent or so, leaving little profit for grain-growing peasants. 
<H5>  Causes </H5>
  1. Misconceptions spreading unchecked. 
  As the old institutions give way to the new, the 
pleasure-seeking habit of some cadres provides fertile soil for 
money worship. Amidst funding contracting, some departments and 
units have been scrambling to raise revenue in each and every 
way possible, officially to increase the wages and benefits of 
their workers but actually to line their own pockets and satisfy 
their own greed. Concocting various contexts and relying on 
their power and position, some power organs at the township and 
town level force peasants to part with their hard-earned money, 
even compelling them to sell their livestock and deducting money 
from the sums payable to the peasants in return for the grain 
they turn over to the government. Some municipal, county, and 
township agencies try to outdo one another. Whatever one 
jurisdiction levies, others want to do likewise. The idea is to 
collect the most fees and charges and offer the most benefits. 
As a result, fees and charges overlap one another, expenses are 
apportioned indiscriminately, and funds are raised in a 
disorderly manner. All these trends have become commonplace. 
  2. Many public welfare projects are being undertaken with no 
bearing to reality. 
  With the introduction of the household responsibility system 
of linking remuneration to output in the countryside after the 
3d Plenum of the 11th CPC Central Committee, the peasants' 
living standards have indeed risen markedly. On the whole, 
however, most peasants have just enough to eat and wear; the 
truly affluent peasants are few and far between. In some 
localities, the officials overestimate the extent of wealth 
among the peasants and consequently mistake unripe conditions to 
be just the opposite. Divorcing themselves from reality and 
ignoring objective conditions, with no regard for the level of 
development of the local economy, they blindly pursue big 
projects and grand projects and indiscriminately go after 
"upgrading," all in the name of reaching some standards in 
everything they do, whether it be building an elementary school, 
a nursing home, or a nursery school. Even after a project meets 
the standards, there are new demands. For instance, after a 
school was built according to specifications, there were demands 
for "six coordinations" or "ten coordinations" and calls for the 
construction of a school of the garden style. Where does the 
money come from? Since the government refuses to pay, the costs 
have to be passed onto the peasants. Caught up in the social 
climate of putting money before everything else, some 
departments and units have come to regard as a commodity what 
should rightly be provided as a service and demand that peasants 
pay for it. 
  3. Organizational over-staffing. 
  The emphasis in institutional organization on having an 
identical lineup of agencies or departments at every level is an 
important reason why fee-collection, apportionment of expenses, 
and fund-raising have gone out of hand. In recent years there 
has been a mindless preoccupation with institutional matching, 
meaning that when a municipality or county sets up a bureau, 
townships insist on having a station or center staffed with 
full-time workers. The result is a rise in the off-budget 
staffing level in townships. Nowadays one can typically find 
more than a dozen departments with almost 60 workers in a 
township. More offices mean more staffers and a heavier burden 
on peasants. 
  4. Shortfall in educational funding. 
  The shortfall in educational funding is a major problem 
facing society today, with the shortage being particularly acute 
at the township level. One cannot complain when rural schools in 
poverty-stricken areas try to stay afloat, improve the 
conditions in which they operate, and close the gap in their 
budgets by imposing a number of charges as appropriate. However, 
some rural schools have overstepped the bounds of reasonableness 
by collecting too many charges, thus making the burden on 
peasants even more onerous. 
  5. Poor quality of cadres 
  Most complaints in the countryside these days have to do 
with 
three trends. One is wining and dining, with rural grassroots 
cadres being the worst offenders. By spending lavishly on food 
and drinks, they have created a leading public evil. Second, 
everybody is going in for ostentation and extravagance and 
trying to outdo one another on that score. The standards are 
getting more and more stringent. Third, a covert form of greed 
is spreading. The cadres in some villages (administrative 
districts) line their personal pockets with public funds. Using 
all kinds of pretexts and in every way possible, they infringe 
upon public properties and the peasants' interests. Some of the 
off-budget personnel are of an exceptionally poor quality. They 
have little awareness of the concept of the law and some have 
been assigned to their jobs without any training. The result is 
that they break the law frequently. In recent years, 
municipalities, counties, townships, and villages 
(administrative districts) have all been making their own 
home-grown policies. Although both the State Council and 
provincial government have issued repeated orders demanding that 
the burden on peasants be lessened, a number of grassroots 
cadres have chosen to ignore such orders and, driven by private 
interests, continue to try to balance their budgets on the 
peasants' backs by levying charges on them and apportioning 
expenses and raising funds among them in an arbitrary manner. 
  6. There is no adequate effective supervision and 
inspection. 
  It is the responsibility of the price, finance, and auditing 
departments to investigate the "three indiscriminates," that is, 
the indiscriminate levying of charges, indiscriminate 
apportionment of expenses, and indiscriminate fund-raising. In 
reality nobody wants to get involved because of the resistance 
and many difficulties encountered. Moreover, cooperation is 
lacking among the agencies. There are cases in which fees are 
collected, expenses apportioned, and funds raised in blatant 
violation of the national policy, yet such acts are authorized 
by or have the blessing of leading organs at the same level of 
government. The prices, finance, and auditing agencies have 
neither the power to investigate nor the courage to report to 
the authorities above. So the trends are allowed to go unchecked 
and the "three indiscriminates" get worse and worse. Meanwhile, 
the burden on peasants becomes heavier and heavier. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40126 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Tobacco Area, Output </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257P Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 13 Dec 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0257P </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 the actual tobacco area was 22,400,000 
mu, and output will reach 2,850,000 tons. Including the 
2,250,000 tons of tobacco in storage at the end of June, gross 
output will exceed 5 million tons. The domestic cigarette 
industry consumes over 1.8 million tons annually, and annual 
tobacco exports are about 150,000 tons. At present there is 
enough tobacco to meet the needs of the cigarette industry and 
exports for the next two and a half years. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40127 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   3d Quarter Sichuan Pork Output </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257G Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI BAO in Chinese 30 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257G </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] By the end of the third quarter, Sichuan 
Province had removed 40,920,000 hogs from stock, and pork output 
was 2,660,000 tons, increases of 3.29 percent and 2.74 percent 
respectively over the same period in 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40128 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangsu 1993 Grain Output, Farmer Income </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0257R Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO in Chinese 1 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0257R </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 the gross output of grain in Jiangsu 
Province was 32.32 billion kilograms, exceeding the guidance 
plan by 4.3 percent. The cash crop area exceeded 2 million 
hectares, and accounted for one-fourth of the crop area. 
Estimated per capita farmer net income is 1,200 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40129 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lu Rongjing's Address to 5th Anhui CPC Committee </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0121A Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 22 Dec 93 pp 1,3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0121A </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lu Rongjing (4151 2837 2529): "Speech to the </F>
Tenth (Enlarged) Plenary Session of the Fifth Provincial CPC 
Committee (Excerpts) 13 December 1993"] 
  [Text] The main topics of this meeting are further study of 
the implementation of the spirit of the 3d Plenary Session of 
the 14th Party Congress, relaying and putting into effect the 
spirit of the National Economic Work Conference convened by the 
State Council, summarizing the work of 1993, focusing on the 
building of a socialist market economy system, studying and 
making plans for Anhui Province's further intensification of 
reform, optimizing the structure, increasing returns, and 
continuing to maintain sustained, rapid, and healthy development 
of the economy. Below, I will discuss several views on these 
topics based on the spirit of the provincial CPC committee's 
study. 
  I. Dialectically Analyzing the Situation, Using 
Summarization of Experiences as Basis for Further Strengthening 
of Confidence About Acceleration of Development 
  Guided by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory about building a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism and the spirit of the 
Fourteenth CPC Committee, during 1993 the people of the entire 
province emancipated thinking, rallied spirits, and seized 
opportunities. Enthusiasm for accelerating development runs very 
high, and reform and opening to the outside world, and 
modernization have entered a new stage. Throughout the province, 
the political situation is stable, society is moving ahead, and 
the economy is running well. In reviewing the year's work, the 
following matters are of rather profound significance: 
  First is taking a firm grip on the crucial matter of 
emancipating thinking to change ways of thinking, promoting a 
transformation of ideas, and spurring work overall. The 8th 
Plenary Session of the 5th Provincial CPC Committee convened in 
1992 highlighted the emancipation of thinking to change ways of 
thinking. It linked ideological realities with work realities, 
suggested the need to intensify study to comprehend Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's important remarks and the spirit of the 14th Party 
Congress, maintained the unity of the emancipation of thinking 
and the seeking of truth from facts, changed attitudes about 
resignation to poverty, insulation and conservatism, and 
traditional planned economy concepts as well as isolated and 
lopsided ways of thinking. It increased awareness of the need to 
forge ahead, awareness of the need to innovate, market economy 
awareness, and dialectical awareness of being responsible for 
the overall situation. The entire province, from top to bottom, 
conscientiously implemented the spirit of this conference. Their 
understanding of the theory of building a distinctively Chinese 
brand of socialism and the basic line of the party deepened; 
their awareness of the need for wholehearted attention to the 
economy increased; their horizons broadened and they tried more 
methods. After the Central Committee prepared a policy for 
intensifying and improving macroeconomic regulation and control, 
all levels and all government departments proceeded from 
realities to gain a profound understanding of the importance of 
and necessity for Central Committee policies. They fully 
realized that correct macroeconomic regulation and control is 
indispensable to the acceleration of development and for 
positive solution to existing problems. At the same time, they 
clearly understood and acted on the favorable opportunities that 
the Central Committee's policies provide an agricultural and 
resources-rich province such as ours. They diligently studied 
how to develop in a situation of intensified and improved 
macroeconomic regulation and control, both overcoming the abuses 
of the "large common pot" of the traditional planned economy 
system in which everyone benefitted no matter their 
contribution. They also guarded against the problems stemming 
from decentralization in a market economy, thereby enabling the 
economy of the whole province to maintain a both rapid and good 
development momentum. 
  Second is resolutely putting into effect the idea that 
"development is the only assurance, making every effort to seize 
opportunities to accelerate development." Working from a 
foundation of further emancipation of thinking, the 9th Plenary 
Session of the 5th Provincial CPC Committee convened in April. 
It stressed the need to cherish and seize the favorable 
opportunity provided by Comrade Xiaoping's important remarks and 
the spirit of the 14th Party Congress to further clarify battle 
objectives in an effort to open up new economic growth points 
and to move Anhui's economy a new step upward. Bearing in mind 
the goal of rural villages attaining a comfortable well-off 
standard of living, the session conducted a lengthy discussion 
to clarify specific criteria for a comfortable well-off standard 
of living at all levels. Consequently, a comfortable well-off 
standard of living became even more a real activity of rural 
cadres and masses. A number of economic growth points having 
rather strong vitality are in process of taking shape rapidly. A 
number of infrastructure projects in the communications and 
transportation fields, as well as energy, and raw and processed 
materials projects have been completed and have gone into 
production one after another. The province's overall economic 
strength has increased markedly. One might say that 1993 has 
been the year of most rapid growth and best development since 
the advent of reform and opening up to the outside world. 
  Third is maintenance of the intensification of reform 
as a means of solving contradictions and problems in moving 
ahead to win positive results. In the cities, the emphasis 
is on the key task of transforming the operating mechanisms of 
state-owned enterprises, continuation of the implementation of 
the "Regulations," diligent transformation of government 
functions, more rapid straightening out of equity relationships, 
and boldly running pilot projects on various forms of operation 
including state ownership with civilian operation, public 
ownership with private operation, leasing, mergers and 
annexations, and bankruptcies from which fairly good results 
have been obtained. In particular, fairly rapid progress has 
been made in promoting the joint-stock system. Rural villages 
have seen the widespread application of the township and town 
enterprise joint-stock cooperation system. Pilot projects for 
reform of the land and household registration control system 
have been actively run to encourage and support the shift into 
non-agricultural industries of surplus rural manpower. Major 
efforts have been put into the fostering of rural markets to 
improve rural socialized services. These measures have played a 
positive role in promoting restructuring of the rural economy, 
in increasing peasant income, and in improving the basic 
position of agriculture. At the same time, definite advances 
have also been made in associated reforms of the commodity 
circulation system, social security, housing, and medical care 
to lay the groundwork for solving deep-seated incongruities in 
economic life. 
  Fourth is unflagging attention throughout to the 
building of the party and the building of spiritual 
civilization, greater efforts beginning to be made in both 
regards. 
  In organizing party building and the building of spiritual 
civilization, personnel turnover tasks were completed smoothly 
at all levels. A large number of young cadres in the prime of 
their life, who are politically steadfast, and who have done 
yeoman service are moving up to new leadership positions to 
infuse new vitality into leadership teams. They will help the 
revamping of grassroots level organizations and the training of 
grassroots cadres, and they will improve the fighting 
capabilities of grassroots level organizations. 
  In the building of ideological work style, the study of 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on the building of a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism has been diligently 
organized, and further concrete measures have been proposed for 
improving the ideological work style of leadership teams. Ideas 
have been formulated to improve party style and to build clean 
government, and solid work has been done in carrying out a 
battle against corruption. Since the second meeting of the 
Central Disciplinary Committee, in particular, acting in 
accordance with Central Committee demands and realities in our 
own province, emphasis has been placed on four tasks, namely on 
county-level and above leadership cadre honesty and 
self-discipline, the investigation and punishment of large and 
important cases, the eradication of the several unhealthy 
tendencies that the masses most dislike, and eliminating the 
diversion of public funds and the use of public funds to send 
sons, daughters, and close friends to college. Preliminary 
results have been achieved in these regards. Thanks to these 
efforts, the ideological style and the work style of leadership 
cadres has been changed anew. In the building of spiritual 
civilization, ideological indoctrination about reform and 
opening up to the outside world has been intensified, efforts 
made to focus everyone's attention on accelerating development, 
the entire province, from top to bottom further forming a 
powerful cooperative force for wholehearted development of the 
economy. To stir to the full the enthusiasm of all quarters, all 
levels have made a great effort to protect the rights and 
interests of the masses, and to safeguard political tranquility 
and social stability. They have particularly concentrated their 
energies on effective measures for solving some glaring problems 
about which the reaction of the public has been intense, such as 
excessive peasant burdens, delays in payment of teachers wages, 
and poor social order in some places. 
  At the same time, we must clearly realize that many 
difficulties and problems continue in our work at the present 
time. We must give them a lot of attention and take positive 
actions to solve them. In particular, we must solve them 
conscientiously through the intensification of reform. 
  II. Use of Reform as the Main Theme in Accelerating the 
Building of the Basic Framework for a Socialist Market Economy 
System To Move the Province's Overall Strength a Step Upward 
  Seizing opportunities, accelerating development, and 
concentrating energies on improving the building of the economy 
is our steadfast policy. Today, Anhui is at a crucial period in 
accelerating development. With hard work, it will succeed; if we 
are lax, it will fail. We must clench our teeth, press on 
without letup, and seize opportunities to move ahead. So long as 
quality is good, markets exist, and a return can be made, we 
should work at full tilt, doing all possible to seize the 
initiative. Of course, our advocacy of faster development most 
certainly does not mean "arbitrary uniformity." The differences 
in economic development between one region and another have been 
shaped by history, and the conditions for development are not 
entirely the same. Places having the conditions for rapid 
development must accelerate development. Where conditions do not 
exist for the time being, we must not insist on competing, muich 
less resort to deception about development. However, a maximum 
effort must be made to create the conditions for gradual 
acceleration of development. There positively must be no blaming 
of objective conditions to cover up work shortcomings and 
failure to try. At the same time, we must realize that 
acceleration of development requires new approaches, genuinely 
shifting to a new course in which restructuring and improving 
returns are the centerpieces. 
  The coming year is a year of all-out promotion of reforms. 
Numerous reform measures of great intensity will be inaugurated. 
These reforms will mean a readjustment of interests in many 
quarters. Complex situations and problems will be faced. Doing 
effective work in every regard will not only have a bearing on 
the smooth promotion of each reform, but on the stability of the 
entire society as well. CPC committees and governments at all 
levels must diligently study the Central Committees various 
reform policies, thoroughly grasp their spirit, keep abreast of 
favorable conditions in an overall way, make full preparations, 
and do a solid job of carrying them out in an active and 
well-founded way. In addition, we must create conditions 
actively through our own efforts and effective work, work hard 
in the pattern of new interest relations that reform has 
brought, seek out greater development opportunities, and 
accelerate our advance. 
  The overall guiding thought and requirements for work in the 
coming year are: Taking Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory for the 
building of a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism as a 
guide, diligent implementation of the spirit of the 14th Party 
Congress and of the 3d Plenary Session of the 14th Central 
Committee; adherence to work in several directions at the same 
time, further emancipation of thinking, seizing opportunities, 
accelerating the pace of reforms in building a socialist market 
economy system, widening opening up to the outside world, 
maintaining a good momentum of rapid economic development even 
while ensuring that quality is higher than in 1993 and that 
returns will be better in 1994, promoting advance of overall 
provincial strength to a new stage, and raising work in every 
field to a new level. 
  1. Focus on the Building of a Modern Enterprise System, 
Accelerate the Straightening Out of Equity Relationships, and 
Concentrate Efforts on Invigorating State-Owned 
Enterprises. Acceleration of the straightening out of 
enterprise equity relationships, exploration of diversified ways 
of operating assets, and genuinely enlivening enterprises to 
enable steady increase in the value of assets, simultaneously 
doing more to build a corps of entrepreneurs, and nurturing and 
creating a large number of entrepreneurs that fit in with the 
modern enterprise system are the keys to current intensification 
of state-owned enterprise reform and the building of a modern 
enterprise system. The building of a modern enterprise system 
must proceed from realities. It must be tailored to different 
kinds of enterprises and operating conditions, different ways 
and means adopted. For large and medium state-owned enterprises, 
the main task is a transformation from the former "plant system" 
to a "corporation system." This is the main direction and task 
in enterprise reform. In addition to transforming enterprises of 
a monopoly character in accordance with the individual 
proprietorship system, competitive enterprises must be 
transformed according to the regular corporation system. Every 
effort must be made to transform most state-owned enterprises 
among basic industries, raw and processed materials industries, 
processing industries, and tertiary industries into limited 
liability corporations in which many shareholders hold shares. 
When conditions are ripe, they may also be transformed into 
joint-stock limited corporations. Demarcation lines between 
industries and systems must be demolished, equity relationships 
being used as the hub for organizing diverse forms of 
corporation system enterprise blocs as economic development 
inherently requires. Small state-owned enterprises must be 
boldly decontrolled. Some may institute contract operation and 
lease operation; others may be reorganized as stock-share 
cooperation operations, or they may be sold to collectives or 
individuals. Especially hard-hit enterprises that have serious 
losses and whose assets are insufficient to defray liabilities 
must be actively annexed or merged, auctioned off, or allowed to 
go bankrupt. For the past several years, many places in the 
province have been running pilot projects in these regards from 
which heartening results have been obtained. Incomplete 
statistics show that more than one-third of the nearly 300 
money-losing enterprises in the province that have been annexed 
or merged have begun to turn their losses into profits. Every 
jurisdiction must diligently summarize and learn lessons from 
these experiences, and apply them to their own situations. They 
must further explore effective ways to straighten out equity 
relationships. No matter the form or method, so long as it meets 
the "three facilitates" standards, it may be courageously 
adopted and actively practiced. At the county level in 
particular, where most enterprises are medium or small, there 
must be greater deregulation in an effort to make major 
advances. Basic work must be done to straighten out enterprise 
equity relationships. A priority task is reappraising the stocks 
and assets of enterprises, defining equity rights, clarifying 
credits and liabilities, appraising assets, and verifying the 
amount of assets held by enterprise juridical entities. 
Simultaneous with accelerated straightening out of equity 
relationships and the promotion of diverse forms of operating 
assets must be diligent attention to the implementation of 
"Regulations on Changing the Operating Mechanisms of Industrial 
Enterprises Under Ownership of the Whole People," and 
"State-Owned Assets Supervision and Control Regulations." This 
has as its purpose the improvement of enterprise administration 
and management, guiding enterprises to condition their internal 
operating system, accelerating enterprises' technological 
transformation, and raising overall enterprise caliber. 
  Establishment and perfection of a modern enterprise system 
is 
not only a fundamental transformation of the microeconomic 
economic base, but also has a bearing on complete and profound 
changes in the macroeconomic system and the political system. It 
requires comprehensive associated reform of the economic control 
system, the market system, the legal system, and the social 
security system. We must make people think more about the needs 
of the overall situation, correctly handle readjustment of 
equity relationships, and ensure implementation of all reform 
measures. In 1994, reform of Anhui Province's government organs 
will also get underway. Plans call for completion of reforms 
over a 12-year period. Prior to the formal inauguration of the 
implementation plans, all levels should pay close attention to 
necessary preparations, taking real strides in further 
transformation of government functions. They must continue to 
use all means to place personnel in other jobs or assign them 
elsewhere to create the conditions necessary for smooth 
implementation of organization reform. After plans are formally 
inaugurated, all jurisdictions must carefully organize for 
active and soundly based action. Social security system reform 
is lagging at the present time. It has become a prominent factor 
limiting progress in enterprise reform. We must act within the 
spirit of the "Decisions," gradually setting up a province-wide 
centralized social security management organization, starting 
with the cities, to hasten formation of a social security system 
that covers all staff members and workers, that provides basic 
protection, and that augments insurance. This will provide 
support for enterprise reform and the free movement of manpower. 
  2. Focus on Attainment of the Goal of a Comfortable 
Well-Off Standard of Living, Accelerating Restructuring of the 
Rural Economy, and Concentrating on Increasing Peasant 
Income. Development of China's rural economy today has 
begun to enter a new stage in which restructuring and improved 
returns are the main features. The overall approach in the 
province's rural work during 1994 is to pursue the goal of a 
comfortable well-off standard of living while stabilizing the 
party's basic rural policies, adhering to a market orientation, 
deepening rural economic system reform, hastening the 
development of market agriculture, establishing a scientific and 
effective macroeconomic regulation and control system, 
lightening the peasants' burdens, genuinely protecting the 
peasants' interests, and vigorously supporting the development 
of agriculture. It is especially necessary to take a systems 
engineering point of view, paying close attention to 
accelerating structural readjustments, hastening the development 
of township and town enterprises, speeding up the development of 
"one premium and two highs" agriculture [i.e., premium products, 
high yields, and high returns], and quickening the shift of 
rural manpower into non-agricultural jobs. We must increase 
peasant per capita income and improve the labor productivity 
rate and the land output rate as important criteria for judging 
the effectiveness of rural economic work. We must move the 
province's rural economy toward the market, spur specialization 
in agricultural production, and hasten progress townships and 
villages development of market towns for further emancipation 
and development of rural productivity. More than 80 percent of 
the province's population lives in rural villages. Rapid 
economic growth depends on opening up rural markets, but rural 
markets can be opened up only if peasant income increases. 
Therefore, everything from top to bottom requires increasing 
peasant income to create more favorable conditions, steadily 
increasing and applying investment in agriculture, increasing 
building of agricultural infrastructure, and ensuring that 
agricultural production and peasant income increase fairly 
rapidly at the same time. 
  The initiation and promotion of a market economy provides 
new 
opportunities for rural development. It particularly provides a 
good opportunity for our large agricultural province to move 
toward the market. We must seize this opportunity, take the 
market as our orientation, actively readjust the structure, and 
devote major efforts to improving overall returns from 
agriculture. We must select in a planned way places where 
conditions are good and potential is high for the founding of a 
number of demonstration zones and demonstration tracts that are 
characterized by high yield, premium returns, and high returns 
agriculture. We must invest science and technology, money, and 
materials in them for the thorough development of varieties and 
quality. Practice in many places shows that establishment of 
analogous turnkey processing enterprises to give impetus to 
steady readjustment of the agricultural structure and to promote 
steady rise in peasant income is an effective way to develop the 
rural economy. Every jurisdiction must actively develop dominant 
industries and hot-selling products having a local flavor as 
markets require and resources permit, using processing 
industries and business concerns as a turnkey, using the 
turnkeys to spur the development of bases, and using bases in 
conjunction with peasant households for the formation of 
specialized wholesale markets. This can bring about the 
integration of trade, industry, and agriculture, and the 
serialization of production, supply, and marketing. It can link 
together the small-scale production of myriad households with 
large markets in China and abroad to promote a pattern of 
regionalization, a specialization of production, an integration 
of operations, and a socialization of services to hasten 
progress in the modernization of agriculture. 
  Township and town enterprises are important mainstays for 
hastening the development of Anhui Province's economy. They 
offer tremendous potential and hope for rural villages 
realization of the goal of a comfortably well-off standard of 
living. Although township and town enterprises in the province 
have developed fairly rapidly during the past two years, 
development has been very spotty. To a very large extent, 
development has been pulled by the rise of "blank spots." We 
have no reason at all to be complacent. Instead, we must clearly 
realize the shortcomings that exist, and unflaggingly 
concentrate and reconcentrate our attention on this problem. 
While emphasizing the market and returns, we must accelerate 
whatever can be accelerated, and turn our hands to whatever has 
to be done, doing all possible to maintain the fine momentum of 
rapid development of recent years. We must make sure that the 
development of township and town enterprises proceeds in tandem 
with the development of agriculture. We must actively start up 
newly emerging industries as well, fully use and make the most 
of our advantages in agricultural resources, vigorously develop 
agricultural and sideline products processing industries, and 
increase the farm products commercialization rate and added 
value rate, thereby gradually shaping a new rural industrial 
pattern based on developmental agriculture in which township and 
town enterprises play a leading role. The province must provide 
guidance tailored to individual circumstances. Places in which 
development is relatively slow should continue to work toward a 
rapid take-off. They should particularly make the elimination of 
"blank villages" a main task to be completed within a certain 
period. Places already having a foundation and requisite 
conditions should concentrate on improving quality, raising 
levels, and expanding scale. They should concentrate on 
readjusting the structure and improving returns. They should 
concentrate on developing away from extensive development toward 
intensive development. In paying attention to the study of both 
foreign and domestic markets, they should concentrate on 
changing from looking outward rather than looking inward. One 
point that must be noted, in particular, is that with changes in 
the operating mechanisms of state-owned enterprises, the 
existing flexible mechanisms in township and town enterprises no 
longer hold the upper hand. Everyone will start from a single 
line, in addition to which township and town enterprises will 
generally not have as good technology, human talent, and 
equipment as state-owned enterprises. Future development will 
face greater difficulties. Therefore, township and town 
enterprises should have a greater sense of crisis and a feeling 
of pressure. They will have to be constantly creative in their 
equity system and operating methods, guard against and overcome 
degeneration of their operating mechanisms, intensify internal 
control, vigorously promote technological transformation and 
technical progress, seek to increase economic returns, and 
increase their market competitiveness. They must move ahead 
further with the stock-share cooperative system. They must use a 
clarification of equity relationships as a foundation for 
stimulating the flow and organization of the elements of 
production across community lines to form a more rational 
enterprise pattern. They must improve planning, bring about a 
greater concentration of township and town enterprises, make 
full use of and transform existing small cities and towns, and 
build new small cities and towns. This is a successful road that 
is in keeping with circumstances in the province. We must 
steadily summarize experiences and accelerate the pace of 
development. 
  The ability of large numbers of rural surplus manpower to 
transfer elsewhere without a hitch is a strategic task that 
affects attainment of the goal of a comparatively well-off 
standard of living in rural villages. Every jurisdiction must 
conscientiously study this matter. They must take effective 
actions, and provide positive guidance to spur the rational and 
orderly shift of manpower. They must strive to widen channels 
for such shifts, vigorously develop developmental agriculture 
and township and town enterprises, energetically develop rural 
tertiary industries, organize and guide the outward movement of 
labor in a planned way, and encourage and support peasants in 
entering cities and towns to work and do business. The 
separation of city and countryside must be eliminated, and the 
household registration, labor employment and land control 
systems reformed to provide support and services for the shift 
of rural manpower. 
  Rural work consists of a multitude of things. Concentration 
on agriculture, improvement of agriculture, and protection of 
agriculture mean placing the work emphasis on "villages." 
Villages are the most basic units and the most lively cells. 
They are connected upward to everything, and they are a 
convergence point downward for myriad households. They shoulder 
the task of directly organizing the broad masses of people in 
attainment of a comfortable well-off standard of living. Only 
when close attention is paid to village level organization can 
the party's various rural programs and policies truly move into 
villages and households where they are put into practice and 
have an effect. Party organizations at all levels, particularly 
county and city CPC committees, must always make acceleration of 
village-level economic development and better building of 
village organization a major focus of rural work. They must 
continue to expend much energy, restructuring, and improve 
grassroots level organization, educate and train the broad 
masses of grassroots cadres, and conscientiously build party 
branches into the nucleus of village organization so that they 
become leaders in directing the peasant's arduous innovation and 
becoming wealthy together. Work is agricultural and in rural 
villages is facing numerous new contradictions and new problems 
today. Every jurisdiction must do more investigation and study 
to solve them in a timely and well-founded way. Attention must 
be paid to the livelihood of the rural masses, particular 
attention given to solving difficulties in mountain regions and 
impoverished areas to help the people there get out of poverty 
and become wealthy more rapidly. 
  3. Focusing on Optimizing Resource Allocations, 
Hastening Development of Production Elements Markets, and 
Concentrating on Making Fullest Use of the Role of the Market 
Mechanism. The basic role in market allocation of resources 
must be premised on market prices. Today, prices of most 
commodities have been decontrolled. The focus of continued 
intensification of reform is on further acceleration of the 
building of specialized markets and wholesale markets throughout 
the province. While relying on the local fostering of a number 
of regional commodity markets, the two-track pricing of means of 
production has been abolished to bring into being more 
production elements markets, and accelerate progress in markets 
setting prices of the elements of production. Given conditions 
in the province, during 1994, marked breakthroughs should be 
made in the building of manpower and human talent markets, 
science and technology and information markets, financial 
markets, real estate markets, enterprise equity exchange 
markets, and rural land use rights exchange markets. Close 
attention must be paid to the development of various kind of 
market middleman organizations, full use made of their service, 
contacting, notarial, and supervisory roles to promote the 
healthy development of market building. 
  Market competition is merciless, and a bipolarization of 
enterprises is also unavoidable. It is too much to expect that 
each and every one of the numerous state-owned enterprises will 
be a winner and make a profit year after year. Survival of the 
fittest must be genuinely applied to enterprises, the fittest 
run well so that they develop more rapidly, and the least fit 
eliminated to stimulate a new organization of the elements of 
production. All jurisdictions must orient toward the market, 
principal support going to the industries and products that 
reflect the level of local economic development and that express 
the distinctiveness of local economic development. Policies, 
investment, and resources should favor them, and they should be 
given priority for development to improve their competitiveness 
in domestic and international markets, to widen avenues for 
their development, and to obtain more marked economic returns, 
thereby stimulating other industries and enterprises. Attention 
must be given to market returns from name brand products, 
development of the province's existing name-brand products 
accelerated, and new name-brand and premium products produced 
steadily. In addition, other enterprises should be encouraged to 
forge links with enterprises manufacturing name-brand products, 
and to register name-brand products, to try to widen market 
share, and to seize the high ground in markets. At the same 
time, continued efforts should be made to foster economic growth 
points, and an all-out effort made to develop diverse forms of 
ownership to increase the percentage of the non state-owned 
economy. In some special areas where the level of productivity 
is fairly low, in particular, it is even more necessary to 
boldly emancipate thinking, free ourselves from restraints, and 
accelerate development of the individual and privately owned 
economy, and the three kinds of partially or wholly 
foreign-owned enterprises to enable them to work with and 
augment state-owned and collectively-owned enterprises for 
mutual advance and common development. 
  4. Focus on the Formation of a Pattern of Opening in 
All Directions To Accelerate the Pace of Opening to the Outside 
World, Concentrating on Increasing the External Orientation of 
the Economy. In a market economy, enterprises are both main 
market entities and main entities for opening up to the outside 
world. Large and medium enterprises that enjoy a relative 
economic, technical, and human talent advantage should be 
selected to lead the push into international markets, full use 
made of their energizing and model roles. However, the number of 
enterprises that have the strength to enter international 
markets directly are few and far between. Most large and medium 
enterprises will have to enter international markets indirectly 
through the importation of foreign capital, the digestion and 
assimilation of advanced technical equipment, and through 
grafting and cooperation. Close attention must be given to study 
and solution of some problems existing in three kinds of 
partially or wholly foreign-owned enterprises to help them 
improve their operations, to increase returns, to improve their 
administration according to law, and to protect their legal 
rights and interests. In addition, the degree of openness must 
be steadily increased, areas opened to the outside world 
widened, efforts made to attract foreign capital at a higher 
level and over a wider range, three new kinds of partially or 
wholly foreign-owned enterprises developed energetically, and 
old enterprises grafted and transformed on a large scale. 
  Reform of the external economic system must be intensified, 
foreign trade expanding and permeating every trade and industry 
for rapid formation of a large economic relations and trade 
system that combines trade, industry, and agriculture; foreign 
and domestic trade; trade inside and outside the province, and 
the domestic and the foreign. In addition, corresponding banking 
and finance, information, scientific and technical human talent, 
insurance, and securities systems must be developed and put on a 
sound footing to serve the development of foreign economic 
relations and foreign trade. An all-out effort must be made to 
open up international markets, to expand foreign trade bases, to 
build strong product sales agencies, and production and 
processing, storage, transportation, and service networks. This 
will advance the multi-level, multi-component, multi-function, 
internationally oriented development of foreign economic 
relations and trade. Enterprises that produce for foreign trade, 
and foreign economic relations and foreign trade government 
units must use to the full and use flexibly applicable state 
policies, make their own operating decisions, accept 
responsibility for their own profits and losses, improve 
management, lower exchange conversion costs, and increase 
economic returns. They must further improve the investment 
climate to improve service quality and operating efficiency, and 
increase external publicity to increase Anhui's name 
international recognition. 
  5. Focus on Promoting the Extension Into the Economy of 
Science and Technology To Speed Up Development and Use of 
Science and Technology, Concentrating on Improving the Science 
and Technology Content of Products. A policy of 
"stabilizing one end while opening up an expanse," must be 
implemented to shape systems for the development of science and 
technology, for research and development, and promotion. 
Scientific research organs must orient toward the marketplace 
and institute businesslike management to enliven their 
mechanisms. Developmental and applied scientific research organs 
must actively build scientific and technical enterprises devoted 
primarily to high and new technology products. Except for a 
small number of permanent scientific researchers receiving 
support from the state, most personnel in public welfare 
scientific research organs must work on matters related to 
economic and social development. They must shift over to 
scientific and technical development and improve their 
self-development capabilities. The orientation of science and 
technology toward the marketplace must be accelerated to spur 
the commercialization of the fruits of scientific and technical 
research. Enterprises must be willing to put up large amounts of 
money to buy the fruits of scientific and technical research to 
hasten the technological transformation and the technical 
progress of enterprises. Scientific research units must use 
channels of all kinds to introduce and sell the products of 
their own scientific and technical research. They should look 
for developmental projects by making technology transfers for 
money, by calling for bids, and through auctioning to accelerate 
their conversion into real productivity. Use of the current 
favorable opportunity for transforming the joint-stock system, 
using science and technology to acquire shares is a fine way to 
advance the integration of science and technology with the 
economy. It should be tried out boldly. We must make the most of 
the province's strengths in science and technology and human 
talent, and use preferential policies as an orientation for 
building, as soon as possible, technical and information market 
networks that link the province, prefectures, municipalities, 
and counties vertically, and that link large institutions of 
higher education, scientific research organs, and enterprises 
laterally. We must develop intermediary organizations, augment 
the number of scientific and technical brokers in order to do a 
good job of building bridges for the transfer of the fruits of 
technological research. The province's civilian-run scientific 
research institutions have developed fairly rapidly in recent 
years. They have made an important contribution to inculcating 
science and technology into the economy, thereby exhibiting 
exuberant vitality. We must provide them further support, 
diligently assist them in solving difficulties, and promote 
their steady development and growth. 
  We must pay close attention to the development of high and 
new technology and associated industries, striving to break 
substantial new ground by the end of the present century in 
industrializing various technical fields including electronics, 
information, and biological engineering. Every jurisdiction must 
devote more energy to the support of projects having a high 
scientific and technical content, but that do not yet exist on a 
large scale. In the economic development zones, in particular, 
every effort must be made to set up more high and new technology 
enterprises. We must both develop and import at the same time, 
practice the principle of "internalizing" imports, continue to 
widen international academic exchanges, widen the scientific and 
technical cooperation realm, and import both domestic and 
foreign advanced scientific and technical achievements and 
technical equipment. Although the development of high technology 
poses certain risks, returns may also be quite high. We must 
hasten the establishment and perfection of diverse scientific 
and technical input systems, set up various funds including a 
fund to reduce risks in scientific and technical development 
that is primarily government funded to provide backstopping for 
the industrialization of new and high technology. 
  Human talent is the carrier of science and technology, and 
the training of human talent depends on education. Education 
must orient toward the main battleground of building the economy 
and toward the future. The training of human talent of a fairly 
high scientific and cultural level and that understands 
sophisticated work skills is the prime task. Acting in the 
spirit of the Central Committee's educational reform and 
development program, the provincial CPC committee and the 
provincial government have made a decision about educational 
reform and development problems in the province, the 
implementation of which they will organize conscientiously. 
During the first half of 1994, the provincial CPC committee and 
provincial government will also render decisions about ordinary 
educational reform and development problems. All jurisdictions 
should pay close attention. They should strive for substantial 
advances in making the nine-year compulsory education system 
universal and in the elimination of illiteracy among youths for 
early attainment of the "two basics" goal. The "Teachers' Law" 
must be conscientiously implemented to ensure teacher benefits 
according to law. 
  III. Intensifying Indoctrination, Mastery of Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's Theory for Building a Distinctively Chinese 
Brand of Socialism To Raise the Level of Leadership For Taking 
Account of the Situation as a Whole 
  Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory for building a distinctive 
Chinese brand of socialism carries on, enriches, and develops 
Mao Zedong Thought. It is contemporary Chinese Marxism, and it 
is our guide for action. Use of this scientific theory to arm 
the whole party provides the underpinnings for enhancement and 
improvement of Party leadership, for strengthening the party, 
for moving ahead with reform and opening up to the outside 
world, and for modernization. The degree to which this theory is 
understood and applied determines the overall caliber of party 
organizations at all levels and the level of leadership. We must 
relate this theory to reform and development realities, and 
diligently study it. We must strive to understand fully and put 
into effect its basic Marxist standpoint, point of view, and 
methods to improve awareness and resoluteness in implementing 
the party's basic line. Right now, Volume 3 of the 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping should be diligently 
studied in particular. Leading cadres at the county level and 
above should take the lead in study, strive to understand the 
spiritual substance, do a conscientious job of unifying thinking 
about Comrade Xiaoping's theory and the spirit of the 14th Party 
Congress, and about the "Decisions" of the 3d Plenary Session of 
the 14th CPC Central Committee, steadily raise the level of 
leadership needed to deal with the overall situation in a 
unified way and to better discharge the important historical 
task of leading the building of a socialist market economy 
system. 
  1. Study and Mastery of Comrade Xiaoping's Theory, 
Persevering Further in the Ideological Line of Emancipating 
Thinking and Seeking Truth in Facts. The emancipation of 
thinking and the seeking of truth in facts are the quintessence 
of Comrade Xiaoping's theory for building a distinctively 
Chinese brand of socialism. They are an ideological line that 
our party has upheld for a long time, and they are an important 
prerequisite for our doing a good job. The emancipation of 
thinking is a process of steady development. Old problems are 
solved only to have new problems steadily appear. Therefore, the 
emancipation of thinking is not something that can be done once 
and for all. One must make new efforts as situations develop and 
as reform intensifies. The emancipation of thinking and the 
seeking of truth in facts are parts of a piece. Upholding the 
oneness of the emancipation of thinking and the seeking of truth 
in facts is to enhance dialectical awareness, and to hold fast 
to practice, which is the first basic principle of Marxism so 
that thinking conforms to reality, and subjectivity and 
objectivity accord with each other. In leadership work, one very 
important point is the need to use the standard of the "three 
facilitates" to determine choices in actual work, to decide 
whether to move ahead or pull back, and to judge the advantages 
and disadvantages, gains and losses from all programs, policies, 
plans, and methods. Leading cadres at all levels must be adept 
at proceeding from their own realities under guidance of Central 
Committee overall policies and plans. They must concentrate more 
on finding the areas in which policies and plans can be linked 
to realities, boldly practice, and perform their work 
creatively. The broad masses of people are the main entity in 
practice. They possess extreme creativeness and unbounded 
wisdom. In recent years, we have effectively moved ahead with 
work in every regard by adhering to the mass line, by respecting 
the creative spirit of the masses, and by creating fresh 
experiences through the timely summarization of the practice of 
the masses. This is an extremely valuable experience. Leading 
cadres at all levels must maintain high political enthusiasm and 
continue to uphold and carry forward this fine work style. They 
must more consciously steep themselves in the fervent practice 
of the masses, learn from the masses, and learn lessons from 
practice. Nowadays large numbers of good role models and "points 
of light" are coming to the fore everywhere. We must make sure 
to uncover and summarize their experiences, and spread them at 
once. 
  2. Study and Master Comrade Xiaoping's Theory, Further 
Maintaining the Policy of Working in Multiple Directions at the 
Same Time and Working With Might and Main. We must 
diligently increase propaganda and cultural work, and 
ideological and political work to install the Party's basic 
theories and basic line in everyone. We must attain the optimum 
combination of the traditional moral excellence of the Chinese 
people and the spirit of the times, shape an ideology that holds 
a commanding position, and better channel the attention of the 
broad masses toward reform and opening to the outside world, and 
the building of the economy. We must raise high the banners of 
patriotism, socialism, and collectivism, vigorously propagandize 
the pioneering of causes through arduous effort and the fine 
tradition of selfless devotion. We must propagandize the 
advanced role models of helping people attain happiness, of 
readiness to take up the cudgels for a just cause, and of aiding 
the distressed and succoring those in peril. We must 
particularly improve the education of youth. We must actively 
advocate a life style of having a correct view of life and a 
healthy civilization. We must do more to build social morality 
and professional ethics, stand up bravely for ideals, stress 
convictions and ethics, take a clear-cut stand against money 
worship, extreme individualism, and a decadent life style, stand 
up for what is right, and root out evil influences. Today, 
problems with mayhem in the cultural marketplace remain fairly 
glaring. Resolute actions must be taken for further 
rectification. 
  In a certain sense, a socialist market economy is a legal 
system economy. We must improve legislation, particularly 
economic legislation, and judicial and administrative 
enforcement work in accordance with "the Decisions" goals for 
building a legal system. We must thoroughly educate all the 
people in the law, improve the legal awareness and the concept 
of the law of the entire society, and bring into play the role 
of legal supervision, organizational supervision, mass 
supervision, and public opinion supervision. Nowadays, social 
order problems are rather glaring in some places. This must be 
given serious attention. Leading cadres at all levels are 
comrades in charge, first of all, who must further improve the 
leadership of social order work. They must truly regard the 
maintenance of order in their own locale as a serious political 
obligations. They must unflaggingly crack down hard on all 
criminal activities, and resolutely force down the trend toward 
rise in all kinds of cases, particularly large and important 
cases. They must correctly deal with various internal 
contradictions among the people, make sure that they do careful 
work, understand how matters can develop from small beginnings, 
take preventive measure, and strive to nip in the bud the 
various factors that damage political stability and public order. 
  Better building of clean government and opposing decadence 
are necessary conditions and important underpinings for the 
building of a socialist market economy system. Thanks to the 
work done by the Central Committee and the provincial CPC 
committee, the struggle against decadence is proceeding smoothly 
throughout the province. It is developing healthily. 
Nevertheless, work in these regards is spotty, and the task is 
still a fairly daunting one when viewed in light of Central 
Committee requirements and the desires of the broad masses of 
rank and file cadres. Therefore, we must maintain a clear view 
and continue to work toward assuring periodic results. Leading 
cadres at all levels, particularly cadres at the county level 
and above, must both serve as models, taking the lead in honesty 
and self-discipline, and dare to take charge, strictly meeting 
requirements. They must play an important part in the work of 
law and discipline enforcement units in enforcing the law and 
enforcing discipline in the improvement of Party style and the 
building of clean government, providing vigorous support for 
their work. 
  Economic system reform is a profound revolution having a 
bearing on many areas in the economic foundation and 
superstructure. We must handle well the correlation among 
reform, development, and stability, handle well the interest 
relationships of all quarters, improve people's conception of 
the overall good, make full use of mass organizations such as 
labor unions, the Young Communist League, and the Women's 
Association, as well as the enthusiasm of all democratic 
factions. We must arouse all positive elements that can be 
aroused, and we must convert negative factors into positive 
factors. We must improve the ideological education of rank and 
file cadres, guide everyone in how to deal correctly with 
readjustments of interest relationships that reform occasions, 
further shape a strong cooperative force that works heart and 
soul on construction, ensure that all our work is done in a 
stable and unified environment. and move ahead exuberantly from 
the broadest and deepest mass foundation. 
  3. Study and Mastery of Comrade Xiaoping's Theory for 
Further Party Building Requires the Building of Leadership Teams 
First. Greater building of leadership teams at all levels 
is the key to good performance in party building. Overall, teams 
at all levels throughout the province are in good shape. They 
have been able to stand the test at some key times, and they 
have done real deeds in their work. Nevertheless, they are 
unsuited in many ways to the requirements of reform and opening 
up to the outside world, and the development of a socialist 
market economy. They must be steadily perfected and improved. 
The caliber of team members must be further improved to increase 
the ability to run the socialist market economy. This is an 
important part of the current better building of teams and 
raising of the leadership level. Work style must be genuinely 
changed, formalism must be overcome, and investigation and study 
must be a regular work requirement that is put on the daily 
agenda of important things to do. We must enter the front line 
of reform and construction to do a solid job of studying some 
major problems in reform and development, making no decisions 
without investigation, postponing decisions when investigation 
is incomplete, and making decisions anew after thorough 
investigation. We must select good people in accordance with 
cadre's "four transformation" plans and the principle of their 
possession of both ability and political integrity. We must 
constantly place cadres of good political caliber in leadership 
teams at all levels -- cadres who are versed in economic work, 
and who dare to blaze trails, particularly middle-age and young 
cadres. We must pay special attention to the nurture and 
promotion of party and government hands who can act in terms of 
the situation as a whole and who can open the way to new 
endeavors. Every time leadership teams finish their terms in 
office, the problem of insufficient reserve cadres becomes more 
glaring. We must take immediate action to improve work in this 
regard. 
  The party's grassroots organization is the party's 
stronghold 
in the basic level organization of society. It is the foundation 
for all party work and all combat strength. CPC committees at 
all levels must genuinely give prominent place to the building 
of the grassroots organization as part of party building. They 
must firmly decide to change the weak and apathetic state of 
some grassroots organizations. They must genuinely build 
grassroots organizations into strongholds for unifying and 
leading the masses to realize the party's combat goals. Better 
building of the party in township and town enterprises, in three 
kinds of partially or wholly foreign-owned enterprises, and in 
civilian-operated scientific and technical enterprises has 
become an important and urgent task in the building of 
grassroots organization. Investigation and study must be 
diligently conducted, attention given to the summarization of 
experiences, and concrete direction given. 
  This conference has one more topic, namely to consider the 
work report of the provincial advisory committee. In the spirit 
of the 14th Party Congress and the recommendations of the 
provincial advisory committee, following this meeting, the 
provincial advisory committee will no longer exist. Since its 
founding, the provincial advisory committee has helped the 
provincial CPC committee do a large bit of highly effective 
work. It has made outstanding accomplishments in advancing the 
provinces reform and opening up to the outside world, and its 
modernization, as well as in safeguarding and developing a 
tranquil and unified political situation. The old comrades on 
the provincial advisory committee earnestly practice what they 
preach, and they have served as models in bringing about a 
changeover from the old to the new in the cadre corps. One might 
say that there has not been a single work achievement of any 
kind that is not a crystallization of the painstaking labor, the 
wisdom, and the sweat of the old comrades. In the past, today, 
and in the future, the old comrades have been, are, and will be 
valuable wealth. The lofty spirit of the old comrades in 
devoting their lives to the revolution, their fine tradition of 
honesty in the performance of official duties, their noble 
morale character of making contributions without arrogance, and 
their rich and beneficial precious experiences forever deserves 
our emulation and continuation. CPC committees at all levels 
must better look after the political and daily life of old 
comrades. They must continue to listen with an open mind to 
their valuable views. Although the provincial advisory committee 
will no longer exist after this meeting, it is hoped that the 
old comrades will continue to care about and support our work, 
and constantly make new contributions in advancing our 
province's reform and development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40130 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Views Role as Asian `Operations Center' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0206A Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 11, 
15 Nov 93 pp 66-71 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0206A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIEN-HSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Kuo Ta-wei (6753 1129 1792): "Century-Spanning </F>
Fight to the Death"] 
  [Text] The Asia-Pacific Operations Center beckons 
loud enough to wake the dead. 
  Some say it is necessary to Taiwan's survival. 
  Others ridicule it as a quixotic scheme; they see it as an 
impractical plan. 
  Does Taiwan indeed have an opportunity to become a regional 
headquarters for transnational businesses? 
  What are Taiwan's advantages and disadvantages for becoming 
an Asia-Pacific operations center? 
  What major changes are needed to attain the goal? 
  A large market holding hidden vitality lies along the 
Pacific 
Rim of the Asian continent. This area has an annual 6 percent 
economic growth rate, and forecasts call for one-half of the 
world's gross output to come from here by 2040. Transnational 
businesses in advanced nations are anxious to establish a 
bridgehead here. 
  At the same time, Taiwan, which is a way station in the 
area, 
is working hard to break out of an economic development 
stalemate by importing high value-added industries to accelerate 
internal transformation and to stimulate the desire to invest. 
In 1992, however, outside investment in Taiwan for the year fell 
to a new four year low of only $1.5 billion. 
  A "national construction program" that seeks to vault Taiwan 
into the ranks of a modern nation, the Asia-Pacific Operations 
Center Plan, took shape during the surge to accelerate internal 
transformation and stimulate investment. 
  The Asia-Pacific Operations Center is no new topic. This 
hope 
has attracted businesses from many nations to set up regional 
headquarters in Taiwan. Very many businesses long ago began to 
plan tactical alliances whereby their Asia-Pacific branch 
corporations engage in procurement, production, marketing, 
technical assistance, research and development, and the 
collection of information. 
  Economic considerations aside, as a result of these tactical 
alliances, Taiwan will make itself a part of the global economic 
network, which will enable it to improve its international 
standing and national security. 
  This is not a bad tactical conception; the question is 
whether the tactic is feasible. 
  To go from Europe and the Americas to Southeast Asia and 
Mainland China does not require going via Taiwan. Countries 
other than Taiwan -- notably Singapore and Hong Kong -- can 
provide added value that Taiwan does not provide. 
  Just what value does Taiwan add as a springboard for 
cooperation with the west? 
  Can existing administrative regulations be reformed in time? 
Can the necessary infrastructure be put in place rapidly? 
  These are the requirements for Taiwan's success as an 
Asia-Pacific Operations Center. 
  People generally believe that Taiwan's professional 
scientific and technical brain power will serve as a solid 
contingent that will permit Taiwan to become a research and 
development [R &amp; D] base, and a technical support base for 
Asia 
and the Pacific. Universal education and training in 
mathematical concepts will permit Taiwan to turn out highly 
capable engineers at low cost. 
  According to a global competitiveness survey that the Swiss 
International Management and Development Institute (IMDI) made 
in 1992, Taiwan obtained 732 United States patents during 1990 
for first place among developing countries. Taiwan also far 
exceeds major competitors such as Singapore and Hong Kong in R 
&amp; 
D and manpower investment. During 1992, a total of 5,157 
doctorate and masters degree holders returned home, but their 
skills were not needed in Taiwan, thereby creating a new dilemma 
of self-induced unemployment. 
  Taiwan has a large number of people who work with their 
hands 
to match the engineers who work with their brains. 
  It is small but fast, hardworking, medium and small 
businesses that have gloriously created the picture of Taiwan's 
economic growth. From Taipei to Taichung, and from Yunlin to 
Pingtung, they have expanded contacts into a closely knit 
industrial network that has become an asset that cannot easily 
be duplicated in the Asia-Pacific region. 
  "As an Asia-Pacific manufacturing center, Taiwan is 
certainly 
a turnkey," Stanley Shih, chairman of the board of Acer Computer 
Corporation, says with conviction. 
  Given its geographic position and its role as a cultural 
intermediary, Taiwan can become a bridge for the United States 
and Japan to enter this region, particularly the China mainland. 
Yeh Ying [5509 7727], director of the commercial section of the 
American Association in Taiwan believes this to be Taiwan's most 
powerful "trump card." 
  Taiwan, which has ample foreign exchange reserves, lags 
behind Japan in investment in the Asia-Pacific region, it is 
true, but it is far ahead of Mainland China. This still 
expanding Chinese network is strengthened by a common language 
and culture. Because of Taiwan's experience in managing the 
mainland and the 70 percent Chinese Southeast Asian market, 
economist Soluo [phonetic] suggests that Chinese business can 
"use Taiwanese younger cousins to do business with mainland 
older cousins." Shanwen Computer general manager, Liu Shangen 
[0491 1472 2704], affirmed Taiwan's capability in a more 
humorous manner. He said, "Taiwan understands very clearly even 
the art of doing things through the back door." 
<H5>  One Upgrade and Four Kinds of Expertise </H5>
  It is because Taiwan holds advantages in geographical 
location, and in manufacturing and technical capacity that 11 
international firms that have been producing in Taiwan for many 
years have signed a tactical partnership letter of intent with 
the Ministry of Economics. 
  For example, Motorola Electronics has not only established 
an 
electronic parts manufacturing center in Taiwan, but it has also 
set up a massive circuit research and development center to 
design products for Japan and South Korea. AT&amp;T also plans to 
cooperate with Taiwan firms to contract the building and 
operation of telephone communications hardware abroad. Phillips 
of Taiwan controls the entire operating process from design to 
marketing of four major products including illumination 
equipment, electronic components, monitoring equipment and 
telecommunications, and information processing services. 
  However, in planning an Asia-Pacific Operations Center, 
Taiwan will not be content with being only a production and 
technical assistance support base. If it is also to function as 
an entrepot and as a financial center, Taiwan will have to make 
one upgrade and become expert in four fields. 
  The one upgrade is improved science and technology. The four 
fields of expertise are personnel, money, goods, and information. 
  Taiwan has, in being a good foundation for developing and 
bringing forth new technology, and this is the road it must take 
to improve competitiveness. If it only concentrates on existing 
production and technology, Taiwan will be relegated to the 
status of a large export processing base. However, "What 
conditions must we have to build new and sophisticated 
industries" that bring in high technology? The general manager 
of Taiwan's International Standard Electronics, Mao Yu-nan [3029 
3254 0589] came straight to the point in posing this question. 
  In addition to upgrading domestic R&amp;D capabilities, we 
must 
take the opportunity to bring in high science and technology 
brain power and high level professional talent. We also have to 
create an overall environment to match. Although Singapore's 
level of science and technology and its technical manpower 
cannot match Taiwan's, it has well-developed financial and 
economic regulations, and a high quality living environment that 
attracts scientific and technical talent from abroad. 
  Although Taiwan is more friendly toward foreigners than 
other 
developing countries (including Singapore and Hong Kong), and 
does not practice discrimination (according to the IMDI 
appraisal), overall living conditions are not as good. 
  Since signs are not in English, foreigners in Taiwan are 
reluctant to wander the streets. In Japan, all one has to do is 
dial the telephone, and emergency translation service in various 
languages is available 24 hours a day. Whenever it rains in 
Taiwan, people walking along the sidewalks in Taipei may step 
into mud holes. During free time on weekends, foreigners do not 
know where to go sightseeing. Traffic jams and air pollution 
problems exist as well. Consequently, a consulting company that 
Federal Express hired to make an evaluation listed Taipei as a 
"hardship city" for foreigners to live in. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. Plentiful Scientific and Technical Manpower                       | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Taiwan (1991)     |Hong Kong         |Singapore (1992)  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Professional and  |666,000           |                  |216,500           | 
|Technical Personn-|                  |                  |                  | 
|el                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of institu-|123               |14                |6                 | 
|tions of higher e-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ducation          |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of people  |612,400           |48,200            |60,400            | 
|enrolled in insti-|                  |                  |                  | 
|tutions of higher |                  |                  |                  | 
|education         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of people  |350,100           |44,000            |62,000            | 
|enrolled in natur-|                  |                  |                  | 
|al science course-|                  |                  |                  | 
|s (physics, engin-|                  |                  |                  | 
|eering, medicine, |                  |                  |                  | 
|and agriculture)  |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Degree to which n-|3                 |11                |4 Source of Data: | 
|eed for engineers |                  |                  |Asia-Pacific Oper-| 
|is met (ranking a-|                  |                  |ations Center Fea-| 
|mong developing n-|                  |                  |sibility Study, M-| 
|ations)           |                  |                  |inistry of Econom-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ics               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. High Standards                                                    | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Taiwan            |Hong Kong         |Singapore         | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|R&amp;D expenditu-|$2.075 billion    |                  |$178 million      | 
|res               |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|R&amp;D expenditu-|1.41              |                  |0.88              | 
|res as a percenta-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ge of GDP         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of people  |52,100            |                  |6,900             | 
|engaged in R&amp;-|                  |                  |                  | 
|D*                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Number of R &amp; |6.32              |                  |3.90              | 
|D people per 1,000|                  |                  |                  | 
|*                 |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Patents obtained  |732               |52                |Note: * means 1989| 
|in the United Sta-|                  |                  | data; otherwise  | 
|tes               |                  |                  |the data are for 1| 
|                  |                  |                  |990. Source of Da-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ta: Swiss IMDI "W-| 
|                  |                  |                  |orld Competitiven-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ess Report, 1992" | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 3. Low Costs                                                         | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Professions       |Taiwan (1)        |Singapore (2)     |Percentage (3)    | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical Engineers|50,102            |66,074            |76%               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Petroleum and Coa-|60,010            |;80,810           |75%               | 
|l Engineers       |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Mechanical Engine-|33,385            |51,496            |65%               | 
|ers               |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electrical and El-|33,771            |50,671            |\67%              | 
|ectronics Enginee-|                  |                  |                  | 
|rs                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Civil Engineers   |33,275            |52,199            |64%               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Average           |42,109            |60,250            |70% Explanation: 1| 
|                  |                  |                  |) Taiwan data obt-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ained by multiply-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ing 1990 data tim-| 
|                  |                  |                  |es 1.08. 2) Singa-| 
|                  |                  |                  |pore data is gros-| 
|                  |                  |                  |s wages plus the 1| 
|                  |                  |                  |8 percent obligat-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ory payment into  | 
|                  |                  |                  |the Central Provi-| 
|                  |                  |                  |dent Fund. 3) Per-| 
|                  |                  |                  |centages are Taiw-| 
|                  |                  |                  |an engineer salar-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ies as a percenta-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ge of Singapore e-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ngineer salaries. | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source of Data: Asia-Pacific Operations Center Feasibility Study, Ministry | 
|of Economics                                                               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Well-developed intellectual property production laws are 
even 
more an incentive in bringing in high science and technology. 
  One of the main proponents of the Asia-Pacific Operations 
Center plan, Taiwan University Law Department Professor Hsu 
Hsiao-po [1776 1420 3134] says candidly that if Taiwan fully 
protects intellectual property rights, "more foreign businessmen 
will be willing to introduce technology." Taiwan, which is 
well-versed in the application and commercialization of science 
and technology can increase its technological innovation 
opportunities by increasing the sources of technology. 
  If Taiwan becomes a general headquarters for the Asia and 
Pacific region, managers will shuttle back and forth to meetings 
in various countries; technicians will be on the move to help 
other areas solve problems that suddenly come up in the research 
and development and production process. Personnel from other 
countries will also congregate in Taiwan for training. 
Flexibility in the free entry and departure of personnel is 
necessary to the operation of transnational businesses. 
  However, Taiwan currently regulates foreign white collar 
labor very strictly, thereby impeding channels for attracting 
outstanding brain power from abroad. Despite his holding a 
doctors degree from a French university and having formerly 
worked in the United Nations, a Japanese lawyer who founded a 
practice in Germany was still unable to obtain a resident's work 
permit for Taiwan. 
  After a distressing two months wait, his wife -- a Republic 
of China citizen -- had to resign her job in Taiwan, and as of 
the time he boarded a plan, the Japanese lawyer had still 
received no explanation from the unit concerned. 
  A lawyer in the Legal Affairs Office commented that Taiwan's 
employment law and associated regulations are "completely 
divorced from reality." 
  In addition, foreigners resident in Taiwan must file a 
report 
every time they leave the country, small children included. 
Furthermore, a Taiwan transit visa is available in only a small 
number of countries, and it is valid for only a five day stay. 
Even South Korea, which is very security conscious, has 
increased the period to seven days. Several times when the 3-M 
Corporation in the United States held a conference in Taipei, 
high ranking officials of the corporation were unable to attend 
because their visas were not processed in time. 
  In Singapore, by contrast, so long as an alien holds a work 
permit, he or she is free to enter and leave the country freely 
during the period of its validity. Even local military age males 
need only notify the authorities concerned by telephone, and 
they can pick up their bags and leave the country. 
  Not only are procedures for entering and leaving Taiwan 
onerous, but Taiwan is not competitive even in the movement of 
goods. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 4: Taiwan Laws Not Up to Date; Many Restrictions                     | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Taiwan Ranking    |Hong Kong Ranking |Singapore Ranking | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Legal standards o-|;8                |4                 |1                 | 
|f finance and ban-|                  |                  |                  | 
|king institutions |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Protection of int-|7                 |5                 |1                 | 
|ellectual propert-|                  |                  |                  | 
|y rights          |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Government contro-|5                 |1                 |2                 | 
|l and troubling o-|                  |                  |                  | 
|f businesses      |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Compatability of  |12                |4                 |1                 | 
|environmental law-|                  |                  |                  | 
|s with business c-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ompetitiveness    |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Extent to which a-|6                 |3                 |1                 | 
|nti-trust laws pr-|                  |                  |                  | 
|event unfair comp-|                  |                  |                  | 
|etition           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Openness of the p-|5                 |1                 |2 Source of Data: | 
|ublic sector towa-|                  |                  |Swiss IMDI, "Worl-| 
|rd foreign compet-|                  |                  |d Competitiveness | 
|itive bidders on  |                  |                  |Report, 1992"     | 
|contracts         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 5. Infrastructure Seriously Inadequate--Ranking of the Degree to Whi-| 
|ch Infrastructure Meets Commercial Needs in Developing Countries           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Infrastructure It-|Taiwan            |Hong Kong         |Singapore         | 
|em                |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Air Transportation|6                 |5                 |1                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sea Transportation|4                 |2                 |1                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Railroads         |6                 |3                 |2                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Highways          |6                 |4                 |1                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Telecommunications|6                 |2                 |1                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electric Power    |9                 |2                 |1 Source of Data: | 
|                  |                  |                  |Swiss IMDI, "Worl-| 
|                  |                  |                  |d Competitiveness | 
|                  |                  |                  |Report, 1992"     | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




Table 5. Lack of Honesty; Low Administrative Efficiency --Ranking of Various 
Administrative Indicators in Developing Countries 

Government honesty             5                        2 

Distortion of policies by      6                        2 
government groups not 
receiving benefits 

Degree to which government     4                        5 
economic policies are in 
keeping with new economic 
climate 

Government transparency        4                        6 

Current political system's     4                        6 
ability to meet economic 
challenges 

Flexibility of government      8                        1 
hiring and firing practices 

Popular support for            4                        6 
government policies 

Degree to which individual     5                        3 
person and property are 
properly protected 

Public confidence in the       9                        3 1 
fairness of the judiciary 

Source of Data: Swiss IMDI, "World Competitiveness Report, 1992" 




----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 7. Chungcheng Airport Charges High, Utilization Rate Low             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Taiwan's Chungche-|Hong Kong's Kaite-|Singapore's Chang-| 
|                  |ng Airport        |k Airport         |i Airport         | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Scheduled Takeoff-|68,982            |120,999           |125,540           | 
|s and Landings (N-|                  |                  |                  | 
|umber of Planes)  |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tourists Per Year |10.83 million     |22.09 million     |18.1 million      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Utilization Rate% |43                |107               |61]               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cargo Capacity (t-|400,000           |1 million         |1.5 million       | 
|ons)              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Average Receipts (|2,430             |1,240             |1,330             | 
|U.S. Dollars) per |                  |                  |                  | 
|landing, arrival, |                  |                  |                  | 
|and passenger loa-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ding ramps        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: Ministry of Economics, Asia-Pacific Operations Center Feasibility  | 
|Study                                                                      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  In the IMDI evaluation, Taiwan lagged behind Singapore and 
Hong Kong in the degree to which infrastructure meets commercial 
needs, and it even came in behind Malaysia where per capita 
income is lower than in Taiwan. 
  Taiwan's administrative and building efficiency have 
suffered 
in the political tumult of the past several years. This is the 
main reason for the backwardness of Taiwan's infrastructure. 
Volume of cargo handled today in Kaohsiung's seven ports is only 
63 percent that of Singapore and Hong Kong. Although Kaohsiung's 
civilian piers load or unload 27 standard cargo containers in 10 
hours, thereby running neck-and-neck with Singapore and Hong 
Kong, the government piers handle only 13. 
  Kaohsiung port still uses the longshoreman management 
methods 
of 1971 to figure wages. Consequently, some people draw more 
than NT$100,000 per month in wages. Worse yet, after they 
retire, their job is passed on to their son in a longshoreman 
"hereditary system." 
  During July 1993, more than 50 ships waited to get into 
port, 
each ship waiting one to two weeks, the loss per day averaging 
$6,000. This caused the poor reputation far and wide for 
Taiwanese ports 
  Slowness and high charges have, in fact, damaged the 
utilization rate of both Taiwan's airports and harbors. 
  Although Taiwan's manufacturers break their necks to meet 
deadlines, cargoes are held for at least one or two days before 
clearance at Chungcheng Airport. In advanced countries, customs 
examinations are figured in hours. The average scheduled landing 
fee for an airplane in Taiwan is $2,430. At Hong Kong's Kaitek 
Airport, where an airplane takes off or lands once every two 
minutes, the fee is only about half that. 
  Taiwan's future goal is the development of light, fragile, 
short, and small products, and the U.S. Federal Express is 
discussing a plan to establish a hub in Taiwan that can make the 
most of Taiwan's strength in being able to act quickly. The 
administrative efficiency and infrastructure problems relating 
to the movement of people and cargoes are crucial to whether 
Taiwan can become an Asia-Pacific Operating Center. In addition, 
the associated flow of money and information require even 
greater effort. 
  Two years ago, the national finance and banking conference 
reached a decision to set up an Asia financial center, but so 
far nothing has appeared but publicity; no real action has been 
taken. Financial control limitations, inconvenience in moving 
money into and out of the island, insufficient financial 
commodities, and the lack of skilled financial personnel are old 
problems that hurt the effective use of funds. Likewise, they 
impede Taiwan's becoming an Asia-Pacific Operations Center. 
  The uncertain quality of Taiwan's telecommunications and the 
lack of competitiveness of charges cloud the Asia-Pacific 
Operations Center plan even more, and they are also constitute a 
stumbling block for Taiwan's entry into telecommunications in 
which the exchange of graphics is the mainstream. 
  A large number of obstacles and doubts about whether "we can 
or cannot" face us in proceeding with the Asia-Pacific 
Operations Center. No wonder that some entrepreneurs take a "I 
couldn't care less" attitude about it, and throw invitations to 
panel discussions into the waste basket without reading them. 
  Taiwan University's Three Principles of the People Institute 
assistant professor Tu Chen-hua [2629 7201 5478] and six other 
members spent an entire year travelling around the United 
States, Hong Kong, and Singapore making comparisons to complete 
the report on "the feasibility of establishing an Asia-Pacific 
Operations Center in Taiwan" that the Ministry of Economics 
commissioned them to make. Their 300 page-thick evaluation 
employs various indicators to point out that the overall picture 
for Taiwan is not optimistic. However, if it is to be 
established, nevertheless, "the focus from top to bottom will 
have to be on making a more international and freer frame of 
mind in Taiwan, including the frame of mind of the middle level 
civil servants responsible for implementation, and the public in 
general, and well as amending regulations. 
  Tu Chen-hua warned that the results of the study show that 
the biggest obstacle to moving ahead with this plan stems from 
the lack of a full international outlook on the part of middle 
level civil servants who oppose change. This includes government 
officials lacking a professional background. 
  In order to become a regional operations center, Taiwan must 
be a customer-oriented organism that provides services around 
the clock. 
  At Kaohsiung Port, which supposedly operates around the 
clock, repair personnel could not be found in the middle of the 
night. At Chungcheng Airport, the Customs does not clear cargoes 
after Saturday noon. Obtaining a clearance requires payment of 
NT$3,000. During an emergency once, China Airlines had to land 
at a small airport in Kaohsiung after midnight only to be 
refused. It had to turn back to Hong Kong where the airport is 
not open around the clock, but which is flexible. 
  "What can be done to make the whole country aware that 
Saturdays and Sundays are not days off in an Asia-Pacific 
Operations Center?" is a question that Hsin-kuang Textiles 
general manager Hu Ch'iao-jung [5170 0294 2837] spelled out 
world by word at a panel discussion. 
  The public in general also faces the challenge of an 
internationalization of their frame of mind. The understanding 
of the managerial level of Taiwan firms about trans-national 
culture, and their international management experiences are far 
behind those of places like Hong Kong and Singapore where 
English is commonly spoken throughout society. 
  In 1992, America-Taiwan Telecommunications began to send 
technical personnel from Taiwan to Indonesia, Thailand, and 
Mainland China to prove assistance. However, general manager Yeh 
Tsu-yu [5509 4371 4416] found that these technical personnel had 
adjustment problems in the places to which they were sent. They 
were not accustomed to short temporary duty assignments outside 
Taiwan. "This is a psychological process everyone must go 
through. They must develop their own international frame of 
mind," he said. The greatest frame of mind transformation 
required is for government to go from regulation orientation to 
task orientation. 
  The evaluation report that the Ministry of Economics 
commissions recommends at great length 50 administrative 
measures and legal regulations in need of amendment. In addition 
to citing regulations related to the corporation law, the 
employment law, the income tax law, and foreign exchange control 
regulations, it cites Singapore's leasing and tax concessions as 
an example in emphasizing that amendment of laws should 
emphasize benefits to be gained more than guarding against harm. 
  Taiwan laws, which are a legacy of the Japanese system that 
came from Germany, emphasize guarding against harm. However, Law 
regulating commerce are based on the British and American legal 
systems." If Taiwan's laws are to be internationalized in the 
absence of people having this background, how can a law 
amendment draft be produced? is a question asked by Hu 
Ch'iao-jung who is a legal scholar. 
  Most multi-national firms have set up operations centers in 
Hong Kong and Singapore to look after the southeast Asia market. 
Since it first began to promote a regional headquarters plan in 
1986, more than 40 large firms have established a base in 
Singapore. These firms include IBM, ICI, Ch'i-i [1142 8381], 
Hsin-li [2450 0500], and International corporations. 
  Taiwan is getting a late start. Only by offering something 
special can it win out over the competition. 
  "We have to do well the things that they (Singapore and Hong 
Kong) do not do, gradually besting them. This is the only 
tactic," says Stanley Shih, chairman of the board of Acer 
corporation, which has set up a regional center in Singapore, 
but whose headquarters remains in Taiwan. According to Stanley 
Shih, Taiwan is still the best choice for R&amp;D and for 
managing 
production. "At least, we should persuade foreigners to set up 
dual centers." Taiwan does not have to be a center in which 
everything is done including production, R&amp;D, finance and 
banking, the entrepot trade, and marketing is done. "If we just 
get going, we can become a champion although possibly not being 
first in every particular," says Mao Yu-nan metaphorically. 
  The process of training to be a champion in 10 areas 
requires standards for judgment. "At least, objective data for 
judging each area is needed to determine whether we are 
approaching our vision; otherwise, it is only an illusion," says 
Mao Yu-nan unceremoniously in pointing out priorities. 
  During one of its visits to Singapore, the evaluation team 
that the Ministry of Economics commissioned brought back a 1 
meter high stack of data and material in which even the added 
value produced by each employee at Singapore's airport was 
figured and reported. Even if there is only a slight decline in 
telecommunications competitiveness indicators relative to other 
countries, the Singapore telephone bureau readjusts its business 
tactics every year to catch up. 
  Taiwan does not care about such data at all; it does not 
look 
at specific indicators. 
  The Asia-Pacific Operations Center provides an orientation, 
but even more necessary is coordinated overall actions. Hong 
Kong Chinese University Professor Weng Sung-jan [5040 2646 3595] 
points out the importance of intangible competition indicators. 
Are foreigners happy about travel in Taiwan? Is bribery serious? 
"Maybe the international image needs adjustment!" 
  As an Asia-Pacific Operations Center, Taiwan will have to 
compete not only with Hong Kong and Singapore, which are a step 
ahead, but its competitors will also include Thailand and even 
Pudong in Shanghai, which are itching to compete. 
  Taiwan Phillips, which arrived in Kaohsiung 20 years ago, 
developed from simple processing into an international 
production center, and today it is a self-established fully 
functional operations center. Speaking as a person who has 
experience, Director General Lo I-ch'iang [5012 4135 1730], who 
is a staunch proponent of the Asia-Pacific Operations Center 
Plan states with conviction: "When Taiwan does something better 
than others, why won't other countries come? We have to decide 
ourselves." 
  It is the time for Taiwan itself to make a decision about 
the 
Asia-Pacific Operations Center. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40131 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hong Kong Economic Report 23 Dec 93-5 Jan 94 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0601160194 </F>
<F P=103> HK0601160194 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:BFN 

  [Editorial Report] The following are summaries of media 
reports on economic developments in Hong Kong monitored by Hong 
Kong Bureau between 23 December 1993 and 5 January 1994. Source 
information is given in parentheses at the end of each item or 
is provided in the body of the item. 
<H3>  HONG KONG INVESTMENT IN PRC: 
TV Maker Targets Mainland Market for Expansion </H3>
  Consumer electronics group Kong Wah Holdings has entered 
into 
a joint venture with the Shannxi-based Caihong Electronic Group 
to exploit the colour television market in China. Kong Wah and 
Caihong will both hold 42.5 percent of the venture, the 
remainder being held by Zhuhai's Tong Fei company. Kong Wah's 
initial investment would be HK$10 million. Kong Wah Chairman CK 
Lam said that, as China's largest manufactuere of colour picture 
tubes, Caihong Electronics would be able to stabilize the supply 
of picture tubes to Kong Wah. Mr. Lam said the company expected 
to invest a further HK$20 million in the project by the end of 
next year. 
  Kong Wah currently has 8 percent of the mainland market for 
televisions, but Lam expects this to increase to 20 to 25 
percent by the end of 1994. (Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD in 
English 23 Dec 93 p 23) 
<H5>  Bank of China Promotes Foreign Investment in Mainland </H5>
  The general manager of the Hong Kong-based Bank of China 
Group (BOC) Investment Company Ltd, and director of the BOC 
China Fund Company Ltd, Shi Hongzhen, says that the BOC 
Investment Company been especially successful in attracting 
foreign investment in Mainland China. Mr Shi indicated that in 
the nine years since its establishment, the BOC Investment 
Company had handled a total of HK$8 billion in investment in 170 
projects. In 1993, 78 contracts were signed. 
  According to Mr Shi, BOC Investment Company's investments 
over the past year were characterised by its major support for 
energy and transportation projects. Up to the present, the 
company had invested in 16 power plants with a total installed 
capacity of 15.7 million kw. BOC Investment also helped a 
Singaporean group win a highway contract in Jiangsu, and the 
company is becoming increasinglty involved in the high 
technology and real estate areas, funding precision tool plants 
in Shenzhen and 41 real estate projects in eastern and southern 
China. The company is also developing large-scale projects, 
such as a $100 million investment in an iron and steel plant in 
Anhui. (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 24 Dec 93 p 25) 
<H5>  Float Glass Production Line Under Construction in Qingdao </H5>
  Construction began on the world's biggest "Luoyang floating 
method" glass production line, a joint venture between a Chinese 
corporation and a Hong Kong company, in Qingdao's Huangdao New 
Economic Zone on 28 December 1993. On completion, the first 
phase of this 500-million-yuan project will produce 3.1 million 
boxes of quality float glass each year, 40 percent of which will 
be exported. The scheduled completion and commissioning date is 
September 1995. (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 0901 GMT 
29 Dec 93) 
<H5>  Retailer Restructures Hong Kong, Mainland Operations </H5>
  In order to expand its retail business, the China Resources 
(Holdings) Limited Company (CRC) recently decided to merge two 
affiliated department stores, the Chinese Merchandise Emporium 
Limited and the China Products Company (Hong Kong) Ltd, into one 
entity called CRC Department Store, Ltd. Wei Jianan, chairman 
of the board of directors and general manager of CRC Department 
Store Ltd, said that the merger was designed to consolidate 
superior resources to improve economic efficiency and increase 
competitiveness. CRC is also planning to set up chain stores in 
various major cities in the mainland, including Harbin, 
Shanghai, and Beijing. 
  Huang Wenzhao, a director of the CRC Department Store Ltd, 
and deputy general manager, said the CRC's annual turnover in 
Hong Kong had reached HK$50 billion. Apart from department 
stores, CRC also operates supermarkets across the territory and 
several companies dealing in handicraft products. 
  CRC is joining forces with a local department store to build 
a mall in Shanghai with a total investment of HK$120 million. 
CRC has a 50-percent stake in the mall, which will begin 
operations in 1996. (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 
1310 GMT 5 Jan 93) 

<H3>    OTHER ISSUES: 
Hong Kong Regains Position as World's Biggest 
Container Port </H3>
  Extrapolated statistics show that Hong Kong will will handle 
a total of 9.3 million twenty foot equivalent units (TEU) in 
1993, eclipsing Singapore, Rotterdam, and Kaohsiung to become 
the world's biggest container port. Mainland China has made the 
biggest contribution to growth, with the value of goods 
transited via Hong Kong increasing by 33 percent from January to 
October this year, followed by Singapore (27 percent), Germany 
(23 percent), the United States (21 percent), the United Kingdom 
(19 percent), France (18 percent), Japan (17 percent), Canada 
(14 percent), and the ROK (12 percent). Mainland China is Hong 
Kong's biggest transit market and 42 percent of its export 
commodities are shipped abroad via Hong Kong. Hong Kong's 
efforts to constantly improve its port facilities and 
cargo-handling procedures have also contributed to the success 
in its shipping industry. Operating procedures have been 
improved. For instance, all incoming and exiting trucks are now 
supervised and directed by computer as a result of the Port 
Authority's decision to automatize and computerize procedures. 
This has reduced the time required to load and unload a 
container to less than one hour. 
  The container and shipping industry is very important to 
Hong 
Kong's economy. The industry handles 90 percent of the 
territory's total cargo and contributes 15 percent of GDP, 
providing jobs to 350,000 people. In the last five years, Hong 
Kong's capacity has increased 15 percent annually, and its 
marine cargo is predicted to increase from 100 million tonnes 
per annum at present to 200 million tonnes by the turn of the 
century, increasing further by 100 percent by 2011. (Hong Kong 
ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1022 GMT 27 Dec 93) gw 
<H5>  Hong Kong Contractors Face Protectionism on Mainland </H5>
  Stewart Cheng Kam-chui, a director of New World subsidiary 
Hip Hing Construction, says that the mainland construction 
industry is still not fully open to foreign contractors as local 
firms were often favored there. Mr Cheng said that foreign 
contractors were not allowed to undertake projects alone; only 
through joint ventures with local partners. Alternatively, they 
could take the role of project manger if half or more of the 
capital involved were foreign funds. In addition, according to 
Mr. Cheng, the current contract tendering system in China does 
not reflect market reality, because of favoritism shown towards 
state-run contractors. (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST 
(BUSINESS POST) 30 December 93 p 2) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40132 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hong Kong Economic Report 6-19 Jan </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK2001001094 </F>
<F P=103> HK2001001094 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:BFN 

  [Editorial Report] The following are summaries of media 
reports on economic developments in Hong Kong monitored by Hong 
Kong Bureau between 6 January and 19 January 1994. Source 
information is given in parentheses at the end of each item or 
is provided in the body of the item. 
<H5>  HONG KONG INVESTMENT IN PRC: </H5>
<H5>  Zung Fu Expands Auto Service Centers in South China </H5>
  Zung Fu, a division of Jardine International Motors Holdings 
and the sole agent for Mercedes-Benz in Hong Kong and Macao, is 
planning to set up 12 auto repair shops in the Zhu Jiang Delta 
and along the China coast in 1994, according to Chiang Kun-tai, 
the general manager of Zung Fu (China) Ltd. Mr. Chiang also 
said that the Shenzhen Zung Fu Xihu Service Company and its 
affiliated licensed Mercedes service center, a joint venture 
between Zung Fu and Shenzhen Xihu Enterprises Development 
Company, has opened for business. The service center is part of 
the company's strategy to set up a service network in South 
China and will attend to the needs of 3,000 Mercedes owners in 
Shenzhen, as well as Mercedes owners from Hong Kong who commute 
between the territory and the Zhu Jiang Delta. (Hong Kong 
ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0751 GMT 13 Jan 94) 
<H5>  Capital Steel Seeks Hong Kong Funding for Shandong Plant </H5>
  The parent company of Hong Kong-listed Shougang 
International 
has announced its involvement in a project to build a HK$45 
billion (Hong Kong dollars) steel plant in Shandong. Capital 
Iron and Steel Company Ltd., (Shougang) will raise more than 
HK$22.5 Billion on overseas markets and through the introduction 
of foreign investors. 
  The plant, which will be situated in Quli, Shandong 
Province, 
will have an annual capacity of 10 million tonnes. Sources said 
they expected Capital Iron and Steel's Hong Kong-listed 
subsidiary Shougang Concord Holdings to play a key role in 
raising overseas capital for the joint venture project with the 
Shandong Provincial government. The state would not provide 
funds for the project, but the new firm is expected to enjoy the 
same benefits and concessions as Sino-foreign joint ventures. 
(Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) in English 17 
Jan 94 p 1) 
<H5>  Law Firm Opens Office in Guangzhou </H5>
  The Hong Kong law firm Stephenson, Harwood and Lo has opened 
an office in Guangzhou. Julia F. Charlton, a lawyer with the 
firm, said the office would concentrate on offering legal 
services in stockbrokerage, bond issuance, and banking. 
Stephenson, Harwood and Lo expects to assist Chinese companies 
to issue H-shares (Hong Kong listed shares denominated in 
renminbi) and bonds, and to participate in "other financial 
activities." An official from the Guangdong Provincial Bureau 
of Justice said that Guangdong needs more foreign law firms to 
help improve its legal system and contribute to economic 
development. (Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 18 Jan 94 p 2) 
<H5>  Cheung Kong in Joint Venture To Build Yunnan Power Plant </H5>
  Hong Kong real estate giant Cheung Kong (Holdings), which is 
controlled by billionaire Li Ka-shing, has signed a letter of 
intent to build a HK$8.1 billion (Hong Kong dollars), 
1500-megawatt hydroelectric power plant in Yunnan to supply 
electricity to Thailand. According to Liang Dingxing, deputy 
chief of the Electricity Industry Planning Bureau of Yunnan, the 
plant will be located at Xi Shang Ba Na, near the PRC border 
with Laos and Vietnam. The plant would also help satisfy demand 
for electricity in southwest China. Although preparation work 
has already started, Mr. Liang said that "details" still had to 
be sorted out before the deal could be finalized. One reported 
stumbling block is that the Thai Government wants to acquire an 
equity stake in the joint venture handling construction of the 
plant. (Hong Kong HONGKONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) in 
English 18 Jan 94 p 1) 
<H5>  Hong Kong-Based Firm Invests in Guangzhou Steel Mill </H5>
  The Hong Kong-based Guangzhou Enterprise (Group) Company 
Ltd., is one of five underwriters for the Guangzhou Zhujiang 
Steel Plant, the largest construction project in the Guangzhou 
Development Zone. The plant, recently approved by the State 
Council, requires HK$620 million for its first phase of 
construction. It will begin production in July 1996. The other 
underwriters are Guangzhou Economic Construction and Development 
Company, Guangzhou Metallurgy Company, Guangzhou Development 
Zone State-Owned Asset Investment Company, and the Guangzhou 
International Trust and Investment Company. (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO 
TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 1102 18 Jan 94) cc 
<H5>  CITIC Hong Kong Invests in Shanghai Tunnel Project </H5>
  China International Trust and Investment Company's (CITIC) 
Hong Kong-listed subsidiary is to take part in a joint venture 
to build a multilane tunnel in Shanghai's Pudong New Area. A 
ceremony to mark the beginning of construction of the Shanghai 
Yanan Donglu Multilane Tunnel was held in Pudong on 18 January. 
The project is being carried out by the Shanghai-China 
International Trust and Investment Corporation Tunnel 
Development Ltd., a joint venture between the Shanghai Municipal 
Huangpu Jiang Tunnel Construction Company and CITIC (Hong Kong) 
Holdings. Total investment will be 1.4 billion yuan. (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 1031 GMT 18 Jan 94) 

<H5>    Kerry Group To Build Port Facilities in Guangxi </H5>
  According to Mao Xuhui, the mayor of Fanggang City, Guangxi, 
Robert Kuok's Kerry Group has invested 30 million yuan to 
construct a wharf in Fanggang City. Preparations are being made 
at present and construction is expected to begin in March. It 
is expected that the first phase of the project, which will 
involve the construction of three to five berths with the 
capability to handle 50,000-tonne vessels, will be completed by 
the 2000. Kerry Group plans to invest over 2 billion yuan in 
the project. (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in Chinese 1031 GMT 18 
Jan 94) ey 
<H5>  Twenty State Enterprises To List on Hong Kong Bourse in 1994 </H5>
  Professor Liu Hongru, chairman of China's Securities 
Supervision and Administration Committee, has said that 20 
state-owned enterprises will list on the Hong Kong Stock 
Exchange this year. Some would also have secondary listings on 
the New York and London stock exchanges, with a small number 
having their primary listings in New York. Professor Liu said 
that Hong Kong was a financial center in which international 
investors had great confidence, and that after 1997, the "one 
country, two systems" policy would enable Hong Kong to maintain 
its bridging role. (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO in Chinese 19 Jan 94 p 
A5) 
<H5>  PRC INVESTMENT IN HONG KONG: </H5>
  Guangdong Development Bank [GDB], China's first joint-stock 
bank, is to set up three representative offices in Hong Kong as 
part of its overseas expansion drive. Li Ruohong, GDB's vice 
president, said that the bank would like to upgrade its 
representative office to a branch office when the bank met asset 
requirements set by the Hong Kong Monetary Authority. GDB is 
currently marketing a $80 million five-year syndicated loan to 
banks in Hong Kong. Last year, GDB arranged a $50 million 
guaranteed facility for a power station in Huizhou, the first 
time it had acted as a guarantor in offshore funding. All of 
GDB's fund-raising activities have been done through Hong Kong. 
"If Hong Kong meets our needs, there is no reason for us to go 
somewhere else to raise funds," said Mr Li. (Hong Kong SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) in English 8 Jan 94 p 2) 
<H5>  OTHER ISSUES: </H5>
<H5>  Japanese Rank First Among Foreign Investors </H5>
  In recent years, Japanese companies have continued to 
increase their investments in Hong Kong, many of them attracted 
by the economic growth of Mainland China. In the last 10 years, 
Japanese companies have replaced U.S. and British firms as the 
largest foreign investor in Hong Kong. In order to lower 
operational costs and compete for greater market share, Japanese 
manufacturing enterprises have been increasing their overseas 
investments, and Hong Kong is a key point for such investment 
because of its proximity to China. According to Hong Kong 
government statistics, by the end of 1992, cumulative investment 
from Japan amounted to HK$124.45 billion, and Japanese companies 
fixed assets in Hong Kong totalled HK$85.16 billion, exceeding 
that of U.S. corporations, who ranked second. (Hong Kong 
ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese 0812 GMT 11 Jan 94) 
<H5>  Report Says Commercial Rents, Housing Costs To Rival Tokyo </H5>
  Hong Kong could have the world's most expensive rents if 
current trends continue, leading to fears that the territory 
could lose investment as businesses flee spiraling costs. 
  According to a study by property consultancy Brooke Hillier 
Parker, Hong Kong's retail rents are already 130 percent those 
of Tokyo at HK$545 per square foot (psf), while office and 
housing costs are rising continuously. The average office rent 
in Hong Kong is currently HK$62 psf, compared to HK$84 in Tokyo. 
However, a projected 30-percent rise in the territory's average 
office rent this year, combined with a 10 percent drop in Japan, 
could cause the two cities to change places in 1994. Housing 
costs, which are expected to rise by 25 to 30 percent this year, 
are also approaching parity with Tokyo. (Hong Kong THE STANDARD 
in English 12 Jan 94 p 21) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40133 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar010___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-010 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Hong Kong Economic Report 20 Jan-8 Feb </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0802100094 </F>
<F P=103> HK0802100094 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:BFN 

  [Editorial Report] The following are summaries of media 
reports on economic developments in Hong Kong monitored by Hong 
Kong Bureau between 20 January and 8 February 1994. Source 
information is given in parentheses at the end of each item or 
is provided in the body of the item. 
<H3>  HONG KONG INVESTMENT IN THE PRC: 
FEATURE: More Mainland Companies Prepare To List in 
Hong Kong </H3>
  At a seminar in Wuhan, representatives of the second batch 
of 
mainland companies to list on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange and 
officials of the China Securities Regulatory Commission (CSRC) 
met to discuss listing procedures, according to an article by 
Christine Chan on page 1 of the 27 January edition of the SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST). Among those listing is the 
Wuhan-based steel giant Wuhan Iron and Steel (Wugang), which is 
expected to be the largest listing of a Chinese company thus 
far, eclipsing Maanshan Iron and Steel's HK$3.93 billion (Hong 
Kong dollars) listing in November 1993. Maanshan's chairman, 
Hang Yongyi, was invited to speak at the conference to pass on 
his experience of listing in Hong Kong. 
  Of those expected to list, four are power supply companies: 
Huaneng International Power Development, Huaneng Electricity 
(Shandong), Datang Power Plant, and Shandong Power Plant. In 
addition, Harbin Power Plant Equipment and Northeast Electric 
Transmission and Transformation Equipment make power plant 
equipment, cables, and transformers for the electricity supply 
industry. Airline and transportation companies are also 
represented by China Eastern Airlines and China Southern 
Airlines, as is the Guangzhou-Shenzhen Railway, which is 
expected to raise up to HK$400 million. 
  In a series of articles on pages one and two of the 28 
January edition of the BUSINESS POST, Barry Porter and Foo Choy 
Peng examine several issues arising from the increasing numbers 
of mainland companies seeking to list on the Hong Kong Stock 
Exchange through either direct or indirect means. Barry Porter 
quotes the chairman of the Hong Stock Exchange, Charles Lee, 
saying that nearly all of the 22 companies listed would float 
shares in Hong Kong, although some could obtain secondary 
listings in other exchanges, notably New York. Mr. Lee, who 
attended the Wuhan seminar, said that the first of the new batch 
of PRC firms to list in the territory could be ready to make 
public offerings by June 1994. However, Mr. Lee also said that 
this may be "wishful thinking." 
  Foo Choy Peng cites a CSRC official who draws attention to 
several drawbacks encountered by mainland firms who had decided 
to obtain access to the Hong Kong stock market by the 
acquisition of Hong Kong-listed shell companies. Mr. Nie 
Qingping said that the CSRC was unable to supervise such 
companies effectively, which could lead to problems with 
investor protection. Mr. Nie added that such "back-door" 
listings also raised the possibility of state-owned assets 
flowing out of the country. Mr. Nie said that fund-raising 
through direct listings was the preferred method, with Hong Kong 
as the major venue for such exercises. 
  In another article on page one of the same issue, Foo cites 
Henry Tsang, a director of investment banking with Merrill Lynch 
in Hong Kong, who says that a shortage of market professionals 
could affect Hong Kong's ability to meet the requirements of 
those Chinese companies seeking to list in Hong Kong. According 
to Mr. Tsang, lawyers, bankers, and accountants in the territory 
were all operating at "full capacity." "We just don't know how 
much this market is able to cope in terms of more and more 
transactions." Mr. Tsang said that it took a lot of effort from 
many people to deal with just six public offering by mainland 
companies last year. "It is important to note that Hong Kong 
investors are probably not enough to satisfy all China's 
requirements," Mr. Tsang said, adding that it would not be easy 
for the Hong Kong market to absorb an issue substantially larger 
than $100 million 
<H5>  Listing of Wuhan Steel Firm To Fund Expansion Plans </H5>
  Wuhan Iron and Steel (Wugang) plans a major expansion using 
the proceeds expected from its launch on international 
securities markets. The company aims to produce up to 11 
million tonnes of steel in 1994. Sales are expected to hit 
17.6 billion yuan, with pre-tax profits of 3.45 billion yuan and 
foreign exchange earnings of $120 million. The company's 
expansion plans are expected to require capital expenditure of 
22.5 billion yuan and $850 million in foreign exchange. Wugang 
plans to build a third steel mill, a cold- rolled steel plant, 
and a 400-megawatt power plant. (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING 
POST (BUSINESS POST) in English 26 Jan 94 p 1) 
<H5>  Legend Computer To Raise HK$224 Million on Exchange </H5>
  Legend Holdings, a Hong Kong-based joint venture between 
Beijing Legend Holdings, Daw Computer Systems, and China 
Technology Trade (Hong Kong) Limited, is listing its shares on 
the Hong Kong Stock Exchange. The computer distributor and 
manufacturer is raising $29 million by issuing 168.75 million 
shares. Trading will begin on 14 February. According to 
company Chairman Liu Chuanzhi, the cash raised will be used to 
develop and market new products and for additional working 
capital. Legend has three design centers in Hong Kong, 
Shenzhen, and San Jose, California, and has an annual production 
capacity of 1.68 million motherboards. The company also 
distributes personal computers in mainland China through a 
network of 22 distributors. (Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 26 
Jan 94 p 2) 

<H5>    Mainland Chemical Firm Plans Hong Kong Listing </H5>
  Yizheng Chemical Fibre Company, the world's fourth largest 
manufacturer of polyester and one of the biggest chemical 
companies in China, plans to issue H shares on the Hong Kong 
Stock Exchange in March. According to the Jiangsu-based 
company's agenda, the H shares will be issued in mid-March and 
listed by the end of that month. Shares for domestic investors, 
A shares, will be listed on the Shanghai Stock Exchange in May. 
The company is presently engaged in a $421 million investment 
program which will raise the company's annual production 
capacity to 1 million tonnes by 1995. Last year, the firm 
produced 545,000 tonnes of polyester with total sales of 4.94 
billion yuan, profits of 1.05 billion yuan, and export earnings 
of $37.2 million. (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) in 
English 30 Jan 94 p 1) 
<H5>  Guangzhou Investment Placement To Raise HK$1 Billion </H5>
  Guangzhou Investment is raising HK$1.03 billion in a share 
placement to expand its interests in cement manufacturing in 
Guangdong. The placement is being arranged by Peregrine 
Brokerage and will dilute Yue Xiu Enterprises' controlling stake 
from 64 percent to 53 percent. Merchant bankers expect this to 
be the first of many issues in the territory to Hong Kong and 
international investors this year. Using the proceeds of the 
placement, the company plans to take interests in three cement 
operations in Guangdong: 51 percent of Zhujiang Cement Plant, 
which has an annual production capacity of 1.8 million tonnes; 
50 percent of the Huadu Cement Plant in Huada City, which will 
have an annual capacity of 400,000 tonnes on completion in 1995; 
and 51 percent of Xinqing Cement Plant, which had an annual 
capacity of 170,00 tonnes in 1993. The placement is the first 
major issue of its kind by the mainland group since its listing 
as the property arm of Yue Xiu in December 1992. (Hong Kong 
SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) in English 1 Feb 94 p 1) 
<H3>  PRC INVESTMENT IN HONG KONG: 
FEATURE: Mainland Investors Return to Surging Real 
Estate Market </H3>
  Both the commercial and residential property markets 
continued their upward surge in January, and the reappearance of 
large-scale purchases by PRC-funded firms emerged as a major 
factor driving the real estate market to new heights. 
  In an article on page 7 of the SUNDAY MORNING POST (SUNDAY 
MONEY) on 30 January, Kennis Chu examines the renewed influence 
of investors from mainland China in the Hong Kong property 
market. According to Chu, Chinese investment has risen 
noticeably since November 1993, when credit controls imposed in 
July of last year by Vice Premier Zhu Rongji to cool inflation 
were relaxed. Property prices have reached record highs, 
particularly for Grade-A office space and luxury apartments. 
The article states that Chinese participation in the real 
estate market can be divided into three types: central 
government enterprises, such as CITIC and China Merchants 
Holdings; companies owned by provincial governments like 
Guangdong Investment and Sichuan's Jianling (HK); and city and 
village-owned companies, such as Foshan's China Weal, Huiyang, 
and Pripenic. 
  In a front-page article in the 2 February issue of the SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST), Barry Porter cites a report 
by real estate consultant First Pacific Davies which puts the 
volume of recorded transactions in January at HK$17.32 billion 
and estimates an additional $5 billion in private transactions. 
The article points out that this exceeds the previous monthly 
record of HK$12 billion set in May 1993, a month in which there 
was an "unprecedented surge in buying by mainland corporations," 
a spree which Porter asserts was "partly responsible" for Zhu 
Rongji's July austerity program. The article goes on to state 
that mainland corporations are buying Hong Kong property as a 
hedge against a further devaluation of the yuan. However, most 
of the major publicly recorded purchases have been by completed 
by listed Hong Kong-based firms, such as Hong Kong China, 
controlled by the Lippo group, which paid HK$2.2 billion for an 
apartment block in the Mid Levels area; Lai Sun Group, which 
bought a Tsimshatsui office building for HK$1.4 billion; and 
Great Eagle, which paid HK$2 billion for the Ramada Renaissance 
Hotel, also in Tsimshatsui. 
  The SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) on 29 January 
reports on page one that, in an effort to reduce its exposure to 
the residential property market, the territory's leading lender 
has further tightened its policies on the provision of mortgages 
for "luxury" apartments costing more than HK$5 million. 
Hongkong Bank announced that from 29 January, the mortgage 
lending ratio for properties worth $5 million or above would be 
reduced to 50 percent from 60 percent. The ratio for those 
priced below $5 million remains at 70 percent. However, a 
report carried by the Hong Kong-based PRC-affiliated news agency 
ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE in Chinese at 0912 GMT on 30 January states 
that the Bank of China (BOC) Group had no intention of following 
Hongkong Bank for the moment. The report said that the BOC 
would closely watch the market's reaction and developments in 
the field. An official with the BOC Group said that they would 
not require their 13 subsidiary banks to follow the same rules 
in arranging mortgages; instead, the banks would be allowed to 
decide their own policy according to their particular financial 
resources. 
<H5>  Mainland Tourists To Supplant Taiwanese in 1994 </H5>
  According to estimates from the Hong Kong Travel Association 
and the China Travel Service, mainland China is expected to 
replace Taiwan as the source of the greatest number of visitors 
to Hong Kong. During the first 11 months of last year, the 
number of mainland tourists visiting Hong Kong rose to 1.58 
million, just behind arrivals from Taiwan. Last year, Hong Kong 
attracted 9 million visitors, a 13-percent increase on two years 
ago. Booming tourist arrivals have given Hong Kong's hotels an 
average occupancy rate of 85 percent. (Beijing CHINA DAILY in 
English 24 Jan 94 p 3) 

<H5>    Bank of China Chief on Operations in Hong Kong </H5>
  Mr. Wang Qiren, chairman of the board of directors of the 
Bank of China, has said that in transforming specialized banks 
in the mainland into commercial ones, the mainland should refer 
to experiences in bank management overseas, especially that of 
Hong Kong and Macao. Mr. Wang said that since the 
implementation of reform and opening to the outside world, 
financial circles in the mainland have set up increasingly close 
ties with their counterparts in Hong Kong. At present, 13 Hong 
Kong-based banks have set up 35 branches, 24 representative 
offices, and six jointly funded financial institutions in 
mainland China, and mainland banks, including the Bank of China 
and the People's Construction Bank of China, have also set up 
branches in the territory. Mr. Wang said that the Bank of China 
would develop its business in the territory in an active and 
steady way. (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE in English 1020 GMT 3 
Feb 94) 
<H5>  CITIC Pacific Takes 50 Percent of Lantau Development </H5>
  Hong Kong Resorts International (HKR) is selling half of its 
wholly owned subsidiary Hong Kong Resort Company to CITIC 
Pacific, a subsidiary of the Beijing-controlled China 
International Trust and Investment Company, for HK$3.4 billion. 
Hong Kong Resort's main asset is its Discovery Bay residential 
development on Lantau island, which has a population of 9,500. 
HKR Managing Director Payson Cha Mou-sing has been lobbying the 
Hong Kong Government to build a tunnel to link Discovery Bay 
with the North Lantau Expressway, which is part of the new 
airport project. At present, Discovery Bay is only accessible 
by ferry, but if linked to Kowloon by road, land values on 
Lantau Island would be likely to appreciate. (Hong Kong SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) in English 8 Feb 94 p 1) 
<H3>  OTHER ISSUES: 
Record Volume of Air Cargo in 1993 </H3>
  Hong Kong Air Cargo Terminals Ltd. (HACTL) handled a record 
1.1 million tonnes of air freight in 1993. Final year-end 
figures show that HACTL passed the 1-million-tonne mark for the 
first time in November. December saw a further 99,134 tonnes 
carried, up 19.6 percent on 1992. For the year, HACTL handled 
550,167 tones of export cargo, up 17.1 percent on 1992; 432,429 
tonnes of import cargo, up 22.1 percent; and 116,203 tonnes of 
transshipment goods, up 22.9 percent. 
  HACTL is one of three bidders for airport cargo handling 
franchise at Chek Lap Kok. However, the Provisional Airport 
Authority is unwilling to grant any franchises for Chek Lap Kok 
until the Sino-British disagreement over airport financing is 
resolved. The other bidders for the franchise are the Hong Kong 
Airport Services consortium, comprising Singapore interests, 
China Merchant Holdings, and Kerry Holdings, and DHL. (Hong Kong 
SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) in English 25 Jan 94 p 
2) 
<H5>  Growth in Imports, Exports Slows in 1993 </H5>
  Hong Kong's trade deficit fell last year, but growth in 
exports and imports slowed and some analysts believe the 
territory is heading for a period of stagnant growth in external 
trade. Exports grew 13.1 in the year to December, while 
imports rose 12.2 percent, leaving a total trade deficit of 
HK$26.3 billion. Miron Mushkat, chief economist at Lehman 
Brothers, said that China's economy was unlikely to be a 
"particular source of strength" to Hong Kong. China's austerity 
program was said to have affected re-exports while domestic 
exports continued to be affected by the relocation of 
manufacturing industry to the mainland. (Hong Kong HONG KONG 
STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) in English 29 Jan 94) 
<H5>  End of Vietnam Embargo Boosts Shares of Hong Kong Firm </H5>
  The share price of Luks Industrial jumped 21 percent on 3 
February as prospects of an end to the U.S. embargo against 
Vietnam became apparent. Luks was one of the first local 
companies to invest in Vietnam despite the U.S. ban on trade 
with Hanoi. Luks owns 71 percent of a plywood plant with an 
annual production capacity of 40,000 cubic meters and has 80 
percent of a cement works which will have an annual capacity of 
500,00 tonnes a year on completion. The company also has an 
interest in a 500,000-square-foot commercial property in Ho Chi 
Minh City. (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 
in English 4 Feb 94 p 2) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40134 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Asia-Pacific Region, `Good Neighbor' Policy Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0097A GUOJI WENTI YANJIU [INTERNATIONAL STUDIES] in 
Chinese No 50, 13 Oct 93 pp 1-3, 7 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0097A </F>
<F P=104>  GUOJI WENTI YANJIU [INTERNATIONAL STUDIES] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhan Shiliang (6124 0013 0081): "The </F>
Asia-Pacific Situation and China's `Good Neighbor' Policy"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] 
<H6>  II. </H6>
  With the conclusion of the Cold War, Asian-Pacific hot spots 
began to cool down. The peace process sped up in Kampuchea, 
South Korea and North Korea strengthened their negotiations, and 
each of the East Asian nations began paying more attention to 
their own economic construction, with mutual friendly 
cooperation and closer relationships. A new pattern of 
multilateral force which was both competitive and cooperative 
emerged gradually in the Asia-Pacific area, and the situation in 
the entire region tended to be more relaxed. 
  The relative stability and economic development in the 
Asia-Pacific region doesn't mean there are no negative factors 
which could affect stability and development. Power politics and 
hegemonism are still the major barriers to peace and development 
in the whole world and in this region; economic factors play a 
prominent role in international relationships, while economic 
development throughout the world is unbalanced, trade 
protectionism is growing stronger, and the conflicts between 
some nations (especially between the United States and Japan) is 
increasing. The former hot spot Korean peninsula remains in a 
very unstable situation, and the Kampuchea question has not been 
completely resolved, with new outbreaks of clashes still a 
possibility. Russia is in a turbulent state. There also exist in 
East Asia territorial disputes and ethnic and religious 
conflicts which could also interfere with the stability of the 
situation. In addition, it is still difficult to predice the 
future development of Japanese-U.S. relations, or Chinese-U.S. 
relations. Some countries still harbor suspicions about Japan 
developing into a military power. It is precisely because of 
these unstable and uncertain factors that we should pay 
sufficient attention to questions of Asia-Pacific security. 
  All Asia-Pacific nations strongly demand the further 
economic 
development of their own countries, and experience has proven 
that this will only be accomplished under conditions of 
continued peace and stability in the region. Peace and stability 
are related to the fundmental interests of each nation; if 
contradictions and disputes arise among them, the only correct 
course of action is to seek a means of resolution through 
peaceful negotiations, avoiding antagonism giving way to 
outbreaks of violence. 
  In varying degrees, economic development will create 
competition and conflict, but if we are talking about East Asia 
itself, these will be more compensatory in nature. Due to 
differences in economic base, development level, and situation, 
the East Asian nations are establishing a multilevel 
developmental structure, with closer, more cooperative economic 
and trade relations. The whole of East Asia has formed into a 
constantly expanding, huge market, and is on the steady path to 
regional cooperation and development. Although mutual 
competition will develop, mutual cooperation and benefit will be 
the chief aspect of this. 
  As mentioned before, the Asia-Pacific region already had a 
multipolar tendency early on, and this tendency will grow even 
stronger. It would be impossible for one or two countries, or a 
group of countries, to control the entire region. The 
multi-power co-existence of China, Japan, United States, and 
Russia as well as the Association of Southeast Asian Nations 
(ASEAN), and Australia will serve to restrict, control, and 
balance the overall situation. The rise of developing countries 
like China and ASEAN will be positive factors in curbing great 
powers from fighting over this region. 
  The situation and conditions in the Asia-Pacific region 
differs considerably from that of Europe, so it would be 
difficult to build a regional peace organ here modeled on a 
European model peace alliance. We have to study enthusiastically 
how to establish a regional peace organ which will gradually 
suit the region's specific factors. Based on the current 
situation, we should pay more attention to open up various 
bilateral peace negotiations and talks, while also carrying out 
appropriate multilateral activities, holding multiple type, 
multilevel, multichannel conversations, to increase 
understanding, communicate knowledge, and increase trust. 
  In the 1990s, the Asia-Pacific region will be in a 
transitional phase toward a new, multipolar pattern. It is 
possible there will be tensions and crises in some areas or some 
individual problems, due to sharpened contradictions. However, 
looking at the entire entity, the Asia-Pacific region could 
possibly remain very stable for the next decase. Meanwhile, it 
will continue to attract the whole world's attention with the 
rapidity of its economic development. 
<H6>  III. </H6>
  The backwards, disunified, old China was the frequent target 
of invasions by the great powers. The great powers' battles in 
China was one important reason for past instability, or constant 
disorder, and even war in the East Asia region. After the 
People's Republic of China was founded, it conducted a peaceful 
diplomatic policy of independence and self-determination. China 
initiated the Five Principles of Peaceful Coexistence, and has 
always taken as the basic principle of its foreign affairs the 
establishment and development of friendly cooperative relations 
with all the world's nations. Now, China has become an important 
pillar of stability and development in the Asia-Pacific region. 
  Striving for a peaceful and stable territorial environment 
is 
a focal point in China's foreign affairs. China pays special 
attention to developing relationships with nations in 
neighboring territory, always conducting a good neighbor policy. 
Now, China's relationships with these territorial neighbors are 
in a totally fine situation. Leaders visit each other 
constantly, while economic and trade cooperative relationships 
are growing closer and closer. 
  Last year was the 20th anniversary of the normalization of 
relations between China and Japan, with widespread and deeply 
felt ceremonies held in both nations. In April, General 
Secretary Jiang Zemin visited Japan, taking relations between 
China and Japan to a new stage of developing friendship. In 
October, Japanese Emperor Akihito paid a six-day historical 
visit to China. Not long after China and South Korea established 
relations, President Roh Tae Woo visited China, and the 
governments of the two countries signed four agreements on 
trade, investment protection and other issues. In November of 
last year, Premier Li Peng made a formal visit to Vietnam in 
response to a invitation, the first visit to Vietnam by a 
Chinese premier in 21 years. In the first half of the year, 
Philippine President Ramos, Malaysian Premier Mahathir, and 
Singapore Prime Minister Goh Chok Tong all visited China, while 
Thailand Premier Chuan Leepai visited China in late August; not 
long ago, Central Committee Chairman Qiao Shi visited Indonesia, 
Malaysia, Singapore, Thailand, and the Philippines. These 
important mutual visits strongly promoted the development of 
relations between China and ASEAN. Meanwhile, a delegation from 
the party and government, led by standing members of the 
Political Bureau of the Central Committee of the Chinese 
Communist Party, visited North Korea to foster friendly and 
cooperative relations between China and that nation. 
  These good political relations provide considerable impetus 
to the development of economic and trade relations. In 1991, 
trade between China and Japan grossed nearly $23 billion, 10 
times what it was prior to the establishment of diplomatic 
relations between the two nations. In 1991, trade between China 
and South Korea was up to $5.8 billion, and in 1992, it was up 
to $8.2 billion. This year, it is expected to reach $10 billion. 
In 1978, trade between China and the ASEAN countries was only 
$859 million; in 1988, it increased to $3.818 billion, a 
3.4-fold increase for the decade. There have been further large 
increases in recent years, reaching $8.466 billion in 1992, 15 
times again what it was in 1975. There is still tremendous 
potential for future development: At present, trade between 
China and ASEAN constitutes only about 5 percent of China's 
total foreign trade and just a little over 2 percent of that of 
ASEAN. 
  There are terrorital questions which remain between China 
and 
some nations, legacies of history. China has always taken a very 
cautious attitute concerning these matters. Early in 1957, 
former Premier Zhou Enlai fully laid out for the National 
People's Congress China's principal considerations in resolving 
terrorital issues, saying that, "We want to resolve terrorital 
questions, with the goal of stabilizing our borders, to 
alleviate the international situation in a way that is 
beneficial to modernization, but without making our relationship 
with our neighbors tense." He went on to say that resolution 
of territorial questions must be linked with expanding the Five 
Principles of Peaceful Coexistence; we should seek resolution of 
these questions on a basis of treating both sides as equals, 
favorable to each other and to friendship. The Chinese 
Government has conscientiously implemented the above principles 
and policies, treating each situation differently while being 
practical and realistic. It has resolved terrorital questions 
with some neighboring countries fairly and reasonably, while 
some problems are currently being negotiated and there has been 
some progress. At the beginning of this year, when Foreign 
Minister Qian Qichen visited Laos, the two sides signed a 
"Terrorital Agreement Between China and Laos." Concerning the 
issue of the Spratly Islands, the sovereign rights or which 
belong to China, the Chinese Government expressed the idea of 
"putting dispute aside, and developing together," and the 
positive response to this from relevant nations is growing by 
the day. 
  China was subjected to endless bullying and humiliation 
under 
hegemonism, so it will always oppose hegemonism and power 
politics. China will never seek hegemony for itself, never 
engage in expansionism or threaten other countries with military 
force, nor will China fill any so-called "vacuum" either, 
setting aside the fact that no "vacuum of power" exists in the 
Asia-Pacific region. On a per capita basis, China's military 
expenditure is only about $6 at present, while the United 
States' is $1,100 and Japan's is $300; does this not make it 
clear that China's military expenditures are very low? China's 
military forces are completely used for defense, and it holds no 
military advantage in the region. The "China threat theory" is 
purely fictitious. 
  China is a developing nation with one-fifth of the world's 
population, and its present focus is on building its domestic 
economy. For over a decade, China has adhered to a basic 
national policy of reform and opening up to the outside world, 
with considerable achievements. China's opening up to the world 
is establishing a new pattern of multi-level, multi-channel 
opening in all directions. This requires the development of 
closer economic and trade relationships with every nation in the 
Asia-Pacific region, as well as the long term maintainence of 
peace, stability, and development throughout the region. China 
has a weak economic base spread over a vast area. Regional 
development is very unbalanced throughout the country, and the 
average GNP still puts it among the world's low income nations. 
In the livelihood of the people, the problem of getting 
sufficient food and clothing for everyone has just been 
resolved, so the common standard of living will not reach the 
point of being comfortably well off before the end of this 
century. Furthermore, achieving the planned strategic goal of 
bringing China up to the level of a medium developed country is 
still a long way off, and will take several decades of hard 
work. Even if it is a rich and strong nation at that time, China 
will still strive for continual improvement and prosperity in 
the people's standard of living, so will still need peace and 
stability in the Asia-Pacific region and throughout the world. 
  In summary, China's security and benefit are linked closely 
with the peace and stability of the Asia-Pacific region. China 
will work with each country in the Asia-Pacific region to 
achieve regional peace and development, moving forward hand in 
hand to promote greater stability and prosperity throughout the 
world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40135 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article on Mao Zedong's `On New Democracy' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0402081194 Beijing JINGJI YANJIU in Chinese No 12, 20 Dec 
93 pp 16-25 </F>

<F P=103> HK0402081194 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI YANJIU </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Haibo (3769 3189 3134) of the Industrial </F>
Economics Institute of the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences: 
"A Study on Mao Zedong's `On New Democracy'"] 
  [Text] "On New Democracy" is a brilliant epoch-making work 
on Marxism written by Mao Zedong. Studying this work again not 
only helps remind us of the great achievements of Mao Zedong, 
but contributes to a correct understanding of history during 
those early days of New China, and enables us to gain useful 
insights into many theoretical and practical issues. 
<H3>  I. "On New Democracy" Includes Not Only "The Theory of New 
Democracy" But Also "The Theory of New-Democratic Society" </H3>
  From materials that I have come across, since "the theory of 
new democracy" was first put forward, practically all 
discussions on the topic either wittingly or unwittingly treated 
"the theory of new democracy" as "the theory of new-democratic 
revolution" and made no mention (at least not clearly) of "the 
theory of new-democratic society." After the idea that "the 
transitional period is a new-democratic period" was put forward 
in 1953, whether or not there existed a new-democratic society 
independent and distinct from the transitional period became a 
theoretical problem. In 1955, the formulation "the transition 
from a new-democratic society to a socialist society" was 
reworded to read "the transition from capitalism to socialism." 
After this rewording, whether or not there existed a 
new-democratic society in theory again became a fundamental 
theoretical problem. It was only under the guidance of the 
Marxist ideological line of seeking truth from facts, which was 
restored at the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee, that people began discussing these issues. For 
example, in his paper entitled "On the Historic Mission of `The 
Theory of New-Democratic Society'" and his long article entitled 
"From `The Theory of New-Democratic Society' to `The Theory of 
the Primary Stage of Socialism,'" Yu Guanyuan [0060 0342 6678) 
systematically expounded, for the first time, the view that "the 
theory of new democracy" established by Mao Zedong included two 
closely related and inseparable components, namely, "the theory 
of new-democratic revolution" and "the theory of new-democratic 
society." (Footnote 1) (Yu Guanyuan: Studies on 
Socialism in Political Economy, Vol 5, People's Publishing 
House, 1991 (same below), pp 494-495) Bo Yibo also 
unequivocally pointed out in his famous work entitled "Reviews 
on Certain Major Policy Decisions and Events": "Some people 
said that this theory (that is, `the theory of new 
democracy'--author) only applies to the period of new-democratic 
revolution. This is not true. It also covers the conception of 
a new-democratic society." (Footnote 2) (Bo Yibo: 
Reviews on Certain Major Policy Decisions and 
Events, Vol 1, CPC Central Committee Party School Press, 
1991 (same below), p 61) However, this question does not seem 
to have aroused too much interest among Chinese academic 
circles. As noted above, it will be useful in historical, 
theoretical and practical terms to acquire a clear understanding 
of this question. 
  In order to further illustrate that "the theory of new 
democracy" covers "the theory of new-democratic revolution" and 
"the theory of new-democratic society," it is necessary to 
analyze the basic ideas of these two theories. The basis on 
which Mao Zedong established "the theory of new-democratic 
revolution" was that "Chinese society as it exists today is 
colonial, semicolonial and semifeudal in nature." The 
international background of that society was: "After the first 
imperialist world war and the October Revolution in Russia," the 
"Chinese bourgeois-democratic revolution" "became an integral 
part of the world proletarian socialist revolution." (Footnote 
3) (Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 2, People's 
Publishing House (same below), pp 633, 666-667) 
  This being the nature of Chinese society, "it follows that 
the character of the Chinese revolution in its present stage is 
bourgeois-democratic, that its principal targets are imperialism 
and feudalism and that its basic motive forces are the 
proletariat, the peasantry and the urban petty bourgeoisie, with 
the national bourgeoisie taking part at certain times and to a 
certain extent; it also follows that the principal form of 
struggle in the Chinese revolution is armed struggle." 
(Footnote 4) (Ibid, pp 604) Later, this was summed up by Mao 
Zedong as: "A revolution against imperialism, feudalism and 
bureaucrat-capitalism waged by the broad masses of the people 
under the leadership of the proletariat. This is China's 
new-democratic revolution, and is the general line and general 
policy of the Chinese Communist Party in the present historical 
period." (Footnote 5) (Selected Works of Mao Zedong, 
Vol 4, pp 1316-1317) 
  This nature of Chinese society also determines that "the 
Chinese revolution must be divided into two stages. The first 
step is to change the colonial, semicolonial and semifeudal form 
of society into an independent, democratic society. The second 
is to carry the revolution forward and build a socialist 
society." (Footnote 6) (Selected Works of Mao 
Zedong, Vol 2, p 666) 
  The new-democratic society emerged as a great 
accomplishment of new-democratic revolution. As a theoretical 
reflection of this social practice, "the theory of 
new-democratic society" is also a natural conclusion derived 
from "the theory of new-democratic revolution." However, this 
is only the interrelated side of "the theory of new-democratic 
society" and "the theory of new-democratic revolution." The two 
theories are also different in other ways. 
  In order to show their differences, it is necessary to look 
at the history of this concept of new-democratic society. 
  Mao Zedong wrote his famous work The Chinese Revolution 
and the Chinese Communist Party in 1939. In this book, he 
not only systematically put forward the theory of new-democratic 
revolution, but put forward the basic notion of a new-democratic 
society. He said: "The whole picture will show the development 
of socialist as well as capitalist factors. What will the 
socialist factors be? The increasing relative importance of the 
proletariat and the Communist Party among the political forces 
in the country; leadership by the proletariat and the Communist 
Party which the peasantry, intelligentsia and the urban petty 
bourgeoisie already accept or are likely to accept; as well as 
the state sector of the economy owned by the democratic republic 
and the cooperative sector of the economy owned by the working 
people. All these will be socialist factors. With the addition 
of a favorable international environment, these factors render 
it highly probable that China's bourgeois-democratic revolution 
will ultimately avoid a capitalist future and enjoy a socialist 
future." (Footnote 7) (Ibid, p 650) However, the concept of 
new-democratic society was not yet used in this writing and was 
only used for the first time in "On New Democracy." After this, 
he also used this concept and other related concepts, such as 
"new-democratic state system" (or "new-democratic states") and 
"new-democratic economic forms" on several occasions. (Footnote 
8) (Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 3, p 1056; 
Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 4, pp 1253, 1433, 
1476) He also analyzed the politics, economics and culture of 
the new-socialist society on other occasions. 
  In short, in so far as the content of "the theory of 
new-democratic revolution" and "the theory of new-democratic 
society," goes, the former is about the nature, targets, tasks, 
motive forces, road and future of the Chinese revolution after 
the October Revolution in Russia, while the latter is about the 
politics, economics and culture of Chinese society after the 
victory of the new-democratic revolution. 
  However, the fulfillment of the above-mentioned tasks of the 
new-democratic society after the nationwide victory of the 
new-democratic revolution is not something that can be 
accomplished within a short time, but has to go through a 
historical period. Mao Zedong talked about "the entire 
historical period of new democracy" in "On Coalition 
Government," written in 1945. (Footnote 9) (Selected 
Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 3, p 1093) Here, "the entire 
historical period" primarily includes the time needed to 
complete the new-democratic revolution, but it also includes the 
time needed to fulfill the various tasks of the new democratic 
society. Mao Zedong further elaborated on this at the Enlarged 
Meeting of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central Committee in 
September 1948. At that meeting, Liu Shaoqi delivered a report 
entitled "On the Question of Building New Democracy." The 
central idea of the report is that after winning the democratic 
revolution, we cannot directly and immediately make the 
transition to socialism. He said: "We will make `Left' 
mistakes if we take steps to eliminate capitalism prematurely." 
Mao Zedong agreed with his view, but added in particular: 
"When should we make an all-out offensive then? Well, perhaps 
15 years after nationwide victory." (Footnote 10) (Quoted from 
Reviews on Certain Major Policy Decisions and Events, 
Vol 1, p 47) 
  In this way, a distinction is made between the time needed 
to 
realize the new-democratic revolution and the time needed to 
realize the new-democratic society. Of course there are areas 
where the two overlap. This overlapping has a dual meaning: 
First, the time between the "May 4 Movement" in 1919 and the 
founding of the PRC is the time when the new-democratic 
revolution took place. However, between 1928, when 
revolutionary bases were established, and the year New China was 
founded policies of the new-democratic society were implemented 
at different times and to different extents in the revolutionary 
bases and the liberated areas. Second, the founding of New 
China marked the completion of the new-democratic revolution and 
the beginning of the new-democratic society. However, during 
this period, it was still necessary to fulfill some of the tasks 
left by the new-democratic revolution, the most important task 
being the completion of the land reform. On the whole, the 
new-democratic revolution began and finished earlier than the 
new democratic society. Although the new-democratic revolution 
ended prematurely, the period between the founding of New China 
in October 1949 and when the general line of the party for the 
transitional period was put forward and implemented in 1952 
still constituted the new democratic revolution. This is 
because "The Common Program of the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference," as a comprehensive program for the 
new-democratic society, was still realized quite thoroughly. 
This made Chinese society at this time a rather typical 
new-democratic society. 
  To sum up, whether we look at the whole process of the 
formation and development of "the theory of new democracy," or 
whether we look at the differences between "the theory of 
new-democratic revolution" and "the theory of new-democratic 
society" in terms of content, duration and the practical basis 
upon which they were formed, "the theory of new democracy" does 
include two interrelated yet different components, namely "the 
theory of new-democratic revolution" and "the theory of 
new-democratic society." It is simply not in accord with 
reality to understand "the theory of new democracy" only as "the 
theory of new-democratic revolution." 
  The formulation that the transitional period is a 
new-democratic period is also difficult to substantiate 
theoretically. The theory of transition was first put forward by 
Marx in "Critique of the Gotha Program" and was subsequently 
developed by Lenin in "Economics and Politics in the Era of the 
Dictatorship of the Proletariat." It actually refers to the 
transition from capitalism to socialism in capitalist countries 
after the victory of the proletarian revolution. The new 
democratic society in China is a special period of social 
development after the victory of the new-democratic revolution 
in semifeudal and semicolonial China. Although during this 
period political and economic factors of socialism had the upper 
hand and its future lay in the realization of socialism, as a 
special social historical stage it was different in principle 
from the transition from capitalism to socialism. 
  Even from the perspective of Chinese history, it does not 
make sense to equate the transitional period with the 
new-democratic period. As noted above, China was a typical 
new-democratic society during the years between the founding of 
New China in October 1949 and 1952. China's transitional period 
covered the period between 1953 and 1956, when the party's 
general line for the period of transition was put forward and 
implemented. There is a clear distinction in time between the 
two. It is true that the socialist transformation of individual 
agricultural and handicraft undertakings and private capitalist 
industry and commerce had already begun during the years between 
October 1949 and 1952. However, during this period, the 
principal economic feature was still the implementation of the 
above-mentioned three major economic programs of the party for 
the new-democratic period, and what we had was the economic form 
of new democracy which comprised five economic sectors. There 
is a difference in principle between this and the principal 
economic feature of the subsequent transitional period, which 
was the transformation of various private ownership systems into 
socialist public ownership. 
  Meanwhile, the formulation "the transition from capitalism 
to 
socialism" does not hold water in whatever sense given the 
conditions in China. The reason is: China already had 
liberated areas before October 1949 while it was still a 
semicolonial and semifeudal society, and after that it existed 
as a new-democratic society. Where does the "transition from 
capitalism to socialism" come in? 
  Thus, as discussed above, the view that "the theory of new 
democracy" includes both "the theory of new-democratic 
revolution" and "the theory of new-democratic society" will 
stand despite the putting forward of new formulations, such as 
"the transitional period is a new-democratic period" and "the 
transition from capitalism to socialism." 
<H3>  II. "The Theory of New Democracy" Is Mao Zedong's 
Development of Marxism </H3>
  Half a century has elapsed since the publication of "On New 
Democracy" in 1940. However, we still cannot claim that Chinese 
academia has fully grasped the great significance of "the theory 
of new democracy." Take for instance the recent academic 
dispute over "the theory of two leaps" and "the theory of three 
leaps" in the history of the development of socialism. The 
proponents of the first theory believe that the first leap in 
the history of the development of socialism was when Marx and 
Engels turned socialism from a utopian dream into a science, 
while the second leap was the completion of the transformation 
of scientific socialism from its conventional mode into 
present-day socialism, which in China is socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. (Footnote 11) (GUANGMING RIBAO, 24 April 1993, 
p 3) The proponents of the second theory believe that there was 
another leap between the two mentioned above, and that was the 
development of Marxism by Lenin and Stalin. (Footnote 12) 
(GUANGMING RIBAO 21 July 1993 p 3) It is not my intention to 
give a full appraisal of these discussions here. However, it 
should be pointed out that they have all overlooked the fact 
that the putting forward of "the theory of new democracy" is 
also a leap in the history of the development of socialism; in 
other words, it is an epoch-making development of Marxism. 
  Marx and Engels no doubt brought about a leap in the history 
of the development of socialism by turning socialism from a 
utopian dream into a science. However, the founders of Marxism 
could not have answered the numerous new problems which were to 
determine the destiny of socialism (including the victory of 
socialism and the consolidation of the victory of socialism) 
after their deaths. For example, they once put forward two 
concepts: First, "the communist revolution will be no merely 
national one; it will be a revolution taking place 
simultaneously in all civilized countries, that is, at least in 
England, United States, France and Germany." (Footnote 13) 
(Selected Works of Marx and Engels, Vol 1, p 221) 
Second, "with the seizing of the means of production by 
society, production of commodities is done away with and, 
simultaneously, the mastery of the product over the producer. 
Anarchy in social production is replaced by systematic, 
definite organization." (Footnote 14) (Selected Works of 
Marx and Engels, Vol 3, p 323) However, neither of these 
two concepts conformed to the subsequent practice of socialism. 
  Based on his analysis of the basic economic and political 
characteristics of imperialism, particularly his analysis of the 
law of the unbalanced development of economy and politics, Lenin 
drew this conclusion: "Socialism may triumph first in a few 
capitalist countries, or even in a single country." Moreover, 
"the chain of the imperialist front must, as a rule, break where 
the links are weaker and, at all events, not necessarily where 
capitalism is more developed." (Footnote 15) (Selected 
Works of Lenin, Vol 2, p 709; Stalin: The Question 
of Leninism, p 22-23) Thus, Lenin replaced the outmoded 
theory of socialist revolution put forward by the founders of 
Marxism with the new theory of socialist revolution under the 
new historical conditions of imperialism. We can see clearly 
that without the guidance of this new theory, there could not 
have been the victory of the October Socialist Revolution in 
Russia in 1917, or, for that matter, the birth of a string of 
socialist countries after World War II. Thus, we should regard 
this new theory and the theory of the dictatorship of the 
proletariat put forward by Lenin as an epoch-making development 
of the theory of scientific socialism. 
  On the second concept, if we had followed in the footsteps 
of 
the former Soviet Union and the socialist countries in Europe, 
we would not have been able to consolidate the socialist system. 
It was Deng Xiaoping who, with the great courage and resolution 
of a proletarian revolutionary and guided by the universal 
principles of Marxism, negated this concept on the basis of a 
scientific summing up of the practice of socialism. He also put 
forward step by step the theory of the socialist market economy 
and the general principle of reform and opening up after the 
Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee. Under 
the guidance of this theory and principle, China has attracted 
worldwide attention with its achievements in economic structural 
reform and its economic development, which is mainly the work of 
reform. Thus, while the socialist countries in Europe were 
falling apart one after another, China's socialist cause 
flourished as never before. Thus, the theory of socialism with 
Chinese characteristics (which includes the theory of socialist 
market economy) put forward by Comrade Deng Xiaoping and further 
summed up by the 14th CPC National Congress in 1992 should be 
seen as another epoch-making development of Marxism. 
  In these respects, we do not disagree in principle with "the 
theory of two leaps" (for the most part) or "the theory of three 
leaps" (in its totality). However, for the purpose of this 
article, what we need to analyze is the notion that "the theory 
of new democracy" is also an epoch-making development of Marxism. 
  It should be affirmed that the concept of the leadership of 
the proletariat in the bourgeois-democratic revolution put 
forward by Marx and Engels, and particularly many of Lenin's and 
Stalin's ideas about national liberation movements in colonies 
no doubt provided important guidance in the formation of "the 
theory of new-democratic revolution." However, as an integrated 
theory, "the theory of new-democratic revolution," particularly 
as an integrated general line and formula for new-democratic 
revolution like "the revolution of the masses of the people led 
by the proletariat against imperialism, feudalism and 
bureaucratism" was entirely Mao Zedong's own creation. Moreover, 
it was under the guidance of "the theory of new-democratic 
revolution" that China, which accounted for a large proportion 
of the world's population, won a victory in its democratic 
revolution and paved the way for the subsequent victory of the 
Chinese socialist revolution. Thus, it is wrong to deny "the 
theory of new- democratic revolution" as an original idea of Mao 
Zedong's when we see that this theory includes the ideas of Marx 
and Engels, and particularly the ideas of Lenin and Stalin. 
This is the first point I want to make. 
  Second, although "the theory of new-democratic revolution" 
has Chinese characteristics, its basic content still had 
universal significance as a guiding principle for revolutionary 
movements in colonies and semicolonies after the October 
Revolution in Russia. Mao Zedong noted the following in "The 
Chinese Revolution and the Chinese Communist Party": "We call 
this special type the new- democratic revolution and it is 
developing in all other colonial and semicolonial countries as 
well as in China." (Footnote 16) (Selected Works of Mao 
Zedong, Vol 2, p 647) He also wrote in "On New Democracy": 
In the era after the October Socialist Revolution in Russia, 
"any revolution in a colony or semicolony that is directed 
against imperialism ... no longer comes within the old category 
of the bourgeois-democratic world revolution, but within the new 
category." (Footnote 17) (Ibid, pp 667-668) It should also be 
noted that in the era of the proletarian socialist world 
revolution, although the proletariat of capitalist countries 
constituted the main force, and the oppressed peoples in the 
colonies and semicolonies were the allies, the latter played a 
decisive role in the proletarian socialist world revolution 
because they made up a large proportion of the world population. 
Thus, as a guiding ideology for national-democratic revolutions 
in colonial and semicolonial countries, "the theory of 
new-democratic revolution" was of immense international 
significance. 
  Third, if we look at how socialist countries in Europe fell 
apart one after another in the late 1980s and early 1990s, we 
can see that the victory of the Chinese revolution, as well as 
the existence and development of socialist China as a result, 
are of decisive importance to the world socialist revolution. 
Of course there are many reasons why China's socialist system 
can be consolidated, the most decisive reason being the 
systematic implementation of market- oriented economic 
structural reforms, yet taken all in all, it is because the 
consolidation of China's socialist system always has the victory 
of the Chinese revolution as its precondition. 
  Based on the above analysis, we have every reason to regard 
"the theory of new-democratic revolution" as an important aspect 
of the epoch-making development of Marxism. 
  However, while "the theory of new-democratic revolution" 
includes many of the ideas expressed by Marx and Engels, and 
particularly by Lenin and Stalin, "the theory of new-democratic 
society" takes its place in the history of the development of 
Marxism as something new. Here it is mainly a development of 
the doctrine of socioeconomic forms with historical materialism 
as its basic content. According to the concept of Marxism, 
there are the following five chronologically arranged 
socioeconomic forms in the history of the development of human 
society: Primitive communist society--slave society--feudal 
society--capitalist society-- communist society (including the 
socialist stage and the communist stage). In addition, there 
are also other nonfundamental socioeconomic forms. For example, 
semicolonial and semifeudal China was a nonfundamental 
socioeconomic form, and the new-democratic society established 
in China after the new-democratic revolution was another 
nonfundamental socioeconomic form. However, this new-democratic 
society not only existed in China, which had the largest 
population, but also existed in Russia after the victory of the 
October Revolution and in all colonial and semicolonial 
countries after the victory of their democratic revolutions. 
Hence, it is of widespread international significance. 
  Furthermore, with "the theory of new-democratic society" 
guiding practice in the first three years following the founding 
of New China, semicolonial and semifeudal China was turned into 
a new-democratic society on the basis of its victory in the 
democratic revolution. This was the first new-democratic 
society established in populous China in the history of mankind. 
"The theory of new-democratic society" also guided the 
restoration of the national economy during this period. This 
enabled us to achieve great successes which amazed the world 
within three short years in spite of immense difficulties, and 
laid a solid foundation for the subsequent victory of the 
socialist system in China. 
  Thus, given that "the theory of new democracy" (including 
"the theory of new-democratic revolution" and "the theory of 
new-democratic society") developed Marxism in such significant 
ways, and that it comprehensively and systematically paved the 
way for the development of the national-democratic revolution in 
colonial and semicolonial countries, which occupied an important 
position in the proletarian socialist world revolution and 
accounted for a large proportion of the world population, and 
for the realization of socialism after winning the revolution, 
it is not unjustified to call it an epoch-making development of 
Marxism. 
  Regrettably, China prematurely ended the new-democratic 
society in 1952 and entered the transitional period in 
accordance with Lenin's theory of transition in 1953. Because 
of this, the role of "the theory of new-democratic society" had 
not been fully brought into play, and its great significance at 
home and in the international arena had not been fully 
demonstrated. 
  However, after 45 years of practice following the founding 
of 
New China, it is now possible for us to compare the conditions 
during the periods 1949-1952 and 1978-1993 with those during the 
years between 1953 and 1977. This will enable us to come to the 
conclusion that if, after 1953, we had not followed Lenin's path 
of transition but had, instead, taken the above-mentioned road 
of "the theory of new-democratic society," that is, the road of 
"new-democratic society" started by Mao Zedong and developed by 
Liu Shaoqi, around the time of the founding of the people's 
republic, then China would have fared much better in 
socioeconomic development, the buildup of its overall national 
strength, the improvement of the people's livelihood, and so 
forth after 1953. (Footnote 18) (Bo Yibo did a good job of 
summing up the "concept for consolidating the new-democratic 
system" advocated by Liu Shaoqi between 1948 and 1951. He was 
also correct in the following comment: "I believe that Comrade 
Shaoqi's conception in fact originated from Chairman Mao's 
ideal. They are basically in agreement on major issues" 
(Reviews on Certain Major Policy Decisions and 
Events, Vol 1, pp 46-61] 
  However, the second road is different from the first not 
because there are contradictions and struggle between socialist 
factors and capitalist factors, not in the fact that it gives 
priority to the development of the socialist economy, not in its 
transitional nature, or in the fact that it will lead to the 
socialist society. Both roads are basically the same in these 
respects. The difference between the two lies in the following: 
First, in so far as their original meaning is concerned, the 
former refers to the period of transition from capitalism to 
socialism after the victory of the proletarian revolution in 
capitalist countries, while the latter refers to the special 
stage of social development toward socialism after the victory 
of the new-democratic revolution in semicolonial and semifeudal 
countries. According to the first road, we will actually regard 
the old Chinese society as a capitalist society rather than a 
semicolonial and semifeudal society, and will not observe the 
need to develop social productive forces in the transformation 
of the capitalist economy. Thus, even if we have the subjective 
will to develop social productive forces, and have even given 
careful consideration to the need to develop social productive 
forces in the steps, form and method for the transformation of 
the capitalist economy, in having skipped the stage of the new- 
democratic society in our strategy for reforming the capitalist 
economy, we will end up giving priority to changes in the 
relations of production rather than to the development of social 
productive forces. According to the second road, we will 
proceed from the actual national conditions of the backward 
productive forces in our semicolonial and semifeudal society 
prior to the victory of the revolution, and take the development 
of social productive forces as our central task. In this way, 
we will truly observe the need to develop social productive 
forces in the transformation of the capitalist economy. 
  Second, it is true that according to the first road, we 
could 
have adopted the method of transformation rather than the 
confiscation of capitalist economy, but even so, we would still 
have taken the transformation of capitalist economy as our 
fundamental task as soon as the period of transition started. 
It is precisely this which fundamentally determines that we 
cannot, while restricting the negative role of the capitalist 
economy (its harm to the national economy and the people's 
livelihood), fully bring its positive role (its benefits to the 
national economy and the people's livelihood) into play. This 
is particularly true in China, where we completed the socialist 
transformation of capitalist economy only three years after the 
transitional period started. Mao Zedong was aware of this up to 
a point. He advocated in December 1956 that after the basic 
completion of the socialist transformation of the private 
ownership of the means of production in our country, we should 
continue to implement "new economic policies" for some time, and 
preserve and develop some "private industry and commerce," 
"husband-and-wife stores" and "free markets." He also said that 
"big private factories may be opened, ... and should not be 
confiscated after 10, 20 years." "Those funded by overseas 
Chinese should not be confiscated even after 20 or 100 years." 
"We can open investment companies, ... and engage in either 
state-owned undertakings or private undertakings." "After 
abolishing capitalism, we can engage in capitalism again." 
(Footnote 19) (Quoted from Reviews of Certain Major 
Policy Decisions and Events, Vol 1, pp 64, pp 433-434) Of 
course this does not mean a return to the new-democratic society 
which spanned the years between October 1949 and 1952. Rather, 
this means achieving, to a certain degree, the ownership 
structure suited to the initial stage of socialism as put 
forward by the Third Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee in 1978. In other words, we should, while ensuring 
the dominant role of socialist public ownership, suitably 
preserve and develop some individual, private and 
foreign-operated economic undertakings. 
  In following the second road, naturally we should also 
restrict the negative role of capitalism and ultimately abolish 
capitalism and realize socialism. However, this should be 
realized not by way of confiscation or transformation, but 
through "economic competition" between socialism and capitalism. 
In this process, "the weighting of socialist and semisocialist 
economic sectors will gradually increase, while the weighting 
and role of private and individually operated economic sectors 
will be relatively reduced ... in order to steadily but surely 
realize socialism." In adopting socialist steps, "the state 
should not resort to confiscation, but should rather persuade 
the capitalists to continue to run their factories by offering 
compensation and high salaries. (Footnote 20) (Ibid, pp 53, 59) 
  Third, following the first road, we had, as can be seen in 
events that took place in China, basically completed the 
socialist transformation between 1953 and 1956 shortly after the 
restoration of the national economy in 1952 without a solid 
foundation of modern industry. 
  According to the second road, after going through the 
new-democratic society, "industry and agriculture would have 
seen substantial progress. The state would be in a much 
stronger position to lead the economy. ... Economic management 
cadres would have matured and increased in number. Party 
technocrats would have developed, and the worker-peasant 
alliance would have become much better consolidated politically 
and economically. That is the time to take steps to make the 
transition to socialism." (Footnote 21) (Ibid pp 60-61) It is 
quite obvious that all these are important conditions for 
smoothly advancing socialism, bringing into play the superiority 
of the socialist system, and promoting the development of social 
productive forces. 
  In short, taking the first road implies acting in accordance 
with Lenin's theory of transition. It also means basically 
taking over the planned economic structure originating from the 
theories of Marx and Lenin and later established by Stalin. 
Thus, in 1956, a planned economic structure which was mainly 
characterized by its unified socialist public ownership system 
(mainly state-ownership) and which chiefly relied on mandatory 
plans and rejected the market mechanism was established in the 
main. This not only rendered it impossible to fully bring the 
positive role of the capitalist economy into play, but became a 
fundamental reason why the Chinese economy did not make much 
progress for a long time thereafter. 
  A popular view today is to attribute our failure to achieve 
economic progress for many years after the socialist 
transformation to the havoc wrought by the "Great Leap Forward," 
and particularly the decade-long "Cultural Revolution." On the 
surface, this view is no doubt correct, but the fundamental 
reason still rests with the planned economic structure, although 
it is true that the "Great Leap Forward" was indeed touched off 
by the investment expansion mechanism of the planned economic 
structure. The "overconcentration of power" that sprang out of 
the highly centralized planned economic structure "was one 
important cause of the `Cultural Revolution.'" (Footnote 22) 
(Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping (1975-1982), p 289) 
  Of course we are not trying to deny that the basic 
completion 
of socialist transformation within a short span of three years 
in a big country with a population of several hundred million is 
an unprecedented achievement in the history of the development 
of the socialist movement. Nor are we denying the great 
ground-breaking achievements scored during the transformation. 
The following are some of the major achievements: New forms of 
transition were adopted in the socialist transformation of 
individual agricultural and handicraft undertakings and 
capitalist industry and commerce; in addition to the majority of 
peasants and handicraftsmen, many bourgeois elements also 
accepted the socialist transformation without showing too much 
of a grudge; rather than taking a plunge, social production 
achieved relatively sustained, steady and rapid development 
(compared with the First Five-Year Plan and many subsequent 
plans). 
  However, seen over the long term, our analysis of the 
negative effects of the first road still holds water. 
  If we had taken the second road, we would have been able to 
fully exploit the positive points of capitalism and ultimately 
completed the transformation, and we would have been able to 
promote the sustained development of productive forces and 
realized socialism. This means that we not only would have 
opened up the road of "new-democratic revolution" in 
semicolonial and semifeudal China, but also would have opened up 
a new road of "new-democratic society" after winning the 
revolution. This would have made "the theory of new democracy" 
so much greater in theory and practice, at home and abroad. 
  However, there is another point of view which is also worth 
discussing here. In recent years some scholars have put forward 
the view that "the theory of new-democratic society" may have 
continued to play a direct guiding role in "the theory of the 
initial stage of socialism." In other words, they are saying 
that Chinese society could have entered the initial stage of 
socialism from the new- democratic society. Strictly in 
theoretical terms, it is no doubt correct to say that "Chinese 
society could have entered the initial stage of socialism from 
the new-democratic society." But even then, whether or not 
"`the theory of new-democratic society' could have continued to 
play a direct guiding role in `the theory of the initial stage 
of socialism'" is open to question. "The theory of 
new-democratic society" makes no mention of the socialist market 
economy. In any case, seen from the practice of new democracy 
between October 1949 and 1952, there was already an embryonic 
form of the planned economic structure and we were already 
developing in that direction. The establishment of the 
socialist market economy is a basic component of "the theory of 
the initial stage of socialism." Of course this does not mean 
that the market economy exists only in the initial stage of 
socialism but not in the intermediate and advanced stages. 
Nonetheless, the market economy remains an indispensable basic 
component of "the theory of the initial stage of socialism." 
Thus, although we could, under the guidance of "the theory of 
new-democratic society," prepare important grounds for China's 
advance from a new-democratic society into the initial stage of 
socialism, it is not altogether correct to think that we could 
give shape to the initial stage of socialism as proposed step by 
step after 1978 merely by relying on the guidance of "the theory 
of new-democratic society" without developing it (particularly 
the theory on the development of the socialist market economy) 
and putting it into practice. 
  The above analysis of the two roads was made on the basis of 
practice during the 45 years since the founding of the people's 
republic, and questions were raised from the angle of past 
experience. In reality, however, it is by no means easy (or not 
altogether possible) to follow the guidance of "the theory of 
new- democratic society," and it is difficult not to follow the 
guidance of Lenin's "theory of transition." Here, we are not 
going to concern ourselves with other social reasons (including 
the well-meaning desire to hastily make the transition to 
socialism), and will instead venture to discuss the reasons from 
the perspective of Marxist epistemology. Mao Zedong wrote the 
"Decision of the CPC Central Committee on Certain Problems in 
Our Present Rural Work (Draft)" in 1963. In this document, he 
made good use of Marxist epistemology first put forward in his 
1937 article, "On Practice." He wrote: "Often, correct 
knowledge can be arrived at after many repetitions of the 
process leading from practice to knowledge and then back to 
practice again." This is also true of our present issue. In 
1952, due to limitations in practice and understanding, the 
question of whether China should follow the road of "the theory 
of new-democratic society" or the road of "the theory of 
transition" baffled not only the vast numbers of party cadres 
but also the party's highest policymakers. This in a way shows 
that while Mao Zedong himself established "the theory of 
new-democratic society," he also ended this society prematurely; 
and that while Liu Shaoqi had upheld and developed "the theory 
of new-democratic society" for a long time around the time of 
the founding of the people's republic, he only fully accepted it 
at long last after repeated criticism by Mao Zedong. 
<H3>  III. Some Useful Insights Given to Us by "The Theory of New 
Democracy" Established by Mao Zedong </H3>
  Whether in establishing "the theory of new democracy" 
(including "the theory of new-democratic revolution" and "the 
theory of new-democratic society"), or in ending the 
new-democratic society prematurely, Mao Zedong gave us many 
useful insights that are full of practical significance. 
  First, we must always seek truth from facts. Upholding this 
principle means fundamentally upholding Marxist dialectical 
materialism. In the final analysis, Mao Zedong could establish 
the scientific "theory of new democracy" because he took as his 
point of departure the semicolonial and semifeudal society which 
was the basic national condition. This is expressed most 
clearly on the question of the united front with the national 
bourgeoisie and the armed struggle, which formed the basic 
characteristics of the Chinese revolution. Mao Zedong ended the 
new-democratic society prematurely partly because he overlooked 
our national conditions. 
  Second, we must always keep abreast of the need to develop 
social productive forces. Upholding this principle means 
fundamentally upholding Marxist historical materialism. In 
directing the revolution against imperialism, feudalism and 
bureaucrat-capitalism in "the theory of new democracy," taking 
the national bourgeoisie as one of the motive forces of the 
revolution, and making use of the positive aspects of capitalism 
while restricting its negative aspects in the new-democratic 
society after winning the revolution, Mao Zedong took the 
development of social productive forces in China as his basic 
point of departure. In this sense, transformation of ownership 
is the means, while the development of productive forces is the 
end. (Footnote 24) (See Zhou Shulian [0719 0647 5571]: 
"Ownership Is an Economic Means," JINGJI SHEHUI TIZHI BIJIAO 
[COMPARISONS BETWEEN ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL STRUCTURES], 1993 No. 
5, pp 26-29) Mao Zedong ended the new-democratic society 
prematurely partly because he overlooked the need to make use of 
the positive aspects of capitalism. 
  Third, we must uphold the integration of the universal truth 
of Marxism with concrete practice in China, and oppose "Left" 
and right erroneous tendencies, particularly "Left" dogmatism. 
Upholding this principle means upholding Marxism in its most 
complete form. The fundamental mistake of the right opportunist 
theories put forward by Chen Duxiu [7115 3747 4423] during the 
period of democratic revolution lies in his negation of the 
universal truth regarding the leadership of the proletariat and 
the worker-peasant alliance in Marxism-Leninism. The 
fundamental mistake of the three "Left" opportunist deviations, 
particularly the "Left" opportunist theories of Wang Ming [3769 
2494], lies in their mechanical copying of the methods of 
proletarian revolution in capitalist countries. This is 
expressed most clearly in the way we dealt with the national 
bourgeoisie and in the road we followed in armed struggles. 
"The theory of new democracy" is a classic example of the 
integration of the universal truth of Marxism with concrete 
practice in China. However, Mao Zedong prematurely ended the 
new-democratic society. To a certain degree, he was affected by 
dogmatism. Here, the most important reasons why words like "to 
a certain degree" and "affected" are used have been discussed in 
the previous paragraphs. They are: There are many points in 
common between the transition from capitalism to socialism and 
the new-democratic society; there are objective conditions for 
their implementation; there are many creations in the course of 
implementation; and the result is successful (although it has 
brought about serious negative effects). The significance of 
this theory lies in its distinction in principle from "Left" 
dogmatism during the period of democratic revolution. Later we 
mechanically copied the methods of foreign countries. With the 
absence of objective conditions, the revolution ended in failure. 
  Fourth, we must thoroughly study and widely publicize the 
basic theories of social development, truly achieve unity of 
understanding in the party's highest policymaking circles, and 
see to it that these theories take root in the minds of the vast 
numbers of cadres. In this respect, "the theory of 
new-democratic revolution" is a classic example. This theory 
reached the peak of its development at the Seventh CPC National 
Congress held in 1945. Through publicity, unity of 
understanding was achieved in the whole party, and the theory 
was truly grasped by all cadres. This was an important reason 
why we were able to win the War of Liberation less than four 
years after winning the War of Resistance Against Japan. By 
comparison, "the theory of new-democratic society" seems lacking 
in something. This is primarily due to restrictions in 
objective reality. However, it is also true that due to 
insufficient study and publicity, many cadres did not understand 
that "the theory of new democracy" included "the theory of 
new-democratic society" in addition to "the theory of 
new-democratic revolution." This was an important reason why 
the party's general line for the transitional period was adopted 
without a hitch in 1952. Reviewing the historical experience of 
this period is of great immediate significance to our present 
efforts to adhere to and implement the call made by Deng 
Xiaoping in early 1992 that "the party's basic line should be in 
force for 100 years." Of course, in order to do so, we cannot 
simply study and publicize the party's basic line. We must also 
uphold the party's democratic centralism, develop socialist 
democracy and strengthen the socialist legal system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40136 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Urges Study of Mao Economic Thought </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK0402120094 Beijing JINGJI YANJIU in Chinese No 12, 20 Dec 
93, pp 3-15 </F>

<F P=103> HK0402120094 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI YANJIU </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Liu Guoguang (0491 0748 0342), From the Chinese Academy </F>
of Social Sciences, edited by Lin Li (2651 4539): "Study Mao 
Zedong Economic Thought, Open Up a Road Which Will Make the 
Country Strong and the People Prosperous"-- first paragraph is 
author's note] 
  [Text] In the course of writing this article, I received 
the assistance of Comrades Mao Liyan [3029 4539 6056], Xiang 
Qiyuan [7309 0796 3293], Yu Zuyao [0060 4371 1031], Fang Liubi 
[2455 3966 4310], and I offer them my sincere thanks. 
  Mao Zedong economic thought is an important component part 
of 
Mao Zedong Thought. It is a theory founded on the basic 
principles of Marxism-Leninism which Mao Zedong used to examine 
and understand the nature of the Chinese social economy and 
through the grasping of which a gradual revolutionary 
transformation of the Chinese economy was effected. It is a 
theory which determined the economic form which was adopted 
after the victory in China's revolution and the way in which 
this was to be transformed into a higher form. It was a theory 
by which China was to shake off poverty and backwardness and 
move towards industrialization and modernization. This theory 
was produced during the revolutionary struggle, developed 
through a process of continual expansion, and is the 
crystallization of the collective wisdom of Communist Party 
members represented by Mao Zedong. 
<H6>  I. </H6>
  The revolutionary movement under the guidance of Marxism was 
for liberating and developing the social productive forces and 
promoting the progress society. Thus, if there was a desire to 
promote change and development in Chinese society, it was first 
necessary to clearly understand the nature and characteristics 
of Chinese society. As Mao Zedong said: "Clearly understanding 
China's national situation is the basic foundation for clearly 
understanding all problems of the revolution." (Footnote 1) 
("The Chinese Revolution and the Chinese Communist Party" from 
Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 2, p 633) If one 
wanted to scientifically understand the nature of society and 
the national situation of China, it was necessary to uphold the 
only correct cognitive avenue of combining the basic principles 
of Marxism-Leninism with the realities of China. 
  Mao Zedong creatively used the stand, viewpoint, and methods 
of Marxism to examine and understand the China's society and 
economy. At the end of 1939 and the beginning of 1940, he summed 
up the results of research in the 1920's and 1930's on the 
question of the nature of society in our country. In "The 
Chinese Revolution and the Chinese Communist Party," "On New 
Democracy," and other such works, he provided a complete and 
scientific understanding and representation of the nature of the 
modern Chinese socioeconomic pattern. 
  Mao Zedong pointed out that the historical development of 
China's society was also governed by the common laws of 
socio-historical development and that the disintegration of 
China's feudal society was the inevitable result of 
socio-historical development. "The development of the commodity 
economy within China's feudal society already carried within it 
the sprouts of capitalism. Even without the influence of 
foreign capitalism, China would still have slowly developed into 
a capitalist society." (Footnote 2) (Ibid, p 626) 
  The invasion of foreign capital played a role in breaking 
down China's feudal economy and promoting the development of 
capitalism. It created various objective conditions and 
possibilities for the emergence and development of Chinese 
capitalism by breaking down the natural economy base and 
developing an urban commodity economy. Thereby, the sprouts of 
capitalist production relations which had long been carried 
within the feudal society saw a certain development. On the 
other hand, the invasion of foreign capital also obstructed the 
development of Chinese capitalism. The imperialists, for their 
own interests, linked up with China's feudal forces and 
constricted China's national capitalism, so that it could not 
develop and expand normally. Thus, it was unable to become the 
main form in China's social economy and China did not become a 
capitalist society. In this way, modern China gradually evolved 
into a semi-feudal society where a weak capitalist economy and a 
major semi-feudal economy coexisted. 
  Mao Zedong also pointed out that the invasion of foreign 
capitalism not only changed China into a semi-feudal society but 
also changed an independent China into a semi-colonial country. 
"The aim of the imperialist powers in invading China was 
certainly not to change feudal China into a capitalist China. 
The aim of the imperialists was the opposite of this. They 
wanted to change China into their semi-colonies and colonies. 
(Footnote 3) (Ibid, p 628) 
  The 100 years of history following the Opium War was a 
bloodthirsty one whereby the imperialists used all sorts of 
measures to change a feudal China into a semi-feudal, 
semi-colonial society. 
  The nature and situation of China's society determined that 
the main contradictions was that between feudalism and the 
masses of people and also determined that the main targets of 
the Chinese revolution were imperialism, bureaucratism, and 
feudalism. On the basis of a scientific analysis of the nature 
of China's society and a knowledge of the processes of history 
worldwide, Mao Zedong accurately grasped the basic historical 
process of the new-democratic revolution led by the Chinese 
proletariat and revealed the most basic patterns of China's 
revolution. He pointed out that as the task of the revolution 
in semi-colonial, semi-feudal China was to oppose imperialism 
and feudalism, this determined that the historical course of the 
Chinese revolution must be divided into two steps. The first 
step was the democratic revolution and the second step was the 
socialist revolution. These were two revolutionary processes of 
different natures. The first step was for overthrowing the 
imperialist powers and the rule of feudalism in China, and 
changing the colonial, semi-colonial, and semi-feudal forms, so 
that they would constitute an independent, democratic society. 
The second step would be, in accordance with the principles of 
scientific socialism and the laws of social development, to push 
the revolution forward and establish a socialist society, 
thereby truly realizing the dream of a strong country and a 
prosperous people, a dream which all persons with lofty ideals 
and all Chinese people have had for the last century. 
  The aim of the new-democratic revolution which was led by 
the 
Communist Party was to liberate the productive forces. Thus, 
when deciding on the stages and targets of this revolution, it 
was done strictly in accordance with the demands of developing 
the productive forces. Mao Zedong pointed out: "The policies 
and practices of all political parties in China, and whether or 
not their effects on the people are good or bad and great or 
small, can, in the end, be decided by observing whether or not 
they are helpful, and how helpful they are, to developing the 
productive forces of the Chinese people and observing whether 
they fetter the productive forces or liberate them." (Footnote 
4) ("On Coalition Government" from the Selected Works of 
Mao Zedong, Vol 3, p 1079) The economic program for the 
new-democratic revolution and the economic construct for the 
new-democratic society put forward by Mao Zedong were both 
formulated in accordance with this basic principle of Marxism. 
  The economic program of the new-democratic revolution was 
the 
basic program for carrying out revolutionary transformation of 
the economic system of the semi-feudal, semi-colonial society. 
The formation of this program involved a long process of 
exploration and deliberation. After the new-democratic economic 
thinking sprouted during the land reform period, through arduous 
exploration and the accumulation of positive and negative 
ideological materials, by the time of the Anti-Japanese war 
period, a basic system had been formed. During the war of 
liberation this was further enriched and it gradually moved 
toward maturity. The putting forward of the three major 
economic programs was the centralized manifestation of Mao 
Zedong's new-democratic economic thinking which had moved toward 
maturity through a long period of development. In "The Present 
Situation and Our Tasks," which he wrote in December 1947, Mao 
Zedong pointed out: "Confiscating the land of the feudal 
classes and returning it to the peasants, confiscating the 
monopoly capital headed by Jiang Jieshi, Song Ziwen, Kong 
Xiangxi, and Chen Lifu, and returning it to new-democratic state 
ownership, and protecting national industry and commerce are the 
three major economic programs of the new democratic revolution." 
(Footnote 5) ("The Present Situation and Our Tasks" in 
Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 4, p 1253) The 
three major economic programs from the high level of overall 
policy, overcame the "Leftist" and rightist tendencies, 
especially the continually appearing "Leftist" tendencies, which 
had existed for a long time. Thereby, they laid a firm base for 
victory in the new democratic revolution 
  The basic economic idea and basic economic policy of 
confiscating the land of the feudal landlord class and returning 
it to the peasants had long been put forward and realized by our 
party and by Comrade Mao Zedong. The changing of the feudal 
land system was one of the basic tasks of the new-democratic 
revolution and was a change of huge historical significance for 
the basic structure of Chinese society. This change in the 
basic economic structure not only meant that the reactionary old 
politics and the corrupt old culture lost their basis for 
existence but also opened a road for the new politics, new 
economics, and new culture of the new democracy. This created 
the necessary preconditions for China to make the changeover 
from a long-stagnant agricultural country to an industrial one. 
  The semi-colonial and semi-feudal nature of China's society 
resulted in the emergence, existence, and activities of 
capitalism becoming extremely complex. This complexity 
determined that it was extremely difficult to understand and 
handle this question. In the three economic programs, Mao 
Zedong put stress on analyzing the different natures of 
bureaucratic capital and national capital and the different 
roles they played in the development of the productive forces. 
On this basis, he formulated different policies in respect of 
bureaucratic capital and national capital. Bureaucratic capital 
was monopoly-nature, compradore, feudal, state-monopoly capital. 
It was also capital which was joined with autocratic political 
power and which engaged in supra-economic exploitative plunder. 
This characteristic determined that it played a seriously 
obstructive role in respect of developing the social productive 
forces. The program involving the confiscation of bureaucratic 
capital and returning it to the the new-democracy state was put 
forward in accordance with the nature and historical role of 
bureaucratic capital and on the basis of the principle of 
"exploiting the exploiters." It was an extremely important 
program for eradicating, in an overall way, corrupt relations of 
production, to switch the direction of development of the entire 
national economy. As its targets had multiple links in the 
semi-feudal, semi-colonial economy and had special natures, this 
program had a dual democratic-revolution and 
socialist-revolution nature. 

    The program to safeguard national industry and commerce was 
a 
centralized summary of the CPC's understanding of the position 
and role of national capital in a semi-colonial, semi-feudal 
society and in the process of transformation to the future 
society. National capitalism could still play a full and 
positive historical role in the development of the Chinese 
economy. Mao Zedong pointed out that because of the 
backwardness of the Chinese economy, "even with the victory of 
the revolution throughout the country, for a long time, it will 
still be necessary to allow it to exist and, in accordance with 
the division of work of the national economy, all such industry 
and commerce which is beneficial to the national economy will 
need to see development." (Footnote 6) (Ibid pp 1254-55) 
  Another important component part of Mao Zedong's 
new-democratic economic thought was his ideas on the 
new-democratic economic structure. The new-democratic economic 
structure was a result of engaging in a new style of democratic 
revolution in respect of the semi-feudal, semi-colonial 
socioeconomic forms. Mao Zedong pointed out that the 
characteristic of the new-democratic economic structure was that 
diverse economic components coexisted. He believed that during 
the new-democratic revolution stage, and after the new- 
democratic revolution achieved victory, the social economy would 
be constituted through three components -- state operations, 
private operations, and cooperative operations. The state 
operations would, under the leadership of the proletariat, be 
"jointly owned by the ordinary people" and controlled and 
operated by the new-democratic state. This type of economy was, 
in its nature, already socialist. The cooperative operations 
also already had socialist elements. The private operations 
included both private capitalist operations and individual 
operations by the people. In addition, there was also state 
capitalism whereby the state cooperated with private enterprise. 
In this way, the five components of state-run economy, 
cooperative economy, private capitalist economy, individual 
labor economy, and state capitalism formed the new-democracy 
economic pattern. The abovementioned general concept of the 
new-democratic economy put forward by Mao Zedong had already 
been put into effect in the revolutionary base areas and very 
great achievements had been realized. The full development of 
the new-democratic economic theory in practice formed the base 
area economic construction thought which was rich in contents. 
The base areas' new-democratic economic construction thought 
and practice made a major contribution to victory in the 
revolutionary war, providing valuable experiences and lessons 
for economic construction after victory in the revolution. Mao 
Zedong pointed out that the nature of the new-democratic economy 
was noncapitalist and that it was a "transitional stage" in the 
switch from semi-colonial, semi-feudal society to socialist 
society. (Footnote 7) ("The Chinese Revolution and the Chinese 
Communist Party" from the Selected Works of Mao 
Zedong, Vol 2, p 647) 
<H6>  II. </H6>
  After victory in the democratic revolution, how would the 
semi-colonial, semi-feudal society make the transition to 
socialism? Proposing a transitional new-democracy society as an 
intermediate step in the switch towards socialism was an idea 
put forward by Mao Zedong prior to victory in the new-democracy 
revolution and this is where the special nature and creativity 
of this theory of revolutionary change lay. Back in March 1940, 
Mao Zedong had pointed out that new-democracy would be temporary 
and transitional. It was a "step ladder" and that later we would 
proceed "upstairs." As to the conditions determining and 
controlling this change, Mao Zedong also provided clear answers 
on the theoretical level at a very early date. In December 
1935, he pointed out: "Before we have reached a stage where all 
due political and economic conditions are available, and before 
we have reached a time where the changes will be advantageous 
and not disadvantageous to the vast majority of people 
throughout the country, we should not lightly discuss 
transformation." (Footnote 8) ("On the Policies for Opposing 
Japanese Imperialism" from the Selected Works of Mao 
Zedong, Vol 1, p 160) In March 1949, in his report to the 
Second Session of the the Seventh CPC Central Committee, Mao 
Zedong noted that in the economy of Old China, modern industry 
constituted only about 10 percent of the total, while 
agriculture and handicraft industries constituted about 90 
percent of the total. He pointed out that this was the 
manifestation on the economic level of China's semi-colonial, 
semi-feudal society and that this would be the basic point of 
departure in handling all issues during the Chinese revolution 
and for quite a long time after victory in the revolution. 
Proceeding from this point, it was believed that after the 
establishment of our new state, we should establish a 
new-democratic economic form. Mao Zedong pointed out: As 
China's economic legacy is backward, for quite a long time after 
victory in the new- democracy revolution, it will be necessary 
to carefully, gradually, and positively guide the dispersed 
individual agricultural economy and handicraft industry economy 
to develop in the direction of modernization and 
collectivization. Through putting efforts into developing the 
productive forces, we will have to change China gradually from 
an agricultural country into an industrial country and create a 
strong economic base. Otherwise, it will be impossible to 
develop from a new-democratic society into the future socialist 
society. Although at this time we cannot say that our 
understanding and grasp of the economic conditions necessary to 
effect this change are very specific, we do already have a quite 
real and concrete understanding and grasp of the actual contents 
and basic standards for realizing industrialization. This 
understanding and grasp are firmly based on the process of the 
development of the productive forces. Mao Zedong and other 
party leaders estimated that this would require at least 10 and 
perhaps 15 to 20 years to realize. 
  By 1952, the national economy had recovered and surpassed 
the predicted targets but some new contradictions in economic 
life had appeared and accumulated. These contradictions were 
mainly manifested in the fact that, after the land reforms, the 
dispersed and backward individual operations by farmers were 
having difficulty satisfying the continually increasing demand 
for grain and agricultural product raw materials by cities and 
industries. Also, the appearance of polarization between the 
rich and the poor forced CPC members to think about the problem 
of which direction the individual economy was developing. In 
the cities, the struggle between the working class, the 
state-owned economy and the bourgeoisie over whether or not to 
restrict had gone through several rounds. The struggle had not 
been resolved and at that time was seeing fluctuations which 
greatly affected the the state's economic life. The large-scale 
development of industrialization led to an exacerbation of these 
contradictions, meaning that the party and Mao Zedong had no 
option but to consider speeding up and expanding the mutual-aid 
and cooperation movement in the rural areas and the measures to 
restrict capitalism in the cities. This inevitably pushed the 
task of socialist transformation onto the agenda. It was with 
this background that the party's general line for the period of 
transition was put forward. This was: For quite a long period, 
the socialist industrialization of the country will be gradually 
realized and there will be gradual implementation of the state's 
socialist transformation of agriculture, the handicraft industry 
and capitalist industry and commerce. This general line clearly 
put forward to the people of the whole country the great task of 
building socialism. The party central committee held that 
clearly setting down for the whole party and the people of the 
whole country the task of gradually achieving the transition to 
socialism and predicting that this would be completed in 15 
years or longer, was appropriate and necessary. The original 
plan was, after establishing the state, to continue to engage in 
new democracy for a time and only after some years to consider 
the question of making the changeover to socialism. Putting 
forward the general line meant that the original theoretical 
idea saw a certain degree of change and the schedule was brought 
forward. The stage of new-democratic construction which was 
referred to originally, at the same time, also became the period 
for making the transition from new democracy to socialism. 
  The party's general line for the period of transition was an 
organic unity involving the development of the productive forces 
and the changing of production relations. It was a line by 
which socialist construction and socialist transformation saw 
concurrent progress. Gradually realizing socialist 
industrialization of the country and developing the productive 
forces was the main part. Engaging in socialist transformation 
of agriculture, handicraft industries, and capitalist industry 
and commerce constituted the change of the production relations. 
These two wings were for the task of serving industrialization. 
At that time it was estimated that completing this task would 
require three five-year plans, or 15 years. A further 
three-year recovery period totaled 18 years. As compared with 
the originally envisaged 15 or 20 years for new-democratic 
construction, and further implementation and completion of 
socialist transformation, while the specific steps and methods 
saw some change, the amount of time that it was estimated the 
task would take was about the same. 
  The socialist transformation of China's agriculture was a 
huge and extremely wide-ranging and deep-going socialist reform 
by which, in an economically and culturally backward large 
eastern country, an individual-ownership system involving 500 
million peasants, was changed into a collective-ownership system 
involving cooperative members. After the peasants, led by Mao 
Zedong and the CPC, eliminated the system of feudal 
exploitation, they were quickly guided along the road of 
mutual-aid and cooperation. This proceeded from the aim of 
combining agricultural development with the industrialization of 
the state, so that peasants engaged in small-scale production 
would gradually become large-scale producers and, thereby, they 
would move from poverty towards prosperity. It also proceeded 
from the idea that, by guarding against polarization in the 
rural areas and consolidating the worker-peasant alliance, it 
would be more effective in struggling against private capitalism 
and, therefore, in eliminating systems of exploitation in urban 
and rural areas. This point of departure, developing the 
productive forces and establishing a public-ownership system, 
reflected the direction of historical progress and the demands 
of the masses. The strategic deployment relative to 
agricultural cooperativization was established under this 
guiding idea. 
  In the process of implementing socialist transformation of 
agriculture, Mao Zedong followed the basic principles of Marxism 
in respect of individual peasants; upheld the channels of 
education, demonstration, and social assistance; followed the 
principle of voluntary participation; and created a 
Chinese-style road to agricultural cooperativization. On the 
basis of concretely analyzing and scientifically grasping the 
nature and trends of the small-scale agricultural economy and 
the peasants, the peasants were led in a gradual transition from 
mutual-help organizations, to primary cooperatives, and then to 
high-level cooperatives and achievements were realized in this. 
The transitional form constituted by the primary-level 
cooperatives in particular, was marked by Chinese 
characteristics. They were characterized by the division of 
land into shares and the joint operation of the land. This was a 
transitional form which drew the peasants, voluntarily and 
without coercion, into moving towards socialism. However, the 
abovementioned correct principles and methods of gradual 
progress were not followed from beginning to end. After the 
summer of 1955, and especially following the high tide of the 
socialist transformation of agriculture, the policy of gradual 
progress was not upheld. Rather, there was over-impatience for 
results and thereby "Leftist" mistakes appeared. 
  The socialist transformation of handicraft industries also 
involved a three-tier division from low level to high level 
forms. That is, there were handicraft industry production 
groups, handicraft industry supply and marketing cooperatives, 
and handicraft industry production cooperatives. Thereby, there 
was gradual progress along the road of cooperativization. Like 
the trend which occurred in the process of agricultural 
cooperativization, there was also initially healthy and stable 
progress in the cooperativization of the handicraft industry but 
later, some problems appeared. This was mainly due to there 
being excessive centralization and too large a scale, with no 
attention being given to the characteristics of handicraft labor 
whereby it is dispersed, flexible, and highly adaptive. 
  After the proletariat wrested political power, the method of 
peaceful "buying out" was adopted in respect of carrying out 
socialist transformation of capitalist industry and commerce. 
This was quite an ideal form which did not require the payment 
of a high price and which had been put forward by Marx, Engels, 
and Lenin. As the Russian bourgeoisie did not accept this 
policy, Lenin's plan to buy them out could not be realized. 
However, Mao Zedong and the CPC opened a road of socialist 
transformation with Chinese characteristics. This involved 
peaceful transformation of the exploitative system of the 
bourgeoisie under the conditions of an alliance between the 
proletariat and the national bourgeoisie. Our party has always 
adopted distinct policies in respect of our country's national 
bourgeoisie. After victory in the democratic revolution, the 
national bourgeoisie still had the dual character of exploiting 
the working class while safeguarding the constitution of the 
socialist state and willingly accepting socialist 
transformation. In a situation where the people's democratic 
regime and the state-run economy were becoming increasingly 
strong, a powerful alliance between the working class and the 
broad masses of people had been established. Thus, the peaceful 
transformation of capitalist industry and commerce was both 
necessary and possible. 
  The party's general line for the period of transition 
clearly 
put forward the policies of using, restricting, and transforming 
capitalist industry and commerce. It also clearly adopted, as 
the necessary avenue for transformation of capitalist industry 
and commerce, various types of state capitalism, ranging from 
low to high levels and including the purchase of products, 
placing orders for processing, unified purchase and guaranteed 
sales, and joint public-private operations with individual 
enterprises and whole industries. By the end of 1956, the 
socialist transformation of capitalist industry and commerce had 
been basically completed. In this process, there were 
deficiencies and these were mainly manifested in the fact that 
there was over-impatience in the requirements and that the speed 
of transformation was too swift. There was excessive stress 
placed on centralization and inappropriate "transformation and 
merger." A large number of small merchants and small handicraft 
industry operators were considered to be "bourgeoisie industry 
and commerce operators" and were drawn into public-private joint 
operations. This confused the distinction between the 
exploiters and the laborers. 
  When we look back at the course of development during the 
early period after the establishment of the PRC, we can 
certainly feel that, in this quite short period of time, there 
were some changes in the theoretical ideas about the timing and 
pace of the switch from new democracy to socialism and that the 
actual progress of the switch and transformation towards 
socialism was greatly accelerated. 

    On the basis of the standard that the goal of revolution is 
the development of the productive forces, the pace of 
transformation of the production relations should be in accord 
with the development of the social productive forces. However, 
the actual course was one whereby the transformation of the 
production relations transcended the development of the 
productive forces. As the originally envisioned new-democratic 
society was a transitional one, there was no essential clash 
between the contents of the general line of the period of 
transition and the idea of a new- democratic society. 
Furthermore, in terms of the general trend, socialist 
transformation was also in accord with the basic trend of 
development of our country's social development. The objective 
environment at that time also encouraged the acceleration of the 
pace of the transformation. However, the "over-anxious demands" 
and the "excessive pace of change" during the socialist 
transformation must be said to have been deviations from the 
productive forces standard. In terms of the theoretical 
origins, Mao Zedong had begun to shift from his previous stance 
when formulating the new-democratic economic theory strictly in 
accordance with the demands of the productive forces and 
upholding the productive forces standard. He did not have an 
accurate grasp of all aspects of the relationship between the 
development of the productive forces and the reform of the 
production relations. This point can only be recognized clearly 
today and this is a basic thread in the process by which we are 
summing up the overall process of the development of this 
theory. Of course, seen overall in such a vast complex country 
as China, the huge historical significance of maintaining 
basically stable economic development while maintaining the 
widespread support of the people and smoothly and creatively 
realizing this huge social reform, is not something which can be 
easily obliterated. 
<H6>  III. </H6>
  The basic completion of the socialist transformation of the 
private ownership of the means of production in 1956 marked the 
establishment of a new social system and the opening of a new 
road of social development. Establishing the socialism for 
which our party had long struggled, and to which the masses had 
long looked forward, was a great event which inspired the whole 
party and heartened the people. However, because of the lack of 
sufficient theoretical and ideological preparation, the new 
theory of socialist construction could only be explored and 
developed through practice by continually summing up experiences 
on the basis of the principle of combining the basic principles 
of Marxism-Leninism with the realities of China. It was 
inevitable that we would have to travel a rough and rugged road 
along which there would be both successes and failures. 
  Mao Zedong, who was very original in terms of theoretical 
creativity, put forward the idea that we had to follow our own 
road in building socialism very early on. Although, at the 
beginning of the construction, the party made the call to "study 
the Soviet nion," Mao Zedong quickly put forward the idea that 
it was necessary to adopt an analytical attitude regarding the 
Soviet Union's experiences and that it was necessary to engage 
in such study in the light of China's situation. In April 1956, 
Mao Zedong gave his speech "On the Ten Major Relationships," in 
which he pointed out that the experiences of foreign countries 
could not be uncritically rejected or copied entirely. "What is 
particularly worthy of note is that in recent times, in the 
Soviet Union, some of the defects and mistakes made in the 
process of building socialism have been revealed. Do you want 
to take the detour that they took?" (Footnote 9) ("On the Ten 
Major Relationships" from Selected Readings From the Works 
of Mao Zedong, last volume, pp 741-742, 720-721) 
  "On the Ten Major Relationships," with the background of 
affirming that it was necessary for China to travel its own road 
in building socialism, engaged in analysis of the basic social 
contradictions and various economic relationships following the 
basic completion of socialist transformation. Although this 
analysis was only an initial and general one, and the logic and 
levels were not always clearly distinguished, its contents were 
rich in dialectical thought. The first three sections of "On 
the Ten Major Relationships" engaged in analysis of industrial 
relationships and regional economic relationships. Actually, 
this was intended to open up a Chinese road of industrialization 
different from that of the Soviet Union. The fourth and fifth 
sections spoke of the the relations among the state, production 
units, and individual laborers and the relationship between the 
center and the localities. This actually touched on the 
question of reforming the excessively centralized economic 
structure. The last five sections looked at the question of 
mobilizing the various positive elements in the political, 
ideological, and cultural lives. Mao Zedong himself held that 
by putting forward the 10 major relationships, he began to find 
his own road of construction suited to China. "In principle, it 
is the same as that of the Soviet Union but its methods are 
different. It has our own set of contents" and it "begins to 
reflect China's objective economic patterns." (Footnote 10) 
(Cited from Bo Yibo's Answers on Various Major Decisions 
and Events, Vol I, p 471) 

    In its own movement, socialist society gradually saw the 
appearance of some new phenomena and new problems. Not only did 
the convening of the 20th CPSU Congress and the eruption of the 
Polish and Hungarian incidents reveal, on the international 
level, many contradictions in socialist countries but also, 
within our own country, there also appeared problems which 
caused people to ponder. Mao Zedong adroitly grasped these 
problems and, through his command of the overall nature and 
contradictions of socialism, he posed and resolved a series of 
important theoretical questions and made a major theoretical 
contribution. In "On Correctly Handling Contradictions Among 
the People," Mao Zedong summed up the historical experiences of 
the international communist movement and, using the law of the 
unity of opposites to analyze socialist society, created a 
theory of concretely handling contradictions among the people. 
The main contents of this theory were: 1) The basic 
contradictions of socialist society and their essential 
characteristics. Mao Zedong affirmed that contradictions were 
still the motive force in the advance of socialism and pointed 
out that the basic contradictions of socialist society were 
still those between the production relations and the productive 
forces and the between the superstructure and the economic base. 
Between these elements exists one aspect which is basically in 
accord and another aspect which is not. He held that through 
the transformation of the socialist system itself, these 
contradictions could be continually resolved. This idea laid a 
basis for subsequent reforms of the economic structure and the 
political structure. 2) Socialist society has two types of 
social contradictions: Those between the enemy and ourselves 
and the contradictions among the people. Correctly handling the 
contradictions among the people is a major element in the 
political life of a socialist state. 3) In handling 
contradictions among the people, it is necessary to use 
democratic methods; in concrete terms, this is the formula 
"unity -- criticism -- unity." On the basis of this general 
method, he also put forward a series of specific principles and 
policies which, in the economic sphere, included implementing 
overall arrangements and plans, concurrently considering the 
interests of the state, the collective and individuals, and 
taking the Chinese road of industrialization. 
  The issue of the Chinese road of industrialization was an 
important question with which Mao Zedong concerned himself and 
thought about early in the democratic revolution period. After 
entering the period of socialist construction, Mao Zedong 
attached even more importance to this question and put forward 
many major ideas which have guiding significance to this day. 
Mao Zedong pointed out: "Our country is a large agricultural 
country and the rural population constitutes over 80 percent of 
our total population. The development of industry must be 
accompanied by the development of agriculture." (Footnote 11) 
("On Correctly Handling the Contradictions mong the People" from 
the Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 5, p 400) He 
thought that we should not follow the road of the Soviet Union 
and some of the East European countries, whereby there was 
one-sided stress placed on heavy industry. He raised the 
question of the relationship between heavy industry, light 
industry, and agriculture and the question of the Chinese road 
of industrialization. Mao Zedong pointed out: "Heavy industry 
is a focal point of our country's construction." (Footnote 12) 
("On the 10 Major Relationships" from the Selected Works 
of Mao Zedong, Vol 5, p 268) On the other hand, he 
stressed that the development of industry had to be based on 
agriculture. From the angle of the mutual constraints and 
coordinated development of agriculture, light industry, and 
heavy industry, he put forward the idea of achieving development 
in agriculture and light industry in order to truly develop 
heavy industry. He said: "With the development of agriculture 
and light industry, heavy industry will have a market. With 
funds, it will then see faster development. In this way, it 
might appear as if the speed of industrialization will be 
slower. However, it will not be slower and may actually be a 
little faster." (Footnote 13) ("On Correctly Handling 
Contradictions Among the People," from the Selected Works 
of Mao Zedong, Vol 5, p 400) Practice has proved the 
correctness and importance of this idea put forward by Mao 
Zedong and the subsequent economic development has repeatedly 
proved this point. 
  In terms of the economic management structure, Mao Zedong 
held that after the resolution of the ownership system question, 
the major issue will be the management issue, that is, the 
question of how to manage the whole-people ownership enterprises 
and the collective enterprises. This is also a question of the 
relationship between persons under a specific ownership system 
and much can be done on this. On this theoretical basis, Mao 
Zedong put forward the incisive idea that in building socialism, 
it is necessary to handle the relationship between the center 
and the localities well and also the relationship between the 
state and the enterprises. With respect to the relationship 
between the center and the localities, he pointed out: "In a 
country as big as ours, with its huge population and complexity 
of situations, having the enthusiasm of the center and the 
localities is much better than having the enthusiasm of just one 
side. We cannot do as the Soviet Union has done, commanding 
everything from the center and tightly controlling the 
localities so that they do not have even a little flexibility." 
(Footnote 14) ("On the Ten Major Relationships" from the 
Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 5, p 275) 

    Rather, under the precondition of consolidating unified 
leadership by the center, he urged the expansion of local 
powers. On the relationship between the state and enterprises, 
he pointed out: "Centralizing everything at the center or in 
the provincial capitals and not giving factories any power, or 
any leeway for flexibility, or any interests, is I am afraid, 
not the right way of doing things.... Every production unit 
must have some independence in its relationship with the unity, 
as only thus will they be able to see more vigorous 
development." (Footnote 15) (Ibid, p 273) However, the question 
of how, in the end, this nature and these rights and interests 
of the enterprises were to be appropriately established, was not 
fully resolved. Mao Zedong also admitted that our experience 
was insufficient and that there was a need for further research. 
  The question of the commodity economy and the law of value 
in 
a socialist society is one of great theoretical and practical 
importance in terms of the basic operational mechanism of the 
socialist economy. When Mao Zedong was correcting the confusion 
between collective ownership and whole-people ownership, and the 
dividing line between socialism and communism, which had 
appeared in 1958 and correcting the "communist wind" by which 
there was "egalitarian and indiscriminate transfer of 
resources," he proposed that cadres at all levels study 
socialist political economics, "so that they have sober minds, 
as this will be beneficial to the leadership of our great 
economic work." (Footnote 16) (Collected Letters of Mao 
Zedong, p 552) Mao Zedong took the lead in studying and, 
in light of the realities of China's economic construction, 
soberly and deeply considered this major theoretical question 
and, in response to the mistaken ideas which negated commodities 
and money, put forward and expounded various valuable viewpoints. 
  First, proceeding from the angle of history and the role of 
commodity production, Mao Zedong pointed out: China was 
initially a very undeveloped commodity producer, more backward 
than India and Brazil, and it needed a stage whereby commodity 
production was developed. He put stress on proving that 
maintaining commodity production and commodity exchange, which 
was the sole link between the urban and rural economies, was the 
only road by which a country in which small-scale peasants 
constituted the majority, could achieve socialist victory. He 
believed that in a situation where the level of the productive 
forces was quite low, if commodity production and commodity 
exchange was negated and the collective ownership system was 
changed into a whole-people ownership system, and if the state 
allocated the products of the peasants without compensation and 
there were insufficient industrial products to satisfy the 
production and livelihood needs of the broad number of peasants, 
it would in essence be exploiting the peasants and would 
inevitably lead to the peasants being dissatisfied. It would 
also obstruct the development of production and affect the 
worker-peasant alliance. Mao Zedong did not limit himself to 
understanding the origins of the existence of commodity 
production from the level of the two different ownership systems 
but considered this question from a much deeper level. He held 
that the fate of commodity production is, in the end, tightly 
connected to the level of the productive forces. Thus, even 
after making the transition to a unitary socialist whole-people 
ownership system, if commodities were not plentiful, then 
commodity production and commodity exchange would still likely 
exist over various ranges. This view was quite deep and touched 
on the root of the issue. Unfortunately, he did not do further 
research. 
  Everyone knows that for a long time people have been 
suspicious of the idea of commodity production and commodity 
exchange under a socialist system. In respect of some people's 
apprehensions, Mao Zedong pointed out: "At present, there are 
some comrades who fear commodities and this is nothing but a 
fear of capitalism." However, "we cannot confuse commodity 
production and capitalism" because commodity production is not 
something which necessarily leads to capitalism. It requires 
special socioeconomic conditions and the socialist system no 
longer has those conditions. On the negative effects of 
commodity production, Mao Zedong felt that where they existed 
they should be restricted. As to developing commodity 
production and commodity circulation, here he actually began to 
break away from the debate about whether it "was socialist or 
capitalist" and put stress on developing the productive forces. 
Through commodity production, it would be possible to mobilize 
people's enthusiasm for production, increase social wealth, and 
satisfy the daily-increasing demands of society and it was from 
these angles that he understood commodity production. It was on 
this basis that Mao Zedong put forward the famous judgement that 
"the law of value is a great school." He firmly warned the 
whole party that the law of value and exchange at equal value 
are objective laws and if we violate these we will hurt 
ourselves. This law is a great school. If we use it, we will 
be able to teach our hundreds of thousands of party cadres and 
hundreds of millions of people and build socialism and 
communism. If we do not, nothing will be possible. This 
reflected the quite high degree reached by Mao Zedong in his 
thinking on the socialist economy and indicated a breakthrough 
in relation to the understanding of Marx, Engels, Lenin, and 
Stalin on the fate and role of the commodity economy in 
socialism. The sad thing is that while Mao Zedong, with an 
attitude of dealing concretely with work matters, proceeded from 
the angle of promoting the productive forces and achieved his 
results and high level through engaging in theoretical 
exploration, he was unable to sustain and continually develop 
these ideas and another ideological line gradually expanded and 
developed. 
  Previously, from the changes which occurred in Mao Zedong's 
understanding of the transition to socialism, we have already 
seen that his ideas of socialism's need for highly developed 
productive forces and a material base had already seen some 
dilution. When he began to explore the road of China's 
socialist construction, the trend to stress production relations 
became even more pronounced. In January 1962, Mao Zedong said: 
"What I tend to pay more attention to are systems questions and 
issues connected with the production relations." (Footnote 17) 
("Speech at the Expanded Central Work Conference" from the 
Selected Readings From Mao Zedong's Works, last 
volume, p 829) When this line of thought further developed into 
the worry that the superstructure and state political power 
would turn revisionist he mistakenly assessed the domestic class 
struggle situation and put forward the need to take class 
struggle as the key link. He gradually diverged from the center 
constituted by socialist economic construction. After 1957, 
"Leftist" ideas began to show themselves and gradually assumed a 
commanding position, suppressing the correct ideas. The 
accumulation and development of these "Leftist" mistakes finally 
led to the eruption of the "Great Cultural Revolution," which 
interrupted the exploration for a Chinese-style road to 
socialism. 
  Because of the diversions, the mistakes, and the sudden 
break 
in the exploration of the Chinese-style road to socialism, the 
realization of the beautiful hopes put forward by Mao Zedong and 
our party whereby we would turn our country as quickly as 
possible into a strong modern socialist country, suffered a 
setback. 
  Building a strong modern socialist country was a strategic 
target put forward by Mao Zedong and our party following the 
establishment of New China. At the national meeting of party 
deputies and the first NPC convened in 1954, Mao Zedong put 
forward the following idea: We will build our country, which is 
at present backward both economically and culturally, into a 
great industrialized country with a high degree of modern 
civilization. Regarding the steps by which we would realize 
this strategic target, Mao Zedong's idea was to first use three 
five-year plans, that is about 15 years, to lay down a base and 
afterwards, use seven five-year plans, up until the year 2000 to 
build our country into a great and powerful modern socialist 
state. At the Eighth CPC National Congress convened in 1956, he 
made concrete the first stage tasks. He noted that within three 
five-year plans or a bit longer, we would build a basically 
complete industrial system. Despite the occurrence of the 
"Leftist" mistake of the "Great Leap Forward" in 1958, and the 
Great Cultural Revolution which commenced in 1966, this 
strategic goal of building a strong modern country, which was 
pursued by the party and Mao Zedong, has never changed. Under 
Mao Zedong's instructions, at the First Session of the Third 
NPC, in December 1964 and the First Session of the Fourth NPC in 
1975, Zhou Enlai expounded on this strategic target more 
completely. He said: "Our general goal is, within a historical 
period which is not too long, to build our country into a strong 
socialist country with modern agriculture, modern industry, 
modern national defense, and modern science and technology." At 
the same time, he also clearly pointed out the two- step idea 
for realizing this strategic goal. The first step was within 15 
years, that is before 1980, to build an independent and quite 
complete industrial system and national economic system. The 
second step was, within this century, to realize in an overall 
way, the modernization of agriculture, industry, national 
defense, and science and technology, so that our country's 
national economy was in the world front ranks. What causes 
people to ponder is that, over these 20 years, while many 
achievements have been realized in economic construction, 
speaking overall, development has been slow and fluctuating and 
this great strategic target has not been realized as 
planned. 

<H6>    IV. </H6>
  The 3d Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee 
constituted a major shift of deep-going significance in the 
history of our party and, following this, our country's 
socialist modernization entered a a new historical period. Mao 
Zedong economic thought also entered a new stage of 
development--a stage of eliminating "Leftist" mistakes, 
criticizing the "two whatevers," bringing order out of chaos, 
summing up historical experiences, seeking truth from facts, 
liberating thought, and further establishing a theory of 
socialism with Chinese characteristics. As Deng Xiaoping said: 
"Since the Third Plenary Session, we have been restoring the 
correct things advocated by Mao Zedong and applying Mao Zedong 
Thought correctly and in an integrated way. The basic points of 
Mao Zedong Thought are still those noted. In many respects, we 
are doing things that Comrade Mao suggested but failed to do 
himself, setting right his erroneous opposition to certain 
things, and accomplishing some things that he did not. All this 
we shall continue to do for a fairly long time. Of course, we 
have developed Mao Zedong Thought and we shall go on developing 
it." (Footnote 18) ("Remarks on Successive Drafts of the 
`Resolution on Certain Questions in the History of Our Party 
Since the Founding of the PRC'" from the Selected Works of 
Deng Xiaoping (1975-1982), p 264) Deng Xiaoping, as the 
overall architect of our country's reforms and construction in 
the new period, has made outstanding contributions to the 
building of a theory of socialism with Chinese characteristics. 
This theory is a new development of Mao Zedong Thought. 
  Since the 3d Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central 
Committee, Deng Xiaoping and our party have upheld and developed 
Mao Zedong economic thought in many respects and the contents of 
this work are very rich. However, one of the most basic 
elements is that they have upheld that basic point in Mao Zedong 
Thought of combining Marxist theory with the realities of China. 
That is, they have again revived that basic idea of examining 
and judging all questions by proceeding from the requirement of 
developing the social productive forces. Under the guidance of 
this basic principle and this basic line of thought they have, 
in an overall way, constructed a theory of socialism with 
Chinese characteristics. Deng Xiaoping has clearly pointed out 
this point: "We must integrate the universal truth of Marxism 
with the concrete realities of China, blaze a path of our own, 
and build a socialism with Chinese characteristics--that is the 
basic conclusion we have reached after summing up long 
historical experience." (Footnote 19) ("Opening Speech at the 
Twelfth National Congress of the CPC" from the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping (1975-82), p 372) From the Third 
Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee till the 13th 
CPC National Congress and then again till the 14th Congress, our 
party has realized the second historic leap in combining Marxism 
with the concrete realities of China. This leap has also been 
realized on the basis of a long period of exploration and 
accumulation of experience and by summing up the positive and 
negative experiences over the more than 30 years since the 
establishment of the PRC. With a theory of socialism with 
Chinese characteristics it was possible, for the first time, to 
provide quite systematic primary answers to a series of 
questions such as how such an economically and culturally 
backward country as China was going to build socialism and how 
we were to consolidate and develop socialism, using new ideas 
and viewpoints to carry forward and develop Marxism-Leninism-Mao 
Zedong Thought. 

    In developing Mao Zedong Thought during the new period, it 
has been necessary first of all to re-establish some of the 
basic points of theory in order to make them more clear and firm. 
  On the question of the road of development, we have more 
consciously upheld the idea put forward by Mao Zedong a long 
time ago that China must follow its own road in revolution and 
construction. Following one's own road means being innovative 
and having one's own characteristics. What this means is: On 
points of theory, we must not accept what the books say as dogma 
or mechanically copy foreign modes but must take Marxism as 
guidance and practice as the sole criterion for testing truth; 
in terms of the ideological line, we must persist in 
emancipating our minds and seeking truth from facts; on the 
point of departure, we must always put the fundamental interests 
of the masses of the people before everything else and respect 
the creative spirit of the masses; and in the great practice of 
reform and construction, the party must lead the masses to 
explore and create together. 
  On the question of the stages of development, it is 
necessary 
to uphold in a more sober manner the idea of taking the basic 
conditions of our country as our point of departure, advocated 
by Mao Zedong as early as the period of the democratic 
revolution. In our new-democratic revolution, we were able to 
open up a unique road which proved to be successful precisely 
because we had upheld the principle of taking the basic 
conditions of our country as our point of departure and were 
thus able to correctly grasp the nature of the revolution and 
the stages of development. When we were groping our way along 
in socialist construction, we made the "Leftist" mistake of 
skipping over certain stages primarily because we had not 
soberly and objectively grasped and understood the conditions of 
our country and the basic stages of social development. Now, 
after many twists and turns, we have finally come soberly to the 
scientific conclusion that China is still at the primary stage 
of socialism. We now emphasize that this will be a long 
historical period which will last at least 100 years. Thus, in 
our formulation of general and specific policies, we must base 
ourselves on this basic national condition and must not skip 
this basic stage no matter what. 
  On the question of the fundamental task, we must 
re-establish, with reinforced theoretical firmness, the 
theoretical basis of Marxism, that is, the yardstick of 
productive forces, and resolutely discard the wrong "Leftist" 
principle of "taking class struggle as the key link," which is 
inappropriate in a socialist society. We must shift the focus 
of the work of the party and state onto economic development, 
determine that the fundamental task of the socialist society 
should be to develop the productive forces, and determine that 
the target for struggle of the people of the country should be 
to centralize their strengths in realizing modernization. Deng 
Xiaoping has clearly pointed out: Socialism essentially refers 
to the emancipation and development of the productive forces, 
the elimination of exploitation and polarization, and the 
ultimate realization of common prosperity. He emphasized that 
the principal contradiction in Chinese society at the present 
stage is the contradiction between people's growing material and 
cultural needs and the backward social productive forces. Thus, 
we must put the development of productive forces before 
everything else, take economic construction as our central task, 
and promote all-round social progress. This determines that, in 
the final analysis, the criterion for the assessment of work in 
all fields is whether it is conducive to the development of 
productive forces in the socialist society, whether it is 
conducive to enhancing the overall strength of the socialist 
state, and whether it is conducive to the improvement of 
people's living standards. 
  As regards the provision of political guarantees in building 
socialism, it is necessary to put forward, in a more centralized 
and overall way, the requirement that the four cardinal 
principles be upheld. Deng Xiaoping said: "To carry out 
China's four modernizations, we must uphold the four cardinal 
principles ideologically and politically. This is the basic 
prerequisite for achieving modernization." (Footnote 20) 
("Uphold the Four Cardinal Principles" from the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping (1975-1982) p 150) The Report of 
the 14th CPC National Congress also pointed out: "The four 
cardinal principles are the foundations of the country and the 
guarantee for the healthy development of reform, opening up, and 
modernization." 
  All these are, of course, the development of Mao Zedong's 
economic thought under new historical conditions. However, the 
most important, outstanding, and creative development since the 
3d Plenary Session of the 11th CPC Central Committee is reform 
and opening up. In summing up the basic practice and basic 
experience of the last 14 years, the 14th CPC National Congress 
pointed out in its report that the most striking characteristics 
of the new period is reform and opening up. What we have done 
during those 14 years was to build socialism with Chinese 
characteristics through reform and opening up and the 
emancipation and development of the productive forces. 

    Socialism has scored amazing success as it has turned from 
theory into a reality. However, the problems that have emerged 
in its own contradictory movements, such as the lack of 
vitality, poor efficiency, chronic bureaucracy, and corruption, 
have become increasingly serious. As a great revolutionary and 
theorist, Mao Zedong was sharp-eyed enough to see the 
seriousness of these problems. Although he always adhered to 
the fundamental stance of working for the interests of the 
people and did his best to find solutions to these problems, he 
betrayed increasingly serious signs of "Leftist" deviation in 
his approach. He tried to resolve these problems through the 
"Great Cultural Revolution," with the result that the whole 
society suffered a great catastrophe while the problems remained 
unresolved. As the most innovative strategic thinker and 
Marxist thinker in the contemporary world, Deng Xiaoping turned 
his unparalleled political foresight and theoretical courage, 
his scientific spirit of seeking truth from facts, and his great 
insight into the course of historical development, to good 
account in summing up the historical experience of the 
international communist movement and opening up the only road 
for ridding our country of its ills and building China into a 
rich and prosperous nation, namely, the road of reform and 
opening up. Deng Xiaoping said: "There is no way out if we do 
not carry out reform. Practice over the past few decades has 
proved that the old system does not work. We mechanically 
copied the experience of other countries in the past and this 
resulted in us obstructing the development of the productive 
forces. On the ideological level, it led to ossification and 
this obstructed the bringing into play of the enthusiasm of the 
people and the grass-roots levels. In addition, we made our own 
mistakes.... In the 20 years from 1958 until 1978, China's 
society was actually stuck for a long time in a stagnant and 
wavering situation and the national economy and the people's 
livelihood did not see much development or improvement. Could 
such a situation continue without reform?" (Footnote 21) ("The 
Pace of Reform Must Be Accelerated" from the Selected 
Works of Xiaoping Deng, Vol 3, p 237) "Apart from the road 
of reform, China has no other option because only through reform 
can China flourish." (Footnote 22) (XINHUASHE report 23 Oct 1985) 
  Reform and opening up is based on a more profound and 
comprehensive understanding of the basic contradictory movement 
of socialism and economic laws. It was precisely on this 
theoretical basis that Deng Xiaoping scientifically defined the 
nature and significance of reform and unequivocally put forward 
the basic formulation that "reform is a revolution." 
  In "On the Correct Handling of Contradictions Among the 
People," Mao Zedong put forward his doctrine on the basic 
contradictions of socialist society and further came up with the 
scientific argument that the relations of production and the 
productive forces, and the economic base and the superstructure, 
are concurrently suited to each other and contradictory. The 
basic economic system of socialism is suited to the productive 
forces and so is the basic political system suited to the 
economic base. However, the specific form and links of the 
relations of production and the superstructure still leave much 
to be desired and readjustment and transformation are in order. 
Due to historical limitations, Mao Zedong was unable to 
accurately define these imperfections. Subsequent historical 
complications made it impossible for this reform-oriented notion 
to develop in greater depth, thereby deferring the pressing 
historical task of structural reform in China. Deng Xiaoping 
has carried forward and developed this idea of Mao Zedong's. He 
has not only put forward for the first time the need to carry 
out comprehensive reform of the existing economic and political 
systems but based this reform on the comprehensive, concrete, 
and profound analysis and grasp of the actual movement of the 
basic contradictions in society. He pointed out that the 
principal form of expression of the basic contradictions in 
society at present is the contradiction between the developed 
productive forces and the ossified economic, political, 
cultural, scientific, technological, and educational systems. 
Thus, he argued that "this constitutes a revolution.... Our 
intention is not to overthrow anyone but to transform the 
organizational structure of our party and state. If we do not 
carry out this revolution... not only will the four 
modernizations fail but the party and state will face a mortal 
trial and perhaps perish." (Footnote 23) ("Streamlining 
Organizations Constitutes A Revolution" from the Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping (1975-1982), p 352) The possibility 
that the party and state will perish stems from the fact that 
the prolonged existence of an ossified system which fails to 
bring the superiority of socialism into full play has seriously 
fettered the productive forces, generated pessimism in social 
and political life, and is in danger of affecting the very 
existence of the basic socialist system. By scientifically 
putting forward the great theoretical formula that "reform also 
means the emancipation of the productive forces" on the basis of 
such a profound theoretical understanding and truthful admission 
of the fact that there are elements in our traditional system 
that seriously fetter the productive forces, we are able to see 
the significance of reform and opening up from a new height. 

    Reform and opening up have not just opened up a road of hope 
in developing the productive forces, realizing modernization and 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics. They have also 
opened up a broad road for developing socialist economic theory. 
Under the guidance of the basic theory and basic line set down 
by Deng Xiaoping and our party on the basis of the new rich 
theoretical nourishment provided by the continually developing 
practice of reform, in the process of the mutual roles and 
mutual promotion of theory and practice, socialist economic 
theory has broken through the fetters of the various dogmas and 
straightjackets, bravely borrowed and absorbed scientific 
elements from the various economic theories around the world, 
and achieved considerable development. The theoretical basis of 
this development was a re-understanding of socialism. In this 
process of re-understanding, we broke through the dogmatic, 
simplistic understanding of socialism which had existed in the 
past, discarded the "Leftist" voluntarism which produced very 
great harm, and soberly examined the defects which existed in 
the traditional planned economy. The theoretical centering 
point in this development was the seeking of a new target model 
for the economic structure. Since the 3d Plenary Session of the 
11th CPC Central Committee, we have gradually escaped from the 
traditional concepts of the market economy being a specific 
trait of capitalism, and the planned economy being the basic 
characteristic of a socialist economy; we have begun new 
explorations and formed new understandings of the relationship 
between socialism and the commodity economy. The 12th CPC 
National Congress put forward the idea that the planned economy 
should be the main part of the economy and that regulation 
through the market mechanism should form a supplement. The 3d 
Plenary Session of the 12th CPC Central Committee pointed out 
that the commodity economy is a stage which socioeconomic 
development cannot skip over and that our country's socialist 
economy is a planned commodity economy based on the public 
ownership system. The 13th CPC National Congress pointed out 
that a socialist planned economy structure should be one in 
which planning and the market form a unity. After the 4th 
Plenary Session of the 13th CPC Central Committee, the idea was 
put forward that we should establish an economic structure and 
operational mechanism in which the planned economy and 
regulation through market mechanism are combined and which is in 
accord with the development of the planned commodity economy. 
In particular, Comrade Deng Xiaoping's speeches during his trip 
to the south in 1992 further clearly pointed out that planning 
and the market are both economic measures and that whether there 
is a little more planning or a little more of the market is not 
indicative of whether a system is socialist or capitalist. This 
incisive judgement essentially broke free from the ideological 
fetters which saw the planned economy and the market economy as 
categories of basic social systems and allowed us to take a 
great leap forward in our understanding of the relationship 
between planning and the market. In this way, the 14th CPC 
National Congress was able, on the basis of practical 
development and deepening of understanding, to clearly point 
out: The aim of our country's economic reform is to establish a 
socialist market economy system. 
  A socialist market economy system is in accord with the 
basic 
system of socialism. This overall goal of a socialist market 
economy system is a theoretical combination realized through our 
new understanding of all aspects of socialist production 
relations and the economic operational mechanism. Over the last 
10 years or more, the theoretical achievements we have realized 
in our exploration of the various spheres of socialist 
production relations, including ownership structures, enterprise 
systems, market systems, income distribution systems, and 
macroregulatory and control systems, are all contained within 
this target model. The "Decision by the CPC Central Committee 
on Some Issues Concerning the Establishment of a Socialist 
Market Economic Structure," passed by the 3d Plenary Session of 
the 14th CPC Central Committee, also manifested these results of 
long-term exploration in its exposition on the overall framework 
of the new structure and the socialist market economy, providing 
a guiding blueprint for the deeper development of the 
reforms. 

    As noted previously, establishing a strong, modern, 
socialist 
state was a strategic target set down long ago by Comrade Mao 
Zedong and our party. The realization of this great strategic 
goal not only requires strong determination but, more 
importantly, a correct line and policies and a rational economic 
structure as a guarantee. Prior to the 3d Plenary Session of 
the 11th CPC Central Committee, "high speed" and "high targets" 
continually appeared in our country's economic development. 
Although these manifested intense hopes and determination, 
because they did not proceed from reality and did not have 
structural guarantees, added to which was the interference from 
the mistaken line of "taking class struggle as the key link," 
the strategic deployments for modernization could not be 
implemented. Thus, the hoped for economic growth did not 
materialize and, instead, we saw a 20-year period of 
fluctuations and wavering. The 3d Plenary Session of the 11th 
CPC Central Committee set those things to rights which had been 
thrown into disorder. It also decided to shift the focus of the 
work of the whole party and the whole people to economic 
construction and, accordingly, set down modernization goals to 
be realized in steps and by stages. It also adopted the policy 
of reform and opening up, and put great efforts into providing 
the necessary structural conditions for modernization. In all 
these respects, Deng Xiaoping made great and outstanding 
contributions. Over the last 10 years and more, the 
achievements in our country's reform, opening up, and 
modernization were all achieved under the guidance of the theory 
of socialism with Chinese characteristics, which was a new 
development of Mao Zedong's economic thought. This theory will 
be continually enriched and developed in the great practice of 
reform, opening up, and construction in the future and will 
guide the Chinese people in moving from victory to victory, 
until we finally achieve the goal of a strong, modern, socialist 
state. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40137 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Survey of Lhasa Enterprise Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0232A Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO in Chinese 7 Dec 93 pp 1, 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0232A </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhao Enxue (6392 1869 1331): "Face Up to </F>
Difficulties, Seek Differences, Deepen Reform, Increase 
Vitality"] 
  [Text] Due to various causes, for a long time now 
production (operations) at enterprises in Lhasa has consistently 
been in a slump. Relatively many have experienced losses. In 
particular, year after year those with major losses have 
depended on state subsidies to get by. This has become a huge 
burden for Lhasa. It has gotten so serious that fiscal revenues 
are out of breath. In line with the establishment of a socialist 
market economy, what is the present situation of enterprise 
production (operation) in Lhasa? 
  According to Lhasa Economic Committee statistics, from 
January to September 1993, the total accumulated gross output 
value of industrial enterprises in Lhasa (in fixed 1990 prices) 
was 26.1082 million yuan, up 4.17 percent over the same period 
of 1992, and accounting for completion of 74.70 percent of the 
annual plan; of which, 13 industrial enterprises subordinate to 
Lhasa city accounted for 15.0163 million yuan, completion of 
80.47 percent of the annual plan. County-subordinate industrial 
enterprises completed 450,200 yuan, up 105.76 percent over the 
same period in 1992. From January to September, industrial 
enterprises throughout the city accumulated total product sales 
reaching 27.7651 million yuan (excluding county-subordinate 
industrial enterprises). Of which, the Chengguan District 
Minority Handicraft Industrial Enterprise accounted for 11.6031 
million yuan, up 28.17 percent over the same period in 1992. 
From January to September, industrial enterprises throughout 
Lhasa had clearly improved economic results, realizing profits 
of 2.09 million yuan (excluding county-subordinate industrial 
enterprises), up 29.81 percent over the same period in 1992. 
Twenty-six minority handicraft industries in the Chengguan 
region had rather good economic results, realizing profits of 
1.402 million yuan, up 38.13 percent over the same period in 
1992. From January to September, two Lhasa-subordinate transport 
enterprises transported a total of 6,474.3 tons, up 17.61 
percent over the same period in 1992. They had a weekly 
transport volume of 4.92 million ton-kilometers, up 23.93 
percent over the same period in 1992, for a total income of 
1.361 million yuan, up 79.31 percent over the same period in 
1992. Economic efficiency is clearly up. The enterprise 
production situation is pleasing. 
  For many years, because they were fettered by the old 
system, 
enterprises in Lhasa were unable to break out thoroughly from 
"big rice bowl, iron rice bowl" conditions. They were unable to 
motivate fully the enthusiasm of enterprise workers. 
Furthermore, the dependent mentality of enterprises to "wait, 
depend on and demand" was rather serious. There was much talk of 
objective causes, little search for subjective differences. The 
subjective capabilities of enterprises could not be brought into 
play. Reliance on government was rampant. Some enterprises even 
relied on state fiscal subsidies or bank loans to get by. This 
was a burden on state finances. Enterprises owing bank loans had 
no way to repay on time. The burden became more serious year 
after year and enterprises became ever poorer. They have never 
been able to stand on their own feet. 
  Given the difficulties and problems enterprises face, in the 
process of implementing the spirit of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
southern tour and the party's 14th Plenum, the Lhasa Committee 
of the Communist Party of China and the Lhasa people's 
government summarized enterprises' existing problems. They 
believe that to get enterprises out of difficulty requires great 
effort to further deepen enterprise reform and strengthen the 
operational mechanism of enterprises while improving economic 
results. Toward this end, they formulated specific implementing 
methods to enact the State Council's and Autonomous Regions' 
regulations regarding transforming the operational mechanisms of 
state-run industrial enterprises. To deepen enterprise reform, 
leading cadres of the Lhasa Committee and the Lhasa government 
along with sectors managing enterprises actively transformed 
functions, performed services well, deepened survey research on 
each enterprise, grasped major current problems of enterprises 
and helped them resolve major contradictions. To reform 
enterprise work methods, they implemented reforms aimed at 
leadership and guidance, leading enterprises toward the market 
to participate in market competition and enhance 
competitiveness. At the same time enterprises throughout Lhasa 
commonly held big discussions on "liberating thinking, changing 
thought patterns, seeking differences, seizing good 
opportunities and deepening reform." Thus they made enterprises 
recognize that reform was the only way out. Based on minority 
handicraft industry market economy development trends, the 
Chengguan Regional People's Government and Economic Committee 
transformed and merged 34 former minority handicraft enterprises 
into 26. They expanded the enterprise scale of production 
(operations) and went after hot selling products, enhancing the 
enterprises' ability to adapt to and compete on the market. At 
the same time various enterprises further perfected internal 
contract responsibility systems. According to a survey, 13 
Lhasa-subordinate industrial enterprises and 26 minority 
handicraft industries all implemented various forms of contract 
and target responsibility systems, putting each economic target 
concretely on the workshop, the small group and the individual. 
They thoroughly reorganized the "big rice bowl," smashed the 
"iron rice bowl," turning pressure into a motive force and fully 
motivating the enthusiasm of enterprise management personnel and 
production (operation) workers. After smashing the "big rice 
bowl," transport enterprises tightly captured good opportunities 
in the transport market. They actively organized resources, 
"putting down their bowls to find rice [searching out work to 
do]," making rational allocations, fully uncovering potential 
and thinking of every possible way and means to improve existing 
transport equipment utilization rates and make transport 
production good for the future. 
  Due to deepened reform and ferreting out enterprise 
potential, they further enhanced the role of subjective 
enterprise potential. In a timely manner various enterprises 
seized economic markets, actively introduced technology, 
increased the colors and varieties of products and augmented 
vitality. The output value and efficiency clearly rose in five 
Lhasa-subordinate industrial enterprises: the Lhasa wood article 
plant, carpet factory, handicraft and artworks plant, food and 
oil processing plant, and clothing company. In particular, by 
the end of September 1993 the food and oil processing plant had 
already surpassed its entire annual production task and each 
economic target. At the same time, various enterprises actively 
began movements to save energy and expenses and create income. 
Under conditions of the changeover from the old to new economic 
system, intense market competition, higher prices on various raw 
materials, and a shortage of circulating funds, enterprises 
throughout Lhasa strive to reduce product costs, do all they can 
to shrink nonproduction expenses, expand product sales and 
reduce inventories. Product costs fell to various degrees and 
economic efficiency rose at five enterprises: the Lhasa mining 
company, cement manufacturing plant, wood articles plant, 
handicraft and art products plant, and the East Wind sideline 
food products plant. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40138 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bank Official Discusses Financial Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0255B Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO in Chinese 15 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0255B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article entitled "Zhou Zhengqing (0719 2973 1987) Discusses </F>
the Restructuring of the Financial System"] 
  [Text] XINHUASHE--Beijing, 14 Dec--Zhou Zhengqing, vice 
president of People's Bank of China, who spoke here recently 
said that the goal of the restructuring of the financial system 
next year is to set up a central bank system under the State 
Council's leadership to implement the monetary policy 
independently; set up a financial organization system that 
separates policy-oriented and business-oriented financial 
matters and makes the state-owed commercial banks the primary 
system but accommodates other kinds of financial initiations; 
set up a unified and open, orderly and competitive, and closely 
managed financial market system; and to implement stage-by-stage 
reform of the foreign exchange management system according to 
international practices. 
  At the Restructuring of the Financial System Report Meeting 
jointly sponsored by the CPCCC Propaganda Department, Party 
Committee of Departments under the Central Committee, CPC State 
Organ Work Committee, Beijing Municipal Party Committee, and the 
PLA General Political Department, Zhou Zhengqing said, since 
1978, in the wake of the deepening reform of the nations' 
economic system, a series of reform of the financial system has 
also been implemented. Consequently, we are beginning to find 
different kinds of financial institutions; we have a central 
bank system and are gradually setting up a financial 
macroeconomic regulation and control system that integrates 
direct and indirect regulation and control; we have made 
progress in creating new financial tools and different ways of 
extending credit; we have a fledgling financial market; and we 
have begun to restructure the foreign exchange control system. 
We have further opened up the financial sector to the outside 
world. 
  Zhou Zhengqing pointed out that despite the progress made in 
the restructuring of China's financial system, the old system is 
still flawed. Primarily, People's Bank of China has not turned 
into a bona fide central bank. It has not really assumed the 
responsibility of supervising the nation's financial activities. 
The central bank itself is still handling some policy-oriented 
loan business. We are still not utilizing the monetary policy 
tools skillfully enough, and we lack effective indirect 
regulation and control measures. The specialized banks are still 
not separating government from enterprises, and unlike banks in 
the market economy, they lack the mechanisms to discipline 
themselves or let risks constrain their behavior. The financial 
market lacks effective supervision which often leads to market 
disorder and confusion. Reform with respect to the financial 
infrastructure has been slow. 
  Zhou Zhengqing said, the main purpose of the restructuring 
of 
the financial system which begins next year is to turn People's 
Bank of China into a bona fide central bank. The specific reform 
measures are: To change People's Bank's functions and define its 
duties. The headquarters of People's Bank will have the power to 
issue currency, the power to manage basic money, and the power 
to regulate and control the overall credit volume and regulate 
the interest rate standards. The headquarters of the People's 
Bank normally will have financial dealings only with the 
national commercial banks. The branches' basic duties are to 
exercise financial supervision and management, compile and 
analyze statistics, regulate the money supply laterally, manage 
the state treasury, regulate and transfer cash, and manage 
foreign exchange and inter-bank settlement. In restructuring and 
improving the monetary policy system, People's Bank's ultimate 
goal is to maintain currency stability and in turn promote 
economic growth. The monetary policy's intermediary and 
operational targets are the money supply, the credit volume, 
inter-bank short-term loan rates, and bank reserve rates. 
Meanwhile we must strengthen the central bank's leadership, 
supervision, and management of the nation's financial industry. 
  Zhou Zhengqing pointed out that, next year, we must set up 
policy-oriented banks, achieve the separation of policy-oriented 
and business-oriented financial undertakings, and solve the 
problem of specialized banks taking on double responsibilities. 
After the policy-oriented banks are established, they must 
strengthen management, take their own risks, uphold the 
principle of not doing money-losing business and not competing 
with the commercial financial institutions, and accept People's 
Bank's supervision on business matters. After separating out the 
policy-oriented matters, existing state-owned specialized banks 
should gradually be turned into state-owned commercial banks, 
and they should operate like modern commercial banks. Zhou 
Zhengqing said state-owned commercial banks should compete among 
themselves, and their businesses may overlap. State-owned 
commercial banks must not invest directly in nonfinancial 
enterprises. Meanwhile we must actively but steadily develop a 
cooperative bank system, which consists mainly of urban 
cooperative and rural cooperative banks. Their responsibility is 
to serve the medium-sized and small enterprises and the 
agricultural and developing regions. 
  Zhou Zhengqing said, we must set up a unified and open, 
orderly and competitive, and closely managed financial market 
and a tightly controlled money market; we must clearly define 
and regulate the market entities and their conduct to prevent 
funds from draining away from the money market to the securities 
market and the real estate market; we must perfect the national 
debt market and create conditions that enable People's Bank to 
engage in open market operations; we must perfect the stock 
market and restructure the foreign exchange control system--the 
long term goal is to turn RMB into a convertible currency. 
  Finally, Zhou Zhengqing emphasized that the direction of 
next 
year's restructuring of the financial system is set and specific 
steps are mapped out, but in the actual implementation process, 
particularly in changing from the old to the new system, we must 
insist on controlling the total volume to prevent runaway 
inflation. He said that this round of financial reform will be 
more rigorous and broader in scope than previous rounds, and it 
will entail major changes in the central bank itself. This means 
we must pay even closer attention to controlling the total 
volume; otherwise not only will the restructuring of the 
financial system fail but the whole economic reform process will 
be jeopardized. Thus, in next year's financial reform, before 
the new monetary policy tools and specific measures are in full 
operation or show initial improvement, we should not be rash and 
abandon the original volume regulation and control measures 
prematurely. Zhou Zhengqing said that after the policy-oriented 
operations are taken out of the state-owned specialized banks, 
it does not imply that they will automatically become commercial 
banks. The transformation of specialized banks into commercial 
banks is closely tied to the establishment and perfection of 
China's modern enterprise system. It must be coordinated with 
the reforms of the planned system, investment system, foreign 
trade system, and taxation system. The transformation itself is 
a process. 
  To implement financial reform, we need a series of financial 
laws and regulations. Some parts of the reform must be defined 
in legal format to ensure an orderly process. Next year will be 
a year of financial legislation. We expect that more than 20 
laws and regulations will be drawn up and ratified. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40139 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Output of Raw Materials in December </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  HK2001110594 Beijing CEI Database in English 20 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK2001110594 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of raw materials in December 1993, released by the State 
Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |12/93             |12/92             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Iron ore          |10,000t           |2953.1            |1938.5            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pig iron          |10,000t           |770.5             |693.7             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steel             |10,000t           |769.4             |704.8             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rolled steel      |10,000t           |615.18            |559.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ferro alloys      |10,000t           |22.96             |19.40             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Coking coal       |10,000t           |591.34            |540.93            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ten nonferrous me-|10,000t           |28.54             |24.60             | 
|tals              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Of: Copper        |10,000t           |5.31              |5.21              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Aluminium         |10,000t           |10.23             |9.48              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Copper products   |10,000t           |8.26              |4.21              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Aluminium products|10,000t           |4.39              |4.34              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Alumina           |10,000t           |5.08              |13.67             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric-iron ore|10,000t           |15.80             |132.12            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Phosphorus ore    |10,000t           |129.01            |199.60            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Timber            |10,000cu m        |579               |504               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Artificial board  |10,000cu m        |53.35             |35.78             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cement            |10,000t           |3397.4            |2722.2            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plate glass       |10,000c           |1051.20           |988.29            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t - ton, cu m - cubic meter, c - case                               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40140 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dai Qing on Han Dongfang as Workers' Leader </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0234A Hong Kong KAIFANG [OPEN MAGAZINE] in Chinese No 
10, 18 Oct 93 pp 52-54 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0234A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong KAIFANG [OPEN MAGAZINE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dai Qing: "How Will Han Dongfang Establish His </F>
Own Orientation?"--First paragraph is editor's note] 
  [Text] This article was written to explain the 
circumstances of Chinese workers under 40 years of Chinese 
Communist Party rule and the events involving the CPC's 
deep-seated feelings against the workers' movement and against 
Han Dongfang. It also deals with the question of what role Han 
Dongfang has set out for himself. 
  With the overseas democracy movement seemingly quieter with 
each passing day, suddenly, we have the events surrounding Han 
Dongfang's challenging Beijing and then running into roadblocks. 
According to my view from the sidelines, the Chinese Government 
and the overseas democracy movement each do their own talking, 
but they never have any contact. Hence, what has emerged is a 
situation of mutual denouncement, mutual revilement and harming 
the opponent but never attacking his vital points; not because 
both sides are different, but only because the mental knapsacks 
of both sides are crammed so full of their stock roles and 
phrases, they are unable (or unwilling) to talk about that which 
is the most crucial. 
<H5>  The CPC Cannot Bring Itself To Mention Han Dongfang </H5>
  If we look closely at the relevant legal statutes, the 
Chinese Government is in the wrong. Everybody maintains that Han 
was issued an valid passport, and if they want to put him in 
prison, to kill him or want to force to surrender, they must 
first allow him to enter the country, at least in theory. If 
they don't in fact imprison him, or kill him, then most likely 
they will also not be able to play the game of inducing him to 
capitulate, and will not be willing to sink so low as the 
Kuomintang and resort to assassination, so it will push the view 
abroad that everything is just fine, something that is clearly 
naive, is it not? Of course, using the term "naive" to describe 
the CPC I fear is a perfectly inappropriate use of the word. The 
problem is that is it not naive to use the term naive in regard 
to the CPC? My response is that I find it difficult to talk 
about this. 
  What do I mean by difficult to talk about? First we must 
talk about Han Dongfang. Han emerged as a leader of the 
"Workers' Free Trade Union" in 1989, and no matter how hard he 
worked to appear moderate and rational, within the government 
and the society as a whole (including the US AFL-CIO and Hong 
Kong's HK Alliance in Support of Democratic Movement in China) 
there is fear that in his own mind, his social role and 
orientation is as a "leader of a workers' movement." But what is 
the workers' movement? For China what was yesterday's, what is 
today's and what will be tomorrow's worker's movement? How will 
this movement be led? And after this movement, what then? I 
think that it is Americans and Hong Kong people who do not 
understand these questions, including in this group the hard 
working and honest Mr. Szeto Wah; Han Dongfang himself does not 
understand very well. The CPC has the most understanding of the 
issue, but cannot say anything. This is because it does not want 
to allow those hundreds of thousands of industrial workers 
inside the country to understand. In fact, it does not matter 
much if the industrial workers understanding of these questions 
is no better than their confusion regarding them, but this 
touches on the theoretical foundation on which the CPC 
established the party and established the government. I do not 
know if the readers have all had this experience: Among CPC 
cadres there is no lack of people who are warm and sincere and 
do solid work, but if you touch on ideology, and the theory of 
class struggle, then each and every one has a wooden face, and 
unshakable determination. Therefore, in talking about this "Han 
Dongfang returns to China and runs into obstruction" event, one 
must start from the basic theories of the CPC and the Chinese 
workers' movement. 
  Since there have been machines, there have been workers to 
run the machines, and there have been workers who understood 
themselves that they should be able to make a decent livelihood, 
and that after struggling for a certain period for this 
livelihood, there will be a worker's movement and for 
convenience this movement will organize unions. This 
circumstance has continued to the present, and has continued 
until at the same time as the Han Dongfang case, the entire Hong 
Kong Immigration Bureau asked for sick leave. Over the last 
several centuries, people are already quite familiar with this 
concept, that in order to describe this below for convenience, 
we will for the moment call workers that for their own economic 
interests conduct a struggle to form an organization a welfare 
[material benefits] union movement. 
<H3>  Lenin Changed Welfare Union Movement Into a Political 
Activity </H3>
  A welfare union movement is not very frightening, and this 
can be said to stem from its strong industrial character (it 
also does not have an all-encompassing social nature) and its 
consultative character, and its social destructive power is 
limited. After the goal of material benefit has been attained, 
the movement also ends, and the society as before relies on its 
own rules and regulations. This is also why countries that only 
have welfare movements, though at times there are some who are 
discontent and disturbances occur, the society as a whole is 
consistently comparatively stable, and labor unions can jointly 
exist with capitalist industrial production, as they have up to 
this day. 
  What is unfortunate is that in the 19th century, we have the 
emergence in Europe of the philosopher and economist Karl Marx, 
who expounded the labor theory of value. This was an achievement 
puffed up with the conceit of academic circles (compared with 
Marx's academic activity, his revolutionary practice appears 
quite minor); later, Lenin, a social activist who fully accepted 
the tradition of the purity of the people, in a critique of the 
value of this theory, added emotion (injustice), and the next 
step then was to extend the theory to the political realm 
(ending this injustice), and the result was trouble arising in a 
Russia that was outside the bounds within which this theory was 
expounded. Again later on, after this theory, including the 
carrying out of practice based on this theory through "the sound 
of gunfire," had arrived in China, the CPC regarded it as a 
divine instruction, and as "advanced," and even definitively 
stated that the burning-with-impatience intellectuals should 
start to look down on any other theory outside of this Leninized 
principle, and from this abandon their base and take the path of 
theory, marching in succession towards the factories and mines, 
playing the character of a 20th century Chen Sheng-Wu Guang 
Uprising [209 B.C., first large-scale peasant uprising in 
China's history] with a guiding principle and an organization. 
  For old Communist Party members this is very important 
indeed, and when we think about the Cultural Revolution period, 
and in order for the picture of Mao Zedong and Liu Shaoqi 
entering the Anyuan Coal Mine to have been drawn and create such 
a hubbub, we realize that this was no trivial matter. At this 
time, the "politically awakened" workers could not be controlled 
by a few cadres for a few hours, and many waved some money in 
front of their eyes. This was a formula used by scab unions to 
draw in corrupt workers. A working class armed with advanced 
thinking had to be political, and had to "cast off the shackles 
from their bodies, and take on the whole world!" 
<H5>  Some Characteristics of the Situation of Workers in China </H5>
  Originally, China was an agricultural country, and the 
workers' movement had little effect during the struggle to seize 
power. But this did not hinder the thoroughly astute Mao Zedong 
from using a greatly simplified and Sinicized unified theory to 
arouse the peasants, and this allowed him to force other people, 
including the oldtimers [laobizu], foreigners, the 
representatives of foreigners, and "leaders of the white areas," 
to one by one stand aside, and in the end he prevailed through 
absolute superiority--this before ever entering a city. 
  After entering the cities, the situation for Chinese workers 
then really becomes difficult to explain in a few words. To sum 
it up, it involved the following points: 
  1) Workers were put in a very high political position by the 
CPC. "Roots red, seedlings straight!," "leadership in 
everything!", everybody was familiar with these sayings, and 
didn't say them much. 
  2) Because on the mainland a policy of bringing living 
standards to the same level, the people's economic position was 
not bad, including that of idlers and fools. 
  3) Although there are unions, they are hollow, useless 
organizations--the All-China Federation of Trade Unions is 
subordinate to the CPC Central Liaison Department. Union 
grass-roots level organizations also exist as subordinates of 
the Trade Union Federation, but they only manage dances and 
organize excursions. There is no way for them to clamor for 
material benefits: Are you not the owner of the factory? How can 
the owner petition himself? 
  4) In terms of politics, people think but all do not use 
their thoughts. You are the leading class, you already have 
rights, what further is there to ask about politics? If one does 
not think about this or take any interest in it, there are also 
opportunities, and the CPC early on gave you a firm definition, 
but which political movement in the end was able to dispense 
with the stand taken by the working class. In 1957, the turning 
point in the Anti-Rightist Struggle from "attracting" to 
"attacking" was when "the working class had spoken;" in 1976, 
the "attack" was already concrete as the workers arrived on the 
scene with government-issued clubs for dealing with the students 
and city residents. But this was not only "the broad masses of 
the workers"; some were fortunate to be able to serve as leading 
cadres, even central leading cadres. 
<H5>  The Reasons Why the CPC Will Not Let Han Dongfang Return </H5>
  The reasons CPC authorities will not allow Han Dongfang 
return should be very clear. 
  First, what type of movement actually is the workers' 
movement led by Han Dongfang? Is it a Western-style unionist 
welfare movement or is it a CPC-type political movement? For me, 
looking at Han since 1989, including an examination of his 
statements and actions prior to his imprisonment and after his 
release, what he has done is exactly the same as Wuerkaixi and 
Chai Ling, completely deviating from the CPC's mold, by marching 
along in the footsteps of the elder generation, in which the 
intellectuals were concerned with society, and really becoming 
involved with the thoughts and feelings of social reform, going 
down amongst the workers, and arousing them, organizing them.... 
This time, the intellectual's actual educational pedigree, and 
occupation, including his consistently vainly hopeful moderate 
positions and reasonable dialogue, have already become not 
important, and the part he plays is the role more than 70 years 
ago of Zhang Guotao and that played by Liu Shaoqi (exactly like 
the May Fourth Movement and 9 December Movement hero images 
compiled by the CPC and studied by Wuerkaixi and Chai Ling). 
This is the first layer. 
  Second, at that time the CPC was arousing the workers, 
arousing the students, and those in power constituted the "KMT 
reactionary regime," therefore this was right. Now, however, 
with the peoples' regime under the leadership of the CPC, what 
you are doing resembles, and again is modelled on the complete 
teachings of the CPC, which, in this case, I beg your pardon, is 
counterrevolutionary!! The reader I'm afraid still remembers 
those days in 1989, those two characters meaning "patriotism," 
and how justly and forcefully the students demanded, how justly 
and forcefully Li Peng would not give, making the whole world as 
a result feel injured and resentful, and that the truth lay here. 
  Third, any of those in power know that in arousing the 
students, even if those aroused to take the lead cherish the 
most utilitarian of political goals, it is also possible to have 
nothing extraordinary occur--the South Korean students and the 
police have fought day after day, while the nation's power all 
the same has continued to increase. Arouse the workers, and they 
can cut off water supplies, electricity, cut off transportation, 
their power to disrupt society is too great. A movement to gain 
material benefits uses just this type of deterrent to achieve 
its goals. But economic demands also have a finite end, and the 
capitalist side goes to extremes to declare that it will go 
bankrupt. Political demands are difficult to deal with, and if 
as luck would have had it, they had been in compliance with the 
CPC's political demands of that year, would the movement have 
been of any size? Among these people, who is there that has an 
even clearer stand than the CPC itself? Would the authorities be 
able to contain you as you carried political motives in arousing 
the workers? 
  Fourth, I will form a movement for material gain, is this 
allowed or not? As a matter of fact, China at present already 
has a number of fragmentary movements seeking material benefits, 
but these have not been stirred up by people concerned for their 
country or their people such as Han Dongfang. Rather, their 
standards are low, their scale is small, the extent of their 
contacts is narrow, and their goals are simple. Even though they 
are this way, the authorities pay close attention to each 
occurrence, and in the shortest possible period and within the 
smallest possible scope, either control and stop it, or the 
problem is resolved and issue dropped. Movements for material 
benefits in China are by no means the same as in a country with 
private ownership and market economic mechanisms. In China, 
capital is the state, and the interests that one demands 
conflict with the interests of the government and takes from the 
government's pockets, so how can the authorities not be in pain? 
This is commonly understood. Arriving at the present time, the 
anger of China's hundreds of thousands of workers does not come 
from one place alone. Reform, reform, from the halls of 
officialdom come petty thieves and hoodlums, all getting rich, 
and only the greatly perspiring and hard working "leadership 
class" is suffering. Add to the fact that Li Peng has been 
floundering about for several years, and large- and medium-sized 
enterprises are not doing well. If they do not act in accordance 
with Li Peng's approach, to greatly expand imports, then the 
fact is that state-owned enterprises will be even more anemic. 
Running here, running there, finances worsening, wages not being 
paid. At this juncture, engaging in a movement for material 
benefits is exactly the type of tool that an out-of-power 
politician searches for to cut down those in power, if it is not 
subversion, what is it? How can the authorities dare allow Han 
Dongfang to return to Beijing? 
<H5>  What Role Does Han Dongfang Want To Play? </H5>
  In response, your government blocks the way of one Han 
Dongfang, has the situation turned into a completely economic 
one? Han Dongfang cannot enter the country, China is such a 
large place, how is it that there have not emerged a Zhang 
Xifang [west], a Wang Nanfang [south] or a Zhao Beifang who 
cherish the same ideas, and along with him experienced the same 
"growing up accepting the Party's education?" The question is 
how in terms of principles and policies, to make Hang Dongfang 
and industrial workers understand that revolution is not a good 
method for resolving China's problems, and is by no means the 
only method. The CPC itself succeeded in revolution, but China's 
affairs have not been handled well; today change is arising in 
the same way, and those suffering losses will still be the 
common people. 
  It is a pity that the CPC today has sealed off channels 
through which criticisms and suggestions could be communicated 
to the leadership, and wants to as before through talking big, 
"stuffing" the workers, playing a new trick by having a beauty 
contest, and singing soft popular tunes, to lull the workers, 
and not allow people to discuss principles with clarity. This 
being the case, it is forced to taste bitter fruit--including 
the various types of inconveniences that go along with Han 
Dongfang. 
  For Han Dongfang, I only hope that he has given a lot of 
thought to his place in society. If he only has a happy, 
patriotic desire, then he should go and do what he will do; if 
he wants to be the leader of a workers' movement for material 
benefits, he must first clearly understand the circumstances of 
China's industrial workers; if his ultimate goal is to be a 
social activist, a politician out of power, and then become a 
wielder of power, like China's Wang Zhen or Poland's Lech 
Walesa, having just experienced everything, this would also be 
one stage in his own revolutionary career, as well as not 
requiring too much grief. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40141 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Views Causes of `Labor Tide' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0249A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 11 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0249A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Zhongying (1728 0122 5391): Analysis and </F>
Projection by Concerned Department on Labor Migration: Causes 
Leading to "Labor Tide" Continue To Be of Concern"] 
  [Text] The concerned department, in a recent analysis and 
projection of the labor migration, concluded that the momentum 
of migrant laborers traveling during the Spring Festival period 
will not slacken and that causes leading to the "labor tide" 
still exist. 
  According to statistics of ten major labor exporting 
provinces (prefectures) such as Sichuan and Henan, the number of 
laborers emigrating under organized labor department sponsorship 
reached some 6 million persons; but based on sampling studies 
and statistical analyses, the number of laborers emigrating 
individually or without organized labor department sponsorship 
is estimated to be more than twice that number, i.e. some 12 
million persons; thus combining both categories, the total 
amounts to 18 million persons. When the number of laborers 
migrating from other provinces (prefectures) were included, the 
number of migrant laborers in China totals about 20 million. 
  In recent years, the direction of labor migration has 
concentrated on those areas considered to be the economic "hot 
spots." Based on preliminary analyses, the Zhujiang River Delta 
area has taken in about 6.5 million laborers from other 
provinces, the Shanghai-Nanjing-Hangzhou area approximately 1.2 
million, the two municipalities of Beijing-Tianjin approximately 
1.5 million and the Fujian coastal areas about 800,000 persons; 
therefore, the number of migrant laborers from other provinces 
who were drawn to the various economic hot-spot areas totalled 
some 10 million persons, accounting for about one-half of total 
migrant laborers. 
  The projection is that during the Spring Festival period, 
the 
momentum of labor migration will not slacken, and causes which 
lead to the "labor tide" remain operative: 
  First, the several highly productive areas of the Zhujiang 
River Delta, the Changjiang River Delta and the Beijing-Tianjin 
area are still China's economic "hot spots," and when the 
economies in other areas are cooling down, the former's 
attraction to laborers from other provinces not only has not 
diminished but has become stronger. 
  Second, it will take some time before the effect of measures 
taken to stabilize the rural areas and strengthen agriculture 
will be felt, and the peasants, influenced by the signals and 
relatively better economic benefits of the market, are therefore 
turning toward the economically developed areas, and this is a 
trend that cannot be reversed in the short term. 
  Third, in the interior area, some provinces have already 
used 
the exporting of surplus laborers as a "core enterprise" to 
invigorate the rural economy and help realize the goal of 
becoming "moderately well- off." That being the case, the number 
of surplus laborers exported is likely to increase. 
  This situation is certainly going to create even greater 
pressure on the already over-burdened railway transportation 
system. At present, the Guangdong Province's Labor and Railway 
Departments are making projections based on studies that in the 
period before and after next year's Spring Festival, more than 2 
million persons will be returning home in other provinces to 
visit relatives, an increase of 70 percent over this year's. If 
a 15 percent factor were added (to account for the new migrant 
laborers who will follow the old-timers when they return to 
Guangdong), then during the 30 days spanning the Spring 
Festival, the rail system will have to handle an estimated 4.3 
million travelers (2 million on the outbound and 2.3 million 
inbound). 
  Besides, even if only 50 percent of seasonal laborers were 
to 
travel home from the Beijing-Tianjin, Shanghai-Nanjing-Hangzhou 
and Fujian Province coastal areas, their total number will be 
some 2 million persons, and their roundtrip travels will add 
some 4 million travelers to the rail system. 
  Adding migrant laborers from other areas, it is estimated 
that in the period before and after the 1994 Spring Festival, a 
total of more than 10 million migrant laborers will be traveling 
on the road. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40142 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentator on Guiding "Labor Tide" </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0249B Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 11 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0249B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by this Newspaper's Commentator: "How Should We </F>
Regard the "Labor Tide"] 
  [Text] Hardly had the news media stopped publishing stories 
on labor migration at the beginning of the year, and the "sun" 
has yet to complete its 365-day cycle, the "labor tide" -- 
usually a hot topic when Spring Festival comes around next year 
-- has already come under heated discussion among the people. 
Shanghai calls it an emergency; the pressure on Guangdong is 
also considerable. 
  In recent years, more and more peasants have left their 
villages in the interior to work and make money in the Southeast 
coastal areas, and many of them would go home to visit relatives 
during the Spring Festival period and return to their work areas 
bringing others with them. This is called the "labor tide" 
because of the timing, scope and direction of the migration and 
numbers of migrating laborers involved. 
  Even though various sectors of society hold different views 
toward this "labor migration" question and offer different 
explanations for the phenomenon, there is one point which is 
beyond dispute: this kind of migration is necessary in a market 
economy; on the one hand, given the sluggish economic 
development in the interior, the surplus of peasant farmers and 
the scarcity of land, a great deal of surplus labor is available 
in the rural areas. On the other hand, with the economies of 
coastal areas developing rapidly, a labor shortage has 
developed, which can be met by migrant laborers from other 
areas. Peasants in the interior through migration can obtain 
employment; they not only support economic construction in the 
coastal areas, but also increase their own individual incomes, 
and this is a good thing for the individuals as well as the 
nation. 
  If this situation is inevitable and even advantageous, why 
is 
it that when the Spring Festival comes around each year all 
sectors of society pay such close attention, with some areas and 
concerned departments actually treating the situation as a 
crisis? The main reason is that the migration takes place on a 
large scale in a very limited time frame, and this exceeds the 
capacities of cities and transportation systems to handle the 
situation. 
  The railroads, the heart of China's transportation system, 
are normally operating at peak capacity; during the Spring 
Festival period in recent years, the railroads face the 
staggering burden of handling seasonally higher passenger 
traffic as well as the additional round-trip travels by massive 
numbers of migrant laborers. Some of the heavily travelled rail 
lines, such as the Beijing-Guangzhou line, the Beijing-Shanghai 
line, etc. which on average operate at 80 percent over-capacity, 
sometimes have to operate at 100-200 percent of capacity. The 
concerned department learned from a survey last year that over 
400 persons were jammed into one 116-passenger hard-seat rail 
car. Some of the laborers who could not get on the train and 
became stranded at intermediate stops of their journey generate 
additional pressure on the smaller cities and towns which are 
relatively backward in infrastructure facilities. It is said 
that several years ago when the labor tide started to pour into 
Guangzhou, the Governor, Mayor and other administrators of 
Guangdong had to hold emergency meetings to discuss the question 
of building toilets for the migrants. When large numbers of 
migrant laborers are held up in any locations, they also affect 
public security. 
  Two mutually contradictory questions therefore confront us 
at 
the same time: while we want to go with the trend of encouraging 
agriculture in the interior to cut down on surplus farm laborers 
and encouraging the latter to emigrate and to match up with 
production needs of the developing coastal areas; at the same 
time, we also want to maintain normal social order and to ensure 
stability in the society. 
  Let's face reality, we cannot give up eating because of a 
hiccup or two, and we can only make the following choices: 
rationally control the concentrated, large-scale migration of 
laborers, prevent or put a stop to unplanned migration and deal 
with the "labor tide" in a timely fashion by focusing on the 
positive features and minimizing the defects. At present, the 
concerned departments are united in their efforts to promote the 
drawing up of a labor cooperation agreement between Guangdong 
Province which takes in large numbers of migrant laborers and 
eight provinces (prefectures) such as Sichuan, which export 
large numbers of surplus laborers, to draw on Guangdong's 
experience in handling the labor tide to establish a system of 
regional labor cooperation agreements for East China and North 
China areas, and gradually to establish within China a basic 
system for handling multi-area migration of laborers that 
supports the market economy, the market information system and 
service network, in order to enable those areas which have 
relatively large-scale inflow and outflow migrations of farm 
laborers to achieve the goal of orderly rural labor migration. 
Therefore, the issues which urgently need to be addressed at 
present are projecting, guiding, and managing the direction and 
flow of the labor tide." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40143 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics Show Steady Wage `Increase' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0267A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 22 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0267A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Yunling (3769 0061 0407): "November Worker </F>
Increase Relatively Low"] 
  [Text] In line with deeper reform of the labor, personnel 
and allocation systems, in November the numerical increase in 
workers nationwide was relatively low while total wages rose 
steadily and maintained a rather high increase. 
  According to statistics, at the end of November the number 
of 
workers nationwide was 147.72 million, up 180,000 people from 
the end of October but still down 200,000 people from the end of 
1992. Growth in the number of workers at state-owned economic 
units and urban and rural collective economic units was slow 
while growth in the number of workers at various other economic 
units rose rather greatly. At the end of November the number of 
workers in the last category was 3.36 million people, up 540,000 
people over the end of 1992 and up 850,000 over the same period 
in 1992. In state-owned economic units the number of workers was 
108.84 million people, up 160,000 people over the end of October 
and down 60,000 people over the end of 1992, or basically the 
same as the end of October. In urban and rural collective 
economic units, the number of workers was 35.52 million people, 
down 690,000 people by the end of 1992, basically the same as 
the end of October. Besides greater flexibility of worker use 
in enterprises and ever stronger worker use mechanisms, the main 
reason for the rather slow recovery growth in the number of 
workers is the change which has occurred in people's choice of 
occupations in line with the transition toward a socialist 
market economy. There has been a non-stop increase in some 
surplus or terminated workers or workers who are retained with 
no salary who engage in indidivual operations or are reemployed 
by private enterprises. 
There is a steady increase in workers in the contract system 
of state-owned economic units. At the end of November, the 
number of such workers reached 22.31 million, up 1.72 million 
people from the end of 1992. The number of fixed workers was 74 
.07 million people, down 1.54 million people from the end of 
1992. The number of temporary workers and those used outside 
planning was 12.46 million people, down 240,000 people from the 
end of 1992. 
  In November, workers nationwide were issued 40.02 billion 
yuan in wages, up 7.8 billion yuan over the same period in 1992, 
or up 24.2 percent. Of this figure, state-owned units accounted 
for 31.3 billion yuan, up 6.0 billion yuan over the same period 
in 1992, or up 23.6 percent. Urban and rural collective economic 
units accounted for 7.18 billion yuan, up 1.1 billion yuan, or 
up 17.9 percent. Various other economic units accounted for 1.54 
billion yuan, up 750 million yuan, or nearly 100 percent. 
  Considering January to November as a whole, workers 
nationwide were issued 395.5 billion yuan, up 70.92 billion yuan 
over the same period in 1992, the highest point for accumulated 
wage growth in 1993. Of this figure, state-owned units rose 21.9 
percent, urban and rural collective economic units rose 15.1 
percent, and various other economic units rose 73.5 percent. 
Total wages continued to maintain a fairly high increase rate. 
The main reasons for this are: one, in 1993 material price 
inflation has been consistently rapid, accelerating wage 
increase; two, there has been a turn for the better in 
enterprise overall economic efficiency. Bonuses and subsidies 
correspondingly rose substantially. According to statistics, 
from January to November, as a whole nationwide workers were 
issued 81.44 billion yuan in bonuses, up 34.5 percent over the 
same period in 1992. State-owned units accounted for 67.07 
billion yuan of this figure, up 17.34 billion yuan over the same 
period in 1992, or up 35.1 percent. Allowances and subsidies 
accounted for 94.07 billion yuan, up 20.57 billion yuan over the 
same period in 1992, or up 28.0 percent. 
  Since 1993, worker wages nationwide have consistently 
maintained a fairly high growth rate. In some areas the pace of 
wage increases has consistently been lower than the national 
average due to sliding enterprise economic efficiency. 
Heilongjiang Province consistently has had China's lowest wage 
increase level. According to reports, four large complete coal 
mines, large-scale military industrial enterprises and forestry 
industry enterprises in Heilongjiang defaulted on approximately 
1.1 billion yuan in worker wages, seriously affecting workers' 
security and stability. Therefore, further deepening reform, 
accelerating the transformation of the operating mechanisms of 
state-owned enterprises, especially large- and medium-sized 
ones, will allow them to develop in a fair and rational market 
competition environment in a healthy manner. This is the key to 
fundamentally turning around the overly low growth in worker 
wages at large- and medium-size enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40144 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Anhui Transport Construction Makes Strides </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0242B Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 1 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0242B </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Building a High Speed, Highly Effective </F>
Transportation Network"] 
  [Text] Anhui has made giant 
strides in transport construction. According to preliminary 
statistics, in the first 10 months of 1993 a total investment of 
1.0018 billion yuan was spent on 11 key transport construction 
projects, up 115.54 percent over the same period in 1992. 
  In keeping with the aim of quickly and effectively building 
an integrated transport network, Anhui stresses construction of 
national railroad trunk lines and road hub network projects. At 
the same time it is strengthening north-south road connection 
capabilities and expanding roads towards the coast. The scale of 
projects is increasingly large and grades are ever more 
improved, an initial indication that a modernized transport 
network with a backbone of high quality roads is taking shape. 
  -- Regarding railroad construction: By the end of October, 
54.4 percent of the entire multiple track line roadbed in cubic 
meters of earth and stone within Anhui Province of the 
Beijing-Jiujiang railroad was completed; more than 80 percent of 
the bored pile design for five particularly large bridges on the 
Fuyang-Jiujiang line was finished; and 41 percent of the Fuyang 
hub in earth and stone cubic meters was done. Construction began 
on two particularly large bridges and 26 medium-sized bridges. 
Forty-four kilometers of principal track on the Fuyang-Huainan 
multiple track line were laid; the entire line can be running, 
within one year, attaining the goal of linking three areas. One 
hundred kilometers of the Hefei to Anqing section of the 
Hefei-Jiujiang were laid, reaching the town of Gaohebu. On the 
Hefei railroad hub, 560,000 earth and stone cubic meters have 
been worked. Work has begun on building 21 bridges and culverts 
and 28 medium-sized bridges. 
  -- Regarding highway construction: The first stage of the 
Hefei-Wuhu highway, a 52-km roadbed from Xiage to Shenjiaxiang, 
has been lain. The entire roadbed for the Hefei-Tongling 
first-grade highway restricted to vehicle use, linking Hefei, 
the coastal economic zone, and the Huang Shan and Jiuhua Shan 
tourist areas is done. All-out efforts are being invested in 
road surfacing. Recently the groundbreaking was held for the 
Dalong section of national highway 312. Seven of the eight main 
river piers for the Tongling-Chang Jiang highway bridge have 
emerged from the water and work is beginning on the 
superstructure. 
  -- Regarding airport construction: Anqing airport expansion 
has been examined and approved by the state. The Wuhu-Beijing 
airline officially began flying. The construction curtain was 
raised on the Fuyang airport. 
  -- Regarding harbor channel construction: With the Wuhu port 
as the "faucet" of Anhui's river coastal area, construction is 
intensifying on modernized harbors with Maanshan, Tongling, 
Shazhou and Anqing as the two wings. The Xin'anjiang region 
unified airline was arranged to build a new group of passenger 
and cargo wharves using French Government loans for the 
Xin'anjiang airline overall utilization development project. 
After it is built it will provide the conditions for developing 
Huang Shan tourism and coastal economic development. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40145 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Railroad Transportation Capacity Faces `Bottlenecks' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0242A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 29 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0242A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Shu (7115 6615): "Prominent `Bottlenecks' </F>
Restrict Railroad Transportation; Highway Transportation 
Capacity Relatively Overbuilt"] 
  [Text] Transportation has become a huge factor restricting 
acceleration of China's economic development. So, what is the 
actual restraint situation? This reporter recently learned from 
relevant sectors that the so-called transportation restriction 
refers only to the overall situation which varies greatly among 
various transportation industries. Taking railroad and highway 
transportation for example, railroad transportation 
"bottlenecks" are entirely prominent, while highway 
transportation is relatively overbuilt. 
  According to explanations by comrades related to railroad 
sectors, in recent years state expenditure has greatly 
accelerated railroad construction. At present 10 major railroad 
projects have fully entered the design and construction stage. 
In the first half of 1993 alone, investment reached 3.42 
billion yuan. The Lanzhou-Xinjiang multiple track, Hou-Yue line, 
Bao-Zhong line, Beijing-Zhengzhou electrification, and 
Nanning-Kunming lines have all entered a high tide of 
construction. However, railroad transportation still is severely 
stagnant because of many factors. In the short term the conflict 
of transportation capacity lagging behind economic development 
still is rather prominent. There are relatively great 
deficiencies, whether of freight or passenger transportation. 
According to relevant sectors, the first half of 1993 was one of 
the most serious periods ever for a shortage of railroad 
transportation. The average rate of satisfying of applications 
for rail carriages for freight use was around 40 percent, more 
than 10 percentage points below a normal year. It was hard to 
ensure transportation of some state plan and key commodities. 
For example, in May 162,000 tons of coal was under plan contract 
for use in the chemical industry nationwide. Actual arrangements 
were made for 87,000 tons and the actual amount transported was 
less than 80,000 tons. Transportation was a major external cause 
affecting shortages of state steel contracts in the steel 
industry nationwide. Economic development was unusually rapid 
in the southeast coastal area in 1993, and investment has 
doubled, creating a large volume of goods and passengers flowing 
southward, and meaning even more prominent already over-capacity 
Beijing-Guangdong and Beijing-Shanghai lines. Goods headed south 
for Guangdong can only be one-forth of applications. Many mining 
enterprises along some coastal lines have restricted or ceased 
production because there is no way to guarantee railroad 
carriages. The passenger transportation shortage situation also 
is extremely serious; main trunk lines commonly are more than 50 
percent over capacity. In some areas there is no choice but to 
scatter passengers by using commodity cars for travelers. 
  According to transportation sector explanations, in recent 
years the stress of highway construction mainly has been on 
roads for vehicle use to realize the goal of a nationwide "two 
vertical and two horizontal" network. The trend has been led by 
localities with central government assistance, full utilization 
of accumulated funds and loans, opening up a modernized highway 
transportation network. There have been great successes. 
Nevertheless, there is a relative shortage of passenger and 
commodity resources, road conditions are rather poor and highway 
transportation prices are too high compared to rail because of 
the rapid increase of vehicles in society. Transport capacity is 
relatively overbuilt, meaning severe waste. 
  According to statistics, in the first half of 1993 the 
quantity of civilian vehicles recovered throughout society had 
reached nearly 7.5 million units, a net increase of more than 
1.2 million units over the same period in 1992, a 19 percent 
increase rate. The corresponding passenger and freight 
transportation rates were 3.63 billion people and 3.86 billion 
tons, respectively, up only 5.2 percent and 6.4 percent over the 
same period in 1992. On the other hand, vehicle utilization 
rates dropped. According to a random survey by sectors concerned 
in the first half of 1993, cargo carrying vehicles had an 
average empty driving rate as high as 48.2 percent, up 4.8 
percent age points over the same period in 1992. Specialized 
transportation sector vehicle work rates were only 56 percent, 
down nearly 10 percentage points from the same period in 1992. 
Highway transport's advantages of being fast, convenient and 
flexible have yet to be developed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40146 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Officials Report on Xinjiang Highway Construction </TI></H3>
<H4>   NPC Vice Chairman on `Important Task' </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0268A Beijing ZHONGGUO JIAOTONG BAO in Chinese 23 Dec 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0268A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JIAOTONG BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "NPC Vice Chairman Tomur Dawamat Emphasizes That </F>
Highway Construction Is an Important Task in Xinjiang's 
Development"] 
  [Text] On 2 December 1993, NPC Vice Chairman Tomur Dawamat 
cut the ribbon for the opening to motor vehicle traffic of the 
second phase of National Highway No. 312, the Changji to Hutubi 
section. In a discussion with leading comrades from the 
provincial department of transportation, the Changji Autonomous 
Prefecture, and concerned departments of the Autonomous Region, 
he pointed out the need to definitely make highway construction 
an important task to be emphasized in Xinjiang's development. 
  He said that six of the eight highways turned over in 1993 
to 
the state by the Xinjiang Transportation Department were 
assessed as fine projects, being a great contribution. Highway 
construction in Xinjiang is particularly important, so must 
definitely be made an important task to be emphasized. In such a 
large place as Xinjiang, highways carry 84 percent of Xinjiang's 
freight and 97 percent of its passenger traffic. In Xinjiang, 
highway construction is a matter of economics, culture, and 
stability, with more and better-built roads strengthening unity 
among the people of all nationalities, thus being a blow against 
ethnic separatism. As 1995 will be the 40th anniversary of the 
founding of the Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous Region, we will need 
to put more energy and funding into building better roads to 
make Xinjiang more thriving and prosperous. 
  Tomur Dawamat inspected the second phase of the motor 
vehicle 
highway from Changji to Hutubi in the blowing snow, visiting 
with highway construction workers of all nationalities. The 
second phase of National Highway No. 312, the section from 
Changji to Hutubi, is 49.86 km long, being a westward extension 
after the first phase from Urumqi to Changji was completed and 
opened to traffic, and having been built in the five years 
beginning in September 1988 by the Xinjiang Transportation 
Department's Second Highway Construction Office. The 
Examination and Acceptance Commission has assessed it as a fine 
project. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40147 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Officials Report on Xinjiang Highway Construction </TI></H3>
<H4>   Transportation Director on `Achievements' </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0268B Beijing ZHONGGUO JIAOTONG BAO in Chinese 23 Dec 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0268B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO JIAOTONG BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xinjiang Transportation Department Director </F>
Yunusu Yusufu (0060 0505 2448 3768 4790 3940): "Despite the 
Heavy Responsibility, Development Is Advancing"] 
  [Text] In 1993, Xinjiang highway construction scored rich 
successes. In this one year, of the nine highway contruction 
projects in the National and Autonomous Region's 7th and 8th 
Five-Year Plans, eight were finished and put into use, with six 
of them being assessed as fine projects. This was a result of 
the attention and concern of the Ministry of Transportation and 
the Xinjiang Uygur Autonomous Regional People's Government, the 
support of the people of all nationalities in Xinjiang, and the 
hard work of tens of thousands of highway construction workers 
and officers and men of the People's Armed Police Transportation 
Unit. 
  Xinjiang is a vast territory where transportation used to be 
quite backward. But as reform and opening up has developed in 
depth, and China's western economic construction has taken off, 
the importance of highway construction in Xinjiang has become 
increasingly evident. The great northwest is a key region in 
China's productive forces layout in the transition to the new 
century, and a priority in China's "four border" strategic 
development, as Xinjiang sits on both borders and roadways, 
being located at the center of the new Eurasian land bridge, 
with over 60 countries and regions having developed 
"highway"-centered economic and trade exchanges, with Xinjiang 
as the relay station and the Central Asian inland business and 
trade center for joint development with the CIS and Eastern 
Europe of the Eurasian inland market. Xinjiang highway 
construction is a heavy responsibility with bright prospects, 
meaning that we will have to work even harder. 
  We are now actively planning the construction of a superior 
highway from Turpan to Urumqi to Dahuangshan. This will be 
Xinjiang's largest single highway construction project since 
liberation, with an estimated overall investment of 2.3 billion 
yuan, including a World Bank loan of $150 million, with the 
highway being 285.5 km long, divided into two sections, east and 
north. The east section will start at the mouth of Grape Ravine 
in Turpan on National Highway No. 312, ending at Ulabo Lake in 
Urumqi, being about 178.8 km long; the north section will start 
at the intersection of Xingfu Road at Dahuangshan in Fukang on 
National Highway No. 216, ending at the north mouth of Hetan 
Road in Urumqi, being about 107.7 km long, to be a key part of 
China's northwest highway system. The highway will pass through 
famous Xinjiang tourist sites such as Turpan and Tianchi, 
running along Xinjiang production bases for commodities such as 
coal, oil, industrial chemicals, iron and steel, and motor 
vehicles. It will play an enormous driving role in speeding up 
the industrial and agricultural production of these areas and in 
spurring economic development throughout Xinjiang. We have made 
conscientious early-stage preparations according to World Bank 
loan international project procedures, with the feasibility 
study report having successfully won State Planning Commission 
approval through examination and appraisal, the initial project 
design documents having been examined by the Ministry of 
Transportation, and an evaluation of the whole project by the 
World Bank Evaluation Delegation having been received. To ensure 
project progress and quality, we have adopted international 
bidding, with over 30 construction units having bought advance 
eligibility evaluation documents, the roadside work of land 
acquisition and demolition and removal already underway, and 
efforts being made to begin construction in the summer or fall 
of 1994. Meanwhile, we are emphasizing three highway 
construction projects, such as from Tianchi to Turpan Port, 
guaranteeing their total completion in 1994. While focusing our 
human and financial resources on superior highway construction 
project priorities, we will continue in 1994 to build highways 
such as National Highway No. 312's sections from Sailimu Lake to 
Qingshui River and from Hami to Barkol, in an effort to build 
more and better roads for Xinjiang's economic development. 
  As a review of the past year shows amazing achievements, we 
are looking to the future with full confidence. We will welcome 
the arrival of the new year with even more outstanding 
accomplishments. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40148 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Sugar Industry Unprofitable </TI></H3>
<H4>   Beet Production Declines </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0252A Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO in Chinese 2 Dec 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0252A </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Fan Baochang: "It Is Necessary To Form Policy </F>
Early in Order To Prevent Sugar-Related Fiscal Losses"] 
  [Text] This year is a year of greatly declining sugar 
production in our province. According to forecasts, procured 
beets have amounted to less than 3 million metric tons, 
representing a decline of 50 percent from the best year in 
history. Because of the raw material insufficiency, some 
sugar-making enterprises have become kitchens without rice, and 
have difficulty in surviving. Four sugar refineries, the 
Zhaodong, Zhaozhou, Bayan, and Binzhou, have been forced to 
suspend production. 
  Raw material insufficiencies have always been creating 
difficulties for the survival and development of our province's 
sugar industry; especially, some new refineries which have been 
established more recently have experienced even more prominent 
problems in this regard as their raw material areas are smaller. 
The raw material situation affects the present as well as the 
future; this year's raw material insufficiency not only 
constrains this year's production but will also affect next 
year's. 
  The overall factors responsible for this year's large 
decline 
in beet production: The first is the irrational beet price in a 
comparative sense. Our province's main cash crops are commonly 
called the "two kinds of dou and one kind of 
nodules," that is: soybeans, potatoes, and beets. Currently the 
per mu value of output of soybeans is 240-320 yuan; the per mu 
value of output of potatoes is 160-240 yuan; and the per mu 
value of output of beets is 124-186 yuan. In terms of the per mu 
value of output, there is a marked difference in price between 
beets on the one hand and soybeans and potatoes on the other. 
The sales price of sugar has now risen to 2,800-3,200 yuan per 
metric ton; the ratio of the raw material price to the finished 
product price appears to be very irrational. It is exactly 
because of this price factor that the sown acreage for soybeans 
is extremely large across our province, thereby seriously 
adversely affecting not only beets but also other cash crops and 
grain crops. 
  The second has been the error in the work of guiding public 
opinion. Early this year the General Sugar Group Corporation of 
the province put forward the argument for "being not afraid of 
three things"; one part of the argument was about being not 
afraid of peasants' not growing beets. The argument has produced 
some negative effects. Sugar-making enterprises have slackened 
beet production consciously or unconsciously, and peasants have 
also become dispirited and bitter. 
  The third has been local governments' administrative 
interference. In terms of the provincewide situation, the 
production of raw material for county-supervised sugar-making 
enterprises is generally in better shape than for 
province-supervised enterprises. This is because the difference 
between the situation of making profits and the situation of 
making losses in sugar-making enterprises is great. Thus if the 
enterprises do well, they can become a major fiscal pillar for 
the localities; but if they are in bad shape, they can become an 
unbearable burden. Therefore, with regard to methods of 
promoting raw material production, the localities have not only 
issued mandatory plans but also used some constraining means, 
trying every means to increase raw material production. 
  The fourth is that the problem of difficulty in selling 
beets 
has not been fundamentally resolved. In spring when beet 
production is being arranged and when sown acreage commitments 
are made, sugar refineries would call beet farmers honey 
brothers and sweet sisters, visiting the farmers during Spring 
Festival and delivering seeds and pesticides to their doors; but 
at the time when beets are procured, they would change their 
usual attitude, becoming rude and cold and using dirty methods 
to withhold part of the payments to beet farmers. The phenomenon 
of extorting money and objects has occurred form time to time. 
White slips have not been thoroughly eliminated. According to a 
source, the sugar front of the entire province still owes 160 
million yuan in white slip money. This year there is still a 
shortage of 624 million yuan in procurement funds. This means 
that more white slips will continue to be issued. If selling 
beets does not generate cash, how would peasants acquire 
enthusiasm for growing beets? 
  Over several years the sugar industry provincewide was all 
along in a predicament. There were many reasons for the 
situation. The main reason was that the sugar price was not 
proper. Now the price has grown gradually, and people at home 
and abroad are optimistic about the price, resulting in a good 
external environment for the development of the sugar industry. 
Nevertheless, beet production provincewide is now faced with a 
grave situation. A failure to take effective measures to rectify 
the situation will not only endanger the development of the 
sugar-making enterprises but also make it difficult for them 
just to survive. Resolving the raw material insufficiency is now 
an extremely urgent issue. 
  First, it is hereby suggested that the provincial government 
immediately adopt a policy on the procurement price of beets. 
Raising the procurement price of beets is inevitable. It is 
necessary to adopt a prudent attitude toward the question as to 
how much the price should be raised. If the damages to peasants' 
interests are underestimated, the enthusiasm for growing beets 
would still not be raised. But overestimation in this respect 
would produce a result unbearable to enterprises, and harm the 
state's interest. Only by properly setting the procurement price 
of beets would it be possible to take care of the interests of 
all three parties, thereby raising everyone's enthusiasm. Under 
usual circumstances, it is proper to have the beet procurement 
cost account for 50 percent of the sales price of sugar. If the 
sales price of sugar is 2,800 yuan, 3,000 yuan, or 3,200 yuan 
per metric ton, then it is proper to raise the beet price to 175 
yuan, 185 yuan, or 195 yuan per metric ton. A proper price ratio 
can play the role of directing and adjusting supply-and-demand 
relationships. A situation where the beet price changes with 
changes in the sugar price will certainly stimulate beet 
production, thereby meeting the needs of sugar-making 
enterprises. 
  Second, enterprise autonomy should be effectively 
implemented. According to a source, in recent years some 
refineries have formulated some homegrown policies in an effort 
to promote raw material production, adopting, for example, such 
preferential policies as those of supplying beet farmers with 
half-price seeds and paper tubes as well as free pesticides to 
be mixed with seeds, the practice of paying some service fees to 
county, township (town), and village cadres, etc. In 1992 the 
Yi'an Sugar Refinery implemented the new method of 
"reward-getting beet growing," distributing forms in spring, 
checking the cases in autumn, and giving the rewards at the end 
of the year. With 200,000 yuan, it bought peasant willingness to 
grow beets. In the spring of this year, although every refinery 
knew that the irrational price ratio would adversely affect 
peasants' enthusiasm for growing beets, no one would dare to 
raise the price by itself. 
  In view of the abovementioned situation, it is hereby 
suggested that the supervisory agencies delegate this power to 
enterprises, asking them to do their work boldly and proudly 
under the condition of having no misgivings. The belief is that 
they will discharge well their accounting responsibilities on 
the basis of consideration of their respective economic 
capabilities, and will not carry out loss-making operations. 
  Third, vigorously spread the use of the new technique of 
paper-tube seedling growing. This new technique was introduced 
from Japan. Over the several years, the refineries have spread 
the use, and produced substantial successful experience. But a 
new overall situation has yet to be created. There are mainly 
three reasons for that: the first is the belief that the 
investment is too large; the second is the belief that the labor 
input is too large; and the third is the failure of technical 
guidance to catch up. 
  As practice has proven, the new technique of paper-tube 
seedling growing provides a great potential for increasing 
yield. Under usual conditions, per mu yield can reach 
3,000-4,000 kg, equal to the 2 mu yield based on direct 
planting; in many instances, the yield is over 5,000 kg. 
According to calculations based on a procurement price of 185 
yuan per metric ton, the per mu value of output will be 555-740 
yuan, which will be more than three times the per mu value of 
output of soybeans. 
  Fourth, enhance the construction of the body of agricultural 
affairs officers. The ties and bridges between enterprises and 
the raw material areas are created through the work of 
agricultural affairs officers. The agricultural affairs officers 
of some old refineries maintain many fine traditions, which 
should now be advocated, restored, and developed. 
  Currently some agricultural affairs officers are complacent, 
and are not diligent. When they are arranging beet production in 
rural areas, they often stay in towns, exercising remote command 
through telephones. 
  Two qualities of agricultural affairs officers are urgently 
in need of improvement. It is necessary to formulate a code of 
conduct governing the work of agricultural affairs officers. The 
construction of the body of agricultural affairs officers should 
be managed in a routine, regularized, and standardized manner. 
  Fifth, be determined to resolve the problem of beet-selling 
difficulties. The problem of beet-selling difficulties is an old 
and difficult problem which people have wanted to resolve for 
many years but which has so far not been resolved in a 
satisfactory manner. Peasants hate the problem extremely. This 
problem has not only hurt peasants' enthusiasm for growing beets 
but also totally broken peasants' hearts. Therefore it is 
necessary to be determined to resolve the problem of 
beet-selling difficulties. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-40149 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar011___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-011 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heilongjiang Sugar Industry Unprofitable </TI></H3>
<H4>   Sugar Industry Declining </H4>
<F P=102> 94CE0252B Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO in Chinese 14 Dec 
93 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0252B </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by staff reporter Chen Xiaoping: "Our Sugar </F>
Industry Has Been Unprofitable Continuously Over the Years; Crop 
Growing Must Be Modernized"] 
  [Text] In recent years our sugar industry has been making 
losses continuously; the 1991-1992 sugar-making period saw a 
loss of 590 million yuan, and the 1992-1993 sugar-making period 
saw a loss of 259 million yuan. Based on the current situation, 
people have expressed many views on the causes of the sugar 
industry's loss in 1993-1994. It is generally believed that the 
main cause is the raw material insufficiency, that the cause of 
the raw material insufficiency is the peasants' unwillingness to 
grow beets, and the causes of peasants' unwillingness to grow 
beets include, firstly, the use of white slips, secondly, the 
selling difficulties, and, thirdly, the irrational price ratio. 
  Those views have some merits. The sugar industry 
provincewide 
needs roughly 6 million metric tons of beets each year. Last 
year 4.2 million metric tons of beets were procured; this year 
only 2.2 million metric tons can be procured, representing less 
than one-third of the processing capacity. This shows that the 
raw material insufficiency has developed to such a point that it 
must be resolved. For sure, problems such as being paid with 
white slips, selling difficulties, and low efficiency do exist. 
But, in my view, those do not constitute the essence of the 
issue. First, facts have proven that the sugar industry still 
makes losses even in years when there is sufficient raw 
material. During the 1991-1992 sugar-making period, 6.8 million 
metric tons of beets were procured, but the industry as a whole 
still incurred a loss of 590 million yuan. This shows that the 
sugar industry's losses are not completely caused by raw 
material insufficiencies. Of course, some may say that the 
situation in the 1991-1992 sugar-making period was special, 
because the beets' sugar content was low, with the content being 
only 13 percent which was 3 percentage points lower than in 
normal years. Such was not really the case. Even if the sugar 
content had been 16 percent, resulting in the production of an 
additional 200,000 metric tons of sugar, only 410 million yuan 
in losses would have been made up, according to calculations 
based on that year's sales price of 2,050 yuan per metric ton, 
and there would still have been a loss of 180 million yuan. 
Second, the problems of being paid with white slips and selling 
difficulties have been widespread problems in the procurement of 
agricultural and sideline products over the last dozen years or 
so but not problems peculiar to beet procurement, and therefore 
cannot explain why peasant's enthusiasm for growing beets has 
been especially low. Third, the view that the price ratio is 
irrational because the current net returns on beet growing are 
lower than on soybean or potato growing may not be scientific 
either. In fact, the beet procurement price of 155 yuan per 
metric ton is not low at all. Currently the arrival beet price 
(procurement price plus freight) is 220 yuan per metric ton on 
average. According to calculations based on the assumption that 
9 metric tons of beets are needed to make 1 metric ton of sugar, 
just the beet part of the cost of 1 metric ton of sugar will be 
1,980 yuan, which is already higher than the sugar price on the 
international market. As shown here, the beet price has reached 
the point that it can no longer be further raised in view of the 
comparison with the international market. 
  The fundamental cause of the problem is that the gap between 
the standard of our province's beet-growing industry and the 
average world standard is too large. At present, the average per 
mu yield of beets for the world is 4 metric tons, with the sugar 
content being around 20 percent, while the developed countries' 
per mu yield of beets can be as high as 5-6 metric tons. 
However, our province's per mu yield of beets has been kept 
around 1 metric ton ever since 1949, with the sugar content 
being around 14 percent. That is, in terms of quantity, a 4 mu 
plot in our country equals a 1 mu plot in those countries; in 
terms of quality, 3 metric tons of our beets equal 2 metric tons 
of their beets. In the past, the effort to raise peasants' 
enthusiasm for growing beets did not focus on increasing per 
unit area yield, but was consisted of repeated raising of the 
price. The price has been raised from 60 yuan per metric ton in 
1972 to 155 yuan per metric ton now, resulting in a price 
increase of 260 percent; but peasants still have no enthusiasm. 
We have now arrived at the end of the road of raising peasants' 
enthusiasm through raising the price, and a further price 
increase is sure to result in all sugar refineries being closed. 
Furthermore, in view of the current situation, an increase of a 
few dozen yuan in the per metric ton price of beets will not 
resolve the issue of peasants' enthusiasm. To make peasants 
achieve returns on beet growing equal or similar to returns on 
soybean growing, it would be necessary to increase the price by 
more than 100 percent in view of the current situation of per mu 
yield. But, such a price would be obviously unbearable to 
sugar-making enterprises. From a historical perspective, the 
comparatively high returns on soybean growing at the present 
time has not been entirely caused by a high price. In the 1970s 
the province's per mu yield of soybeans was only slightly more 
than 150 jin, but by 1992 the per mu yield had been raised to 
230 jin. If the per mu yield of soybeans had remained at the 
level of the 1970s, the per mu revenue, as calculated on the 
basis of the figure of 0.8 yuan per jin, would have been 35 yuan 
lower than the per mu revenue of beets. The comparatively high 
returns on soybean growing have been caused mainly by the 
increase in per unit area yield based on scientific and 
technological progress. 
  As demonstrated above, our provincial sugar industry's 
fundamental way to get out of the predicament is to modernize 
the beet-growing industry, so as to reach the average world 
standard as soon as possible. Only in this way would our 
provincial sugar industry be able to successfully enter the 
world market and remain undefeated in competition after our 
country's signatory state status in the GATT has been restored. 
Surely, raising per unit area yield would call for hard work, 
and is different from price increase which can be achieved 
through making a decision. But, increasing per unit area yield 
can produce the real effect of increasing the productive forces; 
price increase can alleviate immediate, urgent difficulties, but 
cannot fundamentally resolve the issue. It is necessary to 
utilize the foremost productive force in the effort to develop 
the productive forces. This approach represents not only the 
sugar industry's fundamental way to get out of the predicament 
but also the fundamental way to make our province's dairy, 
flax-growing, and wheat-growing industries embark on the road of 
benign development and improve their own efficiency. It is high 
time that our province did really hard work to develop the rural 
productive forces. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
